"A" IN COLLEGE: (Here's former NFL star Kevin Greene)  I played for the Tigers of this Alabama school whose name is also a color
Auburn
Counties1 Birmingham-Hoover1,143,772 Bibb, Blount, Chilton, Jefferson, St. Clair, Shelby, Walker2 Huntsville441,086 Limestone, Madison3 Mobile415,123 Mobile4 Montgomery373,141 Autauga, Elmore, Lowndes, Montgomery5 Tuscaloosa237,761 Hale, Pickens, Tuscaloosa6 Daphne-Fairhope200,111 Baldwin7 Auburn-Opelika154,255 Lee8 Decatur153,084 Lawrence, Morgan9 Dothan148,095 Geneva, Henry, Houston10 Florence-Muscle Shoals147,639 Colbert, Lauderdale11 Anniston-Oxford-Jacksonville115,916 Calhoun12 Gadsden103,531 EtowahTotal3,633,514
3
The center of population of Alabama is located in Chilton County, outside the town of Jemison.
It was formally recognized by the state legislature on January 25, 1844.
Similarly many metropolitan and suburban counties are majority-Republican and elections are effectively decided in the Republican Primary, although there are exceptions.
AFRICAN CUISINE: Granular semolina goes by this name which is also the name of a stew made in Morocco, Algeria & Tunisia
couscous
Cuisine  thumb|A Couscous based Salad Algerian cuisine is rich and diverse.
3
This not only prompted the Bedouins to leave, but the Fatimidtreasury even gave them a light expatriation cash allowance.
Autonomous tribal states were tolerated, and the regency's authority was seldom applied in the Kabylie.
They also did a brisk business in ransoming some of the captives.
AFRICAN GEOGRAPHY: M'zab, Tanezrouft & Suf are regions of this desert in Algeria
Sahara Desert
South of the Tell Atlas is a steppe landscape ending with the Saharan Atlas; farther south, there is the Sahara desert.
3
Almost all of this population left during the war of independence or immediately after its end.
In addition, several football clubs have won continental and international trophies as the club ES Sétif or JS Kabylia.
Access to "improved water sources" was limited to 92% of the population in urban areas and 80% of the population in rural areas.
EDUCATION: The 1st schools in Alaska were established in the 1820s by this country
Russia
To the west and south is the Pacific Ocean, with Russia (specifically, Chukotka Autonomous Okrug and Kamchatka Krai) farther west across the Bering Strait.
3
Statehood supporters also found themselves fighting major battles against political foes, mostly in the U.S. Congress but also within Alaska.
These operations originated from the demand for customized transport to remote areas.
Craig  City  1,201 60  Diamond Ridge  CDP  1,156 61  Salcha  CDP  1,095 62
EARTHQUAKES: The USA's most powerful quake occurred in 1964 in Alaska on this Christian holiday also associated with a quake
Good Friday
thumb|left|upright|Kodiak, before and after the tsunami which followed the Good Friday earthquake in 1964, destroying much of the townsite.
3
The climate of the interior of Alaska is subarctic.
Employment is primarily in government and industries such as natural resource extraction, shipping, and transportation.
organized list of topics about Alaska  Sports in Alaska  References  External links     Alaska's Digital Archives  Alaska Inter-Tribal Council       US federal government  Alaska State Guide from the Library of Congress  Energy & Environmental Data for Alaska  USGS real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of Alaska  US Census Bureau  Alaska State Facts  Alaska Statehood Subject Guide from the Eisenhower Presidential Library  Alaska Statehood documents, Dwight D. Eisenhower Presidential Library   Alaska state government  State of Alaska website  Alaska State Databases – Annotated list of searchable databases produced by Alaska state agencies and compiled by the Government Documents Roundtable of the American Library Association.
NATIONAL PARK PLACE: The largest national park outside Alaska, Death Valley National Park in this state is over 3 million acres
California
Counting territorial waters, Alaska is larger than the combined area of the next three largest states: Texas, California, and Montana.
3
It is the most perfect volcanic cone on Earth, even more symmetrical than Japan's Mount Fuji.
The state capital, Juneau, is not accessible by road, only a car ferry, which has spurred several debates over the decades about moving the capital to a city on the road system, or building a road connection from Haines.
Mushers from all over the world come to Anchorage each March to compete for cash, prizes, and prestige.
"LAST" CHANCE: It's Alaska's nickname
"The Last Frontier"
State motto: North to the Future  Nicknames: "The Last Frontier" or "Land of the Midnight Sun" or "Seward's Icebox"  State bird: willow ptarmigan, adopted by the Territorial Legislature in 1955.
3
Alaska is larger than all but 18 sovereign countries.
Effectively, the corporations hold title (including subsurface title in many cases, a privilege denied to individual Alaskans) but cannot sell the land.
Most food in Alaska is transported into the state from "Outside", and shipping costs make food in the cities relatively expensive.
OHIOANS: This Ohioan was Teddy Roosevelt's veep & lent his name to a city in Alaska
Fairbanks
Fairbanks is the only large city in the region.
3
Alaska's At-large congressional district is one of the largest parliamentary constituencies in the world.
Hooper Bay  City  1,093 63  Farm Loop  CDP  1,028 64
Due to the varied terrain and wide scope of the Troopers' duties, they employ a wide variety of land, air, and water patrol vehicles.
OFFICIAL STATE THINGS: Oh, deer!This is Alaska's state land mammal
Moose
Hunting for subsistence, primarily caribou, moose, and Dall sheep is still common in the state, particularly in remote Bush communities.
3
М., 1992.
Economic Impact of Alaska's Visitor Industry.
No state has voted for a Democratic presidential candidate fewer times.
ALASKA: Alaska's Malaspina one of these ice formations, covers an area larger than Rhode Island
a glacier
thumb|The  (named after Tustumena Glacier) is one of the state's many ferries, providing service between the Kenai Peninsula, Kodiak Island and the Aleutian Chain.
3
Religious affiliation in Alaska (2014) Affiliation% of population Christian |-
A sales tax for the FNSB has been voted on many times, but has yet to be approved, leading law makers to increase taxes dramatically on goods such as liquor and tobacco.
Suicide rates for rural residents are higher than urban.
HEALTH & MEDICINE: Strains of this respiratory viral infection are named for their places of origin, like Asia & Hong Kong
Flu
However, the lowlands did not have enough open grasslands to support a large horsebound force; for this and other reasons, the nomads who conquered states in China, India, and the Middle East often found themselves adapting to the local, more affluent societies.
3
Prior to then in the Bronze Age the records of the Assyrian Empire, the Hittite Empire and the various Mycenaean states of Greece mention a region undoubtedly Asia, certainly in Anatolia, including if not identical to Lydia.
A 2013 study by the International Crops Research Institute for the Semi-Arid Tropics (ICRISAT) aimed to find science-based, pro-poor approaches and techniques that would enable Asia's agricultural systems to cope with climate change, while benefitting poor and vulnerable farmers.
146,573 11,458 Stepanakert  20px Northern CyprusNorthern Cyprus is a state with limited recognition.
RICH COUNTRY, POOR COUNTRY: More than 80% of Angola's GDP stems from the production of this resource; much is found offshore
oil
Following negotiations held in Portugal, itself experiencing severe social and political turmoil and uncertainty due to the April 1974 revolution, Angola's three main guerrilla groups agreed to establish a transitional government in January 1975.
3
Although the political situation of the country began to stabilize, regular democratic processes were not established before the Elections in Angola in 2008 and 2012 and the adoption of a new Constitution of Angola in 2010, all of which strengthened the prevailing Dominant-party system.
Mincultura.gv.ao.
2005 Findings on the Worst Forms of Child Labor.
MUSEUMS: The Amsterdam house where this diarist & her family hid during WWII has been a museum since 1960
Anne Frank
Famous Amsterdam residents included Anne Frank the diarist, the artists Rembrandt van Rijn and Vincent van Gogh and the philosopher Baruch Spinoza.
3
The city has many open squares (plein in Dutch).
The fifteenth, Westpoort, covers the harbour of Amsterdam and had very few residents.
Car Amsterdam was intended in 1932 to be the hub, a kind of Kilometre Zero, of the highway system of the Netherlands, with freeways numbered One to Eight planned to originate from the city.
ART: Many Rembrandt masterpieces hang in this "national museum" in Amsterdam
Rijksmuseum
Amsterdam's main attractions, including its historic canals, the Rijksmuseum, the Van Gogh Museum, Stedelijk Museum, Hermitage Amsterdam, Anne Frank House, Amsterdam Museum, its red-light district, and its many cannabis coffee shops draw more than 5 million international visitors annually.http://www.parool.nl/parool/nl/4/AMSTERDAM/article/detail/3975968/2015/04/23/Amsterdam-verwelkomde-in-2014-ruim-5-miljoen-buitenlandse-toeristen.dhtml  History  Etymology thumb|left|The Oude Kerk was consecrated in 1306.
3
The medieval and colonial age canals of Amsterdam, known as Grachten, embraces the heart of the city where homes have interesting gables.
It offers previews of many different artists, such as musicians and poets, who perform on podia.
City government  As with all Dutch municipalities, Amsterdam is governed by a directly elected municipal council, a municipal executive board and a mayor (burgemeester).
GRAY LIKE MY PERSONALITY: Elisha Gray was involved in a legal battle with Alexander Graham Bell over the invention of this device
the telephone
His research on hearing and speech further led him to experiment with hearing devices which eventually culminated in Bell being awarded the first U.S. patent for the telephone in 1876.
3
In 1868, not long before he departed for Canada with his family, Bell completed his matriculation exams and was accepted for admission to the University of London.
Gray had reinvented the variable resistance telephone, but Bell was the first to write down the idea and the first to test it in a telephone.
Later developments Continuing his experiments in Brantford, Bell brought home a working model of his telephone.
2008 BLOCKBUSTER MOVIES: When does 22 equal 600 million?  This film's 22 ABBA hits helped it rake in $600 million
Mamma Mia!
In 1999, ABBA's music was adapted into the successful musical Mamma Mia!
3
The group also enjoyed significant success in Latin American markets, and recorded a collection of their hit songs in Spanish.
Andersson released his third album BAO 3 in October 2007, of new material with his band BAO and vocalists Helen Sjöholm and Tommy Körberg, as well as playing to full houses at two of Sweden's largest concert venues in October and November 2007, with an audience of 14,000.
She became chairperson for this organisation from 1992 to 1995.
ALBERT CAMUS: In an influential essay, Camus compared the human condition to the Greek myth of this rock pusher
Sisyphus
In the same year he finished his first books, The Stranger and The Myth of Sisyphus.
3
His views contributed to the rise of the philosophy known as absurdism.
But, his personal understanding of the world (e.g., "a benign indifference", in The Stranger), and every vision he had for its progress (e.g., vanquishing the "adolescent furies" of history and society, in The Rebel) undoubtedly set him apart.
But Camus wants to know if he can live with what logic and lucidity has uncovered – if one can build a foundation on what one knows and nothing more.
FICTIONAL DETECTIVES: The first detective created by Agatha Christie
Hercule Poirot
She also wrote six romances under the name Mary Westmacott, but she is best known for the 66 detective novels and 14 short story collections that she wrote under her own name, most of which revolve around the investigative work of such characters as Hercule Poirot, Jane Marple, Parker Pyne, Harley Quin/Mr Satterthwaite and Tommy and Tuppence Beresford.
3
She eventually made friends with a group of other girls in Torquay, and she noted that "one of the highlights of my existence" was her appearance with them in a youth production of Gilbert and Sullivan's The Yeomen of the Guard, in which she played the hero, Colonel Fairfax.
Upon Hicks' death, also at age 85 like her mother, on 28 October 2004, both this and the Greenway Estate passed to Christie's grandson, Mathew Prichard.
Around the World with the Queen of Mystery, a collection of correspondence from her 1922 Grand Tour of the British empire, including South Africa, Australia, New Zealand, and Canada.
BIRTHSTONES... MEET THE BIRTHSTONES: Jim Brady was born on August 12, 1856 but April would have been more appropriate, with this as its stone
diamond
April's birthstone is the diamond.
3
Movable observances Ulcinj Day – first Saturday in April Opening Day – first Sunday in April Good Friday (Christians)
(In Japan the school year and fiscal year start on April 1.)
April 29 is a Japanese national holiday, as Shōwa Day since 2007.
THE BOOK OF THE YEAR: "All Stations! Distress! April 15, ____"
1912
1907 – Triangle Fraternity is founded at the University of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign 1912 –
3
Henry James, American-English author (d. 1916) 1851 – Ponnambalam Ramanathan, Sri Lankan lawyer and politician, 3rd Solicitor General of Sri Lanka (d. 1930) 1856 – Jean Moréas, Greek poet and critic (d. 1910) 1858 – Émile Durkheim, French sociologist, psychologist, and philosopher (d. 1917) 1861 – Bliss Carman, Canadian-American poet and playwright (d. 1929) 1874 –
Godfrey Stafford, English-South African physicist and academic (d. 2013)   1920   –
– Chris Cates, American baseball player   1985   – John Danks, American baseball player   1985   – Ryan Hamilton, Canadian ice hockey player   1985   – Aaron Laffey, American baseball player   1985   – Amy Ried, American porn actress and director   1985   – Diana Zubiri, Filipino actress 1986
WORD ORIGINS: In Homer, Athena takes the form of this old friend of Odysseus to advise Odysseus' young son
Mentor
Her guiding actions reinforce her role as the "protectress of heroes" or as mythologian Walter Friedrich Otto dubbed her the "goddess of nearness" due to her mentoring and motherly probing.
3
Athena puts the infant Erichthonius into a small box (cista) which she entrusts to the care of three sisters, Herse, Pandrosus, and Aglaulus of Athens.
This woman was Helen, who was, unfortunately for Paris, already married to King Menelaus of Sparta.
Pallas Athena is the tutelary goddess of the international social fraternity Phi Delta Theta.
THE 5 BOOKS OF MOSES: Sarah's handmaid bore Abraham this son & was told, "His hand will be against every man"
Ishmael
Abraham was extremely wealthy and powerful, but his wife Sarah was barren, so his servant Eliezer, and Ishmael the son of Sarah's handmaid Hagar might have been candidates to inherit him.
3
Also, Melchizedek king of Salem (Jerusalem), a priest of God Most High, brought out bread and wine and blessed Abraham and God.
Along the way, Isaac asked his father where the animal for the burnt offering was, to which Abraham replied "God will provide himself a lamb for a burnt offering".
The title refers to The Cave of the Patriarchs.
MUSIC APPRECIATION: Despite her deafness, Evelyn Glennie, born near Aberdeen in this country, is a world-famous percussionist
Scotland
Aberdeen (;  ;  ; ) is Scotland's third most populous city, one of Scotland's 32 local government council areas and the United Kingdom's 37th most populous built-up area, with an official population estimate of 196,670 for the city of Aberdeen itself and 228,990 for the local authority area.
2
There is also a boat race held every year between AUBC and RGUBC.
Ambulance: The North East divisional headquarters of the Scottish Ambulance Service is located in Aberdeen.
MAIDS IN GREEK MYTH: Queen of the Amazons, her marvelous girdle was taken by Hercules
Hippolyta
Notable queens of the Amazons are Penthesilea, who participated in the Trojan War, and her sister Hippolyta, whose magical girdle, given to her by her father Ares, was the object of one of the labours of Hercules.
3
It may be derived from an Iranian ethnonym *ha-mazan- "warriors", a word attested as a denominal verb in Hesychius of Alexandria's gloss  (": 'to make war' in Persian") and which also appears together with the Indo-Iranian root *kar- "make" in Sanskrit karma.
Orithyia, daughter and successor of Marpesia, famous for her conquests.
, the group consists of 150 women.
NATIONAL PARKS: The bathhouses on Bathhouse Row in this Arkansas park were modeled on those in Europe
Hot Springs
The government shifted the state Confederate capital to Hot Springs, and then again to Washington from 1863-1865, for the remainder of the war.
3
The per capita personal income in 2010 was $36,027, ranking forty-fifth in the nation.
Arkansas gained twelve spots in the best state for business rankings since 2011.
Sutherlin 1996, p. 17.
NATIONAL FORESTS: The northernmost of Arkansas' national forests shares its name with these mountains in the area
the Ozarks
Geography  thumb|right|View from the Ozark Highlands Scenic Byway in Boxley Valley thumb|right|The Ozarks: bend in the Buffalo River from an overlook on the Buffalo River Trail near Steel Creek right|thumb|The flat terrain and rich soils of the Arkansas Delta near Arkansas City are in stark contrast to the northwestern part of the state.
3
No mechanized vehicles nor developed campgrounds are allowed in these areas.
Climate right|thumb|Devil's Den State Park is a popular state park in Washington County for enjoying autumn foliage.
The most enduring icon of Arkansas's hillbilly reputation is The Arkansas Traveller, a painted depiction of a folk tale from the 1840s.
CAMPBELL SOUP: This singer of "Wichita Lineman" fame was born to an Arkansas sharecropping family
Glen Campbell
Arkansas's enduring image has earned the state "a special place in the American consciousness", but it has in reality produced such prominent figures as politician and educational advocate William Fulbright, former President Bill Clinton, former NATO Supreme Allied Commander General Wesley Clark, Walmart magnate Sam Walton singer-songwriters Johnny Cash and Glen Campbell, and noted physicist William L. McMillan, who was a pioneer in superconductor research.
3
The Delta region is bisected by an unusual geological formation known as Crowley's Ridge.
Arkansas's current rate of change, age distributions, and gender distributions mirror national averages.
After 2010, Republican strength expanded further to the Northeast and Southwest and into the Little Rock suburbs.
COMPARATIVE LIT: Of the Greek tragedy trinity Aeschylus, Sophocles & him, he was the least honored in his time
Euripides
He is also the first whose plays still survive; the others are Sophocles and Euripides.
3
Other sources claim that an angry mob tried to kill Aeschylus on the spot, but he fled the scene.
It opens with the arrival of a messenger in Susa, the Persian capital, bearing news of the catastrophic Persian defeat at Salamis to Atossa, the mother of the Persian King Xerxes.
In the Republic, Plato quotes the line "God plants a fault in mortals when he wills to destroy a house utterly."
ASTROLOGY: There are this many houses in the astrological subdivision
12
In the 12th century, Arabic texts were imported to Europe and translated into Latin.
3
Alexander the Great's conquest of Asia allowed astrology to spread to Ancient Greece and Rome.
For these reasons Thagard views astrology as pseudoscience.
The composer Colin Matthews wrote an eighth movement entitled Pluto, the Renewer, first performed in 2000.
MILITARY MATTERS: The ABC weapons are atomic, biological & this
Chemical
But Conservative, 2008 Canadian political campaign  Association of British Counties, of historic counties  Religion  American Baptist Convention, former name of American Baptist Churches USA  Association of Baptist Churches in Ireland, in Ireland and the United Kingdom  Other organizations  Afrikan Black Coalition, a University of California student organization  Aircraft Builders Council, a provider of aviation products liability insurance  American Bowling Congress, now part of the United States Bowling Congress  Indianapolis ABCs, a 1900s Negro league baseball team  Places  ABC Islands (Alaska), Admiralty Island, Baranof Island, and Chichagof Island  ABC islands (Lesser Antilles), Aruba, Bonaire, and Curaçao  ABC nations, Argentina, Brazil, and Chile  ABC Region, an industrial area outside of São Paulo, Brazil  Academia Británica Cuscatleca, a school in Santa Tecla, El Salvador  Altnabreac railway station, Scotland, by National Rail code  Publications and media  ABC (Audit Bureau of Circulations UK), a circulation-auditing organization in the UK and Ireland  ABC (newspaper), a Spanish newspaper founded in 1903  Alphabet book, any of several children's books depicting the alphabet  America's Best Comics, an imprint of DC Comics  Audit Bureau of Circulations (India), a circulation-auditing organization in the India  Audit Bureau of Circulations (North America), a circulation-auditing organization in North America  Diario ABC Color, a Paraguayan newspaper founded in 1967  Technology  ABC dry chemical, a fire extinguishing agent  ABC weapon or weapon of mass destruction  Aerial bundled cable, for power lines  Transport  Cars  ABC (1906 automobile), an American car  ABC (1920 automobile), an English car  ABC (1922 automobile), a planned American car  ABC Motors, an English manufacturer of aircraft, aero engines and cars  Active Body Control, a type of automobile suspension technology  Others  ABC motorcycles  Advance Booking Charter, a type of air travel  Automatic Buffer Couplers, railway couplers  Other uses  ABC Futebol Clube, a football (soccer) club based in Natal, Rio Grande do Norte, Brazil  Air batu campur, also known as ais kacang, a Malaysian dessert  Alcoholic beverage control, US; ABC board may run ABC stores  Alien big cat, large feline outside its indigenous range  Alphabet, and metaphorically the fundamentals of any subject (e.g. "the ABC[s] of finance")
2
ABC are the first three letters of the Latin script known as the alphabet.
ABC model of flower development, a genetic model  ABC strategy for "Abstinence, be faithful, use a condom", a sex-education strategy  Abortion–breast cancer hypothesis, a posited connection between breast cancer and abortion  Aneurysmal bone cyst, a kind of lesion  ATP-binding cassette transporter, a transmembrane protein  Mathematics  abc conjecture, a concept in number theory  ABC formula  Approximate Bayesian computation, a family of statistical techniques  Music  Songs and albums  ABC song (disambiguation)  "ABC" (Anna Book song), from 1986  ABC (Jin album), a 2007 album by Chinese-American rapper Jin  "ABC" (Jin song), the title song  ABC (Kreidler album), a 2014 album by Kreidler  ABC (The Jackson 5 album), a 1970 album by The Jackson 5  "ABC" (The Jackson 5 song), the title song  "ABC" (The Pipettes song)  "ABCs" (song), a single on the album Troubadour by rapper K'naan  Alphabet song, or "the ABCs"  Groups  ABC (band), a UK New Wave band  A.B.C-Z (A.B.C. till 2008), a Japanese boyband managed by Johnny's and Associates  Acid Black Cherry, a Japanese Rock band  Alien Beat Club, a Danish pop band  Another Bad Creation, an American R&B and rap musical group  Other music  ABC Classics, an Australian record label  ABC notation, a musical notation language  ABC Records, an American record label  O2 ABC Glasgow, a music venue  Organizations  Ornithology  African Bird Club, a British ornithological charity  American Bird Conservancy  Australian Bird Count, a project of the Royal Australasian Ornithologists Union  Politics  All Basotho Convention, a political party in Lesotho  Americans Battling Communism, founded 1947  Anarchist Black Cross, political organization  Anything
LAKES & RIVERS: Regular steamship service is available on this river from Cairo to Aswan
Nile
Aswan is a busy market and tourist centre located just north of the Aswan Dams on the east bank of the Nile at the first cataract.
2
They believed that it was seated immediately under the tropic, and that on the day of the summer solstice, a vertical staff cast no shadow.
Averages high temperatures are consistently above  during summer (June, July, August and also September) while averages low temperatures remain above .
HOLIDAYS & OBSERVANCES: A miss, hoping to be a mrs., might want to observe this November holiday created by Al Capp
Sadie Hawkins Day
The real powers in America are women—the wives and sweethearts behind the masculine dummies..."  Highlights of the 1950s included the much-heralded marriage of Abner and Daisy Mae in 1952, the birth of their son "Honest Abe" Yokum in 1953, and in 1954, the introduction of Abner's enormous, long lost kid brother Tiny Yokum, who filled Abner's place as a bachelor in the annual Sadie Hawkins Day race.
3
He also wrote the comic strips Abbie an' Slats (in the years 1937–45) and Long Sam (1954).
Web page at Bridgeport Central High School devoted to Al Capp
According to comics historian Coulton Waugh, a 1947 poll of newspaper readers who claimed they ignored the comics page altogether revealed that many confessed to making a single exception: Li'l Abner. "When Li'l Abner made its debut in 1934, the vast majority of comic strips were designed chiefly to amuse or thrill their readers.
THE 50 STATES: The name of this state is from an Aleut word meaning "Great Land"
Alaska
The Aleut people () (), also referred to as the "Unangan", are the indigenous people of the Aleutian Islands of Alaska, United States and Kamchatka Krai, Russia.
3
The leading Aleuts negotiated with the Russians, saying they had failed to deliver enough supplies in return for furs.
The bone tip is fastened to a length of braided twine meanwhile; the hunter held the other end of the twine in his hand.
Reedy-Maschner, Katherine. "Aleut Identities : Tradition and Modernity in an Indigenous Fishery".
A LOSING BATTLE: In 1798 Admiral Brueys & the French lost big in the battle of this river near Alexandria
Nile
Its low elevation on the Nile delta makes it highly vulnerable to rising sea levels.
3
The wealth underground is doubtlessly immense; but despite all efforts, there is not much for antiquarians to see in Alexandria outside the museum and the neighborhood of “
Route 6 starts at Sidi Gaber El Sheikh in the outer route between Sporting and Mostatfa Kamel.
Sports thumb|Alexandria Stadium thumb|Borg El Arab Stadium  The main sport that interests Alexandrians is football, as is the case in the rest of Egypt and Africa.
2000 CALENDARS: Amcal has a wall calendar featuring ads & slogans from this Atlanta-based soft drink company
Coca-Cola
Atlanta contains the country's third largest concentration of Fortune 500 companies, and the city is the global headquarters of corporations such as The Coca-Cola Company, The Home Depot, Delta Air Lines, AT&T Mobility, Chick-fil-A, UPS, and Newell-Rubbermaid.
3
City of Sandy Springs.
Contemporary art museums include the Atlanta Contemporary Art Center and the Museum of Contemporary Art of Georgia.
In 2011, the New York Times characterized Empire State South and Miller Union as reflecting "a new kind of sophisticated Southern sensibility centered on the farm but experienced in the city."
CIVIL WAR PEOPLE: In early September 1864 this general ordered all the civilians out of Atlanta
Sherman
The region surrounding Atlanta was the location of several major army battles, culminating with the Battle of Atlanta and a four-month-long siege of the city by the Union Army under the command of General William Tecumseh Sherman.
2
Atlanta has played a major or contributing role in the development of various genres of American music at different points in the city's history.
The team moved to Atlanta in 1968, and they currently play their games in Philips Arena."A Franchise Rich With Tradition:
SCARFACE: Not exactly "Man of the Year", Al Capone appeared controversially on a 1930 cover of this magazine founded in 1923
Time
Ralph ran the bottling companies (both legal and illegal) early on, and was also the front man for the Chicago Outfit for some time until he was imprisoned for tax evasion in 1932.
2
He did not even have a bank account, but always used Western Union for cash delivery, not more than $1,000.The Real Story: The Untouchables, Smithsonian Channel (2009 Documentary)   Political alliances
Film and television Capone has been portrayed on screen by: Rod Steiger in Al Capone (1959).
BILL CLINTON: Bill Clinton met Hillary Rodham while both were attending this law school
Yale
Both Clintons earned law degrees from Yale Law School, where they met and began dating.
3
While campaigning for U.S. President, the then Governor Clinton returned to Arkansas to see that Ricky Ray Rector would be executed.
thumb|General John P. Jumper, U.S. Air Forces in Europe commander, escorts Clinton upon his arrival to Ramstein Air Base, Germany, May 5, 1999.
Clinton and Blair: the political economy of the third way (Routledge, 2007)  Renshon; Stanley A. "The Polls: The Public's Response to the Clinton Scandals, Part 1: Inconsistent Theories, Contradictory Evidence" Presidential Studies Quarterly, Vol.
BIBLE GUYS: He says, "I will now turn aside, and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt"
Moses
Torah  The Torah (תּוֹרָה) is also known as the "Five Books of Moses" or the Pentateuch, meaning "five scroll-cases".
3
University Press of America, 2005  The poetic books In Masoretic manuscripts (and some printed editions), Psalms, Proverbs and Job are presented in a special two-column form emphasizing the parallel stichs in the verses, which are a function of their poetry.
He adds that the earliest Christians also searched those same Hebrew scriptures in their effort to understand the earthly life of Jesus.
The text of the New Testament: an introduction to the critical 1995 p52 "The New Testament was written in Koine Greek, the Greek of daily conversation.
NOTES TO FUTURE CONTESTANTS: It may have 22 chapters, but this last book of the Bible doesn't have an "s" at the end of its name, so don't add one
Revelation
The Torah contains the commandments of God, revealed at Mount Sinai (although there is some debate among traditional scholars as to whether these were all written down at one time, or over a period of time during the 40 years of the wanderings in the desert, while several modern Jewish movements reject the idea of a literal revelation, and critical scholars believe that many of these laws developed later in Jewish history).Mordecai Kaplan 1934 Judaism as a Civilization MacMillan PressElliot N. Dorff 1979 Conservative Judaism: Our Ancestors to Our Descendants.
3
Christian use of the term can be traced to c. 223 CE.
It has been proposed, and is thought highly likely by scholars, that "Esdras B" – the canonical Ezra–Nehemiah – is Theodotion's version of this material, and "Esdras A" is the version which was previously in the Septuagint on its own.
In the case of manuscripts that were sold commercially, the writing would “undoubtedly have been discussed initially between the patron and the scribe (or the scribe’s agent,) but by the time that the written gathering were sent off to the illuminator there was no longer any scope for innovation.”De Hamel, Christopher.
"TRANS" MISSION: This highway extends almost 5,000 miles from St. John's, Newfoundland to Victoria, British Columbia, eh
Trans-Canada Highway
In 1960, the government established BC Ferries as a crown corporation, to provide a marine extension of the provincial highway system, also supported by federal grants as being part of the Trans-Canada Highway system.
3
The province's most populous city is Vancouver, which is located at the confluence of the Fraser River and Georgia Strait, in the southwest corner of the mainland (an area often called the Lower Mainland).
thumb|Internment camp for the Japanese Canadians during World War II  The advent of prohibition in the United States created new opportunities, and many found employment or at least profit in cross-border liquor smuggling.
Consistent with both increased tourism and increased participation in diverse recreations by British Columbians has been the proliferation of lodges, chalets, bed and breakfasts, motels, hotels, fishing camps, and park-camping facilities in recent decades.
FISH, BIRD, OR MAMMAL: The lamprey
fish
Enantiornithes occupied a wide array of ecological niches, from sand-probing shorebirds and fish-eaters to tree-dwelling forms and seed-eaters.
3
This material, as well as the output of the intestines, emerges from the bird's cloaca.
As blood travels through the venules to the veins a funneling occurs called vasodilation bringing blood back to the heart.
Plants and pollinating birds often coevolve, and in some cases a flower's primary pollinator is the only species capable of reaching its nectar.
BANGLADESH SLOWLY: 45 seats in Bangladesh's parliament are reserved for these; so, we guess, they're always down
women
This included the wearing of the sari, bindu and bangles by Muslim women; and art forms in music, dance and theater.
3
Roman geographers noted the existence of a large and important seaport in southeastern Bengal, corresponding to the modern-day Chittagong region.
Targets have included Nobel Peace Prize winner Muhammad Yunus and the Grameen Bank, secularist bloggers, pro-opposition newspapers and television channels.
The Sylhet region, home to Bangladesh's [[tea]] country, also receives a large number of visitors.
GEOGRAPHY "B": Bangladesh banks on this big bay
Bay of Bengal
To its south, it faces the Bay of Bengal.
3
Secondly, the Himalayas shed off an equally unusually high amount of melt water that year.
The [[Central Public Library (Dhaka)|Central Public Library of Dhaka]] was established in 1959.
p. 29.
BERMUDA SHORTS: Laborers from the Azores & the Madeira Islands helped make this the second-most common language spoken in Bermuda
Portuguese
Shipwrecked Portuguese mariners are now thought to have been responsible for the 1543 inscription in Portuguese Rock (previously called Spanish Rock).
2
In 1957, a second summit conference was held.
The Cenotaph in front of the Cabinet Building (in Hamilton) was erected in tribute to Bermuda's Great War dead (the tribute was later extended to Bermuda's Second World War dead) and is the site of the annual Remembrance Day commemoration.
INTERNATIONAL NAMES: As a boy Bolivia's president Evo Morales herded these pack animals
llamas
Further, this elite's control of llama herds became a powerful control mechanism as llamas were essential for carrying goods between the civic centre and the periphery.
3
In the late 19th century, an increase in the world price of silver brought Bolivia relative prosperity and political stability.
The most dramatic reform was the "capitalization" program, under which investors, typically foreign, acquired 50% ownership and management control of public enterprises in return for agreed upon capital investments.
thumb|Evo Morales' inauguration as President.
COLLEGE TOWNS: Brown University
Providence, Rhode Island
Brown University is a private, Ivy League, research university in Providence, Rhode Island.
3
Many courses in the department are open to all Brown undergraduates without prerequisite, and include archaeology, languages, history, and Egyptian and Mesopotamian religions, literature, and science.
Students concentrating (majoring) in the department choose a track of either Egyptology or Assyriology.
The Pembroke Center  The Pembroke Center for Teaching and Research on Women was established at Brown in 1981 by Joan Wallach Scott as a research center on gender.
EDWARD R. MURROW: Murrow first gained fame broadcasting from rooftops during this 1940 "Battle"
the Battle of Britain
A "battle" in this broader sense may be of long duration and take place over a large area, as in the case of the Battle of Britain or the Battle of the Atlantic.
3
Areas of dense vegetation, such as jungles and forest, act as force-multipliers, of benefit to inferior armies.
One significant difference of modern naval battles as opposed to earlier forms of combat is the use of marines, which introduced amphibious warfare.
Today, a marine is actually an infantry regiment that sometimes fights solely on land and is no longer tied to the navy.
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: This former movie "Batman" is a distant cousin of the poet who wrote "Trees"
Val Kilmer
The character has been portrayed on both film and television by Lewis Wilson, Robert Lowery, Adam West, Michael Keaton, Val Kilmer, George Clooney, Christian Bale, and, soon, by Ben Affleck.
3
Kane and Finger drew upon contemporary 1930s popular culture for inspiration regarding much of the Bat-Man's look, personality, methods, and weaponry.
However, if one wants the 'credit', then one has to cease being a 'ghost' or follower and become a leader or innovator."Comic Book Artist 3.
Batman and Catwoman are shown having a sexual encounter on a rooftop in Catwoman #1 (2011); the same issue implies that the two have had an ongoing sexual relationship.
1980s MOVIE CHARACTERS: In this 1989 movie Burt Lancaster says, "No one's called me Moonlight Graham in 50 years"
Field of Dreams
Lancaster's last film was Field of Dreams (1989).
3
After initially building his career in "tough guy" roles, Lancaster abandoned his all-American image in the late 1950s in favor of more complex and challenging parts, and came to be regarded as one of the best motion picture actors in history.
In 1952, Lancaster coproduced The Crimson Pirate with producer Harold Hecht (who had previously produced three Lancaster films under his own production company Norma Productions; Kiss the Blood Off My Hands (1948), The Flame and the Arrow (1950), and Ten Tall Men (1951)).
All five of his children were with Norma Anderson: Bill, who became a screenwriter, James, Susan, Joanna, and Sighle (pronounced Sheila).
"N" GAME: The "Blizzard of '93" was one of these storms that move up the Atlantic Coast along the Gulf Stream
a nor'easter
Nor'easter blizzards thumb|left|200 px|Illustration of the Great Blizzard of 1888  A nor'easter is a macro-scale storm along the East Coast of the United States and Atlantic Canada; it gets its name from the direction the wind is coming from.
3
Caption jokingly reads "I believe there is a train under here somewhere!"
In the United States, the storm was responsible for the loss of electric power to over 10 million customers.
Great Lakes Storm of 1913 November 7–10, 1913, was the deadliest and most destructive natural disaster ever to hit the Great Lakes Basin in the Midwestern United States and the Canadian province of Ontario.
REPUBLICANS: In 1949, Barry Goldwater was elected to the city council of this Arizona city
Phoenix
Goldwater was born in Phoenix, in what was then the Arizona Territory, the son of Baron M. Goldwater and his wife, Hattie Josephine ("JoJo") Williams.
3
He was also a lifetime member of the Veterans of Foreign Wars, the American Legion, and Sigma Chi fraternity.
During his Senate career, Goldwater was regarded as the "Grand Old Man of the Republican Party and one of the nation's most respected exponents of conservatism."  Policies Goldwater soon became most associated with labor-union reform and anti-communism; he was an active supporter of the conservative coalition in Congress.
The "Southern Strategy", fulfilled, Salon  It has frequently been argued that Goldwater's strong performance in Southern states previously regarded as Democratic strongholds foreshadowed a larger shift in electoral trends in the coming decades that would make the South a Republican bastion (an end to the "Solid South")—first in presidential politics and eventually at the congressional and state levels, as well.
INTERNATIONAL ACTORS: This Belfast-born actor was just 28 when he directed & starred in the 1989 film "Henry V"
Kenneth Branagh
Gerry Adams, politician John Stewart Bell, physicist George Best, football player, Ballon D'or winner Danny Blanchflower, football player and manager Jackie Blanchflower football player Sir Kenneth Branagh, actor Christopher Brunt, football player Jocelyn Bell Burnell, astrophysicist Patrick Carlin, Victoria Cross recipient Ciaran Carson, writer Frank Carson, comedian Craig Cathcart, football player Shaw Clifton, former General of The Salvation Army Lord Craigavon, former Prime Minister of Northern Ireland Mal Donaghy, football player Jamie Dornan, Actor Barry Douglas, musician John Boyd Dunlop, inventor Jonny Evans, football player Corry Evans, football player Carl Frampton, boxer Sir James Galway, musician Craig Gilroy, rugby union player Chaim Herzog, former President of Israel Alex Higgins, snooker player Eamonn Holmes, broadcaster Paddy Jackson, rugby union player Oliver Jeffers, artist Lord Kelvin, physicist and engineer C.S. Lewis, author James Joseph Magennis, Victoria Cross recipient Jim Magilton, football player and manager Paula Malcomson, actress Mary McAleese, former President of Ireland Gerry McAvoy, musician and long time bass guitarist with Rory Gallagher Wayne McCullough, Olympic Games Silver Medalist, WBC World Champion Boxer, Patron of Northern Ireland Children's Hospice Alan McDonald, football player Sammy McIlroy, football player and manager Gary Moore, guitarist Van Morrison, singer-songwriter Doc Neeson, singer-songwriter Mary Peters, Olympic sportswoman Patricia Quinn, actress Pat Rice, football player and coach Trevor Ringland, rugby union player Peter Robinson, First Minister of Northern Ireland Bobby Sands, IRA hungerstriker David Trimble, former First Minister of Northern Ireland, Nobel Peace Prize winner Gary Wilson, cricketer  Education  thumb|The Lanyon Building of Queen's University in south Belfast Belfast has two universities.
3
Industrialisation and the inward migration it brought made Belfast, if briefly, the biggest city in Ireland at the beginning of the 20th century, and the city's industrial and economic success was cited by unionist opponents of Home Rule as a reason why Ireland should shun devolution and later why Ulster unionists in particular would fight to resist it.
Some 13 more frosty nights than Stormont.
Like many British cities dependent on traditional heavy industry, Belfast suffered serious decline since the 1960s, exacerbated greatly in the 1970s and 1980s by the Troubles.
CHARLIE CHAPLIN: Chaplin went on stage at age 5 in this type of "hall", the British equivalent of Vaudeville
Music Hall
Chaplin began performing at an early age, touring music halls and later working as a stage actor and comedian.
3
Robinson, p. 40.
In an interview he granted in 1959, the year of his 70th birthday, Chaplin stated that there was still "room for the Little Man in the atomic age".Robinson, pp.
Robinson, pp. 173, 197, 310, 489.
EUGENE O'NEILL: O'Neill was furious when this 18-year-old daughter of his married 54-year-old Charlie Chaplin
Oona O'Neill
Legal troubles and Oona O'Neill In the mid-1940s, Chaplin was involved in a series of trials that occupied most of his time and significantly affected his public image.
3
Through his father's connections,Marriot, p. 4.
A Woman of Paris and The Gold Rush   Having fulfilled his First National contract, Chaplin was free to make his first picture as an independent producer.
Louvish, p. 297.
COLOMBIA: Colombia's second-largest city, it's known for its textiles & as a center for the illegal drug trade
Medellín
these are divided into three branches known as cordilleras (mountain ranges): the Cordillera Occidental, running adjacent to the Pacific coast and including the city of Cali; the Cordillera Central, running between the Cauca and Magdalena River valleys (to the west and east respectively) and including the cities of Medellín, Manizales, Pereira and Armenia; and the Cordillera Oriental, extending north east to the Guajira Peninsula and including Bogotá, Bucaramanga and Cúcuta.
3
Colombia is a middle power and a regional actor with the fourth largest economy in Latin America, is part of the CIVETS group of six leading emerging markets and is an accessing member to the OECD. Colombia has a diversified economy with macroeconomic stability and favorable growth prospects in the long run.
In accordance with the principle of separation of powers, government is divided into three branches: the executive branch, the legislative branch and the judicial branch.
Some of the most common ingredients are: cereals such as rice and maize; tubers such as potato and cassava; assorted legumes; meats, including beef, chicken, pork and goat; fish; and seafood.
THE BILL OF RIGHTS: 17 amendments were passed by the house, but only this many became part of the Constitution in 1790
10
Middle ages after 1000 The Pravda Yaroslava, originally combined by Yaroslav the Wise the Grand Prince of Kyiv, was granted to Great Novgorod around 1017, and in 1054 was incorporated into the Ruska Pravda, that became the law for all of Kievan Rus.
3
For example, it is known that it relieved tax for widows and orphans, and protected the poor from the usury of the rich.
Systems that appeared somewhat later include the Edictum Rothari of the Lombards (643), the Lex Visigothorum (654), the Lex Alamannorum (730) and the Lex Frisionum (ca 785).
The constitutions of Canada and the United States establish federal states, with power divided between the federal government and the provinces or states.
CZECH, PLEASE: His mother, Olga, was once ranked 2nd in Czechoslovakia in women's singles tennis
Ivan Lendl
The famous tennis players Ivan Lendl, Miloslav Mečíř, Hana Mandlíková, Martina Hingis, Martina Navratilova and Daniela Hantuchová were born in Czechoslovakia.
3
Neighbours  Austria 1918–1938, 1945–1992  Germany (Both predecessors, West Germany and East Germany, were neighbours between 1949 and 1990.)
Under the decrees, citizenship was abrogated for people of German and Hungarian ethnic origin, who had accepted German or Hungarian citizenship during the occupations.
Some 250,000 Germans, many married to Czechs, some antifascists, and also those required for the post-war reconstruction of the country, remained in Czechoslovakia.
FOREIGN CUISINE: A small Oriental orange or a division of Chinese cuisine
Mandarin
Chinese language, a language or family of languages spoken by the Han Chinese in China  Standard Chinese, the standard form of the Chinese (Mandarin) language in mainland China, Taiwan and Singapore, and the variety most commonly taught as a foreign language  other varieties of Chinese  Written Chinese, the writing system of China  Chinese cuisine, styles of cooking originating from China  American Chinese cuisine  Chinese Peak (California), a mountain  Chinese Peak (Idaho), a mountain  "Chinese Gordon", a nickname of Charles George Gordon (1833–1885), British military commander and administrator  See also  List of all pages beginning with "Chinese"  Category:Demonyms
2
Chinese can refer to:  Something of, from, or related to China    People possessing Chinese citizenship.
It could also mean Chinese citizens who migrated to other countries.
LANGUAGE LAB: This dialect of Chinese is the most widely spoken language in the world
Mandarin
Chinese language, a language or family of languages spoken by the Han Chinese in China  Standard Chinese, the standard form of the Chinese (Mandarin) language in mainland China, Taiwan and Singapore, and the variety most commonly taught as a foreign language  other varieties of Chinese  Written Chinese, the writing system of China  Chinese cuisine, styles of cooking originating from China  American Chinese cuisine  Chinese Peak (California), a mountain  Chinese Peak (Idaho), a mountain  "Chinese Gordon", a nickname of Charles George Gordon (1833–1885), British military commander and administrator  See also  List of all pages beginning with "Chinese"  Category:Demonyms
2
Chinese can refer to:  Something of, from, or related to China    People possessing Chinese citizenship.
Chinese people, people of Chinese nationality, or one of several Chinese ethnicities  Zhonghua minzu (中華民族), the supra-ethnic Chinese nationality   Han Chinese, the dominant ethnic group in mainland China, Taiwan, Hong Kong, and Malaysia  List of ethnic groups in China  Ethnic minorities in China, the non-Han Chinese population in China  Overseas Chinese, people of Chinese ancestry who live outside mainland China,Hong Kong and Taiwan.
"the ONION": Most coverage of this territory's return to China left out its desperate plea to Jackie Chan for help
Hong Kong
It exercises jurisdiction over 22 provinces, five autonomous regions, four direct-controlled municipalities (Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing), and two mostly self-governing special administrative regions (Hong Kong and Macau); while claiming sovereignty over Taiwan.
3
Although Cixi sponsored a program of reforms, the Xinhai Revolution of 1911–12 brought an end to the Qing dynasty and established the Republic of China.
p.11.
The same year, Forbes reported that five of the world's ten largest public companies were Chinese, including the world's largest bank by total assets, the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China.
FAMOUS FACES: Some consider this revolutionary seen here to be the father of modern China
Sun Yat-sen
Republic of China (1912–49)  thumb|Sun Yat-sen, the father of modern China (seated on right), and Chiang Kai-shek, later President of the Republic of China thumb|Chiang Kai-shek and Mao Zedong toasting together in 1946 following the end of World War II On 1 January 1912, the Republic of China was established, and Sun Yat-sen of the Kuomintang (the KMT or Nationalist Party) was proclaimed provisional president.
3
After the collapse of Han, a period of disunion known as the period of the Three Kingdoms followed.
University of Hawaii Press.
In recent decades, China has followed a policy of engaging with African nations for trade and bilateral co-operation;McLaughlin, Abraham; "A rising China counters US clout in Africa".
CHINESE GEOGRAPHY: China's Fertile Triangle lies between Nanjing, Hangzhou & this, the country's leading seaport
Shanghai
It exercises jurisdiction over 22 provinces, five autonomous regions, four direct-controlled municipalities (Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing), and two mostly self-governing special administrative regions (Hong Kong and Macau); while claiming sovereignty over Taiwan.
3
The initial success of the Self-Strengthening Movement of the 1860s was frustrated by the series of military defeats in the 1880s and 1890s.
13 October 2010.
thumb|right|The China Railways CRH380A, an indigenous Chinese bullet train There were 182 commercial airports in China in 2012.
THE PEARL: In early China, cultured pearls were created by placing a lead object shaped like this religious figure in a mussel
Buddha
China is home to many of the world's tallest religious statues, including the tallest of all, the Spring Temple Buddha in Henan.
3
This policy may have led China to support states that are regarded as dangerous or repressive by Western nations, such as Zimbabwe, North Korea and Iran.
20 January 2007.
Following Mao's death in 1976 and the consequent end of the Cultural Revolution, Deng Xiaoping and the new Chinese leadership began to reform the economy and move towards a more market-oriented mixed economy under one-party rule.
COME TO YOUR CENSUS: According to projections, China will be passed in population by this country by the year 2050
India
China extends across much of East Asia, bordering Vietnam, Laos, and Myanmar (Burma) in Southeast Asia; India, Bhutan, Nepal and Pakistan in South Asia; Afghanistan, Tajikistan, Kyrgyzstan and Kazakhstan in Central Asia; and Russia, Mongolia, and North Korea in Inner Asia and Northeast Asia.
3
The country's lowest point, and the world's third-lowest, is the dried lake bed of Ayding Lake (−154m) in the Turpan Depression.
2004 data.
In 1971, the PRC replaced the Republic of China as the sole representative of China in the United Nations and as one of the five permanent members of the United Nations Security Council.
ASIAN HISTORY: The tomb of Hongwu, the first emperor of this famous dynasty, is in Nanjing, China
the Ming
A peasant named Zhu Yuanzhang overthrew the Yuan Dynasty in 1368 and founded the Ming Dynasty.
3
Environmental issues  thumb|Wind turbines in Xinjiang.
Agence France-Presse via The Raw Story.
pp.
THE MIDDLE AGES: From 618 to 907 China was ruled by this dynasty whose name sounds like a breakfast drink
Tang
After World War II, the Communist Party defeated the nationalist Kuomintang in mainland China and established the People's Republic of China in Beijing on 1 October 1949, while the Kuomintang relocated the ROC government to Taiwan with its present capital in Taipei.
3
The subsequent Han Dynasty ruled China between 206 BCE and 220 CE, and created a lasting Han cultural identity among its populace that has endured to the present day.
leading to increased government regulation."China's GDP grows 9.1% in third quarter".
2005.
BARTLETT'S PAIRS: Fred Allen gets 2 zingers, including "California's a wonderful place to live--if you happen to be" this fruit
orange
Vast expanses of wheat, other cereal crops, vegetable crops, cotton, and nut and fruit trees were grown (including oranges in Southern California), and the foundation was laid for the state's prodigious agricultural production in the Central Valley and elsewhere.
2
The California Water Wars, a conflict between Los Angeles and the Owens Valley over water rights, is one of the most well-known examples of the struggle to secure adequate water supplies.
At the apex is the seven Justices of the Supreme Court of California, while the California Courts of Appeal serve as the primary appellate courts and the California Superior Courts serve as the primary trial courts.
CALIFORNIA HERE I COME!: The second-most populous city in the nation, it's more than 450 square miles in area
Los Angeles
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
Principal mammals found in this region include the Sierra coney, white-tailed jackrabbit, and the bighorn sheep.
, the bighorn sheep was listed as endangered by the US Fish and Wildlife Service.
Economy  thumb|right|350px|Gross Domestic Product of California by sector for 2008.
IF YOU BUILD IT...: Built to honor firefighters in this California city, Coit Tower is shaped like a firefighting nozzle
San Francisco
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
California's Native American population of 285,000 is the most of any state.
California is responsible for 13.2 percent of the United States' approximate $16.7 trillion gross domestic product (GDP).
Legislative branch
STATELY FLOWERS: The Wicked Witch of the West might say the Golden State's California this will put you to sleep... but it won't
poppy
Flowering plants include the dwarf desert poppy and a variety of asters.
3
California's economy is centered on technology, finance, real estate services, government, and professional, scientific and technical business services; together comprising 58% of the State economy.
In the deserts of the lower Sonoran zone, the mammals include the jackrabbit, kangaroo rat, squirrel, and opossum.
Factors contributing to the growth in sales-per-acre include more intensive use of active farmlands and technological improvements in crop production.
MERCURIAL: The Mercury News bills itself as "The Newspaper of" this California tech area
Silicon Valley
Stanford University and its Dean of Engineering Frederick Terman began encouraging faculty and graduates to stay in California instead of leaving the state, and develop a high-tech region in the area now known as Silicon Valley.
3
Roman Catholics founded 21 missions along the California coast, as well as the cities of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
The California State Legislature consists of a 40-member Senate and 80-member Assembly.
Consequently California also has the largest number of electoral votes in national presidential elections, with 55.
CHAD IS RAD: Refugees from the neighboring Darfur region of this country have fled into eastern Chad
the Sudan
Geography, climate and environment   thumb|right|upright|Chad is divided into three distinct zones, the Sudanese savanna in the south, the Sahara Desert in the north, and the Sahelian belt in Chad's center.
3
The region's tall grasses and extensive marshes make it favourable for birds, reptiles, and large mammals.
In 2007 Chad had the seventh highest score on the failed state index.
Later, more renowned groups such as African Melody and International Challal attempted to mix modernity and tradition.
"Z"-ING IS BELIEVING: This city was the capital of the Axis puppet state of Croatia from 1941 to 1945
Zagreb
Its capital city is Zagreb, which forms one of the country's primary subdivisions, along with its twenty counties.
2
Other influential newspapers are Novi list and Slobodna Dalmacija.
Along the north coast, Istrian and Krk wines are similar to those produced in neighbouring Italy, while further south in Dalmatia, Mediterranean-style red wines are the norm.
MULTIPLE-WORD CAPITALS: This capital of the Dominican Republic is said to contain the remains of Christopher Columbus
Santo Domingo
He arrived at Santo Domingo on 29 June but was denied port, and the new governor refused to listen to his storm prediction.
3
Additionally, he would also have the option of buying one-eighth interest in any commercial venture with the new lands and receive one-eighth of the profits.
Columbus: The Lost Voyage.
Announcing His Discovery  Columbus Monuments Pages (overview of monuments for Columbus all over the world)
CLEVELAND ROCKS!: The original theme song to this TV sitcom set in Cleveland mentioned the nearby towns of Parma & Solon
The Drew Carey Show
In television, the city is well known as the setting for the popular network sitcom The Drew Carey Show, starring Cleveland native Drew Carey.
3
(2006-01-20).
Most notable is the world renowned Cleveland Clinic, which is supplemented by University Hospitals and its  Rainbow Babies & Children's Hospital.
Walkability In 2011, Walk Score ranked Cleveland the seventeenth most walkable  of the fifty largest cities in the United States.
MUSEUMS: In 1902 the Egyptian Museum moved from this "pyramid" city to nearby Cairo
Giza
Greater Cairo is the largest metropolitan area in the Middle East and the Arab world, and 15th-largest in the world, and is associated with ancient Egypt, as the famous Giza pyramid complex and the ancient city of Memphis are located in its geographical area.
3
However, the origins of the modern city are generally traced back to a series of settlements in the first millennium.
The Heliopolis Club in Heliopolis is the home of current world #1 Ramy Ashour and his brother, world #24, Hisham Ashour.
Cairo: American University in Cairo Press.
"S"CIENCE: The smallest of all constellations is Crux, also known by this name
Southern Cross
Its name is Latin for cross, and it is dominated by a cross-shaped or kite-like asterism that is commonly known as the Southern Cross.
2
Crux is somewhat kite-shaped (a Latin cross), and it has a fifth star (ε Crucis).
Notable features thumb|left|300px|The constellation Crux as it can be seen by the naked eye.
AMERICAN CITIES: In 1882 the Knights of Columbus was founded in this "new" Connecticut city
New Haven
Connecticut's center of population is in Cheshire, New Haven County, which is also located within the Tri-State area.
3
Most of western and southern Connecticut (particularly the Gold Coast) is strongly associated with New York City; this area is the most affluent and populous region of the state.
A series of terrible crashes at these plazas eventually contributed to the decision to remove the tolls in 1988.
Local government  and several lists: List of municipalities of Connecticut by population, List of towns in Connecticut, List of cities in Connecticut, Borough (Connecticut), List of counties in Connecticut Unlike all but one other state (Rhode Island), Connecticut does not have county government.
NEW YORK, NEW JERSEY & CONNECTICUT: This submarine building Connecticut town was the site of a 1781 massacre of U.S. troops by the British; a memorial is shown
Groton
New London and Groton Heights were raided in September 1781 by Arnold, who at that point had turned to the British.
3
Transportation  Roads
Amtrak also operates a shuttle service between New Haven and Springfield, Massachusetts, serving Wallingford, Meriden, Berlin, Hartford, Windsor Locks, and Springfield, MA and the Vermonter runs from Washington to St. Albans, Vermont via the same line.
Westport, a wealthy town a few miles to the east, is often considered one of the most loyally Democratic, liberal towns in Fairfield County.
OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE: From the Greek for "Phoenician", this word describes the 3 Rome vs. Carthage wars; Rome went 3-0
Punic
Native Berbers and settling Phoenicians in Carthage mixed in different ways including religion and language, creating the Punic language and culture.
3
pp.
Islamic conquests
In The Dead Past, a science fiction short story by Isaac Asimov, a leading character is an ancient historian who is trying to disprove the allegation the Carthaginians carried out child sacrifice.
ANCIENT GREECE: This civilization flourished on Crete beginning around 1900 B.C.
Minoan
It was once the center of the Minoan civilization (), which is currently regarded as the earliest recorded civilization in Europe.
3
Crete (,  ; Ancient Greek: , Krḗtē) is the largest and most populous of the Greek islands, and the fifth-largest island in the Mediterranean Sea, after Sicily, Sardinia, Cyprus, and Corsica.
Edible snails are widespread and can cluster in the hundreds waiting for rainfall to reinvigorate them.
Byzantium launched a campaign to take the island back in 842 and 843 under Theoktistos with some success.
PEOPLE: In 1983 he said, "We at Chrysler borrow money the old fashioned way: we pay it back"
Lee Iacocca
Lee Iacocca was brought in as CEO and is credited with returning the company to profitability in the 1980s.
1
Included was a group of German scientists and engineers led by Wernher von Braun; this group had been brought to America under Project Paperclip.
QUOTATIONS: He told the manager of his Chicago department store, "Give the lady what she wants!"
Marshall Field
Chicago was the base of commercial operations for industrialists John Crerar, John Whitfield Bunn, Richard Teller Crane, Marshall Field, John Farwell, Julius Rosenwald and many other commercial visionaries who laid the foundation for Midwestern and global industry.
3
The  long Burnham Park stretches along the waterfront of the South Side.
33–34 During much of that time, the city administration found opposition mainly from a liberal "independent" faction of the Democratic Party.
Chicago has also been the setting for many popular television shows, including the situation comedies Perfect Strangers and its spinoff Family Matters, Married...with Children, Kenan & Kel, The League, The Bob Newhart Show, and Shake It Up.
LANDMARKS: Fazlur Khan designed this 110-story Chicago landmark
The Sears Tower
Major construction projects, including the Sears Tower (now known as the Willis Tower, which in 1974 became the world's tallest building), University of Illinois at Chicago, McCormick Place, and O'Hare International Airport, were undertaken during Richard J. Daley's tenure.
3
After successfully standing for re-election five times, and becoming Chicago's longest serving mayor, Richard M. Daley declined to run for a seventh term.
Chicago is one of the United States' most densely populated major cities, and the largest city in the Great Lakes Megalopolis.
33–34 During much of that time, the city administration found opposition mainly from a liberal "independent" faction of the Democratic Party.
CHICAGO TV: He played Chicago-based psychologist Bob Hartley
Bob Newhart
Chicago has also been the setting for many popular television shows, including the situation comedies Perfect Strangers and its spinoff Family Matters, Married...with Children, Kenan & Kel, The League, The Bob Newhart Show, and Shake It Up.
3
Since 1968, the Joseph Jefferson Awards are given annually to acknowledge excellence in theater in the Chicago area.
In 2013, the violent crime rate was 910 per 100,000 people;http://www.chicagobusiness.com/section/measuring-rahm-emanuel#rate the murder rate was 10.4 -- while high crime districts saw 38.9, low crime districts saw 2.5 murders per 100,000.http://www.chicagobusiness.com/section/measuring-rahm-emanuel#murder  The number of murders in Chicago peaked at 970 in 1974, when the city's population was over 3 million people (a murder rate of about 29 per 100,000), and it reached 943 murders in 1992, (a murder rate of 34 per 100,000).
The University of Illinois College of Medicine (2007).
CASABLANCA: With about 3 million people, Casablanca is this country's biggest city by far
Morocco
Casablanca (in Arabic: , Addaar Albayḍaa; in ; local informal name: Kaẓa) is the largest city of Morocco, located in the northwestern part of the country on the Atlantic Ocean.
3
In revenge, the French attacked by ship, bombarding the city from the coast, and landing troops inside the town, which caused severe damage to the town and 15,000 dead and wounded bodies.
About 40,000 women attended, calling for a ban on polygamy and the introduction of divorce law (divorce being a purely religious procedure at that time).
French fashion designer  Merieme Chadid –
U. S. STATES: While Rhode Island has 5 counties, Delaware has only this many
3
The state takes its name from Thomas West, 3rd Baron De La Warr, an English nobleman and Virginia's first colonial governor, after whom what is now called Cape Henlopen was originally named.
3
The toponyms Gara, Gare, Gaire (the sound [ä] often mutated in [æ]) also appear in old texts cited by Lucien Musset, where the word ga(i)ra means gore.
Spencer built a church in Wilmington for the new denomination.
CSX connects with the freight/heritage operation, the Wilmington and Western Railroad, based in Wilmington and the East Penn Railroad, which operates a line from Wilmington to Coatesville, Pennsylvania.
SCIENCE: Darwin defined it as "preservation of favorable variations and the rejection of injurious variations"
natural selection
Darwin most often refers to:   Charles Darwin (1809–1882), English naturalist and writer, best known as the originator of the theory of biological evolution by natural selection  Charles Galton Darwin (1887–1962), English physicist, the grandson of Charles Darwin.
2
Darwin, Northern Territory, a capital city in Australia  Darwin (surname), a surname (including a list of people with the name) Darwin may also refer to the following:  Science and technology  Darwin (unit), a unit of evolutionary change, defined by J.B.S. Haldane  Darwin (ESA), a European Space Agency project  RRS Charles Darwin, a British ship  1991 Darwin, a main-belt asteroid  Darwin Medal  Darwin Lagrangian  Computing  Darwin (programming game)  Darwin (operating system), the Unix base for Apple's Mac OS X operating system  Darwin Streaming Server  XDarwin  Darwin Information Typing Architecture  Darwin (ADL) An Architecture Description Language  Entertainment  Darwin (2011 film), a 2011 documentary film  Darwin (2015 film), a 2015 science fiction film by Alain Desrochers  Darwin (seaQuest DSV), a dolphin in the TV series seaQuest DSV  Darwin 4078, an arcade game  Darwin (comics), a fictional character in the Marvel Comics Universe, associated with X-Men  Darwin!, a 1972 musical album by Banco del Mutuo Soccorso  Darwin's Nightmare, a 2004 documentary film  Darwin, a fictional fish with legs in the animated TV series "The Amazing World of Gumball"  Darwin, a 1993 television film by Peter Greenaway  Places  Mount Darwin, Zimbabwe  Darwin Glacier (Antarctica)  Darwin Mountains, Antarctica  Darwin Bank, an oil field in Azerbaijan  Australia  Darwin, Northern Territory  Darwin International Airport  Charles Darwin National Park  Charles Darwin Reserve  Charles Darwin University  Darwin River, Northern Territory  Darwin Dam (Tasmania)  Division of Darwin, 1903–1955 election division  Mount Darwin (Tasmania)  Darwin, Tasmania  United Kingdom  Darwin College, Cambridge  Darwin College, Kent  Darwin Shopping Centre, Shrewsbury  The Darwin Centre, of the Natural History Museum, London  Darwin (ward), an electoral ward in the London Borough of Bromley.
North America  Darwin, California, in Inyo County  Darwin, Fresno County, California  Darwin Falls, a waterfall in California  Darwin Falls Wilderness  Darwin Township, Clark County, Illinois  Darwin School, Manitoba  Darwin, Minnesota  Darwin, Ohio  Darwin, Virginia  Mount Darwin (California)  South America  Cordillera Darwin, Tierra del Fuego  Darwin Channel  Darwin, Falkland Islands  Darwin Island, Galapagos Islands  Darwin Sound  Mount Darwin (Andes), Tierra del Fuego  Darwin, Río Negro, a municipality in Río Negro Province, Argentina  Craters  Darwin (lunar crater)  Darwin (Martian crater), a crater on Mars  Darwin Crater, in Tasmania  Other uses  Darwin Rebellion, a demonstration which took place in Australia in 1918  Darwin Baseball League, North Australian sport  Darwin Rugby League, North Australian sport, see Northern Territory Rugby League  Darwin Airline, based in Switzerland  See also  Darwen (disambiguation)  Darwinia (disambiguation)  Darwin Awards  Darwin glass  Darwin Day  Darwin-Wedgwood family  List of things named after Charles Darwin
AROUND THE WORLD: In 1976 soccer's Diego Maradona joined this country's national team when he was only 16 years old
Argentina
He has served as a manager and coach at other clubs as well as the national team of Argentina.
2
In the final match, West Germany attempted to contain him by double-marking, but he nevertheless found the space past the West German player Lothar Matthäus to give the final pass to Jorge Burruchaga for the winning goal.
There is a documented phenomenon of Brazilians being named in honour of Maradona, an example being footballer Diego Costa.
SLINGS & ARROWS: Armed with just a sling & some pebbles, David took out this Philistine giant
Goliath
In 1 Samuel 17, David is officially presented to Saul as the hero who killed Goliath.
2
When Ahitophel sees his council rejected he correctly surmises the cause is lost and hangs himself.
Critical Bible scholarship holds that the biblical account of David's rise to power is a political apology—an answer to contemporary charges against him, of his involvement in murders and regicide.
DAVID: David succeeded this man as the leader of Israel around 1010 B.C.
Saul
Biblical narrative  Saul rejected  left|thumb|Samuel anoints David, Dura Europos, Syria, 3rd century CE  According to the Biblical narrative, Israel is at first ruled by judges, but the people demand a monarchy, so the current judge, the prophet Samuel, reluctantly appoints Saul to be the first king of Israel.
3
Furthermore, according to Talmudic sources, the death of Uriah was not to be considered murder, on the basis that Uriah had committed a capital offence by refusing to obey a direct command from the King.
This aspect of David in the Nine Worthies was popularised firstly through literature, and was thereafter adopted as a frequent subject for painters and sculptors.
The birds and mountains unite with David in uttering praise to God (21:79; 34:10; 38:18), while God made iron soft for David (34:10), God also instructed David in the art of fashioning chain-mail out of iron (21:80); an indication of the first use of Wrought iron, this knowledge gave David a major advantage over his bronze and cast iron-armed opponents, not to mention the cultural and economic impact.
MUSEUMS BY CITY: The Henry Ford Museum(don't say Detroit)
Dearborn
In Southwest Detroit and western Detroit there are smaller, scattered Asian communities including an area in the westside adjacent to Dearborn and Redford Township that has a mostly Indian Asian population, and a community of Vietnamese and Laotians in Southwest Detroit.
3
The present church was completed in 1887.
During the same time period, the sprawling Detroit metropolitan area, which surrounds and includes the city, grew to contain more than half of Michigan's population.
Joseph Catholic Church (1873) is a notable example of Detroit's ecclesiastical architecture Some of the oldest neighborhoods are along the Woodward and East Jefferson corridors.
NOT A STATE CAPITAL: Olympia, Detroit, Madison
Detroit
Detroit () is the most populous city in the U.S. state of Michigan, the fourth-largest city in the Midwest and the largest city on the United States–Canada border.
1
Retrieved on April 8, 2007.
LOOK!  UP IN THE SKY!: Its radius is approximately 109 times that of Earth & it's really hard to miss
the Sun
Earth  (also the world, in  Gaia, or in Latin: TerraOxford English Dictionary),  "terra, n." Oxford University Press (Oxford), 1911.) is the third planet from the Sun, the densest planet in the Solar System, the largest of the Solar System's four terrestrial planets, and the only astronomical object known to harbor life.
3
The Moon is Earth's only permanent natural satellite.
A nebula contains gas, ice grains, and dust (including primordial nuclides).
Ranging from the equator to the polar regions, these are the tropical (or equatorial), subtropical, temperate and polar climates.
GOING GREEN: (Sarah of the Clue Crew points at a diagram of the earth's atmosphere.) Water vapor and ozone are two of these gases, collectively known as GHGs, which keep heat from escaping the atmosphere
greenhouse gases
In this model, atmospheric "greenhouse gases" kept the oceans from freezing when the newly forming Sun had only 70% of its current luminosity.
3
Earth's long-term future is closely tied to that of the Sun.
Internal structure  Earth's interior, like that of the other terrestrial planets, is divided into layers by their chemical or physical (rheological) properties, but unlike the other terrestrial planets, it has a distinct outer and inner core.
In the West, belief in a flat Earth was displaced by the idea of spherical Earth, credited to Pythagoras in the 6th century BC. Earth was further believed to be the center of the universe until the 16th century, when scientists first theorized that it was a moving object, comparable to the other planets in the Solar System.
NATURALISTS: Studying these in the Swiss Alps, Louis Agassiz postulated the Earth was once covered by them
Glaciers
Most fresh water, about 68.7%, is present as ice in ice caps and glaciers.
3
Earth's interior remains active with a solid iron inner core, a liquid outer core that generates the magnetic field, and a convecting mantle that drives plate tectonics.
Sedimentary rock is formed from the accumulation of sediment that becomes buried and compacted together.
Earth's rotational velocity also varies in a phenomenon known as length-of-day variation.
SCIENCE: In geologic theory, the Earth's outer shell has about 12 big these, moving around tectonically
plates
Earth's lithosphere is divided into several rigid tectonic plates that migrate across the surface over periods of many millions of years.
3
After another billion years all surface water will have disappeared and the mean global temperature will reach  ().
Earth's terrain varies greatly from place to place.
Human geography  Cartography, the study and practice of map-making, and geography, the study of the lands, features, inhabitants and phenomena on Earth, have historically been the disciplines devoted to depicting Earth.
EUROPEAN HISTORY: When England's Queen Anne died, this German became king because he was a great grandson of James I
George I
During the Industrial Revolution, many workers moved from England's countryside to new and expanding urban industrial areas to work in factories, for instance at Manchester and Birmingham, dubbed "Warehouse City" and "Workshop of the World" respectively.. England maintained relative stability throughout the French Revolution; William Pitt the Younger was British Prime Minister for the reign of George III.
3
The Kingdom of England – which after 1284 included Wales – ceased being a separate sovereign state on 1 May 1707, when the Acts of Union put into effect the terms agreed in the Treaty of Union the previous year, resulting in a political union with the Kingdom of Scotland to create the Kingdom of Great Britain.
The government has devolved responsibility to the Bank's Monetary Policy Committee for managing the monetary policy of the country and setting interest rates.
The UK film council ranked David Yates, Christopher Nolan, Mike Newell, Ridley Scott and Paul Greengrass the five most commercially successful English directors since 2001.Statistical Yearbook 2011: 7.3 UK directors.
HODGEPODGE: The fundamental cause of this 1337-1453 conflict was England's possession of the Fief of Guienne
Hundred Years' War
thumb|left|200 px|alt=King Henry V at the Battle of Agincourt, 1415.|King Henry V at the Battle of Agincourt, fought on Saint Crispin's Day and concluded with an English victory against a larger French army in the Hundred Years' War.
3
In the aftermath of the Renaissance a form of architecture echoing classical antiquity, synthesised with Christianity appeared—the English Baroque style, architect Christopher Wren was particularly championed..
Some of the best-known songs are Greensleeves, Pastime with Good Company, Maggie May and Spanish Ladies amongst others.
Hitchcock and Lean are among the most critically acclaimed of all-time.
BIOGRAPHY: Born in England in 1919, formed a famous partnership with Nureyev, died a dame in 1991
Margot Fonteyn
The Royal Ballet is one of the world's foremost classical ballet companies, its reputation built on two prominent figures of 20th-century dance, prima ballerina Margot Fonteyn and choreographer Frederick Ashton.
3
Of these, a minority are faith schools (primarily Church of England or Roman Catholic schools).
thumb|left|alt=White men in grey suits, pale blue shirts and red ties celebrate upon the top floor of an open-top bus.
In women's boxing, Nicola Adams became the world's first woman to win an Olympic boxing Gold medal at the 2012 Summer Olympics.
"FIELD" OF DREAMS: England's Wars of the Roses ended there
Bosworth Field
Eventually it led to the Yorkists losing the throne entirely to a Welsh noble family the Tudors, a branch of the Lancastrians headed by Henry Tudor who invaded with Welsh and Breton mercenaries, gaining victory at the Battle of Bosworth Field where the Yorkist king Richard III was killed.
3
England  is a country that is part of the United Kingdom.
Thomas Newcomen's steam engine helped spawn the Industrial Revolution.
Originally the flag was used by the maritime Republic of Genoa.
DOG TAGS: Born 1642, Woolsthorpe, England; mischievous cur: Diamond, known to destroy scientific papers
Sir Isaac Newton
Science and technology  thumb|alt=Torso of man with long white hair and dark coloured jacket|left|upright|Sir Isaac Newton is one of the most influential figures in the history of science Prominent English figures from the field of science and mathematics include Sir Isaac Newton, Michael Faraday, Robert Hooke, Robert Boyle, Joseph Priestley, J. J. Thomson, Charles Babbage, Charles Darwin, Stephen Hawking, Christopher Wren, Alan Turing, Francis Crick, Joseph Lister, Tim Berners-Lee, Paul Dirac, Andrew Wiles and Richard Dawkins.
3
By 410, during the Decline of the Roman Empire, Britain was left exposed by the end of Roman rule in Britain and the withdrawal of Roman army units, to defend the frontiers in continental Europe and partake in civil wars.
132–3.
William of Ockham and Roger Bacon, who were Franciscans, were major philosophers of the Middle Ages.
I PREDICT "SNOW": Some say that Ernest Hemingway considered this 1936 tale his finest story
The Snows of Kilimanjaro
The Snows of Kilimanjaro" and "The Short Happy Life of Francis Macomber".Desnoyers, 9
3
Baker (1972), 331–333
If you leave or skip something because you do not know it, the story will be worthless.
Wells, Elizabeth J. (1975). "A Statistical Analysis of the Prose Style of Ernest Hemingway: Big Two-Hearted River". in Benson, Jackson (ed).
EPICS: She, not the dairy queen, is the title character of a 6-book-long epic poem by Edmund Spenser
The Faerie Queene
Edmund Spenser (; 1552/1553 – 13 January 1599) was an English poet best known for The Faerie Queene, an epic poem and fantastical allegory celebrating the Tudor dynasty and Elizabeth I. He is recognized as one of the premier craftsmen of nascent Modern English verse, and is often considered one of the greatest poets in the English language.
3
Its ruins are still visible today.
He probably hoped to secure a place at court through his poetry, but his next significant publication boldly antagonised the queen's principal secretary, Lord Burghley (William Cecil), through its inclusion of the satirical Mother Hubberd's Tale.
143–161.
EMAIL ETIQUETTE: If not all the recipients know each other, don't give out their addresses--use bcc, short for this
blind carbon copy
Blind carbon copy; addresses added to the SMTP delivery list but not (usually) listed in the message data, remaining invisible to other recipients.
3
E-mail is sometimes used, capitalizing the initial E as in similar abbreviations like E-piano, E-guitar, A-bomb, and H-bomb.
As a solution, people occasionally send a boilerplate message explaining that the email inbox is being cleared out.
The overloading of the target email address can render it unusable and can even cause the mail server to crash.
EDNA ST. VINCENT MILLAY SAYS....: Later in life she wrote that, like the lonely tree, this season "sang in me a little while, that in me sings no more"
Summer
The couple later bought Ragged Island in Casco Bay, Maine, as a summer retreat.
3
Edna St. Vincent Millay (February 22, 1892 – October 19, 1950) was an American poet and playwright.
From Thistles drew controversy for its novel exploration of female sexuality and feminism.
300px|right|thumb|Main house at Steepletop, where Millay spent the last years of her life In 1923 she married 43-year-old Eugen Jan Boissevain (1880–1949), the widower of the labor lawyer and war correspondent Inez Milholland, a political icon Millay had met during her time at Vassar.
THE BIBLE: In the book of Esther, he was hanged on the gallows that he had prepared for Mordecai
Haman
The grand vizier, Haman the Agagite,A descendant of the Amalekite people, of King Agag, whom King Saul of Israel was commanded by the prophet Samuel to utterly destroy because of their wickedness; but Saul chose to spare their king instead.()  Haman's hatred of the Jews may have had its root in this event.
3
Ahasuerus is traditionally identified with Xerxes I during the time of the Achaemenid empire.
In the Bible  King Ahasuerus (Xerxes I"Ahasuerus", Jewish Encyclopedia) held a 180-day feast in Susa (Shoushan).
Esther as rhetorical model Since she used only rhetoric to convince the king to save her people, Esther has been interpreted as a model for a successful rhetoric of marginalized groups persuading those who have power over them.
THE MIDDLE AGES: Irene, who reigned from 797-802, declared herselt Emperor, not Empress, of this empire
the Byzantine Empire
Historians generally refer to the continuing Roman Empire in the east as the Byzantine Empire after Byzantium, the original name of the town that Constantine I would elevate to the Imperial capital as New Rome in AD 330.
3
The first period of the Roman Empire, from 27 BC –
The title of Emperor of Austria and the associated Empire were both abolished at the end of the First World War in 1918, when German Austria became a republic and the other kingdoms and lands represented in the Imperial Council established their independence or adhesion to other states.
Inca Empire
PEOPLE & PLACES: A native of Flanders, or ice skater Peggy
Fleming
The demonym associated with Flanders is Fleming, while the corresponding adjective is Flemish.
3
The two westernmost provinces of the Flemish Region, West Flanders and East Flanders, forming the central portion of the historic County of Flanders.
Antwerp has a population of more than 500,000 citizens and is the largest city, Ghent has a population of 250,000 citizens, followed by Bruges with 120,000 citizens and Leuven counts almost 100,000 citizens.
The first and last ones were directed by Erik Van Looy, and an American remake is being made of both of them, respectively The Loft (2012) and The Memory of a Killer.
CELEBRITY MARRIAGES: Of the 30-year age gap between Frank Sinatra & this wife, Dean Martin quipped, "I've got scotch" that's older than her
Mia Farrow
He went on to marry Mia Farrow in 1966 and Barbara Marx in 1976.
3
On October 4, 1953, Sinatra made his first performance at the Sands Hotel and Casino, after an invitation by the manager Jack Entratter, who had previously worked at the Copa in New York.
It reached the top spot on the Billboard album chart in its second week, remaining at the top for five weeks, and was nominated for the Grammy Award for Album of the Year at the inaugural Grammy Awards.
Santopietro notes that Sinatra was a "lifelong sympathizer with Jewish causes".
WE WANT PISA!: At the head of his own militia, this medieval author of "The Prince" helped conquer Pisa for Florence in 1509
Machiavelli
Savonarola and Machiavelli thumb|left|Girolamo Savonarola being burnt at the stake in 1498 During this period, the Dominican friar Girolamo Savonarola had become prior of the San Marco monastery in 1490.
3
The language spoken in the city during the 14th century was, and still is, accepted as the Italian language.
thumb|Ponte Vecchio, which spans the Arno river Florence is known as the "cradle of the Renaissance" (la culla del Rinascimento) for its monuments, churches, and buildings.
In the archeological museum includes documents of Etruscan civilization.
THE HANGED MAN: This religious reformer of Florence who set up a democratic republic was hanged for his efforts in 1498
Girolamo Savonarola
Savonarola and Machiavelli thumb|left|Girolamo Savonarola being burnt at the stake in 1498 During this period, the Dominican friar Girolamo Savonarola had become prior of the San Marco monastery in 1490.
3
Akron, Ohio: The Werner Company, 1907: p.675 A turbulent political history includes periods of rule by the powerful Medici family, and numerous religious and republican revolutions.
Palazzo Medici Riccardi, designed by Michelozzo di Bartolomeo for Cosimo il Vecchio, of the Medici family, is another major edifice, and was built between 1445 and 1460.
Trenitalia runs trains between the railway stations within the city, and to other destinations around Italy and Europe.
"MEN" OF THE WORLD: In a children's tale, this city of Germany is known for its band of animal musicians
Bremen
Population Baden-Württemberg  Stuttgart 35,75210,569,100 Bavaria  Munich 70,54912,519,600 Berlin  Berlin 8923,375,200 Brandenburg  Potsdam 29,4772,449,500 Bremen  Bremen 404654,800 Hamburg  Hamburg 7551,734,300 Hesse  Wiesbaden 21,1156,016,500 Mecklenburg-Vorpommern  Schwerin 23,1741,600,300 Lower Saxony  Hanover 47,6187,779,000 North Rhine-Westphalia  Düsseldorf 34,04317,554,300 Rhineland-Palatinate  Mainz 19,8473,990,300 Saarland  Saarbrücken 2,569994,300 Saxony  Dresden 18,4164,050,200 Saxony-Anhalt  Magdeburg 20,4452,259,400 Schleswig-Holstein  Kiel 15,7632,806,500 Thuringia  Erfurt 16,1722,170,500  Foreign relations  thumb|Germany hosted the G8 summit in Heiligendamm, 6–8 June 2007 Germany has a network of 227 diplomatic missions abroad and maintains relations with more than 190 countries.
3
Eisenstein, Elizabeth.
Konrad Adenauer was elected the first Federal Chancellor (Bundeskanzler) of Germany in 1949 and remained in office until 1963.
April 1988.
DIPLOMACY--A GAME: The game is based on making & breaking these, such as the triple one that in real life united Italy, Germany & Austria
alliances
left|thumb|The German Empire (1871–1918), with the Kingdom of Prussia in blue  In the  period following the unification of Germany, Bismarck's foreign policy as Chancellor of Germany under Emperor William I secured Germany's position as a great nation by forging alliances, isolating France by diplomatic means, and avoiding war.
3
thumb|left|The Holy Roman Empire in 1648, after the Peace of Westphalia which ended the Thirty Years' War  In 1517, the Wittenberg monk Martin Luther publicised The Ninety-Five Theses, challenging the Roman Catholic Church and initiating the Protestant Reformation.
Germany sent a peacekeeping force to secure stability in the Balkans and sent a force of German troops to Afghanistan as part of a NATO effort to provide security in that country after the ousting of the Taliban.
With more than 6.3 million official members, the German Football Association (Deutscher Fußball-Bund) is the largest sports organisation of its kind worldwide, and the German top league, the Bundesliga, attracts the second highest average attendance of all professional sports leagues in the world.
AIRCRAFT OF WORLD WAR I: The Schutte-Lanz company also made dirigibles in Germany, but it was this company whose airships terrorized London
Zeppelin
Such German inventors, engineers and industrialists as Count Ferdinand von Zeppelin, Otto Lilienthal, Gottlieb Daimler, Rudolf Diesel, Hugo Junkers and Karl Benz helped shape modern automotive and air transportation technology.
3
After 1945, Germany split into two states, East Germany and West Germany.
The assassination of Austria's crown prince on 28 June 1914 provided the pretext for the Austrian Empire to attack Serbia and trigger World War I. After four years of warfare, in which approximately two million German soldiers were killed, a general armistice ended the fighting on 11 November, and German troops returned home.
Since 1999, the Reichstag building in Berlin has been the meeting place of the Bundestag, the German parliament.
SOLDIERS: In 1919 he became "General of the Armies", the highest rank held by any American except George Washington
Pershing
"General of the Armies of the United States" is associated with only two people...one being Washington and the other being John J. Pershing.
3
He did so without loss of life or materiel.
It was the second American statue of Washington on horseback but figures prominently in the official seal of the Confederate States of America.
Influence of war and Wheatley: .
HEIR OF THE DAG: Born in Ghana in 1938, this U.N. Secretary-General won a Nobel Peace Prize in 2001
Kofi Annan
Foreign relations  thumb|250px|Kofi Annan Since independence, Ghana has been devoted to ideals of nonalignment and is a founding member of the Non-Aligned Movement.
3
The Ghana Police Service has eleven specialised police units including a Rapid deployment force (RDF) and Marine Police Unit (MPU).
Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology; the second university to be established in Ghana, is the premier university of science and technology in Ghana and West Africa.
Music and dance  120px|thumb|right|Traditional Adowa dance form and music performance.
NO. 1 COUNTRY HITS: In the title of a 1990 single of the year, Garth Brooks had "friends" here
In low places
It contained what would become Brooks's signature song, the blue collar anthem "Friends in Low Places", as well as two other Brooks classics, the dramatic and controversial "The Thunder Rolls" and the philosophically ironic "Unanswered Prayers".
3
The album's first single, "More Than a Memory", was released to radio on August 27, 2007.
“
Himself Episode: "Country Weston" 1994 Mad
MEDICINE MEN: Galen said this was produced in the liver & ebbed & flowed like the tide in the body; Harvey proved that was absurd
blood
ISBN 0-472-08568-9"Galen on bloodletting: a study of the origins, development, and validity of his opinions, with a translation of the three works".
2
Reintroduction to the Latin West thumb|Mondino dei Liuzzi, Anathomia, 1541 From the 11th century onwards, Latin translations of Islamic medical texts began to appear in the West, alongside the Salerno school of thought, and were soon incorporated into the curriculum at the universities of Naples and Montpellier.
Nutton V.
INTERNATIONAL CUISINE: Gazpacho, a soup often flavored with garlic, was created in this country
Spain
Travellers in Spain I. i. 69 (1845) "Gazpacho..is a cold vegetable soup, and is composed of onions, garlic, cucumbers, pepinos, pimientas, all chopped up very small and mixed with crumbs of bread, and then put into a bowl of oil, vinegar, and fresh water." usually with a tomato base, originating in the southern Spanish region of Andalusia.
3
Every Andalusian region or comarca has its own variety.
The basic gazpacho gave rise to many variants, some also called gazpacho, others not; some authors have tried to classify all these variations.
made of breadcrumbs, garlics, oil, vinegar and on the top of that chopped onions, tomato and peppers.
BASKETBALL MOVIES: Gene Hackman coached a small-town Indiana high school team right to the state championship in this 1986 film
Hoosiers
His major subsequent films include The French Connection (1971) and French Connection II (1975), in which he played Jimmy "Popeye" Doyle; The Poseidon Adventure (1972); The Conversation (1974); Superman (1978), in which he played arch-villain Lex Luthor; Hoosiers (1986); Mississippi Burning (1988); Unforgiven (1992); The Firm (1993); Crimson Tide (1995); Get Shorty (1995); The Birdcage (1996); Enemy of the State (1998);
3
This opened the door to film work.
1970s  thumb|left|Gene Hackman as Jimmy "Popeye" Doyle in The French Connection (1971) In 1971, he was nominated for the Best Supporting Actor Academy Award again, this time for 1970's I Never Sang for My Father, working alongside Melvyn Douglas and Estelle Parsons.
Hackman's first wife was Faye Maltese.
OLD GOTHS: Like Americans, the Goths considered this creature on the 6th century brooch seen here a symbol of power
Eagle
Culture  Art thumb|200px|An Ostrogothic eagle-shaped fibula, 500 AD, Germanisches Nationalmuseum Nuremberg.
3
2002, p. 54.
(Gibbon, Chapter 25.)
Steiner.
AMERICAN PLACE NAMES: George Vancouver named this volcano for the baronial title of Alleyne Fitzherbert, a British diplomat
Mount St. Helens
Vancouver named many features after friends and associates, including:  Mount Baker, named after 3rd Lieutenant Joseph Baker, the first on the expedition to spot it  Mount St. Helens, named after Alleyne Fitzherbert, 1st Baron St Helens  Puget Sound, after Discovery's lieutenant Peter Puget, who explored its southern reaches.
3
Charges and counter-charges flew in the press, with the wealthy Camelford faction having the greater firepower until Vancouver, ailing from his long naval service, died.
The Vancouver Quarter Shopping Centre bears his name in his home town of King's Lynn, England.
Published by McFarland & Company, 2007.
MYTHOLOGICAL CREATURES: One story says that Hera used the 100 eyes of this gigantic monster to decorate the tail of her peacock
Argus
Once Io was given to Hera, she placed her in the charge of Argus to keep her separated from Zeus.
3
Samos excavations have revealed votive offerings, many of them late 8th and 7th centuries BCE, which show that Hera at Samos was not merely a local Greek goddess of the Aegean: the museum there contains figures of gods and suppliants and other votive offerings from Armenia, Babylon, Iran, Assyria, Egypt, testimony to the reputation which this sanctuary of Hera enjoyed and to the large influx of pilgrims.
where the festivals in her honor called Heraia  were celebrated.
p.46   (Ammonia)  Ἀργεία (Argéia) '(She) of Argos'  Βασίλεια (Basíleia) 'Queen'  Βουναία (Bounáia) '(She) of the Mound' (in CorinthHenry George Liddell, Robert Scott.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: Of Hawaii's 8 main islands, this one receives the lion's share of the tourist dollars
Oahu
At the southeastern end of the archipelago, the eight main islands are—in order from northwest to southeast: Niihau, Kauai, Oahu, Molokai, Lānai, Kahoolawe, Maui and the Island of Hawaii.
3
Eurasian Americans are a prominent mixed-race group, numbering about 66,000 (4.9%).
See pages 332-333.
According to journals written by Captain Cook's crew, it is widely believed that many alii engaged in aikāne relationships.
AROUND THE WORLD: It's Hawaii's "Pineapple Island" though it could be called the "Patio Island"
Lanai
Islands resembling Kahoolawe, Lanai, and Molokai are named Los Monjes (The Monks).
3
The resolution apologized for the overthrow of the Hawaiian Kingdom and acknowledged that  the United States had annexed Hawaii unlawfully.
In 2003, according to state government data, there were over 6.4 million visitors, with expenditures of over $10 billion, to the Hawaiian Islands.
The largest is the University of Hawaii System, which consists of: the research university at Mānoa, two comprehensive campuses at Hilo and West Oahu, and seven community colleges.
MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS: The name of this small guitar-like instrument popular in Hawaii is Hawaiian for "jumping flea"
the ukulele
thumb|left|upright|alt = A young man holds a small four-stringed instrument and strums.|A young Cape Verdean man plays the Portuguese cavaquinho, a four-stringed instrument from which the ukulele is descended.
3
Kessinger Publishing, 2005; p. 17 and a minor chief and his men took a ship's boat.
Hawaii incurred the biggest seniority shift between the 112th and 113th Congresses.
Legal status of Hawaii  While Hawaii is internationally recognized as a state of the United States of America while also being broadly accepted as such in mainstream understanding, the international legality of this status has been raised before the U.N. and other international forums, and in daily dialogue in Hawaii.
WORLD CAPITALS: Now Haiti's capital, this city once known as L'Hopital was nearly destroyed by an earthquake in 1751
Port-au-Prince
More of the free people of color lived in the south of the island, near Port-au-Prince, and many intermarried within their community.
2
Michel Martelly, the current president, was elected in the 2011 general election.
The elected President, Leslie Manigat, was overthrown some months later in the June 1988 Haitian coup d'état.
INTERNATIONAL POTPOURRI: The railroads in Honduras were built mainly to transport this fruit that has a lot of ap"peel"
bananas
Neoliberal policies favoring international trade and investment began in the 1870s, and soon foreign interests became involved first in shipping, especially tropical fruit (most notably bananas) from the north coast, and then in railway building.
3
Its northern portions are part of the Western Caribbean Zone, as reflected in the area's demographics and culture.
Honduras saw insertion of American troops in 1903, 1907, 1911, 1912, 1919, 1924 and 1925 and in 1904 writer O. Henry coined the term "Banana republic" to describe Honduras.
On New Year's Eve there is food and "cohetes", fireworks and festivities.
HANS CHRISTIAN ANDERSEN: Of the mother duck's offspring, he was the best swimmer
The Ugly Duckling
Some of his most famous fairy tales include "The Emperor's New Clothes", "The Little Mermaid", "The Nightingale", "The Snow Queen", "The Ugly Duckling", and many more.
3
Taking the suggestion seriously, Andersen began to focus on writing.
Hans Christian Andersen Literature Award, a Danish literary award established in 2010  Events and holidays Andersen's birthday, 2 April, is celebrated as International Children's Book Day.
Later Tales, published during 1867 & 1868 (1869)  The Little Match Girl (1845)
EARLY ART: The innermost of his 3 coffins discovered by Howard Carter is solid gold & painted in his likeness
King Tut
Howard Carter (9 May 18742 March 1939) was an English archaeologist and Egyptologist who became world famous after discovering the intact tomb of the 18th Dynasty Pharaoh, Tutankhamun (colloquially known as "King Tut" and "the boy king") in November 1922.
3
Howard Carter spent much of his childhood with relatives in the Norfolk market town of Swaffham, the birthplace of both his parents.
Book Midden Publishing, 2012 (ISBN 978-1-905914-05-0) Cross, William.
Hodder and Stoughton, 1980 (ISBN 0340246642) Winstone, H. V. F. Howard Carter and the Discovery of the Tomb of Tutankhamun.
DOG STARS: One of Hercules' labors was to fetch this monstrous watchdog
Cerberus
Capture and bring back Cerberus.
3
Capture the Golden Hind of Artemis.
One of these is Hercules' defeat of Cacus, who was terrorizing the countryside of Rome.
Renaissance mythography drew more extensively on the Greek tradition of Heracles, typically under the Romanized name Hercules, or the alternate name Alcides.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Heinz' varieties
57
Since 1896, the company has used its "57 Varieties" slogan; it was inspired by a sign advertising 21 styles of shoes, and Henry Heinz chose the number 57 even though the company manufactured more than 60 products at the time.
3
Heinz was a pioneer in both scientific and "technological innovations to solve problems like bacterial contamination."
The decline was also attributed to an inadequate response to broad demographic changes in the United States, particularly the growth in population among Hispanic Americans and African Americans.
Australia thumb|left|Heinz-Watties factory in Wagga Wagga, New South Wales.
RELIGION: Mahayanists label other schools of this religion "Hinayana" or "lesser vehicle"
Buddhism
Hīnayāna  is a Sanskrit term literally meaning: the "Smaller Vehicle",Kalu Rinpoche (1995) Profound Buddhism From Hinayana To Vajrayana: p. 15 applied to the Śrāvakayāna, the Buddhist path followed by a śrāvaka who wishes to become an arhat.
2
The Theravadins too refuted the Sarvāstivādins and Sautrāntikins (and followers of other schools) on the grounds that their theories were in conflict with the non-substantialism of the canon.
The Theravada arguments are preserved in the Kathavatthu.
ICELAND COMETH: 96% of the population is affiliated with the Church of Iceland, which is the evangelical type of this religion
Lutheran
Reformation and the Early Modern period  Around the middle of the 16th century, as part of the Protestant Reformation, King Christian III of Denmark began to impose Lutheranism on all his subjects.
3
The forests were heavily exploited over the centuries for firewood and timber.
Birds, especially seabirds, are an important part of Iceland's animal life.
Lamb is by far the most common meat, and it tends to be either smoke-cured (known as hangikjöt) or salt-preserved (saltkjöt).
THE 1970s: In 1978 this ex-premier urged Italy's government to meet his kidnappers' demands; it didn't
Aldo Moro
From the late 1960s until the early 1980s, the country experienced the Years of Lead, a period characterised by economic crisis (especially after the 1973 oil crisis), widespread social conflicts and terrorist massacres carried out by opposing extremist groups, with the alleged involvement of US and Soviet intelligence. /  /  /  The Years of Lead culminated in the assassination of the Christian Democrat leader Aldo Moro in 1978 and the Bologna railway station massacre in 1980, where 85 people died.
3
The bull was a symbol of the southern Italic tribes and was often depicted goring the Roman wolf as a defiant symbol of free Italy during the Social War.
The Kingdom of Sardinia again attacked the Austrian Empire in the Second Italian War of Independence of 1859, with the aid of France, resulting in liberating Lombardy.
Other popular team sports in Italy include volleyball, basketball and rugby.
THE REAL ESTATE SECTION: Italy:  Begun in 1173!About 300 steps to top of 180-ft. landmark!  Full disclosure: it's 14-ft.-plus out of line
the Leaning Tower of Pisa
Several of the finest works in Western architecture, such as the Colosseum, the Milan Cathedral and Florence cathedral, the Leaning Tower of Pisa and the building designs of Venice are found in Italy.
3
Pallottino, M., History of Earliest Italy, trans.
The Ancient peoples of pre-Roman Italy – such as the Umbrians, the Latins (from which the Romans emerged), Volsci, Samnites, the Celts and the Ligures which inhabited northern Italy, and many others – were Indo-European peoples; the main historic peoples of non-Indo-European heritage include the Etruscans, the Elymians and Sicani in Sicily and the prehistoric Sardinians.
Geography   thumb|Topographic map of Italy  Italy is located in Southern Europe, between latitudes 35° and 47° N, and longitudes 6° and 19° E. To the north, Italy borders France, Switzerland, Austria, and Slovenia, and is roughly delimited by the Alpine watershed, enclosing the Po Valley and the Venetian Plain.
ITALIAN GEOGRAPHY: In 1861 this 9,300-square-mile island just south of Corsica became a part of the kingdom of Italy
Sardinia
The Ancient peoples of pre-Roman Italy – such as the Umbrians, the Latins (from which the Romans emerged), Volsci, Samnites, the Celts and the Ligures which inhabited northern Italy, and many others – were Indo-European peoples; the main historic peoples of non-Indo-European heritage include the Etruscans, the Elymians and Sicani in Sicily and the prehistoric Sardinians.
3
However, the southern and rural areas of the country remained largely excluded from industrialization, fueling a large and influential diaspora.
The Economist Intelligence Unit’s quality-of-life index, Economist, 2005  Italy has the third largest economy in the Eurozone and the eighth largest economy in the world.
Milan also hosts major design and architecture-related events and venues, such as the "Fuori Salone" and the Salone del Mobile, and has been home to the designers Bruno Munari, Lucio Fontana, Enrico Castellani and Piero Manzoni.
THE KILLERS: Bodyguards Satwant & Beant Singh killed this female leader of India in 1984
Indira Gandhi
On Nehru's death in 1964, Lal Bahadur Shastri briefly became prime minister; he was succeeded, after his own unexpected death in 1966, by Indira Gandhi, who went on to lead the Congress to election victories in 1967 and 1971.
3
It has unresolved territorial disputes with China and with Pakistan.
Economy  According to the International Monetary Fund (IMF), as of October 2015, the Indian economy is nominally worth US$2.182 trillion; it is the 7th-largest economy by market exchange rates, and is, at US$8.027 trillion, the third-largest by purchasing power parity, or PPP.
Some of the earliest forms of Asian martial arts, such as kalarippayattu, musti yuddha, silambam, and marma adi, originated in India.
RAIDERS: Wingate's Raiders played a key role in the recovery of Burma, helping prevent a Japanese invasion of India in this war
World War II
The next decade was beset with crises: Indian participation in World War II, the Congress's final push for non-cooperation, and an upsurge of Muslim nationalism.
3
Thus, while 45.8% of reptiles and 55.8% of amphibians are endemic, only 12.6% of mammals and 4.5% of birds are.
In the 1950s, it strongly supported decolonisation in Africa and Asia and played a lead role in the Non-Aligned Movement.
Census of India-Gender Composition 2011 The payment of dowry, although illegal, remains widespread across class lines.
RELIGION: Each year about 1 million Hindu pilgrims journey to Varanasi, India to wash away their sins in this holy river
the Ganges
thumb|left|upright|alt=Damaged brown painting of a reclining man and woman.|Paintings at the Ajanta Caves in Aurangabad, Maharashtra, 6th century  In the late Vedic period, around the 6th century BCE, the small states and chiefdoms of the Ganges Plain and the north-western regions had consolidated into 16 major oligarchies and monarchies that were known as the mahajanapadas.
3
They were imitated all over India and led to both the resurgence of Hinduism and the development of all modern languages of the subcontinent.
Many Indian species descend from taxa originating in Gondwana, from which the Indian plate separated more than 105 million years before present.
That year, Manmohan Singh became the first prime minister since Jawaharlal Nehru in 1957 and 1962 to be re-elected to a consecutive five-year term.
LANDMARKS: Passages from the Koran decorate the outside of this marble tomb at Agra, India
Taj Mahal
Art and architecture Much of Indian architecture, including the Taj Mahal, other works of Mughal architecture, and South Indian architecture, blends ancient local traditions with imported styles.
3
Following market-based economic reforms in 1991, India became one of the fastest-growing major economies; it is considered a newly industrialised country.
These gradually developed into the Indus Valley Civilisation, the first urban culture in South Asia; it flourished during 2500–1900 BCE in Pakistan and western India along the river valleys of Indus and Sarasvati.
Many Indian festivals are religious in origin; among them are Chhath, Christmas, Diwali, Durga Puja, Bakr-Id, Eid ul-Fitr, Ganesh Chaturthi, Holi, Makar Sankranti or Uttarayan, Navratri, Thai Pongal, and Vaisakhi.
NAME THE FOE: Indonesia's Abdul Haris Nasution
the Dutch
In 1602 the Dutch established the Dutch East India Company (VOC) and became the dominant European power.
3
The first Indonesian scholar to use the name was Suwardi Suryaningrat (Ki Hajar Dewantara), when he established a press bureau in the Netherlands with the name Indonesisch Pers-bureau in 1913.
15–18 Trade has since fundamentally shaped Indonesian history.
The diverse world of Indonesian music genres was the result of the musical creativity of its people, and also the subsequent cultural encounters with foreign musical influences into the archipelago.
TRADE: In terms of total value, this accounts for over 90% of Iran's exports
Oil
Iran is a major regional and middle power, exerting considerable influence in international energy security and the world economy through its large reserves of fossil fuels, which include the largest natural gas supply in the world and the fourth-largest proven oil reserves.
3
Iran is home to one of the world's oldest civilizations,Christopher A Whatley (2001).
Hanson (2001, p. 32) estimates almost 75 million.
Up to 11 million men and women are members of the Basij who could potentially be called up for service; GlobalSecurity.org estimates Iran could mobilize "up to one million men".
20th CENTURY AMERICANA: The first Dairy Queen opened in Illinois, & the first McDonald's opened in this state
California
Additionally, Ronald Reagan, whose political career was based in California, was the only U.S. president born and raised in Illinois.
3
This was taken into the Ojibwe language, perhaps in the Ottawa dialect, and modified into ilinwe· (pluralized as ilinwe·k).
The Quad Cities region, located along the Mississippi River in northern Illinois, had a population of 381,342 in 2011.
In 2000, 23.3% of Illinois' population lived in the city of Chicago, 43.3% in Cook County, and 65.6% in the counties of the Chicago metropolitan area: Will, DuPage, Kane, Lake, and McHenry counties, as well as Cook County.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: East Chicago is located in this state, not Illinois
Indiana
However, as Indiana had successfully been granted a 10-mile northern extension of its boundary to provide it with a usable lakefront, the original bill for Illinois statehood, submitted to Congress on January 23, 1818, stipulated a northern border at the same latitude as Indiana's, which is defined as  north of the southernmost extremity of Lake Michigan.
3
The winter of 1830–1831 is called the "Winter of the Deep Snow"; a sudden, deep snowfall blanketed the state, making travel impossible for the rest of the winter, and many travelers perished.
Illinois also has several short tracks and dragstrips.
Parks and recreation  thumb|The Illinois Centennial Column in Chicago's Logan Square.
IT HAPPENED IN JUNE: On June 16, 1858 this man gave his "House Divided" speech in Springfield, Illinois
Abraham Lincoln
Three U.S. presidents have been elected while living in Illinois: Abraham Lincoln, Ulysses S. Grant, and Barack Obama.
3
The Illinois Territory was created on February 3, 1809, with its capital at Kaskaskia, an early French settlement.
The city of Rockford, Illinois' third largest city and center of the state's fourth largest metropolitan area, sits along Interstates 39 and 90 some  northwest of Chicago.
Religion  Roman Catholics constitute the single largest religious denomination in Illinois; they are heavily concentrated in and around Chicago, and account for nearly 30% of the state's population.
NOW GET OUT!: After the Mormons left this Illinois town in 1846, a group of French socialists moved in
Nauvoo
By 1839, the Latter Day Saints had founded a utopian city called Nauvoo.
3
Cities include Peoria, Springfield, the state capital; Quincy; Decatur; Bloomington-Normal; and Champaign-Urbana.
However, taken together as a group, the various Protestant denominations comprise a greater percentage of the state's population than do Catholics.
Also, the state has hosted 13 editions of the U.S. Open (latest at Olympia Fields in 2003), six edition of the PGA Championship (latest at Medinah in 2006), three editions of the U.S. Women's Open (latest at The Merit Club), the 2009 Solheim Cup (at Rich Harvest Farms) and the 2012 Ryder Cup (at Medinah).
THIS IS GONNA BE TOUGH: In a 1968 film it was revealed that this machine was born on January 12, 1992 in Urbana, Illinois
HAL
The Chicago Blitz, United States Football League 1982-84 The Chicago Sting, North American Soccer League 1975-84 and Major Indoor Soccer League The Chicago Cougars, World Hockey Association 1972-75 The Chicago Rockers, Continental Basketball Association The Chicago Skyliners, American Basketball Association 2000-01 The Chicago Bruisers, Arena Football League 1987-2008 The Chicago Power, National Professional Soccer League 1984-2001 The Chicago Blaze, National Women's Basketball League The Chicago Machine, Major League Lacrosse The Chicago Whales of the Federal Baseball League, a rival league to Major League Baseball from 1914-1916 The Chicago American Giants of the Negro baseball league, 1910-1952 The Chicago Bruins of the National Basketball League, 1939–42 The Chicago Studebaker Flyers of the NBL, 1942–43 The Chicago American Gears of the NBL, 1944–47
3
As defined by the federal government, the Chicago metro area includes several counties in Illinois, Indiana, and Wisconsin, and has a population of over 9.8 million people.
The Morris Operation is the only de facto high-level radioactive waste storage site in the United States.
However, the "collar counties" (the suburbs surrounding Chicago's Cook County, Illinois), can be seen as moderate voting districts.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: The 1996 Rose Bowl pitted the USC Trojans against this Illinois school's Wildcats
Northwestern
In extreme northwestern Illinois, the Driftless Area, a region of unglaciated and therefore higher and more rugged topography, occupies a small part of the state.
3
By the end of the century, the population had reached 12.4 million.
Chicago, the third most populous city in the United States, is the center of the Chicago metropolitan area.
Moseley-Braun was the first and, to date, only African-American woman to become a U.S. Senator.
BROADWAY: The musical "Into the Woods" is based on several fairy tales, including the one about this boy and his beanstalk
Jack
The main characters are taken from "Little Red Riding Hood", "Jack and the Beanstalk", "Rapunzel", and "Cinderella", as well as several others.
2
Cinderella, returning from the last night of the festival, describes how the Prince had spread pitch on the stairs to prevent her from escaping.
It starred Bernadette Peters, Joanna Gleason, Chip Zien, Kim Crosby, Ben Wright, Danielle Ferland, Chuck Wagner, Merle Louise, Tom Aldredge, and Robert Westenberg.
JAPAN-U.S. RELATIONS: In the phrase San Furanshisuko Heiwa Joyaku, a 1951 treaty, heiwa means this happy condition
peace
Although Japan has officially renounced its right to declare war, it maintains a modern military with the world's eighth largest military budget, used for self-defense and peacekeeping roles.
3
Japan's population grew from 35 million in 1873 to 70 million in 1935.
The largest international gateways are Narita International Airport, Kansai International Airport and Chūbu Centrair International Airport.
This was the greatest decline since at least 1947, when comparable figures were first compiled.
WORLD CITIES: Considered the home of Japanese drama, especially puppet theater, it's Japan's third largest city
Osaka
Some of the surviving elements of the Edo period are roads and water transportation routes, as well as financial instruments such as futures contracts, banking and insurance of the Osaka rice brokers.
3
Japan is a leading nation in scientific research, particularly technology, machinery and biomedical research.
Nevertheless, the level of participation remains high, especially during festivals and occasions such as the first shrine visit of the New Year.
The interaction between Japanese and European art has been significant: for example ukiyo-e prints, which began to be exported in the 19th century in the movement known as Japonism, had a significant influence on the development of modern art in the West, most notably on post-Impressionism.
IN THE NEWS: This Asian country's economy grew to be the third-largest in the world in 2007, behind only the U.S. & Japan
China
Located in the Pacific Ocean, it lies to the east of the Sea of Japan, the East China Sea, China, North Korea, South Korea and Russia, stretching from the Sea of Okhotsk in the north to the East China Sea and Taiwan in the south.
3
The resignation of the shogun led to the Boshin War and the establishment of a centralized state nominally unified under the Emperor (the Meiji Restoration).
This was the greatest decline since at least 1947, when comparable figures were first compiled.
Japanese-made video game consoles have been popular since the 1980s.
WORLD CITIES: This city founded in 1693 didn't become capital of Jamaica until 1872
Kingston
Kingston is the country's capital and largest city, with a population of 937,700.
3
When the Spanish arrived in 1494, except for small agricultural clearings, the country was deeply forested.
The chief varieties of saltwater fish are kingfish, jack, mackerel, whiting, bonito, and tuna.
For Your Eyes
HIGH-TECH CINEMA: In this Coen Brothers comedy, 2 gym employees find a disk containing the memoirs of a CIA agent
Burn After Reading
McDormand has acted in six of the Coen brothers' films, including a minor appearance in Miller's Crossing, a supporting role in Raising Arizona, lead roles in Blood Simple and The Man Who Wasn't There, her Academy Award winning role in Fargo, and her starring role in Burn After Reading.
3
She also did a voice-over in Barton Fink.
Journal of Religion & Film Vol 15, First Edition, University of Nebraska Omaha, Nebraska, 2012, p10 Filming took place in late summer 2008 in some neighborhoods of Roseville and Bloomington, Minnesota, at Normandale Community College, and at St. Olaf College.
Ross, Jenna. "Drugstore has role in lives, film of Coen brothers," Star Tribune (Minneapolis, MN), Friday, November 9, 2007.
FIRST NAMES: This first name of a Jane Austen character is also that of Ethelred's queen
Emma
From 1811 until 1816, with the release of Sense and Sensibility (1811),  Pride and Prejudice (1813), Mansfield Park (1814) and Emma (1815), she achieved success as a published writer.
3
Le Faye, "Chronology", 4; Fergus, "Biography", 7–8; Tomalin, 112–120, 159; Honan, 105–111.
Austen's works brought her little personal renown because they were published anonymously.
R. W. Chapman and B. C. Southam.
BIRTH OF A NATION: June 30, 1960:This country's King Baudouin grants independence to its large Congolese colony
Belgium
Congo gains independence from Belgium.
3
José Emilio Pacheco, Mexican poet and author (d. 2014) 1940 – Mark Spoelstra, American singer-songwriter and guitarist (d. 2007) 1941 – Peter Pollock, South African cricketer and author   1941   –
Anna Levandi, Russian figure skater and coach   1965
– Sébastien Rose, Canadian director and screenwriter 1970 – Brian Bloom, American actor and screenwriter   1970   – Antonio Chimenti, Italian footballer and manager   1970   –
THE LIBERTY BELL: Appropriately, it's the number of times the Liberty Bell is symbolically tapped each year on July 4
13
414 – Emperor Theodosius II, age 13, yields power to his older sister Aelia Pulcheria, who reigned as regent and proclaimed herself empress (Augusta) of the Eastern Roman Empire.
3
The act went into effect the next year.
– Irving Caesar, American songwriter and composer (d. 1996) 1896 –
Richard Cosway, English painter and academic (b. 1742)
ROCK GROUPS: This group, formed by John Lennon, was introduced in 1969 on his "Give Peace A Chance" single
The Plastic Ono Band
In 1969, they formed the Plastic Ono Band, releasing Live Peace in Toronto 1969.
3
Another political activist, John Sinclair, poet and co-founder of the White Panther Party, was serving ten years in prison for selling two joints of marijuana after previous convictions for possession of the drug.
The Beatles Anthology (2000) also presented examples of his writings and drawings.
ISBN 978-1401324520  Wiener, Jon.
JUNE SWOON: Declared a public enemy by the Senate, this Roman emperor committed suicide on June 9, 68 A.D.
Nero
The Roman emperor Nero marries Claudia Octavia.
3
– Charles Joseph Bonaparte, American lawyer and politician, 46th United States Attorney General (d. 1921) 1861 –
Giulio Terzi di Sant'Agata, Italian politician and diplomat, Italian Minister of Foreign Affairs 1947
Billy Knight, American basketball player 1953 – Ken Navarro, Italian-American guitarist and composer 1954 –
CONSTELLATIONS: Ptolemy listed a constellation named for this, Jason's ship; it's been replaced by Carina, Puppis, Pyxis & Vela
the Argo
Jason (;  Iásōn) was an ancient Greek mythological hero who was famous for his role as the leader of the Argonauts and their quest for the Golden Fleece.
3
The king, Thoas, was saved by Hypsipyle, his daughter, who put him out to sea sealed in a chest from which he was later rescued.
Jason sprayed the dragon with a potion, given by Medea, distilled from herbs.
When Orpheus heard their voices, he drew his lyre and played music that was more beautiful and louder, drowning out the Sirens' bewitching songs.
MORE MYTHOLOGICAL MISTAKES: Jason's new wife Creusa shouldn't have tried on the gown this sorceress sent her: it was poisoned
Medea
He was married to the sorceress Medea.
3
Jason, knowing that he was the rightful king, told Pelias that and Pelias said, "To take my throne, which you shall, you must go on a quest to find the Golden Fleece." Jason happily accepted the quest.
The Argonauts killed many of the Doliones, among them the king Cyzicus.
Later Jason and Peleus, father of the hero Achilles, attacked and defeated Acastus, reclaiming the throne of Iolcus for himself once more.
THE CABINET: Our fifth Secretary of State; his Secretary of State, James Madison, became president, too
Thomas Jefferson
Breaking with Hamilton and the Federalist Party in 1791, he and Thomas Jefferson organized the Democratic-Republican Party.
3
"Did James Madison suffer a nervous collapse due to the intensity of his studies?"
Initially Madison did not want to stand for election to the Virginia ratifying convention, but was persuaded to do so because the situation looked so bad.
Beginning in 1802, Napoleon sent more than 20,000 troops to try to restore slavery on the island, as its colonial sugar cane plantations had been the chief revenue producer for France in the New World.
INDEPENDENCE DAYS: On July 28 Peru celebrates its independence from this country
Spain
1778 – Constitution of the province of Cantabria ratified at the Assembly Hall in Bárcena la Puente, Reocín, Spain.
3
Luis Aragonés, Spanish footballer, coach, and manager (d. 2014)   1938
– Rina Aizawa, Japanese actress and model 1992
–
THE MIDDLE AGES: Of the 4 major Crusades, the one in which the Christians actually captured Jerusalem
the First Crusade
They were known as avelei șion (Mourners of Zion) or Shoshanim (Lilies(among the thorns)) thumb|upright|Medieval illustration of capture of Jerusalem during the First Crusade, 1099  Jerusalem was captured in 1073 by the Seljukid commander Atsız.[http://www.islamansiklopedisi.info/ Islam encyclopaedia  Vol 26 pp.323-327   After Atsız was killed, the Seljukid prince Tutush I granted the city to Artuk Bey, another Seljukid commander,  After Artuk's death in 1091 his sons Sökmen and Ilghazi  governed in the city up to 1098 when the Fatimids captured the city.
3
As a result, by 1099 Jerusalem’s population had climbed back to some 30,000.
East Jerusalem, along with some nearby West Bank territory which comprised some dozens of Palestinian villages, was subsequently annexed by Israel, as were the city's Christian and Muslim holy sites.
Today it is both the central library of the university and the national library of Israel.
BIBLICAL FASHION: Achan admitted to Joshua that from the spoils of this city he took a "Goodly Babylon Garment"
Jericho
The first battle after the crossing of the Jordan was the Battle of Jericho.
3
At Gibeon Joshua asked Yahweh to cause the sun and moon to stand still, so that he could finish the battle in daylight.
Historicity  The prevailing scholarly view is that Joshua is not a factual account of historical events.
Dever 2003, p. 206.
MILTON: Book I of this John Milton work begins, "Of man's first disobedience..."
"Paradise Lost"
The Verse, "Paradise Lost".
3
Milton was disdainful of the university curriculum, which consisted of stilted formal debates on abstruse topics, conducted in Latin.
Although there are other records, including some letters and some references in his other prose tracts, the bulk of the information about the tour comes from a work that, according to Barbara Lewalski, "was not intended as autobiography but as rhetoric, designed to emphasise his sterling reputation with the learned of Europe."Lewalski 2003 pp.
Later it became No.
LOW SELF-ESTEEM: Juliana Hatfield sang, "I'm" this "with a capital U, and I don't need a mirror to see that it's true"
Ugly
And no love songs...a not-at-all attractive reaction to the ugly side of humanity, specifically American culture." The two albums were initially released in a set as a pair; however, Juliana's Pony: Total System Failure was received badly by the critics, who preferred the acoustic songwriting on Beautiful Creature.
3
But I am a lot more confident now than I was then with the first album.
10 one of the "20 Best Cover Songs of 2014.
In a 1993 interview in Melody Maker magazine, Hatfield stated that her enthusiasm for the music of the pop group Wilson Phillips apparently led, at least in part, to the breakup of the Blake Babies.
JOHN HANCOCK: In a speech, Hancock said the perpetrators of this 1770 event would have to show God their bloody hands
Boston Massacre
The British troops remained, however, and tensions between soldiers and civilians eventually resulted in the killing of five civilians in the Boston Massacre of March 1770.
3
Hancock paid the duties on the 25 pipes of wine, but officials suspected that he had arranged to have more wine unloaded during the night to avoid paying the duties for the entire cargo.
Hancock was immensely popular and unquestionably patriotic given his personal sacrifices and his leadership of the Second Continental Congress.
He is portrayed in the HBO miniseries John Adams by actor Justin Theroux.
COLLEGE FILMS: When kicked out of school in this film, John Belushi sighs, "Seven years of college down the drain"
National Lampoon's Animal House
Film credits  Tarzoon: Shame of the Jungle (1975) (voice)  Goin' South (1978)  National Lampoon's Animal House (1978)  Old Boyfriends (1979)  1941 (1979)
3
He was subsequently cast with Chevy Chase and Christopher Guest in National Lampoon Lemmings, a parody of Woodstock, which played Off-Broadway in 1972.
In Rolling Stone Magazine'''s February, 2015 appraisal of all 141 SNL cast members to date, Belushi received the top ranking.
She and co-biographer Tanner Colby produced Belushi: A Biography, a collection of first-person interviews and photographs of John Belushi's life that was published in 2005.
BOB DYLAN: Bob's "Lay Lady Lay" was considered for this 1969 Jon Voight film, but didn't make the soundtrack
Midnight Cowboy
Voight came to prominence in the late 1960s with his performance as a would-be gigolo in Midnight Cowboy (1969).
3
After graduation, Voight moved to New York City, where he pursued an acting career.
And so I said "Sure!" and I thought they would ask me to do a walk-on, the way it came: "Would you come be part of the show?"
Voight received his fourth Academy Award nomination, this time for Best Actor in a Supporting Role, for his performance, extending his reign as one of Hollywood's most talented actors.
TIM CONWAY FILMS: Tim appeared with Sandra Bullock in this 1997 sequel, but he didn't replace Keanu Reeves
Speed 2
He made news by refusing to take part in Speed 2: Cruise Control – despite the offered $11 million paycheck, which would have been his largest to date –
3
Acting onstage, he performed as Prince Hamlet for the Manitoba Theatre Centre's production of Hamlet.
During his initial rise to stardom, Reeves preferred to live in rental houses and hotels.
The company produced Henry's Crime in 2010.
THE NUMBER 7: 7 is the international dialing code for Kazakhstan & this big neighbor
Russia
It has borders with (clockwise from the north) Russia, China, Kyrgyzstan, Uzbekistan, and Turkmenistan, and also adjoins a large part of the Caspian Sea.
3
At the time of Soviet leader Joseph Stalin's death, however, Kazakhstan still had an overwhelmingly agriculturally based economy.
According to its Constitution, Kazakhstan is a secular state.
Olympic weightlifting  Zulfiya Chinshanlo won a gold medal at the 2012 London Olympics.
WE'RE NOT IN KANSAS ANYMORE: We've left Lawrence, Kansas for Lawrence in this state, Leonard Bernstein's birthplace
Massachusetts
The secondary settlement of Americans in Kansas Territory were abolitionists from Massachusetts and other Free-Staters, who attempted to stop the spread of slavery from neighboring Missouri.
3
Despite the frequent sunshine throughout much of the state, due to its location at a climatic boundary prone to intrusions of multiple air masses, the state is vulnerable to strong and severe thunderstorms.
Some increase in debt was expected as the state continues with its 10-year Comprehensive Transportation Program enacted in 1999.
In lieu of the state retail sales tax, a 10% Liquor Drink Tax is collected for liquor consumed on the licensed premises and an 8% Liquor Enforcement Tax is collected on retail purchases.
KNOCK, KNOCK: "...No trace of imagination, good taste or ingenuity", the New Yorker said of this '39 film set in Kansas
The Wizard of Oz
Film  As was the case with the novel, the main character in the 1939 fantasy film The Wizard of Oz was a young girl who lived in Kansas with her aunt and uncle.
3
In 1803, most of modern Kansas was secured by the United States as part of the Louisiana Purchase.
By state statute, cities are divided into three classes as determined by the population obtained "by any census of enumeration."
Vote by Kansas School Board Favors Evolution's Doubters
QUOTES: Karl Marx: This "is the opium of the people"
religion
Like Marx, the Young Hegelians were critical of Hegel's metaphysical assumptions, but adopted his dialectical method in order to criticise established society, politics, and religion from a leftist perspective.; ; .
3
Another attendee of the funeral was Ray Lankester, a British zoologist who would later become a prominent academic.
Karl Marx's Theory of History: A Defence (Princeton University Press, 1978)
Marx (Oneworld, 2004)  Draper, Hal, Karl Marx's Theory of Revolution (4 volumes) Monthly Review Press  Duncan, Ronald and Wilson, Colin.
THEATRE: He made his Broadway debut in "Slab Boys" with Kevin Bacon in '83, 12 years before starring in "Batman Forever"
Val Kilmer
In 1982, he won an Obie Award for his role in Forty Deuce, and soon afterward he made his Broadway debut in Slab Boys, with then-unknowns Sean Penn and Val Kilmer.
3
Bacon earned strong reviews for Footloose, and he appeared on the cover of People magazine soon after its release.
From 2012, Bacon has appeared in a major advertising campaign for the EE mobile network in the United Kingdom, based on the Six Degrees concept and his various film roles.
This is done by means of the Erdős number, which is 0 for Paul Erdős himself, 1 for someone who co-wrote an article with him, 2 for someone who co-wrote with someone who co-wrote with him, etc.
A CUP OF KOFI: In 1991 Kofi Annan negotiated the release of U.N. workers held in this country during the Persian Gulf War
Iraq
Iraq In the years after 1998 when UNSCOM was kicked out by the government of Saddam Hussein and during the Iraq disarmament crisis, in which the United States blamed UNSCOM and former IAEA director Hans Blix for failing to properly disarm Iraq, Scott Ritter the former UNSCOM chief weapons inspector, blamed Annan for being slow and ineffective in enforcing Security Council resolutions on Iraq and was overtly submissive to the demands of the Clinton administration for regime removal and inspection of sites, often Presidential palaces, that were not mandated in any resolution and were of questionable intelligence value, which severely hampered UNSCOM's ability to cooperate with the Iraqi government and contributed to their expulsion from the country.
3
From 1954 to 1957, Annan attended the elite Mfantsipim school, a Methodist boarding school in Cape Coast founded in the 1870s.
Annan supported sending a UN peacekeeping mission to Darfur, Sudan.
The announcement was made during the school's 5th anniversary celebrations.
CONTRARY TO POPULAR BELIEF: Some argue there are 46 states, not 50, as Virginia, Kentucky, Pennsylvania & Massachusetts are all these
Commonwealths
The other two states officially called "commonwealths" are Massachusetts and Pennsylvania.
3
Retrieved Sep 2013  A 1790 U.S. government report states that 1,500 Kentucky settlers had been killed by Native Americans since the end of the Revolutionary War.
The lieutenant governor may or may not have executive authority depending on whether the person is a member of the Governor's cabinet.
Language In 2000, 96.1% of all residents five years old and older spoke only English at home, a decrease from 97.5% in 1990.
NOTED NATIVE AMERICANS: Chief Blackfish adopted this Kentucky explorer, guide & later state legislator
Daniel Boone
Red River Gorge Geological Area, part of the Daniel Boone National Forest.
3
thumb|right|200px|The Eastern Kentucky Coalfield is known for its rugged terrain.
The Baptist Denomination is associated with:  University of the Cumberlands, in Williamsburg  Campbellsville University, in Campbellsville  Georgetown College, in Georgetown  Louisville is home to the headquarters of the Presbyterian Church (U.S.A.) and their printing press.
The Kentucky Derby is a horse race held annually in Louisville on the first Saturday in May.
"L"s ON THE MAP: There's a monument to the great racehorse Man O' War in this city, Kentucky's second largest
Lexington
One of the major regions in Kentucky is the Bluegrass Region in central Kentucky which houses two of its major cities, Louisville and Lexington.
2
It is a land with diverse environments and abundant resources, including the world's longest cave system, Mammoth Cave National Park, the greatest length of navigable waterways and streams in the contiguous United States, and the two largest man-made lakes east of the Mississippi River.
Natural attractions thumb|Red River Gorge is one of Kentucky's most visited places thumb|Forest at Otter Creek Outdoor Recreation Area, Meade County, Kentucky  Cumberland Gap, chief passageway through the Appalachian Mountains in early American history.
KELSEY GRAMMER: The male lead in "Yentl", he gave without taking when he recommended Kelsey for a part on "Cheers"
Mandy Patinkin
In 1983 he performed on the demo of the Stephen Sondheim–James Lapine production Sunday in the Park with George, starring Mandy Patinkin.
3
Through Spencer, Grammer has one grandson, Spencer's son Emmett Emmanual Hesketh (born October 10, 2011).
Stewart TV miniseries 1984–1985 Another World Dr. Canard Recurring role 1984–1993 Cheers Dr. Frasier Crane 201 episodesNominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actor in a Comedy Series (1988, 1990) 1986 Crossings Craig Lawson TV miniseries 1987 Biography George Washington Episode: "Benedict Arnold" 1987 J.J. Starbuck Pierce Morgan Episode: "Murder in E Minor" 1988 Dance 'til Dawn Ed Strull TV film 1988 Mickey's 60th Birthday Frasier Crane TV Special 1989 Top of the Hill TV film 1989 227 Mr. Anderson Episode: "For Sale" 1990–present  Sideshow Bob (voice) Recurring rolePrimetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Voice-Over Performance 1990 The Earth Day Special Dr. Frasier Crane  1990  Mr. Brenna Episode: "Maria and the Mister" 1991 Baby Talk Russell Episode: "One Night with Elliot" 1992 Wings Dr. Frasier Crane Episode: "Planes, Trains and Visiting Cranes"Nominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actor in a Comedy Series 1992 Star Trek: The Next Generation Captain Bateson Episode: "Cause and Effect" 1993 Roc Detective Rush Episode: "To Love and Die on Emerson Street: Part 2" 1993 Beyond Suspicion Ron McNally TV film 1993–2004 Frasier Dr. Frasier Crane 264 episodes; also executive producer and director of 37 episodesPrimetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Comedy Series (1994–95, 1998, 2004)American Comedy Award for Funniest Male Performer in a Television Series (1995–96)Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Television Series Musical or Comedy (1996, 2001)Satellite Award for Best Actor – Television Series Musical or Comedy (1998, 2002)Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy SeriesViewers for Quality Television Award for Best Actor in a Quality Comedy Series (1995–98)Nominated—American Comedy Award for Funniest Male Performer in a Television Series (1999, 2001)Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Television Series Musical or Comedy (1994–95, 1997–99, 2002)Nominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Comedy Series (1999–2001)Nominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Comedy Series (1996–97, 1999–2002)Nominated—Satellite Award for Best Actor – Television Series Musical or ComedyNominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Comedy Series (1995–2002)Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy Series (1995–99, 2001–04)Nominated—Television Critics Association Award for Individual Achievement in Comedy (1997, 1999)Nominated—Viewers for Quality Television Award for Best Actor in a Quality Comedy Series (1999–2000) 1994  Det.
External links            Category:1955 births Category:American male film actors Category:American male television actors Category:American male voice actors Category:American people convicted of drug offenses Category:American people of English descent Category:American people of United States Virgin Islands descent Category:American television directors Category:American television producers Category:Best Drama Actor Golden Globe (television) winners Category:Best Musical or Comedy Actor Golden Globe (television) winners Category:California Republicans Category:Juilliard School alumni Category:Living people Category:Male actors from Beverly Hills, California Category:Male actors from New York City Category:New York Republicans Category:Outstanding Performance by a Lead Actor in a Comedy Series
TOM WOLFE: It's Wolfe's 1968 book about Ken Kesey & friends' cross-country journey
The Electric Kool-Aid Acid Test
These parties were described in some of Ginsberg's poems and served as the basis for Tom Wolfe's The Electric Kool-Aid Acid Test, an early exemplar of the nonfiction novel.
3
Kesey was born in La Junta, Colorado and grew up in Springfield, Oregon, graduating from the University of Oregon in 1957.
Unbeknownst to Kesey, who applied at Hall's request, the maverick literary critic Leslie Fiedler successfully importuned the regional fellowship committee to select the "rough-hewn" Kesey alongside more traditional fellows from Reed College and other elite institutions.
Elaine B Safer, The contemporary American Comic Epic: The Novels of Barth, Pynchon, Gaddis, and Kesey.
A SLICE OF LETTISH: Newly independent at the time, Latvia joined this world body on Sept. 22, 1921
the League of Nations
It was a member of the League of Nations (1921–1946).
3
Under German occupation, Latvia was administered as part of Reichskommissariat Ostland.
Several nature reserves protect unspoiled landscapes with a variety of large animals.
Education  thumb|University of Latvia  Riga Technical University and University of Latvia are two major universities in the country, both been established on the basis of Riga Polytechnical Institute and located in Riga.
BODIES OF WATER: Latvia's capital shares its name with this nearby gulf
Gulf of Riga
Geography  thumb|Cape Kolka, the northern tip of Latvia in the Gulf of Riga.
3
As a consequence of the Soviet occupation, both countries are home to a large number of ethnic Russians (26.9% in Latvia and 25.5% in Estonia), some of whom are non-citizens.
The unemployment rate has receded from its peak of more than 20 percent in 2010 to around 9.3 percent in 2014.
Fish is commonly consumed due to Latvia's location on the Baltic Sea.
THE LOUVRE: Among his other paintings in the Louvre are "St. John the Baptist" & the "Virgin of the Rocks"
Leonardo
Francis acquired what would become the nucleus of the Louvre's holdings, his acquisitions including Leonardo da Vinci's Mona Lisa.
3
In 1692, the building was occupied by the Académie des Inscriptions et Belles Lettres and the Académie Royale de Peinture et de Sculpture, which in 1699 held the first of a series of salons.
Mignot, p. 32
The Musée du Louvre contains more than 380,000 objects and displays 35,000 works of art in eight curatorial departments.
KNOWLEDGE OF FONTS: From the Latin for "flowing" comes the name of these typefaces that resemble handwriting script
cursive
thumb|250px|A replica of the Old Roman Cursive inspired by the Vindolanda tablets  The Roman cursive script is commonly found on the many wax tablets excavated at sites such as forts, an especially extensive set having been discovered at Vindolanda on Hadrian's Wall in Britain.
3
If it was not preferred in classical Latin, then it most likely came from the invisible contemporaneous Vulgar Latin.
There are also a number of Latin participles.
The fused infinitive ending is -re or -rī. Third-conjugation stems end in a consonant: the consonant conjugation.
5-LETTER WORDS: From the Latin word for "time", it's the speed at which a musical piece is played
tempo
If it was not preferred in classical Latin, then it most likely came from the invisible contemporaneous Vulgar Latin.
3
The unvarnished, journalistic style of this patrician general has long been taught as a model of the urbane Latin officially spoken and written in the floruit of the Roman republic.
Latin remains the language of the Roman Rite; the Tridentine Mass is celebrated in Latin.
Search on line Latin-English and English-Latin dictionary with complete declension or conjugation.
LATIN CLASS: Latin for "mountain", it follows Olympus & Pavonis in the names of Martian volcanoes
Mons
+ Pronunciation of Latin vowels Latingrapheme Latinphone modern examples   similar to u in cut when short  similar to a in father when long    as e in pet when short  similar to ey in they when long    as i in sit when short  similar to i in machine when long   as o in sort when short  similar to o in holy when long   similar to u in put when short  similar to u in true when long   as in German Stück when short (or as short u or i)  as in German früh when long (or as long u or i)  A vowel and  at the end of a word, or a vowel and  before  or , is long and nasal, as in monstrum .
3
It is taught in primary, secondary, and post-secondary educational institutions around the world.
Adjectives
Lists:   List of Greek words with English derivatives  List of Latin and Greek words commonly used in systematic names  List of Latin abbreviations  List of Latin phrases  List of Latin words with English derivatives  List of Latinised names  Notes  References  External links  Language tools   Searches Lewis & Short's A Latin Dictionary and Lewis's An Elementary Latin Dictionary''.
THE BAYEUX TAPESTRY: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from the Bayeux Cathedral in France.)  A workman is putting a weathercock on the roof of this London church; its consecration on Dec. 28, 1065 is symbolized by the hand of God above the nave
Westminster Abbey
London contains four World Heritage Sites: the Tower of London; Kew Gardens; the site comprising the Palace of Westminster, Westminster Abbey, and St Margaret's Church; and the historic settlement of Greenwich (in which the Royal Observatory, Greenwich marks the Prime Meridian, 0° longitude, and GMT).
3
It is one of the world's leading financial centres and has the fifth-or sixth-largest metropolitan area GDP in the world depending on measurement.
Retrieved 12 November 2015  London generates about 20 per cent of the UK's GDP (or $446 billion in 2005); while the economy of the London metropolitan area—the largest in Europe—generates about 30 per cent of the UK's GDP (or an estimated $669 billion in 2005).
Cable car London's first and only cable car, known as the Emirates Air Line, opened in June 2012.
A YEAR TO REMEMBER: The Great Fire of London isn't so great; Queen Anne of Austria makes a royal exit; Moliere pens "The Misanthrope"
1666
Early modern thumb|The Great Fire of London destroyed many parts of the city in 1666.
2
Until 1889, the name "London" officially applied only to the City of London, but since then it has also referred to the County of London  and now Greater London.
In 2003, a congestion charge was introduced to reduce traffic volumes in the city centre.
"OCK" DU LIEBER: A dialect from the east end of London
Cockney
The most well known of the London accents long ago acquired the Cockney label, which is heard both in London itself, and across the wider South East England region more generally."Cracking Up!".
3
The Office for National Statistics estimated its mid-2014 population to be 8,538,689, the largest of any municipality in the European Union, and accounting for 12.5 percent of the UK population.
London is also home to many specialist arts education institutions, including the Academy of Live and Recorded Arts, Central School of Ballet, LAMDA, London College of Contemporary Arts (LCCA), London Contemporary Dance School, National Centre for Circus Arts, RADA, Rambert School of Ballet and Contemporary Dance, the Royal College of Art, the Royal College of Music and Trinity Laban.
Areas that provide for walks include Wimbledon Common, Epping Forest, Hampton Court Park, Hampstead Heath, the eight Royal Parks, canals and disused railway tracks.
THE 50 STATES: Of states with Lake Michigan shoreline, it has the least, 41 miles
Indiana
Lake Michigan is shared, from west to east, by the U.S. states of Wisconsin, Illinois, Indiana, and Michigan.
3
The Great Lakes are also connected by the Illinois Waterway to the Gulf of Mexico via the Illinois River (from Chicago) and the Mississippi River.
The Manistee National Forest section of the shoreline includes the Nordhouse Dunes Wilderness.
Keith Kompoltowicz, chief of watershed hydrology for the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers' district office in Detroit, explained that biggest factors leading to the lower water levels in 2013 were a combination of the "lack of a large snowpack" in the winter of 2011/2012 coupled with very hot and dry conditions in the summer of 2012.
MIDDLE AMERICA: A canal across Wisconsin's Door Peninsula connects Lake Michigan with this bay
Green Bay
In 1673, Jacques Marquette, Louis Joliet and their crew of five Métis voyageurs followed Lake Michigan to Green Bay and up the Fox River, nearly to its headwaters, in their search for the Mississippi River.
2
Seasonal residents often have summer homes along the waterfront and return home for the winter.
Epoufette Island, Gravel Island, Little Hog Island, and Naubinway Island are located in Mackinac County, Michigan, in the area of Epoufette, Michigan and Naubinway, Michigan.
SHIP HAPPENINGS: Immortalized in a Gordon Lightfoot song, this cargo vessel sank in Lake Superior in 1975
the Edmund Fitzgerald
Henry Wadsworth Longfellow wrote the name as "Gitche Gumee" in The Song of Hiawatha, as did Gordon Lightfoot in his song, "The Wreck of the Edmund Fitzgerald".
3
According to other sources the actual Ojibwe name is Ojibwe Gichigami ("Ojibwe's Great Sea") or Anishinaabe Gichigami ("Anishinaabe's Great Sea").Under the Shadow of the Gods: A guide to the History of the Canadian Shore of Lake Superior by Barbara Chisholm & Andrea Gutsche 1st edition 1998 printed bound in Canada by Transcontinental Printing Inc
The lake is fed by over 200 rivers.
Ontario's Mineral Emblem Ontario Ministry of Northern Development and Mines.
QUICK LIT: A Louise Erdrich novel is titled "The Plague of" these birds
doves
In 2009, her novel The Plague of Doves was a finalist for the Pulitzer Prize for Fiction and also received an Anisfield-Wolf Book Award.
3
She is also the owner of Birchbark Books, a small independent bookstore in Minneapolis that focuses on Native American literature and the Native community in the Twin Cities.
She returned to Dartmouth in 2009 to receive an honorary Doctorate of Letters and to deliver the commencement address.
The Bingo Palace (1994), set in the 1980s,  describes the  effects of a casino and a factory on the reservation community.
WOMEN IN HISTORY: Lise Meitner made atomic energy possible with her 1938 co-discovery of this nuclear process
Nuclear fission
Otto Hahn and Meitner led the small group of scientists who first discovered nuclear fission of uranium when it absorbed an extra neutron; the results were published in early 1939.
3
That year, Meitner was given her own physics section at the Kaiser Wilhelm Institute for Chemistry.
ISBN 3-7776-1380-0.
She is the first and so far only non-mythological woman thus honored.
WHAAAZUUUP?!: Leonardo da Vinci sketched one of these in 1483; Sikorsky produced the first practical one in 1939
helicopter
Sometimes credited with the inventions of the parachute, helicopter and tank,Rumerman, Judy.
3
There are 15 significant artworks which are ascribed, either in whole or in large part, to Leonardo by most art historians.
Behind the figures are a distant landscape and a large ruined building.
The daring display of figure composition, the landscape elements and personal drama also appear in the great unfinished masterpiece, the Adoration of the Magi, a commission from the Monks of San Donato a Scopeto.
ART & ARTISTS: In 1482 Leonardo Da Vinci moved to this city to become its court artist to Ludovico Sforza
Milan
Much of his earlier working life was spent in the service of Ludovico il Moro in Milan.
2
Vasari, p.265
Leonardo commenced his apprenticeship with Verrocchio in 1466, the year that Verrocchio's master, the great sculptor Donatello, died.
ROBERT REDFORD: On August 18, 1937 Robert Redford was born in this "saintly" California beach city that borders Los Angeles
Santa Monica
The eastern end of the Santa Monica Mountains stretches from Downtown to the Pacific Ocean and separates the Los Angeles Basin from the San Fernando Valley.
3
The money generated by the industry kept the city insulated from much of the economic loss suffered by the rest of the country during the Great Depression.
The city met its goal of providing 20 percent of the city's power from renewable sources in 2010.
The sixth busiest commercial airport in the world and the third busiest in the United States, LAX handled over 66 million passengers and close to 2 million tons of cargo in 2013.
FIRST ELECTED OFFICE: He was elected to Louisiana's State Railroad Commission in 1918, lost the race for governor in '24 but won in '28
Huey Long
Beginning in the 1940s, blacks went West to California for jobs in its expanding defense industries. "African American Migration Experience: The Great Migration", In Motion, New York Public Library, Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, accessed April 24, 2008  During some of the Great Depression, Louisiana was led by Governor Huey Long.
3
thumb|French Acadians, who came to be known as Cajuns, settled the swamps of southern Louisiana, especially in the Atchafalaya Basin.
After sales in New Orleans, steamboats operating on the Mississippi transported slaves upstream to markets or plantation destinations at Natchez and Memphis.
The mechanization of agriculture also reduced the need for laborers.
LITERARY CHARACTERS: This title guy lives in West Egg, Long Island; his lost love, Daisy Buchanan, in East Egg
the Great Gatsby
This period and the area was immortalized in fiction, such as F. Scott Fitzgerald's The Great Gatsby (which has also been adapted in films.)
3
About Long Island, LongIsland.com North of the island is Long Island Sound, across from which lie the states of Connecticut and a small part of Rhode Island.
(direct: Final Revised Paper)
Public transportation thumb|left|A 7 train in Queens  The MTA implements mass transportation for the New York metropolitan area including all five boroughs of New York City, the suburban counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, Rockland, Suffolk and Westchester, all of which together are the "Metropolitan Commuter Transportation District (MCTD)".
HOT SPOTS: National seashore resort that's been "burning" off Long Island for years
Fire Island
These islands include Fire Island, Plum Island, Robins Island, Gardiners Island, Fishers Island, Long Beach Barrier Island, Jones Beach Island, and Shelter Island.
3
With a land area of 1,401 square miles (3,629 km2), Long Island is the 11th-largest island in the United States and the 148th-largest island in the world — larger than the  of the smallest state, Rhode Island.
Brooklyn reversed decades of population decline and factory closings to resurface as a globally renowned cultural and intellectual hotbed.
thumb|right|Bethpage Ballpark, home of the Long Island Ducks minor league baseball team  Long Island also has two horse racing tracks, Aqueduct Racetrack in Ozone Park, Queens and Belmont Park on the Queens/Nassau border in Elmont, home of the Belmont Stakes.
FOLLOW THE LEADER: A June 2002 grand council known as a Loya Jirga installed Hamid Karzai as the president of this embattled country
Afghanistan
thumb|300px|right|Hamid Karzai appointed as President of the Afghan Transitional Administration at the 13 July 2002 Loya Jirga held in Kabul, Afghanistan.
2
The institution, which is centuries old, is a similar idea to the Islamic "shura", or consultative assembly.
In the Afghan society, the loya jirga is still maintained and favored, mostly by tribal leaders to solve internal or external disputes with other tribes.
STATE CAPITALS: In October an apple butter festival is held at the Carl G. Fenner Arboretum in this Michigan capital
Lansing
Its capital is Lansing, and the largest city is Detroit.
2
Cadillac's wife, Marie Thérèse Guyon, soon moved to Detroit, becoming one of the first European women to settle in the Michigan wilderness.
Marie, Ontario)
HOW I MET YOUR MOTOR: Appropriately, this Michigan city is known as "Motor City"
Detroit
Its capital is Lansing, and the largest city is Detroit.
3
Other peninsulas of Michigan include the Keweenaw Peninsula, making up the Copper Country region of the state.
By Race, 1790 to 1990, and By Hispanic Origin, 1970 to 1990, For The United States, Regions, Divisions, and States  2000Population of Michigan: Census 2010 and 2000 Interactive Map, Demographics, Statistics, Quick Facts 20102010 Census Data White  88.3%  83.4%  80.1%  79.0% Black  11.2%  13.9%  14.2%  14.2% Asian  0.2%  1.1%  1.8%  2.4% Native  0.2%  0.6%  0.6%  0.6% Native Hawaiian andother Pacific Islander  —  —  —  — Other race  0.2%  0.9%  1.3%  1.5% Two or more races  —  —  1.9%  2.3%  + Fifteen Largest Ancestries in Michigan (2013) Ancestry  Percent  German  20.6%  Irish  11.0%  English  9.0%  Polish  8.4%  American  6.0%   French or French Canadian  5.9%  Dutch  4.6%  Italian  4.6%  Scottish  2.1%  Arab  1.8%  Swedish  1.4%  Hungarian  0.9%  Norwegian  0.8%  Russian  0.8%  Scotch-Irish  0.7%  thumb|Map showing the largest ancestry group in each county (2008) The large majority of Michigan's population is Caucasian.
It is composed of fossilized coral (Hexagonaria pericarnata) from long ago when the middle of the continent was covered with a shallow sea.
CANADIAN CAPITALS: This Manitoba capital annexed the adjacent community of Saint Boniface in 1972
Winnipeg
The northern region of Manitoba, which encompasses nearly 70% the province's total area, is mostly undeveloped consisting primarily of remote and isolated communities amongst vast wilderness.http://www.gov.mb.ca/ana/info/nds.htmlhttps://www.policyalternatives.ca/sites/default/files/uploads/publications/Manitoba%20Office/2012/10/Underdevelopment%20of%20Northern%20Man.pdf Winnipeg is the capital and most populous city in Manitoba by a significant margin, with 730,018 people residing in the Winnipeg Capital Region.
2
In response, Prime Minister John A. Macdonald introduced the Manitoba Act in the Canadian House of Commons, the bill was given Royal Assent and Manitoba was brought into Canada as a province in 1870.
The Minister of Culture, Heritage, Tourism and Sport is responsible for promoting and, to some extent, financing Manitoban culture.
I'M A PEPPER, YOU'RE A PEPPER: This pungent herb's scientific name is Mentha piperita
peppermint
water mint, marsh mint  Mentha arvensis – corn mint, wild mint, Japanese peppermint, field mint, banana mint  Mentha asiatica –
3
Alcoholic drinks sometimes feature mint for flavor or garnish, such as the mint julep and the mojito.
There are several uses in traditional medicine and preliminary research for possible use in treating irritable bowel syndrome.
Allergic reaction
MAD ABOUT MADAGASCAR: Madagascar is one of the leading producers of this bean used as a popular flavor of ice cream
vanilla
Madagascar is the world's principal supplier of vanilla, cloves and ylang-ylang.
3
Among these were the Betsimisaraka alliance of the eastern coast and the Sakalava chiefdoms of Menabe and Boina on the west coast.
Within two months, a transitional government had been established under the leadership of Albert Zafy (1993–96), who went on to win the 1992 presidential elections and inaugurate the Third Republic (1992–2010).
Only two general censuses, in 1975 and 1993, have been carried out after independence.
RUSSIAN PAST: In 1812 fleeing Muscovites burned many buildings as his troops marched into Moscow
Napoleon
When Napoleon invaded Russia in 1812, the Moscovites were evacuated.
3
History  Prehistory The oldest evidence of humans on the territory of Moscow dates from the Neolithic (Schukinskaya site on the Moscow River).
Moscow Encyclopedia, ed.
See also UNESCO's profile on this site. which was built between the 14th and 17th centuries.
IT BORDERS JUST ONE OTHER COUNTRY: Monaco
France
|population_estimate = 37,800 |population_estimate_year = 2014 |population_estimate_rank = 217th |population_density_km2 = 18,713 |population_density_sq_mi = 48,462  |population_density_rank = 1st  |population_census = 35,352 |population_census_year = 2008 |GDP_PPP = $4.694 billion Note: "PPP conversion factor, GDP (LCU per international $)" for France (0.8724) was used.
3
Monaco also has a rich and valuable collection of collectors' coins, with face value ranging from €5 to €100.
The club reached the 2004 UEFA Champions League Final, with a team that included Dado Pršo, Fernando Morientes, Jérôme Rothen, Akis Zikos and Ludovic Giuly, but lost 3–0 to Portuguese team F.C. Porto.
An IAAF Diamond League meet is annually held at Stade Louis II.  A municipal sports complex, the Rainier III Nautical Stadium in the Port Hercules district consists of a heated saltwater Olympic-size swimming pool, diving boards and a slide.
HOLIDAYS & OBSERVANCES: Across the pond, Commonwealth Day was originally established on May 24, the birthday of this 19th century queen
Victoria
Alexander von Nordmann, Finnish biologist and paleontologist (d. 1866) 1810 – Charles Clark, American general and politician, 24th Governor of Mississippi (d. 1877)   1810   – Abraham Geiger, German rabbi and scholar (d. 1874) 1816 – Major John Buckley VC, English recipient of the Victoria Cross (d. 1876) 1816 –
2
Shirish Kunder, Indian director, producer, and screenwriter   1973
Sarah Hagan, American actress   1984   –
THIS 'N' THAT: Although born in Florida, Missouri, Mark Twain grew up in this city on the Mississippi River
Hannibal
thumb|250px|Mississippi River at Hannibal.
3
Counties left|thumb|The highly photographed Jasper County Courthouse in Carthage, Missouri is listed in the National Register of Historic Places  Missouri has 114 counties and one independent city (St. Louis).
John Carpernter's Escape from New York was filmed in Saint Louis in the early eighties, due to the high number of abandoned buildings in the city.
One example of this is the wasp Polistes exclamans.
THE PREZ SEZ: He once said, "I'm just a politician from Missouri and proud of it"
Harry S. Truman
25px U.S. Route 166  25px U.S. Route 400  Law and government  thumb|right|Jay Nixon, the 55th and current governor of Missouri  Framework thumb|right|The Missouri State Capitol in Jefferson City thumb|Harry S. Truman, 33rd President of the United States and the only one from Missouri  The current Constitution of Missouri, the fourth constitution for the state, was adopted in 1945.
3
President Lincoln's administration immediately recognized Gamble's government as the legal Missouri government.
Historians have portrayed stories of the James brothers' outlaw years as an American "Robin Hood" myth.
These facilities have made Branson one of America's most popular tourist destinations..
THE GREEN PAGES: It was just deserts for Burton Bernstein with his study of "The Great & Terrible wilderness" of this desert of Moses
the Sinai
No Egyptian sources mention Moses or the events of Exodus-Deuteronomy, nor has any archaeological evidence been discovered in Egypt or the Sinai wilderness to support the story in which he is the central figure.
3
The lepers are bundled into Avaris, the former capital of the Hyksos, where Osarseph  prescribes for them everything forbidden in Egypt, while proscribing everything permitted in Egypt.
Tacitus states that, despite various opinions current in his day regarding the Jews' ethnicity, most of his sources are in agreement that there was an Exodus from Egypt.
Theologian Paul Blackham notes that Justin considered Moses to be "more trustworthy, profound and truthful because he is older than the Greek philosophers."
OLD TESTAMENT WHO'S WHO: After the Israelites passed through the Red Sea, this sister of Moses led the women in song & dance
Miriam
Moses had one older (by seven years) sister, Miriam, and one older (by three years) brother, Aaron.
3
The people were afraid and wanted to return to Egypt, and some rebelled against Moses and against God.
BCE. Shmuel notes that "a characteristic of this literature is the high honour in which it holds the peoples of the East in general and some specific groups among these peoples."
Kohn, Rebecca.
MOSES: Before Moses died on Mount Pisgah, he scaled this mount to chat with Yahweh
Mount Sinai
After the Ten Plagues, Moses led the Exodus of the Israelites out of Egypt and across the Red Sea, after which they based themselves at Mount Sinai, where Moses received the Ten Commandments.
3
Strabo's "positive and unequivocal appreciation of Moses' personality is among the most sympathetic in all ancient literature."
An epithet of Moses in Baha'i scriptures is Interlocutor of God,. or alternatively the One Who Conversed with God.
Ingersoll protested that in Exodus narrative the commandment forbidding idolatry had not yet been passed on by Moses to his people, and that "to inflict punishment for breaking unknown and unpublished laws is, in the last degree, cruel and unjust".Ingersoll, Robert G. (1879).
WASHINGTON, D.C.: Some of the sculptures outside the entrance of this building depict Moses, Confucius, Solon & William Howard Taft
the Supreme Court building
The Supreme Court building's east pediment depicts Moses holding two tablets.
3
Kenneth Kitchen, a solitary voice among British Egyptologists,J.K. Hoffmeier, 'The Egyptian Origins of Israel: Recent Developments in Historiography,' in Thomas E. Levy, Thomas Schneider, William H.C. Propp  (eds.)  Israel's Exodus in Transdisciplinary Perspective: Text, Archaeology, Culture, and Geoscience, Springer, 2015 pp.196-208 p.202.
Moses also appears in other religious texts such as the Mishnah (c. 200 CE), Midrash (200–1200 CE),. and the Qur'an (c. 610–53).
Bradford evoked the symbol of Moses to the weakened and desperate Pilgrims to help calm them and give them hope: "Violence will break all.
THE FOLKSMEN: This "Freewheelin'" folkster was born in Duluth, Minnesota in 1941
Bob Dylan
Minnesota musicians include Bob Dylan, Eddie Cochran, The Andrews Sisters, The Castaways, The Trashmen, Prince, Soul Asylum, David Ellefson, Hüsker Dü, and The Replacements.
3
By Howard Allen Bridgman page 112 Thousands of people had come to build farms and cut timber, and Minnesota became the 32nd U.S. state on May 11, 1858.
Many of these Scandinavian cultural characteristics and personality traits are satirized on the nationally-syndicated public radio program A Prairie Home Companion.
Paul International Airport (MSP), a major passenger and freight hub for Delta Air Lines and Sun Country Airlines.
NON-RELIGIOUS HOLIDAYS: Joan Crawford died on May 10, the date of this holiday in many countries other than the U.S.
Mother's Day
1908 – Mother's Day is observed for the first time in the United States, in Grafton, West Virginia.
3
Wayne Dyer, American author and educator (d. 2015) 1941 – Winfried Bischoff, German-English banker and businessman   1941   – Aydın Güven Gürkan, Turkish academician and politician (d. 2006) 1942 – Jim Calhoun, American basketball player and coach   1942   – Youssouf Sambo Bâ, Nigerien-Burkinabe educator and politician 1943 –
1807
Konrad Henlein, Czech soldier and politician (b. 1898)
THE SILVER SCREEN: In this film Marlon Brando tells Rod Steiger, "You don't understand.  I could've had class.  I could've been a contender"
On the Waterfront
A cultural icon, Brando is most famous for his Academy Award-winning performances as Terry Malloy in On the Waterfront (1954) and Vito Corleone in The Godfather (1972), as well as influential performances in A Streetcar Named Desire (1951), Viva Zapata! (1952), Julius Caesar (1953), The Wild One (1953), Reflections in a Golden Eye (1967), Last Tango in Paris (1972), and Apocalypse Now (1979).
3
Early in his career, Brando began using cue cards instead of memorizing his lines.
Guys and Dolls would be Brando's first and last musical role.
When we were young, Brando was like the godfather of actors,' says Robert Duvall. 'I used to meet with Dustin Hoffman in Cromwell's Drugstore, and if we mentioned his name once, we mentioned it 25 times in a day.'
2005 COMMENCEMENT SPEECHES: Speaking at his alma mater, he urged graduates to be voracious readers, donate to worthy causes & stay in Maine
Stephen King
Stephen King, a Maine native and resident of Bangor, sets much of his fiction in Maine.
3
A number of English settlements were established along the coast of Maine in the 1620s, although the rugged climate, deprivations, and conflict with the local peoples caused many to fail over the years.
The main function of these ships was to transport either cargos or passengers overseas.
iconic Maine writer  Thomas A. Desjardin (1964–) — a Maine native and resident, he has written several books on Maine history and the Civil War.
ABOUT THE STATES: It's the only state that borders Maine
New Hampshire
It is bordered by New Hampshire to the west, the Atlantic Ocean to the east, and the Canadian provinces of Quebec and New Brunswick to the north.
3
They were relocated at St. Francis, Canada, which was destroyed by Rogers' Rangers in 1759, and is now Odanak.
Western Maine aquifers and springs are a major source of bottled water.
Robert McCloskey (1914–2003) authored several beloved children's books, including "Make Way for Ducklings" and "Blueberries for Sal".
STUPID ANSWERS: In 1542 this daughter of Mary of Guise became the Queen of the Scots
Mary, Queen of Scots
Maryam (sura) "Mary", 19th sura (chapter) of the Qur'an Royalty  Mary I of England (1516–1558), aka "Bloody Mary", Queen of England and Ireland  Mary II of England (1662–1694), Queen of England, Scotland, and Ireland  Mary of Modena (1658–1718), Queen Consort of King James II of England and VII of Scotland  Mary of Teck (1867–1953), Queen Consort of George V of the United Kingdom  Mary, Queen of Scots (1542–1587),mother of James I of England  Mary of Guise (1515–1560), Queen Consort of James V of Scotland and mother of Mary, Queen of Scots  Mary, Crown Princess of Denmark (born 1972), wife of Crown Prince Frederik  Mary I of Portugal, daughter of King Joseph I of Portugal  Mary II of Portugal, daughter of the future King Pedro IV  Mary of Guelders (c. 1434–1463), daughter of Arnold, Duke of Guelders  Mary of Hungary, daughter of Louis I the Great of Hungary  Mary of Burgundy (1457–1482), daughter of Charles the Bold, Duke of Burgundy  Mary of Woodstock (1278–1332), daughter of Edward I of England Geography  Mary Province, in southeast Turkmenistan  Mary District, in Mary Province  Mary, Turkmenistan, capital city of the province, located in Mary District  Islas Marías (Mary Islands), Mexico  Mary, Saône-et-Loire, France  Mary River (disambiguation)  Mary's Point, New Brunswick, Canada  Mary, Turkmenistan, capital of Mary Province Books  Mary (Nabokov novel), by Vladimir Nabokov  Mary: A Fiction, a 1788 novel by Mary Wollstonecraft  Film and television  Mary (1931 film), a 1931 Alfred Hitchcock film  Mary (1978 TV series), a variety follow-up to  The Mary Tyler Moore Show  Mary (1985 TV series), a sitcom follow-up to  The Mary Tyler Moore Show  Mary (2005 film), a film directed by Abel Ferrara about an actress playing Mary Magdalene  Music  Mary Mary, Contemporary Gospel Musical Duo Albums  Mary (Mary J. Blige album), 1999  Mary (Mary Travers album), 1971  Mary (Sarkodie album), 2015 Songs  "Mary", Russian-language art song by Alexander Egorovich Varlamov  Mary (Sarah Slean song), a track on the 2004 album Day One by Sarah Slean  Mary (Scissor Sisters song), a 2004 song by American rock band Scissor Sisters  Mary (Supergrass song), a 1999 song by British band Supergrass  "Proud Mary", a 1969 song by John Fogerty  "Mary," a song by Kings of Leon on the album Come Around Sundown  "Mary," a song by The 4 of Us on the album Songs for the Tempted  "Mary," a song by Tori Amos on the album Tales of a Librarian  "Mary," a song by John Cale from the album Shifty Adventures in Nookie Wood  "Mary," a song by Oingo Boingo on Boingo  "Mary," a song by Robert Fripp on Exposure  "Mary," a song by Sarah McLachlan on the album Fumbling Towards Ecstasy  "Mary", a song by Buffy Sainte-Marie on Illuminations  "Mary," a song by Sublime on the album Robbin' the Hood  "Mary," a song by The Subways on the album Young for Eternity  "Mary," a song by Pete Townshend written for the concept album Lifehouse  "Mary Is a Grand Old Name", a song by George M. Cohan  "Mary (I'm in Love with You)," a song written by J. Fred Coots and Ozzie Nelson  Ships and boats  HMS Queen Mary, a Royal Navy battlecruiser  RMS Queen Mary, an ocean liner in service from 1936 to 1967  RMS Queen Mary 2, an ocean liner that began sailing in 2004  TS Queen Mary, a steamboat in service from 1933 to 1977  Mary Rose, a Tudor warship that sank in 1545  , the proposed naval name and designation for a motorboat the United States Navy planned to take over in 1918 but never actually acquired  Other uses  Mary (elephant), an elephant from the Sparks World Famous Shows circus  Mary Melody, a character from Tiny Toon Adventures  Mary (programming language)  Mary's room, a philosophical thought experiment  See also  Mari (disambiguation)  Marie (disambiguation)  Marie Louise (disambiguation)  Miss Mary (disambiguation)  Saint Mary (disambiguation)  Virgin Mary (cocktail)
2
Mary may refer to: Mary (name), a female given name  People Religious contexts  New Testament people named Mary is an overview article linking to many of those below  Mary (mother of Jesus), also called the Blessed Virgin Mary  Mary Magdalene, devoted follower of Jesus  Mary of Bethany, follower of Jesus, considered by Western medieval tradition to be the same person as Mary Magdalene  Mary (mother of James the Less)  Mary of Clopas, follower of Jesus  Mary, mother of John Mark  Mary of Rome, a New Testament woman  Mary, mother of Zechariah and sister of Moses and Aaron; mostly known by the Hebrew name: Miriam  Mary the Jewess one of the reputed founders of alchemy, referred to by Zosimus.
All pages beginning with Mary  Category:Human name disambiguation pages
MARY, QUEEN OF SCOTS, PLAYMATE OF THE MONTH: Height: 5'11".Weight: None of your business, commoner!Hair: This color
red
Mary may refer to: Mary (name), a female given name  People Religious contexts  New Testament people named Mary is an overview article linking to many of those below  Mary (mother of Jesus), also called the Blessed Virgin Mary  Mary Magdalene, devoted follower of Jesus  Mary of Bethany, follower of Jesus, considered by Western medieval tradition to be the same person as Mary Magdalene  Mary (mother of James the Less)  Mary of Clopas, follower of Jesus  Mary, mother of John Mark  Mary of Rome, a New Testament woman  Mary, mother of Zechariah and sister of Moses and Aaron; mostly known by the Hebrew name: Miriam  Mary the Jewess one of the reputed founders of alchemy, referred to by Zosimus.
1
All pages beginning with Mary  Category:Human name disambiguation pages
COUNTRY SINGERS: INXS' Michael Hutchence
Australia
Michael Kelland John Hutchence (22 January 1960 – 22 November 1997) was an Australian musician and actor.
2
Divinyls' lead singer, Chrissie Amphlett enjoyed the tour and reconnected with Hutchence, "[he] was a sweet man, who said in one interview that he wanted me to have his baby".
On 18 June 2000, his mother Patricia and sister Tina released their book, Just a Man: The Real Michael Hutchence, which is described as "an odd biography ... [that] combines the basic facts of Hutchence's early life ... with an almost too-intimate view of the authors' feelings".
CROSSWORD CLUES "A": Malaria mosquito             (9)
Anopheles
The disease is most commonly transmitted by an infected female Anopheles mosquito.
3
Malaria causes symptoms that typically include fever, fatigue, vomiting, and headaches.
Genetic resistance
Uncomplicated malaria may be treated with oral medications.
MICHAEL JORDAN: Jordan hit the basketball court with Bugs Bunny & pals in this 1996 flick
Space Jam
Jordan also starred in the 1996 feature film Space Jam as himself.
3
SI cover search December 10, 1984, si.cnn.com.
Jordan was close to his father; as a child he had imitated his father's proclivity to stick out his tongue while absorbed in work.
That year, Jordan was the only Washington player to play in all 82 games, starting in 67 of them.
"F" TROOP: Magic-making Mickey Mouse movie of 1940
Fantasia
He went on to appear in over 130 films, including The Band Concert (1935), Brave Little Tailor (1938), and Fantasia (1940).
3
Supposedly one reason for adding the white gloves was to allow audiences to distinguish the characters' hands when they appeared against their bodies, as both were black.
Daycare Center Murals.
Selected short films   Steamboat Willie (1928)  Plane Crazy (1929)  The Karnival Kid (1929)  Mickey's Orphans (1931)  Building a Building (1933)  The Mad Doctor (1933)  The Band Concert (1935)   Thru the Mirror (1936)  Clock Cleaners (1937)  Lonesome Ghosts (1937)  Brave Little Tailor (1938)  The Pointer (1939)  The Nifty Nineties (1941)  Lend a Paw (1941)   Symphony Hour (1942)  Squatter's Rights (1946)  Mickey and the Seal (1948)
THIS SPACE: It's the Magna Carta meadow
Runnymede
(Latin for "the Great Charter"), also called  (Latin for "the Great Charter of the Liberties"), is a charter agreed by King John of England at Runnymede, near Windsor, on 15 June 1215.
3
It became clear that Gascony would also fall unless reinforcements were sent from England.
Henry placed a symbolic emphasis on rebuilding royal authority, but his rule was relatively circumscribed by Magna Carta.
Y Repealed by Statute Law Revision
MONSTER MASH: Name shared by a green-skinned Marvel Comics monster & a wrestler also nicknamed "Hollywood"
Hulk
Marvel counts among its characters such well-known properties as Spider-Man, Iron Man, Captain America, Wolverine, Thor, Hulk and Ant-Man, such teams as the Avengers, the Guardians of the Galaxy, the Fantastic Four, the Inhumans and the X-Men, and antagonists such as Doctor Doom, The Enchantress, Green Goblin, Ultron, Doctor Octopus, Thanos, Magneto and Loki.
3
Goodman formed Timely Comics, Inc., beginning with comics cover-dated April 1941 or Spring 1941."Marvel : Timely Publications (Indicia Publisher)" at the Grand Comics Database.
p. 59.
Year  Retail % ($)  Unit % (Number of items)  Note 2014 33.50% 36.78%  2013 33.50 36.97  2012 34.06 37.59  2011 37.29 40.93  2010 38.23 43.35  2009 40.47 45.63  2008 40.81 45.82  2007 40.25 44.72  2006 38.49 42.33  2005 36.97 42.62  2004 36.54 43.19  2003 33.24 39.68  2002 33.61 40.52   Marvel characters in other media Marvel characters and stories have been adapted to many other media.
MIKHAIL GORBACHEV: In 1952 Mikhail Gorbachev hit this big city to enter its state university law school; he graduated in 1955
Moscow
He graduated from Moscow State University in 1955 with a degree in law.
3
He established close relationships with several Western leaders, such as West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl, U.S. President Ronald Reagan, and British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher—who famously remarked: "I like Mr. Gorbachev; we can do business together".
They also essentially agreed in principle to eliminate all nuclear weapons in 10 years (by 1996), instead of by the year 2000 as in Gorbachev's original outline.
On 27 July 2007, Gorbachev criticized U.S. foreign policy: “
STATUE OF LIMITATIONS: Finished in 1504, this 17-foot Michelangelo man had his arm broken in 1527, but not for any gambling debts
David
Two of his best-known works, the Pietà and David, were sculpted before the age of thirty.
3
Goldscheider, p. 10
London: Methuen.
London: National Gallery Publications, ISBN 1-85709-066-7
RENAISSANCE FAIR LADY: Michelangelo didn't mention multiple personalities when he painted this Delphic prophetess
Sibyl
On the pendentives supporting the ceiling are painted twelve men and women who prophesied the coming of the Jesus; seven prophets of Israel and five Sibyls, prophetic women of the Classical world.
3
Hirst and Dunkerton, pp. 336–46; 83––105  Sistine Chapel ceiling, 1505–12  thumb|upright=1.5|Michelangelo painted the ceiling of the Sistine Chapel; the work took approximately four years to complete (1508–12) In 1505, Michelangelo was invited back to Rome by the newly elected Pope Julius II.
Retrieved 27 January 2007 He wrote over three hundred sonnets and madrigals.
The scheme is of nine panels illustrating episodes from the Book of Genesis, set in an architectonic frame.
ART: Michelangelo spent 3 years, 1501-4, sculpting this Goliath-size statue
David
Two of his best-known works, the Pietà and David, were sculpted before the age of thirty.
1
Artists who were directly influenced by Michelangelo include Raphael, who imitated Michelangelo's prophets in two of his works, including his depiction of the great master in the School of Athens.
YOU HIT ME IN THE FACE!: Love-struck in "Moonstruck", she struck Nicolas Cage to get him to "Snap out of it!"
Cher
Other Cage roles included appearances in the acclaimed 1987 romantic-comedy film Moonstruck, also starring Cher; the Coen Brothers cult-classic comedy Raising Arizona; David Lynch's 1990 film Wild at Heart; a lead role in Martin Scorsese's 1999 New York City paramedic drama Bringing Out the Dead; and Ridley Scott's 2003 drama film Matchstick Men, in which he played an agoraphobic, mysophobic, obsessive-compulsive con artist with a tic disorder.
3
I was like, '
Poor reviews for The Wicker Man resulted in low box office sales.
Another home in Nevada also faces foreclosure auction.
IN THE 2005 ESPN ALMANAC: "7-time NASCAR national champion... died in last lap crash at the 2001 Daytona 500"
Dale Earnhardt
thumb|Dale Earnhardt Jr. (bottom), and team in victory lane in 2004 In 2004, NEXTEL took over sponsorship of the premier series from R. J. Reynolds, who had sponsored it as the Winston Cup from 1972 until 2003, and formally renamed it the NEXTEL Cup Series.
3
This is NASCARs oldest division, and the modern division has been operating since 1985 as the Winston Modified Series and later in 1994 as the Featherlite Trailers Modified Series.
AutoZone Elite and other divisions In the past, NASCAR also sanctioned the AutoZone Elite Division, which raced late-model cars that were lighter and less powerful than Sprint Cup cars, and was originally split into four divisions: Northwest, Southwest, Southeast, and Midwest.
March 5, 2006.
NATO IS NEATO: In 1948 the Allies began talks of a defense pact like NATO in response to the Soviet blockade of this city
Berlin
After the fall of the Berlin Wall in 1989, the organization was drawn into the breakup of Yugoslavia, and conducted its first military interventions in Bosnia from 1992 to 1995 and later Yugoslavia in 1999.
3
ISAF was initially charged with securing Kabul and surrounding areas from the Taliban, al Qaeda and factional warlords, so as to allow for the establishment of the Afghan Transitional Administration headed by Hamid Karzai.
The aim of NTM-I was to assist in the development of Iraqi security forces training structures and institutions so that Iraq can build an effective and sustainable capability that addresses the needs of the nation.
NATO's military operations are directed by the Chairman of the NATO Military Committee, and split into two Strategic Commands commanded by a senior US officer and a senior French officer assisted by a staff drawn from across NATO.
CROW-TATIONS: In the book "New Hampshire" this poet wrote of a crow that "shook down on me the dust of snow"
Robert Frost
Among prominent individuals from New Hampshire are founding father Nicholas Gilman, Senator Daniel Webster, Revolutionary War hero John Stark, editor Horace Greeley, founder of the Christian Science religion Mary Baker Eddy, poet Robert Frost, astronaut Alan Shepard, rock musician Ronnie James Dio, author Dan Brown,  actor Adam Sandler, inventor Dean Kamen, and President of the United States Franklin Pierce.
3
However, the state's overall tax burden is relatively low; in 2010 New Hampshire ranked 44th highest among states in combined average state and local tax burden.
Nominations for all other partisan offices are decided in a separate primary election.
State highway markers still depict the Old Man of the Mountain despite that rock formation's demise in 2003.
MONEY BEST PLACES TO LIVE: Victorian homes line the New Hampshire hamlet of Hanover that benefits from its proximity to this Ivy League school
Dartmouth
New Hampshire's major regions are the Great North Woods, the White Mountains, the Lakes Region, the Seacoast, the Merrimack Valley, the Monadnock Region, and the Dartmouth-Lake Sunapee area.
3
Umbagog Lake along the Maine border, approximately , is a distant second.
(For details, see the article on Government of New Hampshire.)
Founded in 1996, the team plays in the USL Premier Development League (PDL), the fourth tier of the American Soccer Pyramid, in the Northeast Division of the Eastern Conference.
WORLD HERITAGE SITES: You can visit this North America country's L'Anse Aux Meadows historic park even if you're not a Viking
Canada
In Canadian English, North America may be used to refer to the United States and Canada together.
3
These regions also contain many subregions.
The indigenous peoples of North America have many creation myths by which they assert that they have been present on the land since its creation.
Yet megaregion criterion have allowed the Great Lakes Megalopolis to maintain status as the most populated region, being home to 53,768,125 people in 2000.Regional Plan Association (2008).
EXPLORERS: No one knows the exact area in North America which this explorer claimed for England in 1497
John Cabot
Alfred E. Hudd proposed a theory in 1908 that the continents are named after a Welsh merchant named Richard Amerike from Bristol, who is believed to have financed John Cabot's voyage of discovery from England to Newfoundland in 1497.
3
Some genetic research indicated secondary waves of migration occurred after the initial Paleo-Indian colonization, but prior to modern Inuit, Inupiat and Yupik expansions.
The biggest number of Jewish individuals can be found in the United States (5.4 million),World Jewish Population, 2012 Canada (375,000) and Mexico (67,476).
In Mexico and the Central American countries where civilizations like the Maya developed, indigenous people preserve traditions across modern boundaries.
TEA TIME: Not the English, but this colonial power introduced tea to North America in the 1650s
Dutch
Danish is prevalent in Greenland alongside Greenlandic, and Dutch is spoken side by side local languages in the Dutch Caribbean.
3
During the thousands of years of native habitation on the continent, cultures changed and shifted.
The continent can be divided into four great regions (each of which contains many subregions): the Great Plains stretching from the Gulf of Mexico to the Canadian Arctic; the geologically young, mountainous west, including the Rocky Mountains, the Great Basin, California and Alaska; the raised but relatively flat plateau of the Canadian Shield in the northeast; and the varied eastern region, which includes the Appalachian Mountains, the coastal plain along the Atlantic seaboard, and the Florida peninsula.
Haiti is included with this group based on historical association but Haitians speak both Creole and French.
AROUND THE WORLD: This Southern Hemisphere nation was named after a southwestern province of the Netherlands
New Zealand
The Netherlands was ranked first in a study in 2009 comparing the health care systems of the United States, Australia, Canada, Germany and New Zealand.
3
In the case of the Low Countries the geographical location of the lower region has been more or less downstream and near the sea, the geographical location of the upper region changed over time tremendously.
Moreover, the Republic had come to occupy during the Eighty Years' War a number of so-called Generality Lands in Flanders, Brabant and Limburg.
Groningen  Groningen  Groningen 2,325582,649250  Limburg  Maastricht  Maastricht 2,1501,115,805519  North Brabant 's-Hertogenbosch  Eindhoven 4,9142,495,107507  North Holland  Haarlem  Amsterdam 2,6652,775,6171,039  Overijssel  Zwolle  Enschede 3,3241,142,360344  Utrecht  Utrecht  Utrecht 1,3831,268,489916  Zeeland  Middelburg  Middelburg 1,784381,182213  South Holland
EXPLORERS: John Speke died just before he was to debate this former exploring partner on the source of the Nile
Sir Richard Burton
In the Years 1857–1859, Sir Richard Burton.
3
Accessed 28 Feb 2014.See also:  romanization.) begins at Lake Tana in EthiopiaThe river's outflow from that lake occurs at  and flows into Sudan from the southeast.
Burton, recovering from illness and resting further south on the shores of Lake Tanganyika, was outraged that Speke claimed to have proved his discovery to be the true source of the Nile when Burton regarded this as still unsettled.
The calculations were enabled by accurate monthly inflow data collected for 50 years.
BIBLICAL BOTANY: Scholars have it down on paper that the bulrushes on the Nile were probably this plant
Papyrus
The Ancient Egyptians cultivated and traded wheat, flax, papyrus and other crops around the Nile.
3
From here it soon meets with the Sobat River at Malakal.
In Egypt  Below the Aswan High Dam, at the northern limit of Lake Nasser, the Nile resumes its historic course.
After this came regular steam navigation of the river.
FAMOUS KIMS: He's been head of the Communist Party in North Korea since the 1940s
Kim Il-sung
Various outlets have called it Stalinist, particularly noting the elaborate cult of personality around Kim Il-sung and his family.
3
The name Daehan, which means "great Han" literally, derives from Samhan (Three Hans).
After the outbreaks of the Sino-Japanese War in 1937 and World War II, Japan stepped up efforts to extinguish Korean culture.
The main news provider is the Korean Central News Agency.
COLLEGE BOWL: Noah Webster was a co-founder of this Mass. college that administers the Folger Shakespeare Library
Amherst
Frances Julianna (1793–1869)  Harriet (1797–1844), who married William Chauncey Fowler  Mary (1799–1819)  William Greenleaf (1801–1869)  Eliza (1803–1888)  Henry (1806–1807)  Louisa (b. 1808)  He moved to Amherst, Massachusetts in 1812, where he helped to found Amherst College.
3
There was no mention of God, the Bible, or sacred events.
But we cannot legally interfere with the South on this subject."Florea, Silvia.
131 pp.
TALK LIKE A PIRATE: The Nebraska legislature be tree lovers & made this day, April 22, a legal holiday
Arbor Day
Redbook The Arbor Day holiday was founded in Nebraska City by territorial governor J. Sterling Morton.
3
The Handybook for Genealogists:
For years, prior to 1934, US Senator George Norris and other Nebraskans encouraged the idea of a unicameral legislature, and demanded the issue be decided in a referendum.
The lowest courts in Nebraska are the county courts, above that are twelve district courts (containing one or more counties).
WILL...OF...FORTUNE!: This orator & Nebraska representative opposed the gold standard & urged the free coinage of silver
William Jennings Bryan
Illinois native William Jennings Bryan represented Nebraska in Congress, served as  U.S. Secretary of State under President Woodrow Wilson, and unsuccessfully ran for President three times.
3
France's withdrawal from the area left Britain and Spain competing for dominance along the Mississippi; by 1773, the British were trading with the native peoples of Nebraska.
(Draper Utah: Everton Publishers, 2002).
Faulkner, Virginia, ed.
"NEW" YORK: The largest city in New Jersey
Newark
In the 19th century, factories in cities such as Camden, Paterson, Newark, Trenton, and Elizabeth helped to drive the Industrial Revolution.
3
Several casinos lie along the Atlantic City Boardwalk, the first and longest boardwalk in the world.
Before 2010, New Jersey was one of the few states without a lieutenant governor.
In the 2008 election, President Barack Obama won New Jersey with approximately fifty-seven percent of the vote, compared to McCain's forty-one percent.
AIRPORTS: The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey operates JFK, LaGuardia & this Jersey Airport
Newark
In the 19th century, factories in cities such as Camden, Paterson, Newark, Trenton, and Elizabeth helped to drive the Industrial Revolution.
3
Geography thumb|High Point Monument as seen from Lake Marcia at High Point, Sussex County, the highest elevation in New Jersey at 1803 feet above sea level.
, there were 1.6 million foreign-born living in the state (accounting for 19.2% of the population).
There are 12 Tax Court judgeships.
INVENTORS: His West Orange, New Jersey home was made a national historic site in 1955
Thomas Edison
Inventor Thomas Edison also became an important figure of the Industrial Revolution, having been granted 1,093 patents, many of which for inventions he developed while working in New Jersey.
3
The Hudson-Bergen Light Rail connects Bayonne to North Bergen, with planned expansion into Bergen County communities.
New Jersey holds elections for these offices every four years, in the year following each federal Presidential election year.
Jazz pianist and bandleader Count Basie was born in Red Bank in 1904.
NUMBER, PLEASE: If we were to end this category the way a reporter finishes an article, we'd put this number on it here
30
Gilsdorf, Thomas E. Introduction to Cultural Mathematics: With Case Studies in the Otomies and Incas, John Wiley & Sons, Feb 24, 2012.Restivo, S. Mathematics in Society and History, Springer Science & Business Media, Nov 30, 1992.
3
A number is a mathematical object used to count, measure and label.
However, in the 19th century, set theorists and other mathematicians started including 0 (cardinality of the empty set, i.e. 0 elements, where 0 is thus the smallest cardinal number) in the set of natural numbers.
Thus one half is 0.5, one fifth is 0.2, one tenth is 0.1, and one fiftieth is 0.02.
"G"EOGRAPHY: Nazareth is the main city of the "lower" part of this Israeli region
Galilee
Alternatively, the name may derive from the verb na·ṣar, נָצַר, "watch, guard, keep,""...if the word Nazareth is be derived from Hebrew at all, it must come from this root [i.e. נָצַר, naṣar, to watch]" (Merrill, Selah, (1881) Galilee in the Time of Christ, p. 116.Francis
3
Bauckham, Jude, Jude, Relatives of Jesus in the Early Church, pp.
In: I. Kuijt (ed.), Social Configurations of the Near Eastern Neolithic: Community Identity, Hierarchical Organization, and Ritual (1997).
thumb|200px|Makam
"V" SHALL OVERCOME: During the 5th century, this Teutonic tribe conquered part of North Africa & ruled there for 100 years
the Vandals
Sallust, De Bello Iugurthino  North Africa remained a part of the Roman Empire, which produced many notable citizens such as Augustine of Hippo, until incompetent leadership from Roman commanders in the early fifth century allowed the Germanic barbarian tribe, the Vandals, to cross the Strait of Gibraltar, whereupon they overcame the fickle Roman defense.
3
104 no.
Steven Danver (ed.), Native Peoples of the World: An Encyclopedia of Groups, Cultures, and Contemporary Issues, Vol.
Prior to the modern establishment of Israel, there were about 600,000-700,000 Jews in Northern Africa, including both Sfardīm (refugees from France, Spain and Portugal from the Renaissance era) as well as indigenous .
NAME THE YEAR: It was the beginning of a new "age" in this year when the picture seen here was taken(the dropping of the atomic bomb on Nagasaki)
1945
During World War II, at the time of the nuclear attack on August 9, 1945, Nagasaki was an important industrial city, containing both plants of the Mitsubishi Steel and Arms Works, the Akunoura Engine Works, Mitsubishi Arms Plant, Mitsubishi Electric Shipyards, Mitsubishi Steel and Arms Works, Mitsubishi-Urakami Ordnance Works, several other small factories, and most of the ports storage and trans-shipment facilities, which employed about 90% of the city's labor force, and accounted for 90% of the city's industry.
3
During the Meiji period, Nagasaki became a center of heavy industry.
Sports Nagasaki is represented in the J. League of football with its local club, V-Varen Nagasaki.
Suwa Shrine  Syusaku Endo Literature Museum  Tateyama Park  Twenty-Six Martyrs Museum and Monument  Nagasaki Prefectural Art Museum  Urakami Cathedral  Miyo-Ken, a temple where the white snake is worshiped  Events thumb|Nagasaki Lantern Festival The Prince Takamatsu Cup Nishinippon Round-Kyūshū Ekiden, the world's longest relay race, begins in Nagasaki each November.
THE MUSIC OF CANADA: This "Fly By Night" power trio formed in Toronto in 1968; Neil Peart joined in '74 (cue the drum solo)
Rush
Neil Ellwood Peart,  (; born September 12, 1952), is a Canadian-American musician and author, best known as the drummer and primary lyricist for the rock band Rush.
3
It was during this time that Peart decided to revamp his playing style by incorporating jazz and swing components.
2005.
This book, which he worked on for two years, is based around his travelling in North and South America.
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS: It's the main city in Ohio's 14th district, once a rubber center & now called "Polymer Valley"
Akron
+Average daily maximum and minimum temperatures for selected cities in OhioLocationJuly (°F)July (°C)January (°F)January (°C)Columbus  85/65  29/18  36/22  2/–5Cleveland  82/64  28/18  34/21  1/–5Cincinnati  86/61  30/19  38/23  3/–5Toledo  84/62  29/17  32/18  0/–7Akron  82/62  28/16  33/19  0/–7Dayton  87/67  31/19  36/22  2/–5Canton  82/62  28/16  33/19  1/–7  Records
3
Climate The climate of Ohio is a humid continental climate (Köppen climate classification Dfa) throughout most of the state except in the extreme southern counties of Ohio's Bluegrass region section which are located on the northern periphery of the humid subtropical climate and Upland South region of the United States.
Both cultures apparently disappeared in the 17th century, perhaps decimated by infectious diseases spread in epidemics from early European contact.
Ohio is the only state that has voted for the winning Presidential candidate in each election since 1964, and in 33 of the 37 held since the Civil War.
FIRST LADIES: Ida Saxton, the daughter of a Canton, Ohio banker, married this future president in 1871
William McKinley
The seven presidents born in Ohio were Ulysses S. Grant, Rutherford B. Hayes, James A. Garfield, Benjamin Harrison (grandson of William Henry Harrison), William McKinley, William Howard Taft and Warren G. Harding.
3
Transportation Ground travel
Akron Fulton International Airport handles cargo and for private use.
Executive branch
POTPOURRI: Oxford graduate Hugh Grant played a student at this other British university in the coming-of-age film "Maurice"
Cambridge
The sweating sickness epidemic in 1517 was particularly devastating to Oxford and Cambridge where it killed half of both cities' populations, including many students and dons.
3
Geography  Location Oxford's latitude and longitude are  or  (at Carfax Tower, which is usually considered the centre).
Companies often draw their teaching staff from the pool of Oxford University students and graduates, and, especially for EFL education, use their Oxford location as a selling point.
The first was opened at Grandpont in 1844, but this was a terminus, inconvenient for routes to the north; it was replaced by the present station on Park End Street in 1852 with the opening of the Birmingham route.
CITY PEOPLE: This "Friendly" Oakland Raiders tight end of the 1970s was known as "The Ghost"
Dave Casper
Jim Otto C 1960–19741980  16 George Blanda QB-K 1967–19751981  24 Willie Brown CB 1967–19781984  63 Gene Upshaw G 1967–19811987  14, 25 Fred Biletnikoff WR 1965–19781988  78 Art Shell OT 1968–19821989  83 Ted Hendricks LB 1975–19831990  -- Al Davis Coach-Owner-Commissioner 1963–20111992  22 Mike Haynes CB 1983–19891997  29 Eric Dickerson RB 19921999  75 Howie Long DE 1981–19932000  42 Ronnie Lott S 1991–19922000  87  Dave Casper  TE 1974–1980, 19842002  32  Marcus Allen RB 1982–19922003  80  James Lofton WR 1987–19882003 	 76 Bob Brown OT 1971–19732004  -- John Madden Head Coach 1969–19782006  26 Rod Woodson S 2002–20032009  80 Jerry Rice WR 2001–20042010  99 Warren Sapp DT 2004–20072013 8  Ray Guy P 1973–19862014 --  Ron Wolf Scout-Player Personnel Director 1963–1974, 1979–19892015 81
3
The Oakland Raiderettes are the cheerleading squad for the Oakland Raiders.
In October 2005, the lawsuit was settled out of court.
In 1988, Victor Conte offered free blood and urine tests to a group of athletes known as the BALCO Olympians.
MAN, OMAN!: 75% of Omanis practice the Ibahdi branch of this religion
Islam
Oman's official religion is Islam.
3
The Sultan Qaboos bin Said al Said has been the hereditary leader of the country since 1970.
Annual rainfall in Muscat averages , falling mostly in January.
Through a decree by the Sultan, the government has now extended its control over the media to blogs and other websites.
PROVERBS: The saying "There is nothing new under the sun" is a variation of a proverb in this Old Testament book
Ecclesiastes
Hebrew Prayer of Manasseh Greek Mishlei (Proverbs) Proverbs Proverbs Proverbs Hebrew         Qoheleth (Ecclesiastes) Ecclesiastes Ecclesiastes Ecclesiastes Hebrew Shir Hashirim (Song of Songs) Song of Solomon Song of Songs (Canticle of Canticles) Song of Songs (Aisma Aismaton)
3
It is not entirely clear at what point the parameters of the Hebrew Bible, the basis for the Christian Old Testament, were fixed.
He states that it is not a magical book, nor was it literally written by God and passed to mankind.
II. Wiatt (Philadelphia), 1810.
MISSING VOWELS: Old Testament book: MS
Amos
Hosea Hebrew Joel Joel Joel Hebrew Amos Amos Amos Hebrew Obadiah Obadiah (Abdias)
3
These are not in the Protestant Old Testament.
L. M. McDonald & J. A. Sanders (Hendrickson, 2002)
In the 16th, century the Protestant reformers sided with Jerome; yet although most Protestant Bibles now have only those books that appear in the Jewish Bible, they have them in the order of the Greek Bible.
LET'S CELEBRATE!: The second Monday in October, it's also called Discoverers' Day
Columbus Day
Second Saturday Bird Day (Mexico, Central and South America, and the Caribbean) Home Movie Day International observance National Tree Planting Day (Mongolia)  Second Sunday  White Sunday (Samoa and Tonga)  Second Monday  Columbus Day (United States) Fraternal Day (Alabama, United States) Health and Sports Day (Japan) Indigenous Peoples' Day (United States) Mother's Day (Malawi)
3
The eighth month in the old Roman calendar, October retained its name (from the Latin octō meaning "eight") after January and February were inserted into the calendar that had originally been created by the Romans.
October 11 General Pulaski Memorial Day (United States) International Day of the Girl Child (International) Meditrinalia (Ancient Rome) National Coming Out Day (multinational, including United States, United Kingdom and Switzerland among others) Old Michaelmas Day (Celtic) Revolution Day (Republic of Macedonia) October 12 Augustalia (Ancient Rome) Freethought Day
Celiac Sprue Awareness MonthCeliac Awareness Month  Eczema Awareness Month    Health Literacy Month  Healthy Lung Month   Liver Awareness Month National Breast Cancer Awareness Month (in United States and Canada)  National Dental Hygiene Month (in United States)  National Down Syndrome Awareness Month (in United States)National Down Syndrome Society – October is Down Syndrome Awareness Month   National Infertility Awareness Month (in United States) National Domestic Violence Awareness Month (in United States)  National Lupus Erythematosus Awareness Month (in United States)   National Physical Therapy Month (in United States)APTA | National Physical Therapy Month   National Spina Bifida Awareness Month (in United States)  Rett Syndrome Awareness Month (in United States)   Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS) Awareness Month (in United States)  World Blindness Awareness Month   American Pharmacist Month  Medical Ultrasound Awareness Month   3D Ultrasound Awareness Month Mental Illness Awareness Week  Culinary observances  National Pizza Month  National Popcorn Poppin’
OKLAHOMA IS OK: This school in Stillwater opened in the 1890s as the Oklahoma Agricultural & Mechanical College
Oklahoma State University
Oklahoma State University, the University of Oklahoma, the University of Central Oklahoma, and Northeastern State University are the largest public institutions of higher education in Oklahoma, operating through one primary campus and satellite campuses throughout the state.
3
The border between Texas and New Mexico was set first as a result of a survey by Spain in 1819.
The next most commonly spoken language is Cherokee, with about 22,000 speakers living within the Cherokee Nation tribal jurisdiction area of eastern Oklahoma.
During a 10-day run in Oklahoma City, the State Fair of Oklahoma attracts roughly one million people along with the annual Festival of the Arts.
THE ODYSSEY: This goddess of wisdom pleads with Zeus to release Odysseus from the embrace of the nymph Calypso
Athena
With the help of the goddess Athena, who favoured him, and despite Apollo's helping another of the competitors, he won the race and managed to draw the wrestling match, to the surprise of all.
2
According to the Iliad and Odyssey, his father is LaertesHomer does not list Laertes as one of the Argonauts. and his mother Anticlea, although there was a non-Homeric traditionScholium on Sophocles' Aiax 190, noted in Karl Kerenyi, The Heroes of the Greeks, 1959:77.Spread by the powerful kings, //
It was built by Epeius and filled with Greek warriors, led by Odysseus.
POLISH: His first papal trip abroad was to Latin America in January 1979; in June he went home to Poland
Pope John Paul II
From 16 October 1978 until his death on 2 April 2005 Karol Józef Wojtyła (later Pope John Paul II), a Polish native, reigned as Supreme Pontiff of the Roman Catholic Church.
3
Despite many positive developments in the region, Poland has found itself in a position where it must seek to defend the rights of ethnic Poles living in the former Soviet Union; this is particularly true of Belarus, where in 2005 the Lukashenko regime launched a campaign against the Polish ethnic minority.
However, problems still exist.
There are twenty technical universities, nine independent medical universities, five universities for the study of economics, nine agricultural academies, three pedagogical universities, a theological academy and three maritime service universities.
CLASSIC LITERATURE: "A Bird's Eye View of Paris" & "The Bells" are chapters in this 1831 novel
The Hunchback of Notre Dame
Victor Hugo's The Hunchback of Notre Dame inspired the renovation of its setting, the Notre-Dame de Paris.
3
The Sorbonne Library in the 5th arrondissement is the largest university library in Paris.
Blanchard, Pascal; Deroo, Eric; El Yazami, Driss; Fournié, Pierre; Manceron, Gilles (2003).
Water and sanitation thumb|right|A view of the Seine, the Île de la Cité and a Bateau Mouche|225x225px Paris in its early history had only the Seine and Bièvre rivers for water.
WE'RE IN SEINE!: (Sarah of the Clue Crew on the banks of the Seine in Paris)  Following her death on May 30, 1431, her ashes were thrown into the Seine River
Joan of Arc
They repelled an attempt by Joan of Arc to liberate the city in 1429.
3
thumb|left|Gold coins minted by the Parisii (1st century BC)  The Romans conquered the Paris basin in 52 BC and, after making the island a garrison camp, began extending their settlement in a more permanent way to Paris' Left Bank.
The majority of Paris' healthcare and social workers work at the hospitals and social housing concentrated in the peripheral 13th, 14th, 18th, 19th and 20th arrondissements.
Paris did not become the acknowledged capital of French literature until the 17th century, with authors such as Boileau, Corneille, La Fontaine, Molière, Racine, several coming from the provinces, and the foundation of the Académie française.
THAT'S NOT WHERE YOU THINK IT IS: Paris is in the northeast corner of this state, near Detroit, Omaha & Pittsburg
Texas
On 2 February 2000, Philippe Binant realised the first digital cinema projection in Europe, with the DLP CINEMA technology developed by Texas Instruments, in Paris.
3
In the summer of 1789, Paris became the centre stage of the French Revolution.
Paul Delouvrier promised to resolve the Paris-suburbs mésentente when he became head of the Paris region in 1961: two of his most ambitious projects for the Region were the construction of five suburban villes nouvelles ("new cities") and the RER commuter train network.
Patrons danced the bourrée to the accompaniment of the cabrette (a bellows-blown bagpipe locally called a "musette") and often the vielle à roue (hurdy-gurdy) in the cafés and bars of the city.
DID THEY MOVE IT?: You'll find Buenos Aires in this country that's just north of Panama
Costa Rica
It is bordered by Costa Rica to the west, Colombia to the southeast, the Caribbean to the north and the Pacific Ocean to the south.
3
Covering around 40 percent of its land area, Panama's jungles are home to an abundance of tropical plants and animals – some of them to be found nowhere else on the planet.
Spanish authorities exercised little control over much of the territory of Panama, large sections managing to resist conquest until very late in the colonial era.
The number of U.S. civilians (and their dependents), who had worked for the Panama Canal Commission and the U.S. Military, and were killed by the Panamanian Defense Forces, has never been fully disclosed.
DON'T THINK TOO FAST: Originally, Panama hats were made in what is now this country
Ecuador
Panama broke away from Spain in 1821 and joined a union of Nueva Granada, Ecuador, and Venezuela named the Republic of Gran Colombia.
3
In 2013, Panama ranked 5th among Latin American countries in terms of the Human Development Index, and  59th in the world.
In 1717, the viceroyalty of New Granada (northern South America) was created in response to other Europeans trying to take Spanish territory in the Caribbean region.
Panama's wildlife holds the most diversity of all the countries in Central America.
THE 1480s: In 1484, Portugal rejected his "Enterprise of the Indies" plan, so he sought support in Spain
Christopher Columbus
The Portuguese Empire was the first and longest global empire in history, spanning almost 600 years  The Treaty of Tordesillas, intended to resolve the dispute that had been created following the return of Christopher Columbus, which was made by Pope Alexander VI, the mediator between Portugal and Spain.
3
Other relevant laws are the Commercial Code (1888, as amended) and the Civil Procedure Code (1961, as amended).
The Army (21,000 personnel) comprises three brigades and other small units.
|- style="text-align:right;" |6 ||align=left| Coimbra
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: The Jarama & Alagon are among the chief tributaries of this river that flows across Spain & Portugal
Tagus
In Portugal, the Muslim population (or "Moors"), relatively small in numbers,A. R. Disney, p.58 stayed in the Algarve region, and south of the Tagus.
3
It is believed by some scholars that early in the first millennium BC, several waves of Celts invaded Portugal from Central Europe and inter-married with the local populations, forming different ethnic groups, with many tribes.
We bury the dead and take care of the living."
The Jesuits were expelled from the country and their assets confiscated by the crown.
POTENTATE POTABLES: Prince Henry the Navigator planted vineyards for this drink named for an archipelago southwest of Portugal
Madeira
The republic also holds sovereignty over the Atlantic archipelagos of the Azores and Madeira, both autonomous regions with their own regional governments.
3
This began occurring when the Kingdom of Leon and the Kingdom of Castile united and the Castilian Language (known as Spanish) slowly over the centuries began influencing the Galician Language and then trying to replace it.
This allowed considerable slippage in state-managed public works and inflated top management and head officer bonuses and wages.
left|thumb|Opening ceremony of the UEFA Euro 2004 at Estádio do Dragão, Porto.
CANADIAN CITIES: Named for a queen, this capital of Prince Edward Island is the seat of Queens County
Charlottetown
The island has several informal names: "Garden of the Gulf," referring to the pastoral scenery and lush agricultural lands throughout the province; and "Birthplace of Confederation" or "Cradle of Confederation", referring to the Charlottetown Conference in 1864, although PEI did not join Confederation until 1873, when it became the seventh Canadian province.
3
During the 20th century, potatoes replaced mixed farming as the leading cash crop, accounting for one-third of provincial farm income.
As a legacy of the island's colonial history, the provincial government enforces extremely strict rules for non-resident land ownership, especially since the PEI Lands Protection Act of 1982.
The celebrated singer-songwriter Stompin' Tom Connors spent his formative years in Skinners Pond.
GUN PARTS: Time, Newsweek or Playboy
magazines
It is also one of the few magazines whose microfilm format was in color, not black and white.http://www.ibiblio.org/archives-archivists/msg12465.html  Features and format  Rabbit logo thumb|upright|A Playboy cigarette lighter with the distinctive rabbit logo   Playboy's iconic and enduring mascot, a stylized silhouette of a rabbit wearing a tuxedo bow tie, was created by Playboy art director Art Paul for the second issue as an endnote, but was adopted as the official logo and has appeared ever since.
3
Celebrations were held at Las Vegas, Los Angeles, New York, and Moscow during the year to commemorate this event.
Fashion designers participated in the Rock the Rabbit event by designing T-shirts inspired by Playboy's rabbit head logo for each band.
On April 12, about 150 IDF members clashed with police and stoned the editorial offices.
FASHION: Playboy advised “Don't wear t-shirts with pink sports coats unless you live” here
Miami
The top ranked party school by Playboy for 2009 was the University of Miami.
3
An urban legend started about Hefner and the Playmate of the Month because of markings on the front covers of the magazine.
ISBN 0-8118-4858-2 Mario Casilli, Annie Leibovitz, Helmut Newton, and Bunny Yeager.
The Playboy Book: Forty Years.
ASTRONOMY: A line drawn from Merak to Dubhe in this constellation points to Polaris, the North Star
Ursa Major
thumb|250px|left|Ursa Major and Ursa Minor in relation to Polaris  In more recent history, it was referenced in Nathaniel Bowditch's 1802 book, American Practical Navigator, where it is listed as one of the navigational stars.
3
History of observations Polaris in stellar catalogues and atlases  Source  Presence Ptolemy (~169)   Al-Sufi (964)   Al-Biruni (~1030)   Khayyam (~1100)   Al-Tusi (1272)
There are also two distant components:  UMi C and  UMi D which have been shown to not be physically associated with the other three stars.{cite web|url=http://cdsads.u-strasbg.fr/abs/2010AJ....139.1968E  Polaris B can be seen even with a modest telescope.
However, as one of the brighter stars close to the celestial pole, Polaris was used for navigation at least from late antiquity, and described as ἀεί φανής (aei phanēs) "always visible" by Stobaeus (5th century).
IN THE "RAW": Interim capital of Pakistan in the 1960s
Rawalpindi
The Joint Staff HQ is composed of the Air HQ, Navy HQ, and Army GHQ in the vicinity of the Rawalpindi Military District.
3
The genocide carried out during this operation led to a declaration of independence and to the waging of a war of liberation by the Bengali Mukti Bahini forces in East Pakistan, with support from India.
Pakistan has a  coastline along the Arabian Sea and the Gulf of Oman in the south and land borders of  in total:  with Afghanistan,  with China,  with India and  with Iran.
It is also the only biosphere reserve of Pakistan.
ANIMALS: Critters of the Pleistocene epoch include the mammoth & this "breast tooth" relative
mastodon
A major extinction event of large mammals (megafauna), which included mammoths, mastodons, saber-toothed cats, glyptodons, ground sloths, Irish elk, cave bears, and short-faced bears, began late in the Pleistocene and continued into the Holocene.
3
The minor excursion is a "stadial"; times between stadials are "interstadials".
Such a pattern seems to fit the information on climate change found in oxygen isotope cores.
Temperature coordinates are given in the form of a deviation from today's annual mean temperature, taken as zero.
REBELS WITH A CAUSE: In the 1799 Fries Rebellion, Pennsylvania took up arms against a tax on this, including land & slaves
property
An individual's taxable income is based on the following eight types of income: compensation (salary); interest; dividends; net profits from the operation of a business, profession or farm; net gains or income from the dispositions of property; net gains or income from rents, royalties, patents and copyrights; income derived through estates or trusts; and gambling and lottery winnings (other than Pennsylvania Lottery winnings).
3
As of 2010, it is estimated that about 85% of all Hispanics in Pennsylvania live within a  radius of Philadelphia, with about 20% living within the city itself.
The capital of Pennsylvania is Harrisburg.
Other companies such as Herr's Snacks, Martin's Potato Chips, Snyder's of Berlin (not associated with Snyder's of Hanover) and Troyer Farms Potato Products are popular chip manufacturers.
THE NORTHERNMOST NATION: Fiji,Tuvalu,the Philippines
the Philippines
The Philippines (;  ), officially known as the Republic of the Philippines (), is a sovereign island country in Southeast Asia situated in the western Pacific Ocean.
2
By the end of the war it is estimated that over a million Filipinos had died.
Popular dishes include lechón, adobo, sinigang, kare-kare, tapa, crispy pata, pancit, lumpia, and halo-halo.
EXPLORERS: After his circumnavigation of the world he was made mayor of Plymouth, England
Sir Francis Drake
Plymouth was the home port for successful maritime traders, among them Sir John Hawkins, who led England's first foray into the Atlantic slave trade, as well as Sir Francis Drake, Mayor of Plymouth in 1581 and 1593.
2
Plymouth Sound is protected from the sea by the Plymouth Breakwater, in use since 1814.
It received negative feedback before opening when David Mackay said it was already "ten years out of date".
CROSSWORD CLUES "L": Paul Bunyan, for one           (10)
Lumberjack
Paul Bunyan is a giant lumberjack in American folklore.
3
There are many hypotheses about the etymology of the name Paul Bunyan.
A significant portion of these were produced from the 1960s thru the 1970s by the company International Fiberglass as part of their "Muffler Men" series of giant, fiberglass sculptures.
Much of his research was financed through the government-funded  Wisconsin Writers' Program.
GOOD "BI": "Parallel Lives" by Plutarch is an early collection of these
biographies
biographies were probably published under the Flavian dynasty or during the reign of Nerva (CE 96–98).
3
This principle he sought, however, not in any indeterminate matter but in the evil world-soul which has from the beginning been bound up with matter, but in the creation was filled with reason and arranged by it.
In 1770, English brothers John and William Langhorne published "Plutarch's Lives from the original Greek, with notes critical and historical, and a new life of Plutarch" in 6 volumes and dedicated to Lord Folkestone.
Gottlob Benedict von Schirach
SNAP, CRACKLE OR POP: Pepsi or Coke, to some
pop
Rise During the Great Depression, Pepsi gained popularity following the introduction in 1936 of a 12-ounce bottle.
3
At Comic-Con, around 1,500 bottles were given to the 1,500 people who were dressed as Marty McFly at the annual convention, in commemoration of the trilogy.
In 2011, for New York Fashion Week, Diet Pepsi introduced a "skinny" can that is taller and has been described as a "sassier" version of the traditional can that Pepsi says was made in "celebration of beautiful, confident women".
The word first appeared in an exhibit in the Harvard University Law School Library in December 1990 to February 1991, then in several articles and books by anthropologist David Lempert, who coined the phrase.
AMERICAN HISTORY: Americans began to oocupy this even before we could send Russia the $7.2 million we paid for it
Alaska
It shares maritime borders with Japan by the Sea of Okhotsk and the U.S. state of Alaska across the Bering Strait.
3
The Soviet Union, though with a heavy price, was transformed from a largely agrarian economy to a major industrial powerhouse in a short span of time.
In August 1945 the Soviet Army ousted the Japanese from China's Manchukuo and North Korea, contributing to the allied victory over Japan.
Berg Publishers (2009).
"GREAT" LEADERS: Russia, 1762-1796
Catherine the Great
The reigns of Catherine the Great and her grandson Alexander I saw the flourishing of Neoclassical architecture, most notably in the capital city of Saint Petersburg.
3
Eventually, the October Revolution, led by Bolshevik leader Vladimir Lenin, overthrew the Provisional Government and gave full governing power to the Soviets, leading to the creation of the world's first socialist state.
Chebyshev's students included Aleksandr Lyapunov, who founded the modern stability theory, and Andrey Markov who invented the Markov chains.
Bandy, also known as Russian hockey, is another traditionally popular ice sport.
IVY LEAGUE COLLEGES: The John D. Rockefeller Jr. Library is part of this university in Providence, Rhode Island
Brown
Advocates for excising plantation asserted that the word specifically referred to the British colonial practice of establishing settlements which disenfranchised native people and symbolized for many Rhode Islanders a legacy not only of violent native disenfranchisement but also of leadership in the establishment and proliferation of slavery in the colonies and in the post-colonial United States (Rhode Island abolished slavery in 1652, but the law was not enforced and by the early 1700s it was, according to the Brown Daily Herald, "the epicenter of the North American slave trade").
3
In 1638, after conferring with Williams, Anne Hutchinson, William Coddington, John Clarke, Philip Sherman, and other religious dissenters settled on Aquidneck Island (then known as Rhode Island), which was purchased from the local natives, who called it Pocasset.
Variations can include black olives or pepperoni with the spinach.
Cartoonist Don Bousquet, a state icon, has made a career out of Rhode Island culture, drawing Rhode Island-themed gags in The Providence Journal and Yankee magazine.
CLASSICAL COMPOSERS: This father-in-law of Richard Wagner died July 31, 1886, during the Wagner festival at Bayreuth
Franz Liszt
He had completed Lohengrin, the last of his middle-period operas, before the Dresden uprising, and now wrote desperately to his friend Franz Liszt to have it staged in his absence.
3
Wagner lived in Dresden for the next six years, eventually being appointed the Royal Saxon Court Conductor.
From Hitler to Heimat: The Return of History as Film.
Newman, Ernest (1976), The Life of Richard Wagner, 4 vols.
RICHARD WAGNER: In 1850 Wagner published an attack on the influence of this ethnic group in music
the Jews
Wagner's writings on the Jews corresponded to some existing trends of thought in Germany during the 19th century;Weiner (1997) 11; Katz (1986) 19; Conway (2012)
3
Spotts (1994)
45–6; Gregor-Dellin (1983) 418–9
Overvold, Liselotte Z. (1976), "Wagner's American Centennial March:
A KNIGHT TO REMEMBER: This German knight & minstrel who died in 1270 is the title subject of an 1845 opera by Richard Wagner
Tannhäuser
Newman (1976) I, 325–509 During this period, he staged there Der fliegende Holländer (2 January 1843)Millington (2001) 276 and Tannhäuser (19 October 1845),Millington (2001) 279 the first two of his three middle-period operas.
3
Wagner's late dramas are considered his masterpieces.
54; Grey (2008) 228–9
Wagner's followers (known as Wagnerians or Wagnerites)cf.
THEY'RE HISTORY!: Known for his long wall, he also built Rome's magnificent Athenaeum
Hadrian
thumb|Rome stock exchange in ancient Temple of Hadrian  Although the economy of Rome is characterised by the absence of heavy industry and it is largely dominated by services, high-technology companies (IT, aerospace, defence, telecommunications), research, construction and commercial activities (especially banking), and the huge development of tourism are very dynamic and extremely important to its economy.
3
Apart from brief periods as an independent city during the Middle Ages, Rome kept its status as Papal capital and "holy city" for centuries, even when the Papacy briefly relocated to Avignon (1309–1377).
The Roman Colleges are several seminaries for students from foreign countries studying for the priesthood at the Pontifical Universities.
Cinema thumb|right|Set of Gangs of New York in Cinecittà studios, Rome  Rome hosts the Cinecittà Studios, the largest film and television production facility in continental Europe and the centre of the Italian cinema, where a large number of today's biggest box office hits are filmed.
POLITICIANS: In 1949 he established a new government on Taiwan
Chiang Kai-shek
Chinese Nationalist one-party rule  thumb|upright|Chiang Kai-shek, leader of the Kuomintang from 1925 until his death in 1975|alt=A Chinese man in military uniform, smiling and looking towards the left.
3
Also during this time, over 2,000 women were forced into sexual slavery for Imperial Japanese troops, now euphemistically called "comfort women."
Democratic reforms continued in the 1990s, with Lee Teng-hui re-elected in 1996, in the first direct presidential election in the history of the ROC.
Only 4.4% of the patients said they are either "not satisfied" or "very not satisfied" with the service or care provided.
WASHINGTON, D.C.: Ironically, the statue of this president astride Cincinnatus looks toward the former home of Robert E. Lee
Grant
Union General Ulysses S. Grant's campaigns (particularly the Vicksburg Campaign) crippled the Confederacy in 1864 and 1865, and Lee was unable to turn the war's tide or stop Grant's advance during the Overland Campaign and Richmond–Petersburg Campaign.
3
In 1852, Lee was appointed Superintendent of the Military Academy at West Point; he was reluctant to enter what he called a "snake pit", but the War Department insisted and he obeyed.
Lee was enormously relieved to receive a long-awaited promotion as second-in-command of the Second Cavalry regiment in Texas in 1855.
It seems incongruously out of character for Lee to have whipped a slave woman himself, particularly one stripped to the waist, and that charge may have been a flourish added by the two correspondents; interestingly enough, it was not repeated by Wesley Norris when his account of the incident was published in 1866.
COMMENCEMENT CLICHES: This oft-quoted Robert Frost poem says the 2 paths were actually about equally worn
"The Road Not Taken"
In England he made some important acquaintances, including Edward Thomas (a member of the group known as the Dymock poets and Frost's inspiration for "The Road Not Taken"), T. E. Hulme, and Ezra Pound.
3
Frost's mother joined the Swedenborgian church and had him baptized in it, but he left it as an adult.
In 1920, Frost had to commit his younger sister Jeanie to a mental hospital, where she died nine years later.
New York: HarperCollins, 1999.Jarrell, Randall. "Robert Frost's 'Home Burial.'" No Other Book: Selected Essays.
THE '40s: In 1942 RCA plated a master copy of Glenn Miller's "Chattanooga Choo Choo" this color to honor a million sold
Gold
Legacy RCA antique radios  and RCA Merrill/CT-100s and other early color television receivers are among the more sought-after collectible radios and televisions, thanks to their popularity during the golden age of radio, their manufacturing quality, their engineering innovations, their styling and their name, RCA.  Most collectable are the pre-war television sets manufactured by RCA beginning in 1939, including the TRK-5, TRK-9 and TRK-12 models.
3
"Radio & Television" (magazine) Vol.
In about 1980, RCA corporate strategy reported on moving manufacture of its television sets to Mexico.
To account for their results not being as expansive as was hoped, Sung et al.
THE STARS: The name of Rigel is from the Arabic for "foot"; it's the foot of this mighty hunter
Orion
Rigel, also known by its Bayer designation Beta Orionis (β Ori, β Orionis), is the brightest star in the constellation Orion and the seventh brightest star in the night sky, with visual magnitude 0.13.
2
It is notable among other blue supergiant stars in the sense that its pulsations are powered by the nuclear reactions in the hydrogen-burning shell, the star also burns helium on its core.
The spectral lines show emission, absorption, line doubling, P Cygni profiles, and inverse P Cygni profiles, with no obvious periodicity.
LITERARY SETTINGS: (Jon of the Clue Crew walks a walled street of Pamplona, Spain.)  A passage reads, "Suddenly, a crowd came down the street.  They were all running, and then the bulls galloping, tossing their heads up and down..." vividly capturing Pamplona in this 1926 novel
The Sun Also Rises
Its events were central to the plot of The Sun Also Rises, by Ernest Hemingway, which brought it to the general attention of English-speaking people.
3
As the western empire disintegrated, the social and economic base became greatly simplified: but even in modified form, the successor regimes maintained many of the institutions and laws of the late empire, including Christianity.
The Glosas Emilianenses founded in the monasteries of San Millán de la Cogolla contain the first written words in both Basque and Spanish, having the first become an influence in the formation of the second as an evolution of Latin.
Culture   Culturally, Spain is a Western country.
EUROPEAN HISTORY: The British captured this narrow peninsula in 1704; Spain has coveted it ever since
Gibraltar
Its mainland is bordered to the south and east by the Mediterranean Sea except for a small land boundary with Gibraltar; to the north and northeast by France, Andorra, and the Bay of Biscay; and to the west and northwest by Portugal and the Atlantic Ocean.
3
In 1188 the first modern parliamentary session in Europe was held in León
In 1807, a secret treaty between Napoleon and the unpopular prime minister led to a new declaration of war against Britain and Portugal.
Particularly noteworthy was the development in Almería—one of the most arid and desolate provinces of Spain—of winter crops of various fruits and vegetables for export to Europe.
HISTORIC NAMES: Juan Carlos I was sworn in as King of Spain 2 days after the death of this man in 1975
Franco
For three years the Nationalist forces led by General Francisco Franco and supported by Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy fought the Republican side, which was supported by the Soviet Union, Mexico and International Brigades but it was not supported by the Western powers due to the British-led policy of Non-Intervention.
3
The Spanish administration approved legislation in 2007 aimed at furthering equality between genders in Spanish political and economic life (Gender Equality Act).
According to the Spanish government there were 5.7 million foreign residents in Spain in 2011, or 12% of the total population.
See also   Outline of Spain     Notes
WORLD HISTORY: His 1808 ousting of the king of Spain gave Latin American states the pretext to declare independence
Napoleon
The Napoleonic invasions of Spain led to chaos, triggering independence movements that tore apart most of the empire and left the country politically unstable.
3
Two 15th-century Spanish Jewish scholars, Don Isaac Abrabanel and Solomon ibn Verga, gave an explanation now considered folkloric.
Other renewable energies used in Spain are hydroelectric, biomass and marine (2 power plants under construction).
Spanish culture is marked by strong historic ties to Catholicism, which played a pivotal role in the country's formation and subsequent identity.
THE WESTERN HEMISPHERE: This country won independence from Spain in 1821 & from France in 1867
Mexico
For three years the Nationalist forces led by General Francisco Franco and supported by Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy fought the Republican side, which was supported by the Soviet Union, Mexico and International Brigades but it was not supported by the Western powers due to the British-led policy of Non-Intervention.
3
Spain is a democracy organised in the form of a parliamentary government under a constitutional monarchy.
The isle of Alborán, located in the Mediterranean between Spain and North Africa, is also administered by Spain, specifically by the municipality of Almería, Andalusia.
The International style was led by groups like GATEPAC. Spain is currently experiencing a revolution in contemporary architecture and Spanish architects like Rafael Moneo, Santiago Calatrava, Ricardo Bofill as well as many others have gained worldwide renown.
KING OF SPAIN: (Sarah of the Clue Crew at the Palacio Real in Madrid, Spain)  Last name of the man who ruled from this royal palace until Wellington chased him out in 1812
Bonaparte
The ridiculed Spanish king abdicated in favour of Napoleon's brother, Joseph Bonaparte.
3
Roman rule was bound together by law, language, and the Roman road.
This was an Age of Discovery, with daring explorations by sea and by land, the opening-up of new trade routes across oceans, conquests and the beginnings of European colonialism.
There are more than 200,000 migrants from Sub-Saharan Africa living in Spain, principally Senegaleses and Nigerians."Financial crisis reveals vulnerability of Spain's immigrants – Feature".
CONNERY...SEAN CONNERY: Like Bond, Sean spent time in this military branch in his youth
Navy
He then joined the Royal Navy, during which time he acquired two tattoos, of which his official website says "unlike many tattoos, his were not frivolous—his tattoos reflect two of his lifelong commitments: his family and Scotland.
3
I decided to become an actor and it turned out to be one of my more intelligent moves."   Career    1950s  Looking to pick up some extra money, Connery helped out backstage at the King's Theatre in late 1951.
During a bodybuilding competition held in London in 1953, one of the competitors mentioned that auditions were being held for a production of South Pacific; and Connery landed a small part as one of the Seabees chorus boys.
In 1959, Connery landed a leading role in  Robert Stevenson's Walt Disney Productions film Darby O'Gill and the Little People (1959) alongside Albert Sharpe, Janet Munro, and Jimmy O'Dea.
A WINDY CATEGORY: A typical warm winter wind of Switzerland is called Schneefresser, meaning "eater" of this
snow
Sports  thumb|Ski area over the glaciers of Saas-Fee Skiing, snowboarding and mountaineering are among the most popular sports in Switzerland, the nature of the country being particularly suited for such activities.
3
Sports directory if-sportsguide.ch.
Switzerland has the highest European rating in the Index of Economic Freedom 2010, while also providing large coverage through public services.2012 Index of Economic Freedom: Switzerland heritage.org.
Retrieved on 25 January 2010  On 27 November 2008, the interior and justice ministers of European Union in Brussels announced Switzerland's accession to the Schengen passport-free zone from 12 December 2008.
A WORLD OF FOOD: Types of these in Switzerland include Sbrinz, Tilsit & Appenzeller
Cheese
thumb|left|200px|Fondue is melted cheese, into which bread is dipped The cuisine of Switzerland is multifaceted.
3
The Confederacy facilitated management of common interests and ensured peace on the important mountain trade routes.
Maastricht Economic and social Research and training centre on Innovation and Technology, 1 February 2011.
"Fukushima showed that the risk of nuclear power is too high, which in turn has also increased the costs of this energy form.
BODIES OF WATER: Seaports on this bay include Chittagong, Bangladesh & Trincomalee, Sri Lanka
the Bay of Bengal
Geography  thumb|upright|alt=A roughly oval island with a mountainous center|Topographic map of Sri Lanka  Sri Lanka lies on the Indian Plate, a major tectonic plate that was formerly part of the Indo-Australian Plate.http://www.earth.northwestern.edu/public/emile/PDF/EAO147.pdf It is in the Indian Ocean southwest of the Bay of Bengal, between latitudes 5° and 10°N, and longitudes 79° and 82°E. Sri Lanka is separated from the Indian subcontinent by the Gulf of Mannar and Palk Strait.
3
Among the trees of the dry-land forests are valuable species such as satinwood, ebony, ironwood, mahogany and teak.
| date = 31 August 2011 }}</ref>  The [[Global Competitiveness Report]], published by the [[World Economic Forum]], has described Sri Lanka's economy as transitioning from the factor-driven stage to the efficiency-driven stage, and that it ranks 52nd in global competitiveness.<ref>{{Cite journal | url = http://www3.weforum.org/docs/WEF_GCR_Report_2011-12.pdf| pages = 326–327 | author = Schwab, Klaus | year = 2011 | title = The Global Competitiveness Report 2011–2012 | publisher = World Economic Forum | accessdate = 15 July 2014 }}</ref>
url = http://www.unicef.org/infobycountry/sri_lanka_statistics.html | title = Sri Lanka –
SCIENCE & NATURE: The order Sirenia consists of 4 living species: the dugong & 3 species of this animal
the manatee
The skeletal bones of both the manatees and dugong are very dense, which helps to neutralize the buoyancy of their blubber.
3
The Trichechidae species differ from the Dugongidae in the shape of their skull and tails.
extinct  References Specific  Bibliography      Garrison, Tom.
ISBN 978-0-495-55531-5  The Paleobiology Database  External links  Pezosiren portelli, earliest known Sirenian Save
ALL OVER THE WORLD: With about 500,000 souls, this city is the most populous in Slovakia
Bratislava
The capital and largest city is Bratislava.
3
The longest river in Slovakia is the Váh (), the shortest is the Čierna voda.
Slovak graphic art experienced its peak during the 20th century.
Michael Jacobs, Blue Guide:
A PLACE I'VE NEVER BEEN: Wapusk National Park, in this province one east of Saskatchewan
Manitoba
Saskatchewan is bordered on the west by Alberta, on the north by the Northwest Territories, on the east by Manitoba, and on the south by the American states of Montana and North Dakota.
3
Saskatchewan is a landlocked province with large distances to moderating bodies of waters.
Despite poor equipment and lack of provisions, the men on the march persevered and established a federal presence in the new territory.
They were defeated by a Canadian militia brought to the Canadian prairies by the new Canadian Pacific Railway.
STATE CAPITALS: This capital's harbor is connected to San Francisco Bay by a deepwater channel
Sacramento
Water from the Sacramento and San Joaquin rivers, and from the Sierra Nevada mountains, passes through the Bay to the Pacific Ocean.
3
Geology San Francisco Bay is thought to represent a down-warping of the Earth's crust between the San Andreas Fault to the west and the Hayward Fault to the east, though the precise nature of this remains under study.
Between Hayward and San Mateo to San Jose it is .
Gallery  See also thumb|The bay seen in July 2010   Golden Gate  Golden Gate Bridge  Hydrography of the San Francisco Bay Area  Islands of San Francisco Bay  McLaughlin Eastshore State Park  Mount Diablo   Mount Tamalpais State Park  Napa Sonoma Marsh  Point Pinole Regional Shoreline, Richmond  People   J.C. Barthel, who prepared  "plans for the docks and other water-front improvements in the San Francisco Bay district"  References  External links  San Francisco Bay: Portrait of an Estuary, David Sanger and John Hart, University of California Press Barging
ADVERTISING ICONS: First seen in 1924, the Lady graces the screen for this Sony-owned motion picture company
Columbia
Ohga went on to purchase CBS Records in 1988 and Columbia Pictures in 1989, greatly expanding Sony's media presence.
3
Sony Corporation is the electronics business unit and the parent company of the Sony Group, which is engaged in business through its four operating segments – electronics (including video games, network services and medical business), motion pictures, music and financial services.
In the following year he was joined by his colleague, Akio Morita, and they founded a company called Tokyo Tsushin Kogyo (Tokyo Telecommunications Engineering Corporation).
The company discontinued the last Trinitron-based television set in the USA in early 2007.
OLD SCHOOL: Founded in 1411, Scotland's oldest university was named after this apostle, Scotland's patron saint
St. Andrew
John Balliol was pronounced king in the Great Hall of Berwick Castle on 17 November 1292 and inaugurated at Scone on 30 November, St. Andrew's Day.
3
By inheritance in 1603, King James VI of Scotland became King of England and King of Ireland, thus forming a personal union of the three kingdoms.
The Church operates a territorial parish structure, with every community in Scotland having a local congregation.
Because of their topography and perceived remoteness, parts of Scotland have housed many sensitive defence establishments, with mixed public feelings.
UNFINISHED NOVELS: When he died in Samoa in 1894, he left behind what many consider his masterpiece, "Weir of Hermiston"
Robert Louis Stevenson
However, Robert Louis Stevenson, who lived in Samoa from 1889 until his death in 1894, wrote in A Footnote to History: Eight Years of Trouble in Samoa, "… the Samoans are gentle people."Stevenson, Robert Louis  (1892).
3
(Reprint by special arrangement with Yale University Press.
By the late 1920s the resistance movement against colonial rule had gathered widespread support.
Actor and director Nathaniel Lees has featured in many theatre productions and films including his role as Captain Mifune in The Matrix trilogy.
MAPQUEST: To visit San Marino, take a winding road up Mount Titano, a short drive from Rimini in this country
Italy
San Marino (; ), officially the Republic of San Marino (), also known as the Most Serene Republic of San Marino (), is an enclaved microstate surrounded by Italy, situated on the Italian Peninsula on the north-eastern side of the Apennine Mountains.
3
In the 13th century, power was given to the Great and General Council.
Until 1996, goods manufactured and sold in San Marino were not subject to indirect taxation.
The country also has a small wine industry.
CONTROVERSIAL TV: She shocked many with her "wardrobe malfunction" in the 2004 Super Bowl halftime show
Janet Jackson
The halftime show of Super Bowl XXXVIII in 2004 generated controversy when Justin Timberlake removed a piece of Janet Jackson's top, exposing her right breast with a star-shaped pastie around the nipple.
3
As a result, watching and discussing the broadcast's commercials has become a significant aspect of the event.
In the 2007 season, the Patriots became the second team in NFL history to have a perfect regular season record, after the 1972 Miami Dolphins, and the first to finish 16–0.
Super Bowl XLIX was then eventually awarded to University of Phoenix Stadium in Glendale, Arizona.
"LES" IS MORE: Sappho's birthplace
Lesbos
Roman copy of a Greek original of the 5th century BCE  Sappho (; Attic Greek  , Aeolic Greek , Psappho ) was a Greek lyric poet, born on the island of Lesbos.
3
Wiley-Blackwell, 1991.
Sappho's Aeolic Greek dialect is a difficult one, and by Roman times it was arcane and ancient as well, posing considerable obstacles to her continued popularity.
Sappho's contemporary Alcaeus described her thus: "Violet-haired, pure, honey-smiling Sappho" (, fr. 384).
THE 1996 ELECTION: This 94-year-old South Carolina Republican won his eighth term to the U.S. Senate
Strom Thurmond
Lake Marion   Lake Strom Thurmond (also known as Clarks Hill Lake)
2
The capital and largest city is Columbia with a 2013 population of 133,358; the Greenville-Anderson-Mauldin metropolitan area had a 2013 population of 850,965.
Virginian legislators adopted a one-drop law in 1924, forgetting that their state had many people of mixed ancestry among those who identified as white.
SUSHI CULTURE: (Jimmy reports from a fish market in Tokyo.) The most important auction at the Tsukiji Market is for this fish, a part of the Japanese diet chronicled as far back as the 8th century
tuna
Strips of tamagoyaki omelette, tiny fish roe, chopped tuna, and oboro whitefish flakes are typical non-vegetarian fillings.
3
History  thumb|right|Sushi by Hiroshige in Edo period The original type of sushi, known today as nare-zushi (,) was first made in Southeast Asia, maybe along what is also known as the Mekong River.
Contemporary Japanese sushi has little resemblance to the traditional lacto-fermented rice dish.
Ehōmaki (, "lucky direction roll") is a roll composed of 7 ingredients considered to be lucky.
BIBLE STORIES: King Saul didn't let his people eat until they destroyed these enemies
the Philistines
He fell on his sword (committed suicide) to avoid capture at the battle against the Philistines at Mount Gilboa.
3
Saul leads the army to victory over the Ammonites, and the people congregate at Gilgal where they acclaim Saul as king and he is crowned.
This may indicate that the David story is inserted from a source loyal to the House of David; David's lament over Saul in 2 Samuel 1 then serves an apologetic purpose, clearing David of the blame for Saul's death.
Saul led the Israelites to victory over the army of Goliath, who was killed by David.
ENGLISH LIT: "Meet the Tiger!" was the first of many books by Leslie Charteris to feature this hero, AKA Simon Templar
The Saint
Simon Templar is a British fictional character known as The Saint.
2
This is used as the logo of the books, the movies, and the 1960s TV series.
Templar's targets include corrupt politicians, warmongers, and other low life. "
NEVER HEARD OF IT BEFORE: In 1976 Soweto, near Johnannesburg, was the site of protests against the forced use of this language
Afrikaans
Soweto Uprising  Soweto came to the world's attention on 16 June 1976 with the Soweto Uprising, when mass protests erupted over the government's policy to enforce education in Afrikaans rather than their native language.
3
Kasibiz Mahala is a free community magazine that promotes local small businesses established in 2012.
Sport  Football (soccer)
The Soweto Open tennis tournament, part of the Challenger Tour is annually hosted in Soweto.
WE GOTTA GO NOW: Head to this island east of Sumatra to see the orangutans before they become extinct
Borneo
It is the largest island that is entirely in Indonesia (two larger islands, Borneo and New Guinea, are shared between Indonesia and other countries) and the sixth largest island in the world at 473,481 km2 (including adjacent islands such as the Riau Islands and Bangga Belitung Islands).
3
Sumatra came under the control of the Dutch East Indies and became a major producer of pepper, rubber, and oil.
Name   Area (km2)  Populationcensus 2000  Populationcensus 2010  Populationestimate 2014  Capital Aceh 57,956.004,073,0064,486,5704,731,705 Banda Aceh North Sumatra  (Sumatera Utara) 72,981.2311,642,48812,326,67813,527,937 Medan West Sumatra  (Sumatera Barat)
Like all parts of Indonesia, Indonesian (which was based on Riau Malay) is the official language and the main Lingua franca.
GOLDEN GIRLS: Sonja Henie won a 3rd straight gold medal at the 1936 Winter Olympics, held, like the '36 summer games, in this country
Germany
While Irina Slutskaya of Russia won her seventh European Championship in 2006 to become the most successful ladies' skater in European Championships, Henie retains record of most consecutive titles, sharing it with Katarina Witt of Eastern Germany/Germany (1983–1988).
3
It was an open secret that, in spite of the strict amateurism requirements of the time, Wilhelm Henie demanded "expense money" for his daughter's skating appearances.
In 1936, following a successful ice show in Los Angeles orchestrated by her father to launch her film career, Hollywood studio chief Darryl Zanuck signed her to a long term contract at Twentieth Century Fox, which made her one of the highest-paid actresses of the time.
Results  Ladies singles  Event 1923 1924 1925 1926 1927 1928 1929 1930 1931 1932 1933 1934 1935 1936 Winter Olympics   8th     1st     1st     1st World Championships   5th   2nd  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st European Championships          1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st Norwegian Championships  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st  1st         Pairs (with Arne Lie)  Event 1926 1927 1928 World Championships  5th    Norwegian Championships  1st  1st  1st   Awards  Inducted into the World Figure Skating Hall of Fame (1976).World Hall of Fame Members.
FIRST LADIES: This Texas-born conservationist headed the First Lady's Committee for A More Beautiful Capital
Lady Bird Johnson
During the Johnson Administration the first lady, Lady Bird Johnson, worked to draw attention to Texas wildflowers.
3
El Paso, on the western end of the state, averages  of annual rainfall, while parts of southeast Texas average as much as  per year.
Manchaca (2001), p. 199.
Texas descended into anarchy for two months between the surrender of the Army of Northern Virginia and the assumption of authority by Union General Gordon Granger.
THEY REALLY SAID IT: When Jason Kidd was drafted by this Texas NBA team he said, "We're gonna turn this team around 360 degrees"
the Dallas Mavericks
Within the "Big Four" professional leagues, Texas has two NFL teams (the Dallas Cowboys and the Houston Texans), two Major League Baseball teams (the Texas Rangers and the Houston Astros), three NBA teams (the Houston Rockets, the San Antonio Spurs, and the Dallas Mavericks), and one National Hockey League team (the Dallas Stars).
3
Texas from Sea to Shining Sea https://books.google.com/books/about/Texas.html?id=PUemv3wa0O8C&redir_esc=y  Due to its size and geologic features such as the Balcones Fault, Texas contains diverse landscapes that resemble both the American South and Southwest.
In total, 34.2% (7,660,406) of Texas's population aged five and older spoke a language at home other than English.
East Texas and the Gulf Coastal Plains regions near the Louisiana border have a Cajun/Creole influence.
LIKE A HURRICANE: Hurricanes are bad enough, but they also spin off these other hazards; Hurricane Beulah generated 141 when it hit Texas in 1967
tornadoes
The state experiences the most tornadoes in the United States, an average of 139 a year.
3
No culture was dominant in the present-day Texas region, and many peoples inhabited the area.
The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board (THECB) ranks the state's public universities into three distinct tiers:"Tier One/Prop. 4".
Texans also enjoy the rodeo.
PLACES YOU FLY OVER: This Texas city that spells its name like a NYC street is the USA's fourth largest
Houston
Houston is the largest city in Texas and the fourth-largest in the United States, while San Antonio is the second largest in the state and seventh largest in the United States.
3
The first grant, to Moses Austin, was passed to his son Stephen F. Austin after his death.
Just over 200,000 Indians make Texas their home.
Texans also enjoy the rodeo.
MORE FIRST LADIES: She married the future president at St. Mark's Episcopal Church in Bexar County, Texas on November 17, 1934
Lady Bird Johnson
During the Johnson Administration the first lady, Lady Bird Johnson, worked to draw attention to Texas wildflowers.
3
Chipman (1992), p. 243.Weber (1992), p. 34.
After the Fact: The Art of Historical Detection Volume 1.
After Native American resistance, the Spanish missionaries returned to Mexico.
LITERATURE: Nicodemus Frapp is a narrow-minded evangelist in "Tono-Bungay", a 1909 novel by this author of "The Time Machine"
H.G. Wells
Scholarship Significant scholarly commentary on The Time Machine began from the early 1960s, initially contained in various broad studies of Wells's early novels (such as Bernard Bergonzi's The Early H.G. Wells: A Study of the Scientific Romances) and studies of utopias/dystopias in science fiction (such as Mark R. Hillegas's The Future as Nightmare: H.G. Wells and the Anti-Utopians).
3
1978 television film  Sunn Classic Pictures produced a television film version of The Time Machine as a part of their "Classics Illustrated" series in 1978.
Perry accelerates work on the time machine, permitting him to test it before being forced to work on the new project.
Pablo Gómez's Año 802701 (2014) continues the George Pal film with the manner of the original Wells book.
THE JEFFERSON: Thomas Jefferson was born on April 13, 1743 in Shadwell in this state
Virginia
Primarily of English ancestry, he was born and educated in Virginia.
3
The other committee members made some changes.
Barbary Coast of North Africa 1806|Barbary Coast of North Africa 1806.
U.S. negotiators seized this unique opportunity and accepted the offer and signed the treaty on April 30, 1803.Meacham, 2012, p. 387
THOMAS JEFFERSON: Thomas was staying just outside this European city July 14, 1789, so he knew of the big events there
Paris
With his young daughter Patsy and two servants, he departed in July 1784, arriving in Paris the next month.
3
His resolution was later expanded into A Summary View of the Rights of British America, in which he argued people have the right to govern themselves.
422-423  First Barbary War  thumb|alt=Map.
Brookings, 2015  Memorials and honors Jefferson has been memorialized with buildings, sculptures, postage, and currency.
HISTORY: Tenochtitlan, capital of this empire, was founded in 1325 on an island in what was Lake Texcoco
Aztec
Mexico-Tenochtitlan (, ), commonly known as Tenochtitlan () was an Aztec altepetl (city-state) located on an island in Lake Texcoco, in the Valley of Mexico.
2
This stone disc is 3.25 meters in diameter (or 10.5 ft).
Mexico City:
BROADWAY LYRICS: A song in "The Sound of Music" tells you to do this, "search high and low, follow every byway, every path you know"
"Climb Every Mountain"
Maria, the Captain, and the children ‡  "Edelweiss" – The Captain   "So Long, Farewell" (reprise) – Maria, the Captain, and the children  "Finale Ultimo" (reprise of "Climb Every Mountain") – Nuns  Notes
3
Maria explains her lateness, saying she was raised on that mountain, and apologizes for singing in the garden without permission.
He opines that only poor people have the time for great romances ("How Can Love Survive").
As of 2012, the production was still in the repertoire of the Volksoper with 12–20 performances per season.
MOVIE CROSSWORD CLUES "G": 1950s Tokyo-threatening titan(8)
Godzilla
In the kaiju (monster movie) genre, landmarks of Tokyo are routinely destroyed by giant monsters such as Godzilla and Gamera.
3
In 2015, Tokyo was ranked as the 11th most expensive city for expatriates, according to the Mercer consulting firm, and also the world's 11th most expensive city, according to the Economist Intelligence Unit's cost-of-living survey.
Tokyo has been cited as a "convincing example of the relationship between urban growth and climate."
The Global City:
ARCHAEOLOGY: Scholars say Hissarlik, a mount near the mouth of the Dardanelles in this country, is the site of Troy
Turkey
Wilusa or Truwisa; ) was a city situated in what is known from Classical sources as Asia Minor, now northwest Anatolia in modern Turkey, located south of the southwest end of the Dardanelles/Hellespont and northwest of Mount Ida at Hisarlık.
3
Troy (, Ilion, or , Ilios; and , Troia;  and ;Trōia is the typical Latin name for the city.
(publicani), 73 (pirates).
Dörpfeld and Blegen After Schliemann, the site was further excavated under the direction of Wilhelm Dörpfeld  and later Carl Blegen (1932–38).
ALLITERATIVE LIT: Title peak in a Thomas Mann work
the Magic Mountain
ISBN 978-1-4411-6798-9 Mann was awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1929, after he had been nominated by Anders Österling, member of the Swedish Academy, principally in recognition of his popular achievement with the epic Buddenbrooks (1901), The Magic Mountain (Der Zauberberg, 1924) and his numerous short stories.http://www.nobelprize.org/nomination/archive/show.php?id=7347 (Due to the personal taste of an influential committee member, only  Buddenbrooks was cited at any great length.)Nobel Prize website.
3
Andrew Crumey's novel Mobius Dick (2004), which imagines an alternative universe where an author named Behring has written novels resembling Mann's.
The multi-faceted playwright Frontline (magazine), Vol.
Reprinted as Vintage book, K55, New York, Vintage Books, 1957.
"B"4: This monetary unit of Thailand equals 100 satangs
baht
In 1997 increased pressure on the baht, a year in which the economy contracted by 1.9%, led to a crisis that uncovered financial sector weaknesses and forced the Chavalit Yongchaiyudh administration to float the currency.
3
About a year later, a set of new "Red Shirts" protests resulted in 87 deaths (mostly civilian and some military) and 1,378 injured.
Yingluck insisted that she would continue her duties until the scheduled election in February 2014, urging the protesters to accept her proposal: "Now that the government has dissolved parliament, I ask that you stop protesting and that all sides work towards elections.
Snooker has enjoyed increasing popularity in Thailand in recent years, with interest in the game being stimulated by the success of Thai snooker player James Wattana in the 1990s.
RUSSIAN CITIES: This city of 180,000 shares its name with Marx' co-writer of "The Communist Manifesto"
Engels
The Communist Manifesto (originally Manifesto of the Communist Party) is an 1848 political pamphlet by German philosophers Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels.
3
Philadelphia:
Temple University Press.
Michael Harrington.
"SEASON": Paul Scofield won an Oscar as the "year-round" Thomas More in this 1966 film
A Man For All Seasons
Hugh Trevor-Roper called More "the first great Englishman whom we feel that we know, the most saintly of humanists, the most human of saints, the universal man of our cool northern renaissance."Cited in Marvin O'Connell, "A Man for all Seasons: an Historian's Demur," Catholic Dossier 8 no. 2 (March–April 2002): 16–19 online  Jonathan Swift, an Anglican, wrote that More was "a person of the greatest virtue this kingdom ever produced".Writings on Religion and the Church, Chapter 14 "Concerning that Universal Hatred which prevails against the Clergy" by Jonathan Swift, 1736Jonathan Swift,  Prose Works of Jonathan Swift v. 13, Oxford UP, 1959, p. 123).
3
a successful lawyer and later judge, and his wife Agnes (née Graunger).
More himself denied these allegations:  However, in More's "Apology," published in 1533, he writes that he only applied corporal punishment to two heretics: a child who was caned in front of his family for heresy regarding the Eucharist and a "feeble-minded" man who was whipped for disrupting prayers.
Catholic Church Pope Leo XIII beatified Thomas More, John Fisher and 52 other English Martyrs on 29 December 1886.
THEY WROTE FOR THE NEW YORK TIMES: Trying to protect his sources, in 1978 reporter Myron Farber spent 38 days here
Jail
His words to National Security Advisor Henry Kissinger included "People have gotta be put to the torch for this sort of thing..." and "Let's get the son-of-a-bitch in jail."
3
New-York Historical Society.
In 2009, article circulation dropped 7.3 percent to about 928,000; this is the first time since the 1980s that it has fallen under one million.
That day the Post received a call from the Assistant Attorney General, William Rehnquist, asking them to stop publishing.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: Thomas Pynchon followed "V" with this novel about the V-2 rocket
Gravity's Rainbow
For Gravity's Rainbow Pynchon won the 1974 U.S. National Book Award for Fiction."National Book Awards – 1974".
3
An intricate and allusive fiction that combines and elaborates on many of the themes of his earlier work, including preterition, paranoia, racism, colonialism, conspiracy, synchronicity, and entropy.
Past winners & finalists by category.
Toward the end of Corey's address a streaker ran through the hall, adding further to the confusion.
...AND HOWE!: In 1975 balloting for Tory leader, there were 19 votes each for Prior and Howe but 146 votes for her
Margaret Thatcher
By the early 1980s there was no clear neoconservative in the Tory leadership cadre, but Brian Mulroney, who became leader in 1983, eventually came to adopt many policies from the Margaret Thatcher and Ronald Reagan governments.
3
a.
The 60,000 or so Loyalists who settled in Canada, the Bahamas, or returned to Great Britain after the American War of Independence are known as United Empire Loyalists.
This left the PCs in disarray and scrambling to understand how to make toryism relevant in provinces such as Quebec, Saskatchewan, Alberta, and British Columbia that had never had a strong tory tradition and political culture.
OH "PH": In mythology, after Hippolytus rejects her, this wife of Theseus hangs herself
Phaedra
After decapitating the beast, Theseus used the string to escape the Labyrinth and managed to escape with all of the young Athenians and Ariadne as well as her younger sister Phaedra.
2
On Pirithous' behalf they travelled to the underworld, domain of Persephone and her husband Hades.
Price, Anne, The Quest for Theseus (London, 1970) examines the Theseus-Minotaur-Ariadne myth and its historical basis, and later treatments and adaptations of it in Western culture.
ROLE REVERSAL: All Rebecca De Mornay wants to do is get into Princeton but she must deal with prostitute Tom Cruise
Risky Business
After portraying supporting roles in Taps (1981) and The Outsiders (1983), his first leading role was in the romantic comedy Risky Business, released in August 1983.
3
Cruise grew up in near poverty, and had a Catholic upbringing.
Impossible III.
YouTube (2008-01-17).
5' 10" FEMMES: At 5' 10" she "Mrs." looking straight into the eyes of her husband Tom Cruise
Nicole Kidman
Cruise's next films were Days of Thunder (1990) and Far and Away (1992), both of which co-starred then-wife Nicole Kidman as his love interest.
3
Cruise struggled with dyslexia at an early age and has said that Scientology, specifically the L. Ron Hubbard Study Tech, helped him overcome dyslexia.
The Church of Scientology said the video had been "pirated and edited", and was taken from a three-hour video produced for members of Scientology.
He also said that Suri is no longer a practicing member of the church.
ROOF OF THE WORLD: Tibet is the source of this river that empties into the South China Sea near Ho Chi Minh City
Mekong
These include the Yangtze, Yellow River, Indus River, Mekong, Ganges, Salween and the Yarlung Tsangpo River (Brahmaputra River).
3
Yuan control over the region ended with the Ming overthrow of the Yuan and Tai Situ Changchub Gyaltsen's revolt against the Mongols.
Goldstein 1997, pg.
These include Amdo (A mdo) in the northeast, which is administratively part of the provinces of Qinghai, Gansu and Sichuan.
HELLO, GOOD BUY: Ty Cobb, baseball's "Georgia Peach", made millions on early investment in this Georgia beverage company
Coca-Cola
Photo of Cobb sliding with spikes  Cobb's legacy, which includes a large college scholarship fund for Georgia residents financed by his early investments in Coca-Cola and General Motors, has been tarnished by allegations of racism and violence, largely stemming from a couple of biographies that were released following his death.
3
Cobb never had an easy time as husband and father.
Crawford learned about the letter in 1946 and accused Cobb of being a "cheapskate" who never helped his teammates.
"Ty Cobb Backed Negroes." Los Angeles Sentinel, August 3, 1961, B11.
STATE SEALS: This structure, a honey of a symbol for hard work & industry, graces Utah's seal
Beehive
" This is symbolized by the beehive on the Utah flag, and the state's motto, "Industry."Corporation of the President of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints: "Church History in the Fullness of Times." 1989.
3
For the first few years, Brigham Young and the thousands of early settlers of Salt Lake City struggled to survive.
Before troops led by Albert Sidney Johnston entered the territory, Brigham Young ordered all residents of Salt Lake City to evacuate southward to Utah Valley and sent out a force, known as the Nauvoo Legion, to delay the government's advance.
Music videos   Jon Bon Jovi –
U.S.A.: Fillmore filled in as Utah's territorial capital until this city took over in 1856
Salt Lake City
Utah has a population of nearly 3 million (Census estimate for July 1, 2015), approximately 80% of whom live along the Wasatch Front, centering on Salt Lake City.
3
From such films, most US residents recognize such natural landmarks as Delicate Arch and "the Mittens" of Monument Valley.
Gillies et al.
EA Sports BIG's Freekstyle game has a level called "Monumental Motoplex" in Monument Valley.
U.S. CITIES: You can see the oldest continuously used Mormon chapel in a "Trip To" this Utah city
Bountiful
They developed irrigation to support fairly large pioneer populations along Utah's Wasatch front (Salt Lake City, Bountiful and Weber Valley, and Provo and Utah Valley).William Clayton, edited by George D. Smith: An Intimate Chronicle: The Journals of William Clayton, p. 300.
3
In the northeastern section of the state, running east to west, are the Uinta Mountains, which rise to heights of over .
In 2006, the legislature passed legislation aimed at banning joint-custody for a non-biological parent of a child.
thumb|The otherworldly look of the Bonneville Salt Flats has been used in many movies and commercials  See Category:Films shot in Utah  Utah's Monument Valley has been location to several productions, such as 127 Hours (2010), Tim Burton's Planet of the Apes (2001), and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969).
THE UNITED NATIONS: It's what the "C" stands for in UNICEF, a United Nations international emergency fund
Children's
UNICEF (the United Nations Children's Fund) was created in 1946 to aid European children after the Second World War and expanded its mission to provide aid around the world and to uphold the Convention on the Rights of the Child.
3
Meisler, pp.
Post-Cold War thumb|upright|Kofi Annan, Secretary-General from 1997 to 2006 After the Cold War, the UN saw a radical expansion in its peacekeeping duties, taking on more missions in ten years than it had in the previous four decades.
In 2013, the top 10 providers of assessed financial contributions to United Nations peacekeeping operations were the United States (28.38%), Japan (10.83%), France (7.22%), Germany (7.14%), the United Kingdom (6.68%), China (6.64%), Italy (4.45%), the Russian Federation (3.15%), Canada (2.98%), and Spain (2.97%).
STUDYING ABROAD: College towns in this country include Goteborg, Lund &, of course, Uppsala
Sweden
Uppsala (; older spelling Upsala) is the capital of Uppsala County and the fourth largest city of Sweden, after Stockholm, Gothenburg and Malmö. It had 140,454 inhabitants in 2010.
3
Since February 1987, the coldest month recorded is -8.6 °C (16.5 °F).
Across the street from the Gustavianum in the University Park stands the University Hall, erected in 1879–86 in Italian renaissance style.
Other sports clubs located in Uppsala include:   Almtuna IS  Gamla Upsala SK  IF Vindhemspojkarna  IK Sirius  IK Sirius Fotboll  Unik FK  Upsala IF  Uppsala Judoklubb  Uppsala 86ers American Football  Uppsala Fencing Clubhttp://www.upsalafaktning.se/  UASS - Uppsala chess club   Notable natives  200px|thumb|right|Carl Linnaeus, scientist Anders Jonas Ångström (1814–1874), physicist Svante Arrhenius (1859–1927), scientist Ingmar Bergman (1918–2007), film director Jöns Jakob Berzelius
LAKE CITY: Jinja, Uganda
Lake Victoria
The southern part of the country includes a substantial portion of Lake Victoria, shared with Kenya and Tanzania, situating the country in the African Great Lakes region.
3
The European Union's Election Observation Mission reported on improvements and flaws of the Ugandan electoral process: "The electoral campaign and polling day were conducted in a peaceful manner [...]
Several other kingdoms and chiefdoms are officially recognized by the government, including the union of Alur chiefdoms, the Iteso paramount chieftaincy, the paramount chieftaincy of Lango and the Padhola state.
The remainder of the population according to the 2002 census followed traditional religions (1.0 percent), Baha'i (0.1 percent), other non-Christian religions (0.7 percent), or had no religious affiliation (0.9 percent).
MIDDLE INITIAL S.: He used his middle name Ulysses as a first name; a mistake at West Point gave him the middle name Simpson
Ulysses S. Grant
Ulysses may also refer to:   In arts and entertainment    In literature   Ulysses (novel), by James Joyce  Ulysses (Pantheon), two members of a fictional group in the Marvel Comics universe  "Ulysses" (poem), by Alfred Lord Tennyson  HMS Ulysses (novel), by Alistair Maclean  Ulysses Klaw, a character in the Marvel Comics universe   In film and television   Ulysses (1954 film), starring Kirk Douglas based on the story of Homer's Odyssey  Ulysses (1967 film), based on Joyce's novel  Ulysses (2011 film), a 2011 Chilean film  Ulysses (broadcast), a dramatised radio broadcast of Joyce's novel  Ulysses 31, a French-Japanese anime television program   In music   Ulysses (band), an American band  Ulysses (EP), by Shimamiya Eiko  "Ulysses" (song), by Franz Ferdinand  Ulisse (1960–68), an opera by Luigi Dallapiccola  "Ullyses", a song by Dead Can Dance on the album The Serpent's Egg   Other uses in arts and entertainment   Ulysses 1994XF04, a fictional asteroid in the video game Ace Combat  People  Ulysses (given name)  Ulysses Gomez (born 1983), Mexican-American mixed martial arts fighter  Ulysses S. Grant (1822–1885), American general and 18th President of the United States (1869–1877)  Places  Ulysses, Kansas  Ulysses, Kentucky  Ulysses, Nebraska  Ulysses Township, Butler County, Nebraska  Ulysses, New York  Ulysses Township, Potter County, Pennsylvania  In science and technology  ULYSSES (cable system), a submarine communications cable network  Ulysses (robot), a bomb-detecting robot  Ulysses (spacecraft), a space probe designed to study the Sun  Ulysses (text editor), a software product for creative writing  Ulysses butterfly (Papilio ulysses) a butterfly endemic to Australasia  5254 Ulysses, an asteroid  Vehicles  Ulysses (spacecraft), a space probe designed to study the Sun  Ulysses (motorcycle), manufactured by the Buell Motorcycle Company  , any of several ships of the British Royal Navy  , any of several ships  , any of several ships  SS Ulysses (Panama Collier No. 1), a World War I-era steel-hulled screw steamer  , any of several ships of the U.S. Navy  USS Ulysses (ARB-9), a battle damage repair ship of the U.S. Navy  Ulysses (later Grierson), a GWR 3031 Class locomotive on the Great Western Railway between 1891 and 1915  Other uses  Ulysses Club, an international motorcycling club  See also  All pages beginning with Ulysses  hr:Uliks
1
Ulysses is the Latin name for Odysseus, a hero in ancient Greek literature.
FAMILIAR QUOTATIONS... IN 1800: On Nov. 10, 1770 Voltaire penned, "If God did not exist, it would be necessary to" do this
invent him
Voltaire is also known for many memorable aphorisms, such as "Si Dieu n'existait pas, il faudrait l'inventer" ("If God did not exist, it would be necessary to invent him"), contained in a verse epistle from 1768, addressed to the anonymous author of a controversial work on The Three Impostors.
3
2010.
Judaism
ISBN 978-1-58234-630-4.
MR. & MISSIVE: In the "body" of his Nov. 30, 1859 letter to his family from a Virginia prison, he says farewell
John Brown
The execution of Gabriel Prosser in 1800, Nat Turner's slave rebellion in 1831 and John Brown's Raid on Harpers Ferry in 1859 marked the growing social discontent over slavery and its role in the plantation economy.
3
Also among the federal developments was the Pentagon, built during World War II as the headquarters for the Department of Defense.
Fairfax County is the most populous locality in Virginia, with over one million residents, although that does not include its county seat Fairfax, which is one of the independent cities.
W. J. Rorabaugh, Donald T. Critchlow, Paula C. Baker (2004).
COLLEGES: In 1779 this Virginia institution became the first U.S. college to establish a law department
William & Mary
Middle Plantation saw the founding of The College of William & Mary in 1693 and was renamed Williamsburg as it became the colonial capital in 1699.
3
The resulting crater may explain sinking and earthquakes in the region.
Education  thumb|The University of Virginia, a World Heritage Site, was founded by President Thomas Jefferson.|alt=A red brick, Neoclassical dome with a large portico on the front and covered walkway on the sides lit up at dusk.
Although the Washington Metropolitan Area, which includes Northern Virginia, has the second worst traffic in the nation, Virginia as a whole has the 21st-lowest congestion and the average commute time is 26.9 minutes.
CURRENT SITCOMS: A Vermont innkeeper in his last series, this veteran comedian now plays cartoonist Bob McKay
Bob Newhart
Vermont was also the home of Dick Loudon, Bob Newhart's character on the 1980s sitcom Newhart.
3
From 1731 to 1734, the French constructed Fort St. Frédéric, which gave the French control of the New France/Vermont frontier region in the Lake Champlain Valley.
From 2010 to 2013, 16 out of Vermont's 251 towns experienced an increase in population.
Retrieved 2015-11-11.
L.A.'s SISTER CITIES: L.A. has as its sister city this country's second-largest city, Kaunas, not its largest, Vilnius
Lithuania
Vilnius (; see also other names) is the capital of Lithuania and its largest city, with a population of 542,664 as of 2015.
2
The Church of St. Michael and St. Constantine was built in 1913.
Remigijus Šimašius became the first directly elected mayor of the city.
VENICE: The name of the city section where ships were built gives us this word for where military supplies are stored
arsenal
The 18th century's biggest industrial complex was the Venice Arsenal, and the Italian Army still uses it today (even though some space has been used for major theatrical and cultural productions, and beautiful spaces for art).
3
Linguists suggest that the name is based on an Indo-European root  *wen ("love"), so that *wenetoi would mean "beloved", "lovable", or "friendly".
During the Second World War, the historic city was largely free from attack, the only aggressive effort of note being Operation Bowler, a successful Royal Air Force precision strike on the German naval operations in the city in March 1945.
Other Venetian institutions of higher education are: the "Accademia di Belle Arti" (Academy of Fine Arts), established in 1750, whose first Chairman was Giovanni Battista Piazzetta;DEPARTMENTS: Visual arts (Painting; Sculpture; Graphic Art; Decoration); Scenography and Applied Arts (Scenography; New Technologies for the Arts). and the "Benedetto Marcello" Conservatory of Music, which, established in 1876 as High School and Musical Society, later (1915) became "Liceo Musicale" and finally (1940), when its Director was Gian Francesco Malipiero, State Conservatory of Music.
BUSINESS LEADERS: Before founding his own corp., John K. Northrop was chief engineer for this company & designed its Vega airplane
Lockheed
Other vehicles named after Vega include the ESA's Vega launch system and the Lockheed Vega aircraft.
3
The distance to Vega can be determined by measuring its parallax shift against the background stars as the Earth orbits the Sun.
Thus there could be smaller, terrestrial planets orbiting closer to the star.
right|thumb|The path of the north celestial pole among the stars due to the precession.
GAS: The atmosphere of Venus, the heaviest of any planet, is mainly this common gas 1.5 times heavier than air
carbon dioxide
It has the densest atmosphere of the four terrestrial planets, consisting of more than 96% carbon dioxide.
3
Venus is the second planet from the Sun, orbiting it every 224.7 Earth days.
It is radically different from Earth in other respects.
Early efforts  thumb|Mariner 2, launched in 1962|alt=a skeletal, bottle-shaped craft with a large radio dish on top is seen against a background of stars The first robotic space probe mission to Venus, and the first to any planet, began on 12 February 1961, with the launch of the Venera 1 probe.
THE MOVIES: In this 1973 film Woody Allen reads a 1990 New York Times headline, "Pope's Wife Gives Birth to Twins"
Sleeper
Again, Sam, she would later co-star in Sleeper, Love and Death, Interiors, Manhattan and Annie Hall. "He showed me the ropes and I followed his lead.
3
At the 2015 Cannes Film Festival, Allen said, in reference to his upcoming Amazon show, "It was a catastrophic mistake.
Allen also had romantic relationships with Stacey Nelkin and Diane Keaton.
ISBN 978-0879516925.Baxter, John (1998).
AMERICAN HISTORY: When West Virginia became a state in 1863, Wheeling was its capital; this city became the permanent capital in 1885
Charleston
The capital and largest city is Charleston.
3
49 Votes recorded from pro-secession counties were mostly cast elsewhere by Unionist refugees from these counties.
Large numbers of people of German ancestry are present in the northeastern counties of the state.
The Department of Tax and Revenue supervises and otherwise assists counties and municipalities in their work of assessment and tax rate determination.
AS WE KNOW IT: The name of this Wisconsin city is French for "root"
Racine
Yankees also speculated in real estate, platted towns such as Racine, Beloit, Burlington, and Janesville, and established schools, civic institutions, and Congregationalist churches.
3
Between 1840 to 1850, Wisconsin's non-Indian population had swollen from 31,000 to 305,000.
30/15 (−1/−9) Hurley 19/0 (−7/−18) 26/4 (-4/−16)
Currently three of the five most populous cities in Wisconsin provide their constituents with internet-based access of all public records directly from the cities' databases.
ROADSIDE ATTRACTIONS: Seen here, the sculpture of this largest member of the pike family houses Hayward, Wisconsin's shrine to anglers
muskellunge
Badger State DomesticatedAnimal: Dairy cow State Wild Animal: White-tailed deer State Beverage: Milk State Fruit: Cranberry State Bird: Robin State Capital: Madison State Dog: American water spaniel State pro football team: Green Bay Packers State pro baseball team: Milwaukee BrewersState pro basketball team:Milwaukee BucksState pro hockey team:Milwaukee Admirals State Fish: Muskellunge State Flower: Wood violet State Fossil:
3
and third in per-capita milk production, behind California and Vermont."Table 6: Per Capita Milk Production by State, 2003" in CITEC, The Dairy Industry in the U.S. and Northern New York, p. 25.
Milwaukee is at the northern edge of an urban area bordering Lake Michigan that stretches southward into greater Chicago and northwestern Indiana, with a population of over 11 million.
The franchise was founded by "Curly" Lambeau who played and coached for them.
STATE CAPITALS: This site was uninhabited woods when James Doty persuaded the Wisconsin legislature to put the capital there
Madison
The state capital is Madison, and its largest city is Milwaukee, which is located on the western shore of Lake Michigan.
3
Wisconsin does not assess a tax on intangible property.
Seven Interstate Highways transverse the state.
Medium-size cities dot the state and anchor a network of working farms surrounding them.
JANUARY 24: Winston Churchill died Jan. 24, 1965, exactly 70 years after this man, his father
Lord Randolph Churchill
His father, Lord Randolph Churchill, was a charismatic politician who served as Chancellor of the Exchequer; his mother, Jennie Jerome, was an American socialite.
3
Formulated in this way, Churchill's mental health history contains unmistakable echoes of the seminal interpretation of Lord Moran's Black Dog revelations made by Dr Anthony Storr.
J. Wheeler-Bennett (ed.), Action This Day (Macmillan, 1968), pp.
On 26 December 1941, Churchill addressed a joint meeting of the US Congress, asking of Germany and Japan, "What kind of people do they think we are?"Prime Minister Winston Churchill's Address to the Congress of the United States 1941, ibiblio.org Churchill initiated the Special Operations Executive (SOE) under Hugh Dalton's Ministry of Economic Warfare, which established, conducted and fostered covert, subversive and partisan operations in occupied territories with notable success; and also the Commandos which established the pattern for most of the world's current Special Forces.
A YEAR ENDING IN 11: General William Henry Harrison defeats the Shawnee Indians at the battle of Tippecanoe
1811
He originally gained national fame for leading U.S. forces against American Indians at the Battle of Tippecanoe in 1811, where he earned the nickname "Tippecanoe" (or "Old Tippecanoe").
3
President Jefferson, the primary author of the Northwest Ordinance, had made a secret compact with James Lemen to defeat the proslavery movement led by Harrison.
In 1817, Harrison declined to serve as Secretary of War under President Monroe.
Harrison wrote in a letter dated March 10, "I am so much harassed by the multitude that call upon me that I can give no proper attention to any business of my own."http://www.shapell.org/manuscript.aspx?175070 Letter from Harrison to R. Buchanan, Esq.
HIS PRO TEAM RIGHT BEFORE...: ...before Wayne Gretzky played for the L.A. Kings (they're up north)
Edmonton Oilers
In 1978, he signed with the Indianapolis Racers of the World Hockey Association (WHA), where he briefly played before being traded to the Edmonton Oilers.
3
In place of the lyrics "O Canada, we stand on guard for thee", Bryan Adams ad-libbed, "We're going to miss you, Wayne Gretzky".
Major coaching influences
During Gretzky's coaching tenure, the Coyotes did not reach the postseason, and their best finish in the Western Conference standings was 12th.
THIS IS YOUR LIFE, WOODROW WILSON: No hard feelings, though this Socialist was only released from prison by your successor; welcome....
Eugene V. Debs
Wilson was able to win by picking up many votes that had gone to Teddy Roosevelt or Eugene V. Debs in 1912.William M. Leary, Jr. "Woodrow Wilson, Irish Americans, and the Election of 1916", The Journal of American History, Vol.
3
Heckscher, pp.
Heckscher, p. 397. "Colonel" House played an important role in the campaign. "
House also became the U.S. representative on the Allies' Supreme War Council.
PHOTOGRAPHY: William Henry Jackson's photographs of Wyoming in the 1870s helped establish this national park
Yellowstone
They are the North Platte, Wind, Big Horn and the Yellowstone rivers.
3
Furthermore, copper was mined in some areas between the Sierra Madre Mountains and the Snowy Range near Grand Encampment.
Sparsely populated, Wyoming is the least populous state of the United States.
Specifically, the numbers are representative of the property values of the counties in 1930.http://www.tetonat.com/2010/07/08/interesting-wyoming-license-plate-fact/
VICE PRESIDENT... THE SITCOM!: In tonight's episode, "Take This Job & Shove It", he quits as a power line worker to attend the Univ. of Wyoming
Cheney
Former Vice President Dick Cheney is a Wyoming resident and represented the state in Congress from 1979 to 1989.
3
thumb|left|300|Wyoming terrain The Teton Range in the northwest extends for , part of which is included in Grand Teton National Park.
16(−9) 21(−6) 28(−2) 37(3) 46(8) 54(12) 51(11) 41(5) 32(0) 21(−6) 14(−10) 31(-1) Average rainfallinches (mm) 0.6(15.2) 0.6(15.2) 1.0(25.4) 1.6(40.6) 2.1(53.3) 1.5(38.1) 1.3(33.0) 0.7(17.8) 0.9(22.9)
Demographics  Population thumb|300px|Wyoming Population Density Map.
EXPLORERS OF THE NEW WORLD: In 1596 Sir Walter Raleigh wrote the Book "Discoverie of Guiana", Guiana being the area between the Amazon & this river
the Orinoco
Raleigh himself never visited North America, although he led expeditions in 1595 and 1617 to the Orinoco River basin in South America in search of the golden city of El Dorado.
3
At his trial in 1603, he stated he had never studied law.
Both in 1585 and 1586, he sat in parliament as member for Devonshire.
On Raleigh's return to England, an outraged Count Gondomar, the Spanish ambassador, demanded that Raleigh's death sentence be reinstated by King James, who had little choice but to do so.
CROSBY, STILLS, NASH & YOUNG: "Woodstock", the group's first hit together, was written by this onetime gal pal of Graham Nash
Joni Mitchell
The event was captured in the Academy Award winning 1970 documentary movie Woodstock, an accompanying soundtrack album, and Joni Mitchell's song "Woodstock", which commemorated the event and became a major hit for Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young.
3
I said no because at Woodstock we'd have just been another band on the bill."
The Museum contains film and interactive displays, text panels, and artifacts that explore the unique experience of the Woodstock festival, its significance as the culminating event of a decade of radical cultural transformation, and the legacy of the Sixties and Woodstock today.
Also in 2009, Michael Lang and Holly George-Warren published The Road to Woodstock, which describes Lang's involvement in the creation of the Woodstock Music & Arts Festival, and includes personal stories and quotes from central figures involved in the event.
WILLIAM WORDSWORTH: Wordsworth attended St. John's College at this university but was only a mediocre student
Cambridge
They had three other siblings: Richard, the eldest, who became a lawyer; John, born after Dorothy, who went to sea and died in 1805 when the ship of which he was captain, the Earl of Abergavenny, was wrecked off the south coast of England; and Christopher, the youngest, who entered the Church and rose to be Master of Trinity College, Cambridge.
3
He received his BA degree in 1791.
Stephen Gill, William Wordsworth: A Life, Oxford University Press, 1989, pp. 132-133.
On 4 October, following his visit with Dorothy to France to arrange matters with Annette, Wordsworth married his childhood friend Mary Hutchinson.
WITCHCRAFT: Also called transvection, a witch may do it with the aid of a broomstick
Fly
In 820 the Bishop of Lyon and others repudiated the belief that witches could make bad weather, fly in the night, and change their shape.
3
Traditional witchcraft
Harper Collins.
Judika Illes, The Element Encyclopedia of 5,000 Spells: The Ultimate Reference Book for the Magical Arts (Element: London, 2004), page 797.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: This Croat capital was formerly Yugoslavia's second largest city
Zagreb
Name  Capital  Flag  Coat of Arms LocationSocialist Republic of Bosnia and HerzegovinaSarajevo70px|border40px Socialist Republic of CroatiaZagreb70px|border<center>40px<center>Socialist Republic of MacedoniaSkopje70px|border40pxSocialist Republic of MontenegroTitograd, now Podgorica70px|border40pxSocialist Republic of Serbia    Belgrade  Priština  Novi Sad70px|border40pxSocialist Republic of SloveniaLjubljana70px|border40px  Tito's regional goal was to expand south and take control of Albania and parts of Greece.
3
Connections between religious belief and nationality posed a serious threat to the post-war Communist government's policies on national unity and state structure.
The Serbian delegation, led by Milošević, insisted on a policy of "one person, one vote", which would empower the plurality population, the Serbs.
Succession, 2006–present In June 2006, Montenegro became an independent nation after the results of a May 2006 referendum, therefore rendering Serbia and Montenegro no longer existent.
I MARRIED A BEATLE: Yoko Ono
John Lennon
She is the widow and second wife of singer-songwriter John Lennon.
2
She also received minor airplay with the ballad "Mrs. Lennon".
Her circle of friends in the New York art world has included Kate Millett, Nam June Paik, Dan Richter, Jonas Mekas, Merce Cunningham, Judith Malina, Erica Abeel, Fred DeAsis, Peggy Guggenheim, Betty Rollin, Shusaku Arakawa, Adrian Morris, Stefan Wolpe, Keith Haring, and Andy Warhol (she was one of the speakers at Warhol's 1987 funeral), as well as George Maciunas and La Monte Young.
HISTORY: In 1964 Moise Tshombe, who led the Katanga secession, became premier of this country, now Zaire
the Congo
Zaire , officially the Republic of Zaire (; ) was the name, between 1971 and 1997, of a Central African state, now known as the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
3
The president was to appoint and dismiss cabinet members and determine their areas of responsibility.
In 1977 and 1978, Katangan rebels based in Angola launched two invasions—Shaba I and Shaba II—into the Katanga Province (renamed "Shaba" in 1972).
The AFDL, now seeking the broader goal of ousting Mobutu, made significant military gains in early 1997, and by the middle of 1997 had almost completely overrun the country.
ORGANIZATIONS: In 1957 Tom Hayden went off to college in Ann Arbor, where he would co-found this 1960s student organization
Students for a Democratic Society
Students for a Democratic Society (SDS) became the organizational focus of the New Left and was the prime mover behind the opposition to the War in Vietnam.
3
The symbolic birth of the gay rights movement would not come until the decade had almost come to a close.
The Seekers were the first Australian Group to have a number one with "Georgy Girl" in 1966.
The Band released the roots rock album Music from Big Pink in 1968.
ALL MY CHILDREN: Tabitha was Samantha & Darrin's daughter on this 1960s TV show
Bewitched
Television  The most prominent American TV series of the 1960s include: The Ed Sullivan Show, Star Trek, Peyton Place, The Twilight Zone, The Outer Limits, The Andy Williams Show, The Dean Martin Show, The Wonderful World of Disney, Alfred Hitchcock Presents, The Beverly Hillbillies, Bonanza, Batman, McHale's Navy, Laugh-In, The Dick Van Dyke Show, The Fugitive, The Tonight Show, Gunsmoke, The Andy Griffith Show, Gilligan's Island, Mission: Impossible, The Flintstones, The Adventures of Ozzie and Harriet, Lassie, The Danny Thomas Show, The Lucy Show, My Three Sons, The Red Skelton Show, Bewitched and I Dream of Jeannie.
3
In 1960, the Canadian Bill of Rights becomes law, and suffrage, and the right for any Canadian citizen to vote, was finally adopted by John Diefenbaker's Progressive Conservative government.
See also   1960s decor  The Sixties Unplugged (book)  Timelines The following articles contain brief timelines which list the most prominent events of the decade:  1960 • 1961 • 1962 • 1963 • 1964 • 1965 • 1966 • 1967 • 1968 • 1969 • Timeline of 1960s counterculture  References  Further reading  Anastakis, Dimitry, ed.
West Germany and the Global Sixties (2013)  Farber, David, ed.
BOASTING: In his 1964 State of the Union he said, responding to Khrushchev's boast, "We do not intend to be buried"
Lyndon Johnson
In his first State of the Union Address, U.S. President Lyndon Johnson declares a "War on Poverty".
3
March 13 –
The new prime minister is Harold Wilson.
November 10 –
GEORGE W. - THE GUBERNATORIAL YEARS: In '97 Bush got one of these worth $1 billion; in 2001 he asked for one worth more than $1 trillion
Tax cut
George W. Bush signs the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, the first tax cut of a series now known as the Bush tax cuts.
3
The Versailles wedding hall disaster kills 23 in Jerusalem, Israel.
The 8.4 Mw southern Peru earthquake kills 75 and injures more than 2,600.
December  December 2   Enron files for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection 5 days after Dynegy cancels a US$8.4 billion buyout bid (to that point, the largest bankruptcy in U.S. history).
WEALTHY: One of Forbes' 50 Wealthiest Americans, this engineering partner of David Packard died in 2001
Hewlett
Ray Walston, American actor (b. 1914)  January 12  William Redington Hewlett, American businessman (b. 1913)  Adhemar da Silva, Brazilian athlete (b. 1927)  January 16   Virginia O'Brien, American actress (b. 1919)  Laurent-Désiré Kabila, president of the Democratic Republic of the Congo (b. 1939)  January 27 – Marie José of Belgium, last Queen of Italy (b. 1906)  January 30 –
3
The U.S. Federal Trade Commission approves the merger of America Online and Time Warner to form AOL Time Warner.
February 18 – FBI agent Robert Hanssen is arrested and charged with spying for Russia for 25 years.
September 18 –
PEOPLE: In 1999 basketball mourned the loss of this legendary Laker nicknamed "The Big Dipper"
Wilt Chamberlain
Ivan Goff, Australian screenwriter (b. 1910)  September 25 - Marion Zimmer Bradley, American writer (b. 1930)  October thumb|150px|Wilt Chamberlain thumb|150px|Julius Nyerere  October 3 –
3
October 31  EgyptAir Flight 990, travelling from New York City to Cairo, crashes off the coast of Nantucket, Massachusetts, killing all 217 on board.
The year within Fight Club is said to be 1999, just before the beginning of the Millennium.
Omniverse is set in 1999.
1990s POP/ROCK: In 1992 it was hardly the "End Of The Road" for this group, whose hit spent 13 weeks at No. 1
Boyz II Men
Popular American contemporary R&B artists included Michael Bolton, Kenny G, Celine Dion, Mariah Carey, D’Angelo, Lauryn Hill, Whitney Houston, Sade, En Vogue, TLC, Destiny's Child, Toni Braxton, Boyz II Men, Dru Hill, Gloria Estefan, Vanessa L. Williams and LeAnn Rimes.
3
The Dixie Chicks became one of the most popular country bands in the 1990s and early 2000s.
The series was intended as the comeback vehicle of Della Reese, and also launched the career of Roma Downey.
The "War" ended in 2001 when WWE bought WCW. In November 2001, there was a Winner
1990s FASHION: "I'd Rather Go Naked Than Wear" this was the slogan of a high-profile campaign by PETA
Fur
Relations with the United States deteriorated sharply, and the Chinese leadership was further embarrassed by the disintegration of communism in Europe.
3
The perpetrators have never been identified.
Russian financial crisis in the 1990s results in mass hyperinflation and prompts economic intervention from the International Monetary Fund and western countries to help Russia's economy recover.
Lexus would go on to outsell Mercedes-Benz and BMW in the United States by 1991, and would outsell Cadillac and Lincoln by the end of the decade.
1980S TELEVISION: Sugarbaker's, an Atlanta interior decorating firm, is the setting for this CBS sitcom
Designing Women
, Family Matters, Charles in Charge, The Hogan Family, Perfect Strangers, Designing Women, Amen, Head of the Class, Murphy Brown, The Wonder Years, Empty Nest, Coach, Doogie Howser M.D., Quantum Leap, Saved by the Bell, Roseanne, Full House, The Golden Girls,Three's Company, Cheers, Growing Pains, Benson, Soap, Family Ties, Seinfeld, The Simpsons, the World Wrestling Federation (WWF), Married... with Children,"Dragon Ball", and Moonlighting.
3
General Motors began suffering significant losses in the late-1980s, partially the result of chairman Roger Smith's restructuring attempts, and partially because of increasingly dated cars.
Society The 1980s was also an era of tremendous population growth around the world, surpassing even the 1970s and 1990s, thus arguably being the largest in human history.
The primary gaming computers of the 1980s emerged in 1982: the Commodore 64 and ZX Spectrum.
1952: In October the British deployed troops to stamp out a rebellion of this secret society in Kenya
the Mau Mau
October 20 – Martial law is declared in Kenya due to the Mau Mau uprising.
3
March 12 – Hugh Herbert, American actor and comedian (b. 1887)  March 22  Uncle Dave Macon, American musician (b. 1870)  Don Stephen Senanayake, Ceylonese (Sri Lankan) Prime Minister (b. 1884)  March 26 – J.P. McGowan, Australian actor and director (b. 1880)  March 28 –
Maria Montessori, Italian educator (b. 1870)  May 8 – William Fox, Austro-Hungarian-born film producer (b. 1879)  May 9 –
Elmo Lincoln, American actor (b. 1889)  July thumb|180px|Eva Perón  July 4 – Walter Long, American character actor (b. 1879)  July 5 – Alison Skipworth, English actress (b. 1863)  July 10 – Rued Langgaard, Danish composer and organist (b. 1893)   July 21 - Pedro Lascuráin, 34th President of Mexico  July 26 –
COCA-COLA: In a 1940s hit the Andrews Sisters were drinking this with their Coca-Cola
Rum
New York: New York University Press, 1990  The German Instrument of Surrender signed (May 7–8, 1945).
3
The Stranger by Albert Camus in 1942.
Gene Tierney  Spencer Tracy  Lana Turner  Robert Walker  John Wayne  Orson Welles  Richard Widmark  Cornel Wilde  Jane Wyman  Loretta Young  Vera Lynn  Fred MacMurray  Fredric March  Musicians   Marian Anderson  Louis Armstrong  Eddy Arnold
Among the many baseball players (including well known stars) who served during World War II were Moe Berg, Joe DiMaggio, Bob Feller, Hank Greenberg, Stan Musial (in 1945), Warren Spahn, and Ted Williams.
THE CIA: The CIA & this watchdog "council" were established by the same act of Congress in 1947
National Security Council
U.S. President Harry S. Truman signs the National Security Act of 1947 into law, creating the Central Intelligence Agency, the Department of Defense, the Joint Chiefs of Staff, and the National Security Council.
3
February 6 – South Pacific Commission (SPC) founded.
The Beetle was shipped from Bremerhaven, arriving in New York this day.
October 30 –
EARLY AMERICA: In 1626 this Dutchman arrived in New York Harbor aboard the ship Sea-Mew & settled on Manhattan
Peter Minuit
thumb|May 24: Peter Minuit.
3
September 30 – Nurhaci, chieftain of the Jurchens and founder of the Qing Dynasty dies and is succeeded by his son Hong Taiji.
November 18 –
July 13 – Robert Sidney, 1st Earl of Leicester, English statesman (b. 1563)  September 21 – François de Bonne, duc de Lesdiguières, Constable of France (b. 1543)  September 25 – Lancelot Andrewes, English scholar (b. 1555)  September 26 – Wakisaka Yasuharu, Japanese warrior (b. 1554)  September 30 – Nurhaci, Chinese chieftain (b. 1559)  October 2 – Diego Sarmiento de Acuña, conde de Gondomar, Spanish diplomat (b. 1567)  October 30 – Willebrord Snell, Dutch astronomer and mathematician (b. 1580)
COMPOSERS: A 1791 Handel music festival inspired him to compose the oratorio "The Creation"
Haydn
Composer Joseph Haydn is awarded an honorary doctorate of music at the University of Oxford.
3
The Legislative Assembly (France) convenes.
The first issue of The Observer, the world's first Sunday newspaper, is published in London.
Johann Salomo Semler, German historian and Bible commentator (b. 1725)
"G"EOGRAPHY: King Constantine of this Balkan country was forced from his throne in 1917 & again in 1922
Greece
King Constantine I of Greece abdicates for the first time, being succeeded by his son Alexander.
3
April 9–12 – WWI: Canadian troops win the Battle of Vimy Ridge.
April 12 (N.S.) (March 30 O.S.) –
October 19  Dallas Love Field airport is opened.
1917: Impeached as governor of this big state in 1917, James Ferguson later got his wife to run & she won
Texas
The Silent Parade is organized by the NAACP in New York City to protest the East St. Louis riot of July 2, as well as lynchings in Tennessee and Texas.
3
WWI:
Traditional beginning date of the October Revolution and Russian Civil War.
November 22 –
STUPID ANSWERS: Completes the title of the 1993 Roddy Doyle book "Paddy Clarke Ha Ha..."
Ha
British ITV companies GMTV, Carlton Television, Meridian Broadcasting and Westcountry Television start broadcasting, replacing TV-am, Thames Television, TVS and TSW respectively.
1
The 14th century Kapellbrücke covered wooden truss bridge in Lucerne (Switzerland) is largely destroyed by fire.
THE MOVIES: Tommy Lee Jones & Anne Heche no doubt had a blast making this film that erupted on the screen in 1997
Volcano
June 25  A massive eruption of the Soufrière Hills volcano on the island of Montserrat leads to evacuation and eventual abandonment of the capital, Plymouth.
3
Two trains crash at Hunan, China; 126 are killed.
The second-deadliest tornado of the 1990s hits in Jarrell, Texas, killing 27 people.
Hugo Banzer wins the Presidential elections in Bolivia.
1997: James Fenimore Cooper would like this spacecraft that became the first to land on Mars in over 20 years
Pathfinder
July 4 – NASA's Pathfinder space probe lands on the surface of Mars.
3
January 27 –
May 15 –
Meilutytė thumb|right|150px|Martina Stoessel  March 2   Babar Iqbal, Pakistani computer programmer  Becky G, American singer  March 3  Infanta Maria Francisca of Portugal  Ty Walker, American snowboarder  March 6 –
THE 20th CENTURY: In 1997 Bobbi McCaughey two-upped Mrs. Dionne by giving birth to these
septuplets
In Des Moines, Iowa, Bobbi McCaughey gives birth to septuplets in the second known case where all 7 babies are born alive, and the first in which all survive infancy.
3
May 10 –
In the U.S., the Dow Jones Industrial Average gains a record 337.17 points (+4.71%), closing at 7,498.32.
March 19 – Willem de Kooning, Dutch artist (b. 1904)  March 20 – Tony Zale, American boxer (b. 1913)  March 21   Wilbert Awdry, British children's writer (b. 1911)  John Nemechek, NASCAR driver (b. 1970)  March 31 – Friedrich Hund, American physics (b. 1896)   April  thumb|120px|Allen Ginsberg  April 1 – Jolie Gabor, Hungarian socialite (b. 1896)  April 4 – Leo Picard, Israeli geologist and an expert in the field of hydrology (b. 1900)  April 5   Allen Ginsberg, American poet (b. 1926)  Ignazio Buttitta, Sicilian dialectal poet (b. 1899)  April 8 – Laura Nyro, American singer and composer (b. 1947)  April 7  Witto Aloma, Cuban baseball player (b. 1923)  Georgy Shonin, Russian cosmonaut (b. 1935)  April 12 –
THE 1950s: Books in 1951 included "The Caine Mutiny", "From Here to Eternity", and this Salinger classic
The Catcher in the Rye
August 12 – J. D. Salinger's coming-of-age story The Catcher in the Rye is first published in the United States.
3
May 15 –
November 22 – Paramount Pictures releases George Pal science fiction film When Worlds Collide in the United States.
Max Theiler  Literature –
PUT OUT THE CHINA: Abbreviated P.R.O.C., this nation was founded by Mao & friends in 1949
People's Republic of China
September 29  The First Plenary Session of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference approves a design for the Flag of the People's Republic of China.
3
March 2 –
First trial of Alger Hiss for perjury begins in New York with Whittaker Chambers as principal witness for the prosecution, but would end in a jury deadlock (8 for, 4 against)  June  June 2 –
Ghulam Nabi Azad, Indian politician  March 9 –
IT'S ALWAYS ABOUT "U": In 1949 Harry Truman traveled to New York to help lay a cornerstone for this body
the United Nations
May 9 – Rainier III of Monaco becomes Prince of Monaco, upon the death of his maternal grandfather Louis II.  May 11  Israel is admitted to the United Nations as its 59th member.
3
The News Review reveals that neither the English public school Selhurst College nor its headmaster H. Rochester Sneath exist, but are a hoax created by Humphry Berkeley.
Israel and Syria sign a truce to end their 19-month war.
Lead
PLAYS: 1949 Pulitzer Prize play in which the title character commits suicide for the insurance money
Death of a Salesman
Death of a Salesman opens in the Morosco Theatre and runs for 742 performances.
3
Fernand Braudel's La Méditerranée et le Monde Méditerranéen à l'Epoque de Philippe II is published.
Ronnie Mund, American television personality  October 8   Jerry Bittle, American cartoonist (d. 2003)  Sigourney Weaver, American actress  October 12  Carlos the Jackal, Venezuelan-born international terrorist   Stan Hansen, American professional wrestler  October 14  Katy Manning, English actress  Katha Pollitt, American writer  October 17 –
William Francis Giauque  Medicine –
THE BFI'S TOP 100 BRITISH FILMS: 7 David Lean-directed films made the list, including this 1957 P.O.W. movie that won 7 Oscars
The Bridge on the River Kwai
October 2 – David Lean's film The Bridge on the River Kwai opens in the U.K.
3
Dr. Seuss' The Cat in the Hat is published in the United States.
Herbert Wetterauer, German artist and author  April 22 – Donald Tusk, Prime Minister of Poland  April 23  Jan Hooks, American actress and comedian (d. 2014)  Kenji Kawai, Japanese composer  Patrik Ouředník, Czech writer  April 25 – Eric Bristow, English darts player  April 27 – Michel Barrette, Canadian actor and stand-up comedian  April 28 – Dinorah de Jesús Rodriguez, Cuban-born experimental filmmaker  April 29 – Daniel Day-Lewis, English-born actor  May  May 2 – Michael Coyle, American composer  May 3  William Clay Ford, Jr., American automobile executive  Jo Brand, English comedian  May 5 –
Walter Moers, German comic artist and writer  May 24 – John Rowland, U.S. Republican politician, Governor of Connecticut  May 26 –
INVENTORS: In 1926 he launched the world's first liquid fuel rocket
Robert Goddard
March 16 – Robert Goddard launched the first liquid-fuel rocket, at Auburn, Massachusetts.
3
Fonck survived but two of his men are killed.
Konstantin Feoktistov, Soviet cosmonaut (d. 2009)  February 8 –
Fred Gwynne, American actor and author (d. 1993)  July 14 –
THE 1990S: In 1996 Tomiichi Murayama, this country's first Socialist premier since 1948, resigned
Japan
1948 Fukui earthquake strikes Fukui, Japan.
3
January 22 –
The Fresh Kills Landfill, the world's largest, opens on Staten Island, New York.
Billy Crystal, American actor and comedian  March 15 – Sérgio Vieira de Mello, Brazilian diplomat (d. 2003)  March 17 –
THE "NEW" WORLD: Gandhi was on his way to a prayer meeting in this city when he was assassinated in 1948
New Delhi
January 30  Assassination of Mahatma Gandhi: Indian pacifist and leader Mahatma Gandhi is shot by Nathuram Godse in New Delhi.
3
February 16 – Miranda, the innermost moon of Uranus, is discovered by Gerard Kuiper.
Michael Karoli, German musician (d. 2001)  May thumb|120px|Steven W. Mosher thumb|120px|Grace Jones thumb|120px|Klaus Meine thumb|120px|Svetlana Alexievich  May 2 –
William C. Lee, American general (b. 1895)  June 26 –
QUICK BIOS: Born in Porbandar in 1869; fasted, iconoclasted; died in New Delhi, 1948
Mahatma Gandhi
January 7 – Kentucky Air National Guard pilot Thomas Mantell crashes while in pursuit of a supposed UFO.  January 12 – Mahatma Gandhi begins his fast-unto-death in Delhi to stop communal violence during the Partition of India.
3
LP record – Columbia Records introduced its long playing 33 1/3 rpm phonograph format.
June 21 –
June 8- Jürgen von der Lippe, German television presenter, actor and comedian  June 9   Gudrun Schyman, Swedish politician  Gary Thorne, American play-by-play announcer  June 11 – Dave Cash, American baseball player  June 13 –
NATIONAL ANTHEMS: "Hatikvah", meaning "hope", was adopted as this country's national anthem in 1948
Israel
thumb|right|115px|Israeli Declaration of Independence, 1948  May 14 –
3
April 30 – Organization of American States (OAS) founded.
Mikhail Baryshnikov, Russian-born dancer  January 28 –
Billy Crystal, American actor and comedian  March 15 – Sérgio Vieira de Mello, Brazilian diplomat (d. 2003)  March 17 –
TRAGEDIES: Though nearby, the Californian never heard this liner's distress call in 1912; its radio operator was off duty
Titanic
– Sinking of the RMS Titanic:  strikes an iceberg in the northern Atlantic Ocean and sinks with the loss of 1517 lives.
3
New Jersey Governor Woodrow Wilson wins U.S. presidential election  November 5 – Governor of New Jersey Woodrow Wilson wins U.S. presidential election  November 11 –
Members of the Scott Expedition to the South Pole:  Henry Robertson Bowers, Scottish naval officer (b. 1883)  Edgar Evans, Welsh naval officer (b. 1876)  Robert Falcon Scott, English explorer (b. 1868)  Edward Adrian Wilson, English physician and naturalist (b. 1872)  Laurence Oates, English explorer (b. 1880) thumb|right|110px|Karl May  March 30 –
Mary Frances Allitsen, composer   October–December   October 6 –
THE U.S. CENSUS: The Census Bureau became an agency of this Cabinet department in 1913 after it was split with labor
the Department of Commerce
The Census Bureau, U.S. Bureau of Fisheries and U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey form part of the Department of Commerce.
3
Radio Lab, Show 202: "Musical Language", New York: WNYC (21 April 2006).
Felix Draeseke, German composer (b. 1835)  March 10 – Harriet Tubman, African-American abolitionist, humanitarian and spy (b. c. 1822)  March 11 – John Shaw
Alfred Werner  Medicine –
TURN OF THE CENTURY FILMS: On August 28, 1899 a film of this president reviewing troops was shot in Pittsburgh; he was shot in 1901
William McKinley
March 4 – President of the United States William McKinley begins his second term.
3
February 26  Chi-hsui and Hsu-cheng-yu, Boxer Rebellion leaders, executed in Peking.
August 5 – Peter O'Connor sets the first International Association of Athletics Federations recognised long jump world record of 24 ft 11¾ins.
Chen Yi, Chinese military commander and politician (died 1972)
PASSIVE-AGGRESSIVE HISTORY: In 1944 this "Desert Fox" was implicated in a plot to kill Hitler; actually, that's just aggressive-aggressive
Rommel
WWII: German Field Marshal Erwin Rommel commits suicide rather than face execution for allegedly conspiring against Adolf Hitler.
3
February 22 – United States Strategic Air Forces in Europe organized from the Eighth Air Force's strategic planning staff; subsuming strategic planning for all US Army Air Forces in Europe and Africa.
March 1 – WWII:
July 9 –
CRASHING THE PARTY: In 1945 this political party crashed in a big way, getting banned in Germany
the Nazis
WWII:  Soviet forces capture Budapest, Hungary, from the Nazis.
3
Death of Adolf Hitler: Adolf Hitler and his wife of one day, Eva Braun, commit suicide as the Red Army approaches the Führerbunker in Berlin.
At 19:00 hrs in Washington, D.C. (23:00 GMT), U.S. President Harry S. Truman announces the Japanese surrender.
The Japanese Army formally surrenders to the British in Singapore.
MILITARY MEN: Commander of the Pacific Fleet, this American signed the Japanese surrender in 1945
Nimitz
The final official Japanese Instrument of Surrender is accepted by the Supreme Allied Commander, General Douglas MacArthur, and Fleet Admiral Chester W. Nimitz for the United States, and delegates from Australia, New Zealand, the United Kingdom, The Netherlands, China, and others from a Japanese delegation led by Mamoru Shigemitsu, on board the American battleship USS Missouri in Tokyo Bay.
3
Events  Below, events of World War II have the "WWII" prefix.
Italian General Rodolfo Graziani orders the Esercito Nazionale Repubblicano forces under his command to lay down their arms.
August 11–25 – Soviet troops complete occupation of Sakhalin.
LEADERS OF WORLD WAR II: He was German propaganda minister from 1933 to 1945
Joseph Goebbels
Karl Dönitz succeeds Hitler as President of Germany (Reichspräsident) and Joseph Goebbels succeeds as Chancellor of Germany (Reichskanzler), in accordance with Hitler's political testament of the previous day.
3
This ends the August Revolution.
Princess Michael of Kent, German-born member of the British Royal Family  January 20 – Robert Olen Butler, American writer  January 25 –
Auguste van Pels, German-Jewish housemate of Anne Frank (b. 1900) (exact date unknown)
SURVIVORS: In 1943 the 11 survivors of the sunken PT Boat 109 were led to rescue & safety by this future U.S. president
John F. Kennedy
August 2 – WWII: John F. Kennedy's Motor Torpedo Boat PT-109 is rammed by a destroyer.
3
Duke Ellington plays at New York City's Carnegie Hall for the first time.
July thumb|right|The U.S. Liberty ship SS Robert Rowan explodes during the Allied invasion of Sicily, July 11, 1943.
WWII: A Japanese submarine sinks the surfaced U.S. submarine  near Chuuk Lagoon (Truk).
FAMOUS FIRSTS: This womens' two-piece swimsuit made its first appearance at a Paris fashion show in 1946
Bikini
July   July 1 – Nuclear testing: Operation Crossroads, a series of nuclear weapon tests conducted by the United States at Bikini Atoll in Micronesia, is initiated by detonation of Able at an altitude of 520 feet (158 m).thumb|150px|right| July 25: Undersea Atomic Test Baker  July 4  Ankara University is founded in Turkey.
3
The Allies recognize the Austrian republic with 1937 borders, and divide the country into four occupation zones.
February 28 –
March   March 2  British troops withdraw from Iran according to treaty; the Soviets do not.
NOTABLE NAMES: In 1946 the late Mother Cabrini became the first U.S. citizen to be designated this
Saint
D'Argenlieu, French High Commissioner for Indo-China recognizes an autonomous "Republic of Cochin-China" in violation of the March 6 Ho–Sainteny agreement, opening the way for conflict between the Viet Minh and France.
3
The Gold Coast has an African majority in its parliament.
The Basketball Association of America is formed in New York City.
Xanana Gusmão, first President of East Timor  June 22   Kay Redfield Jamison, American psychiatrist  Józef Oleksy, 7th Prime Minister of Poland (d. 2015)  June 23 – Ted Shackelford, American actor  June 24  Ellison Onizuka, American astronaut (d. 1986)  Robert Reich, 22nd United States Secretary of Labor  June 26 – Maria von Welser, German TV journalist and President of UNICEF Germany  June 28 –
THE GREAT WAR: The British & this ally took the German colony of Tsingtao in 1914; in 1941, the teams would be different
Japan
WWII:  Joseph Grew, the U.S. ambassador to Japan, reports to Washington a rumor overheard at a diplomatic reception concerning a planned surprise attack on Pearl Harbor, Hawaii.
3
Thailand Prime Minister Plaek Phibunsongkhram decrees January 1 as the official start of the Thai solar calendar new year (thus the previous year that began April 1 had only 9 months).
WWII:
The Wehrmacht is subsequently pushed back over 200 miles.
BROADWAY: IT'S A CRIME!: The sexiest murderesses on Broadway have been strutting their stuff in this musical revival since 1996
Chicago
August 16   Brookfield Zoo, Chicago.
3
June 10 – Peace talks begin in Northern Ireland without Sinn Féin.
The loi Carrez, or Carrez law governing property transactions, is enacted in FranceLoi n°96-1107 du 18 décembre 1996   December 20 –
Scott Brayton, American race car driver (b. 1959)  May 19 –
HIGH SCHOOL MUSICALS: This 1980 film was set at the N.Y. High School for Performing Arts; a TV show, reality show & musical followed
Fame
June   June 1 – Rube Marquard, American baseball player (New York Giants) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1886)  June 7  Henry Miller, American writer (b. 1891)  Elizabeth Craig, British chef and writer (b. 1883)  Philip Guston, American painter (b. 1912)  June 8 –
3
May 7 – Paul Geidel, convicted of second-degree murder in 1911, is released from prison in Beacon, New York, after 68 years and 245 days (the longest-ever time served by an inmate).
It causes over $250m in damage, and 1 person is killed.
A then-record number of viewers (for an entertainment program) tune into the U.S. soap opera Dallas to learn who shot lead character J. R. Ewing.
HIRSCHFELD: Al Hirschfeld depicted this director with one of the stars of his 1963 film
Alfred Hitchcock
Director Alfred Hitchcock's film The Birds is released in the United States.
3
March 31 –
October   October 1  October 2 John F. Kennedy Toasts of the President and Emperor Haile Selassie at a Luncheon in Rockville, Maryland.
December 12 – Kenya gains independence from the United Kingdom, with Jomo Kenyatta as prime minister.
1907: More than 40 nations attended the second "International Peace Conference" of this Dutch city
The Hague
The Second Hague Peace Conference opens at The Hague.
3
March   March  The 1907 Romanian Peasants' Revolt results in possibly as many as 11,000 deaths.
March 15–March 16 – Elections to the new Parliament of Finland are the first in the world with woman candidates, as well as the first elections in Europe where universal suffrage is applied.
Pierre Pflimlin, French politician (d. 2000)  February 9 – Trường Chinh, President of Vietnam (d. 1988)  February 12 –
NOTABLE NASHES: This poet with a wry sense of humor was born in Rye, New York in 1902
Ogden Nash
Georgette Heyer, British writer (d. 1974)  August 18 – Adamson-Eric, Estonian artist (d. 1968)  August 19  Ogden Nash, American poet (d. 1971)  J. B. L. Reyes, Filipino jurist (d. 1994)  August 22 –
3
March–April   March 6 –
May 31 –
Salomon Jadassohn, German composer and pianist (b. 1831)  February 6 – Clémence Royer, French scholar (b. 1830)  February 15 –
ISLANDS: In 1902 St. Pierre on this island was destroyed by an eruption of Mount Pelee
Martinique
In Martinique, Mount Pelée erupts, destroying the town of Saint-Pierre and killing over 30,000.
3
The Rolling Mill Mine disaster in Johnstown, Pennsylvania kills 112 miners.
The first Aswan Dam on the Nile is completed.
Harry Stockwell, American actor and singer (d. 1984)  April 28 –
SCARY PLACES: Some 30,000 people were killed when Mount Pelee on this French island erupted in 1902
Martinique
In Martinique, Mount Pelée erupts, destroying the town of Saint-Pierre and killing over 30,000.
3
March 10 –
Elizabeth Cady Stanton, American activist (b. 1815)  November 4 – Hale Johnson, American politician (b. 1847)  November 17 – Hugh Price Hughes, Welsh social reformer (b. 1847)  November 22  Friedrich Alfred Krupp, German industrialist (b. 1854)  Walter Reed, American army physician (b. 1851)  December 2 –
Richard Belcredi, former Prime minister of the Austrian Empire (b. 1823)  December 3   Robert Lawson, New Zealand architect (b. 1833)
YADA YADA YADA: In a 1974 national TV address he conveyed, "Our long national nightmare is over..." yada yada yada
Ford
August  thumb|150px|38th US President Gerald R. Ford  August 4 –
3
A soccer stampede occurs in Cairo, killing 49.
A bomb explodes in a train between Italy and West Germany, killing 12 and wounding 48.
Georgette Heyer, British writer (b. 1902)  July 6 –
THE VOTES ARE IN: In 1974 voters in this country rejected the monarchy, dashing Constantine II's hope of returning to the throne
Greece
The Greek military junta is replaced by a civilian government in Greece concluding the seven-year military rule.
3
April 5 – Stephen King publishes Carrie, his first novel.
Kitty Gordon, English stage and silent film actress.
Abdul Rahman Hashim, Malaysian Inspector-General of Police (b. 1925)   June 9   Miguel Ángel Asturias, Guatemalan writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1890)  Katharine Cornell, Berlin-born, American stage actress, writer, theatre owner, and producer (b. 1893)  June 10 – Prince Henry, Duke of Gloucester, Governor-General of Australia (b. 1900)  June 11 –
QUOTATIONS: In 1974 he said, "I am acutely aware that you have not elected me as your president"
Gerald Ford
August 9 – Vice President Gerald Ford succeeds Richard Nixon as the 38th President of the United States.
3
A soccer stampede occurs in Cairo, killing 49.
April 4 – Hank Aaron ties Babe Ruth for the all-time home run record with his 714th at Riverfront Stadium in Cincinnati.
Hank Aaron became the all-time MLB home run leader with his 715th at Atlanta in front of a national television audience.
THE OLYMPICS: The 1968 summer games in this capital city were the first telecast in color
Mexico City
October  October 2 – Tlatelolco massacre: A student demonstration ends in bloodbath at La Plaza de las Tres Culturas in Tlatelolco, Mexico City, Mexico, 10 days before the inauguration of the 1968 Summer Olympics.
2
February 27 –
Archie Mayo, American actor and director (b. 1891)  December 5 – Fred Clark, American actor (b. 1914)  December 9 – Enoch L. Johnson, American political boss and racketeer (b. 1883)  December 10  Karl Barth, German Protestant theologian (b. 1888)  Thomas Merton, American author (b. 1915)  December 12 – Tallulah Bankhead, American actress (b. 1902)  December 14 – Margarete Klose, German soprano (b. 1902)  December 15 – Jess Willard, American boxer (b. 1881)  December 15 – Jian Bozan, Chinese historian (b. 1898)  December 18 – Giovanni Messe, Italian general (b. 1883)  December 19 – Norman Thomas, American politician (b. 1884)  December 20 – John Steinbeck, American writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1902)  December 21 – Vittorio Pozzo, Italian football player and manager (b. 1886)  December 26 – Weegee, Ukrainian photographer and photojournalist (b. 1899)  December 30  Trygve Lie, Norwegian United Nations Secretary General (the first) (b. 1896)  Vladimir Peter Tytla, American animator (b. 1904)  December 31 –
BANDS IN MOVIES: In 1968 The Monkees could be found in this film, also a body part
Head
The photo makes headlines around the world, eventually winning the 1969 Pulitzer Prize, and sways U.S. public opinion against the war.
3
March 18 –
Omi Minami, Japanese voice actress  July 15 –
Frankie Lymon, American singer (b. 1942)  February 29 – Tore Ørjasæter, Norwegian poet (b. 1886)  March thumb|150px|Yuri Gagarin  March 6 – Léon Mathot, French actor (b. 1886)  March 10 – Helen Walker, American actress (b. 1920)  March 16  Leon Cadore, American baseball pitcher (b. 1890)  Mario Castelnuovo-Tedesco, Italian composer (b. 1895)  June Collyer, American actress (b. 1906)  March 20  Charles Chaplin Jr., American actor (b. 1925)  Carl Theodor Dreyer, Danish film director (b. 1889)  March 23 –
KIDDY LIT: This letter completes the title of William Steig's classic 1968 book that was all in letters, "CD...."
B
Events  January thumb|125px|right| January 30: Tet begins.
1
The first student protests spark the 1968 Polish political crisis.
THEY CALL ME MISTER...: This minister's show appeared in Canada in a 15-minute format before premiering on PBS in 1968
Mister Rogers
NET televises the very first episode of Mister Rogers' Neighborhood.
3
September 11  The International Association of Classification Societies (IACS) is founded.
Yuri Gagarin, Soviet cosmonaut, first human in space (b. 1934)  March 30 – Bobby Driscoll, American child actor (b. 1937)  April thumb|150px|Martin Luther King Jr.  April 1 – Lev Davidovich Landau, Russian physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1908)  April 4 –
Lars Onsager  Physiology or Medicine –
HODGEPODGE: Nixon beat this Democrat in the 1968 presidential election
Hubert Humphrey
August 22–August 30 – Police clash with anti-war protesters in Chicago, Illinois, outside the 1968 Democratic National Convention, which nominates Hubert Humphrey for U.S. President, and Edmund Muskie for Vice President.
3
British Prime Minister Harold Wilson endorses the I'm Backing Britain campaign for working an additional half hour each day without pay.
October 11  Apollo program: NASA launches Apollo 7, the first manned Apollo mission (Wally Schirra, Donn Eisele, Walter Cunningham).
November 22 The Beatles release their self-titled album popularly known as the White Album.
STRONGMEN: In 1995 this country's Franjo Tudjman signed a peace deal with the leaders of Serbia & Bosnia
Croatia
Croatian forces launch Operation Flash against rebel Serb forces in western Slavonia.
3
February 9 – STS-63: Dr. Bernard A. Harris, Jr. and Michael Foale became the second African American and Briton, respectively, to walk in space.
In Denver, Colorado, Stapleton Airport closes and is replaced by the new Denver International Airport, the largest in the United States.
October 23 –
INTERNATIONAL ORGS.: Known as NAM, it was founded in 1961 by nations that wanted to stand apart from the Eastern & Western blocs
the Non-Aligned Movement
The first meeting is held of the Non-Aligned Movement.
3
June   June 1 – Ethiopia experiences its most devastating earthquake of the 20th century, with a magnitude of 6.7.
Upon splashdown, the hatch prematurely opens, and the capsule sinks (it is recovered in 1999).
September 10 –
WE RULE: As of 1960, her descendants, except princes & princesses, will bear the surname Mountbatten-Windsor
Elizabeth II
Prince Andrew, Duke of York, British prince and second son of Elizabeth II and The Duke of Edinburgh  February 20 Wendee Lee, American voice actress Kee Marcello, Swedish rock guitarist (Easy Action, Europe)
3
July 4 –
The Ivory Coast  becomes independent from France.
Enrique Amorim, Uruguayan novelist (b. 1900)  July 29 –
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: This former British colony, which gained independence in 1960, is the most populous country in Africa
Nigeria
The television animated sitcom, The Flintstones premiers on ABC.  October   October 1 Nigeria becomes independent from United Kingdom, and Nnamdi Azikiwe becomes its first native-born Governor General.
3
The first televised anime, Three Tales, debuts on NHK.  January 19 –
Sputnik program: The Soviet Union launches the satellite Sputnik 5, with the dogs Belka and Strelka (the Russian for "Squirrel" and "Little Arrow"), 40 mice, two rats and a variety of plants.
December 19 – Fire sweeps through the USS Constellation, to become the U.S. Navy's largest aircraft carrier, while she is under construction at the Brooklyn Navy Yard; killing 50 workers and injuring 150.
LANGUAGES: In 1960 its Bombay state was divided into 2 states, Gujarat & Maharashtra, to reflect their languages
India
Twelve Indian soldiers die in clashes with Red Chinese troops along their small common border.
3
May 18  - Real Madrid beats Eintracht Frankfurt 7-3 at Hampden Park, Glasgow and wins the 1959–60 European Cup (football).
The Tibetan community observes this date as Democracy Day.
October 30 – Dr. Michael Woodruff carries out the first successful kidney transplant in the United Kingdom, at the Edinburgh Royal Infirmary.
5 "G"s: In 1992 the Catholic Church admitted it erred in condemning this man 359 years before
Galileo
Pope John Paul II issues an apology, and lifts the edict of the Inquisition against Galileo Galilei.
3
May 12 –
Iraq agrees to allow U.N. weapons inspectors to search the Iraqi Agricultural Ministry building in Baghdad.
August  August 3–4 –
CHAMPIONS: In 1992 he became the first American to win the men's title at Wimbledon since McEnroe in 1984
Andre Agassi
On July 5, Andre Agassi wins the 1992 Wimbledon Championships –
3
Japan apologizes for forcing Korean women into sexual slavery during World War II. January 15 –
February 16 –
November 5  – Odell Beckham Jr., American football player November 6  –
1992: In July this new Israeli prime minister went to Cairo to meet President Mubarak
Yitzhak Rabin
June 23 The Israeli legislative election is won by the Israeli Labor Party under the leadership of Yitzhak Rabin, ousting a Likud government.
3
September 12 STS-47: Dr. Mae Jemison becomes the first African-American woman to travel into space, aboard the Space Shuttle Endeavour.
September 21 – Mexico establishes diplomatic relations with Vatican City, ending a break that lasted over 130 years.
November 15 –
ROCK AROUND THE SOLAR SYSTEM: in 1992 members of Queen held a tribute concert for this late lead singer
Freddie Mercury
The Freddie Mercury Tribute Concert, held at Wembley Stadium, is televised live to over 1 billion people and raises millions of dollars for AIDS research.
3
U.N. peacekeepers withdraw from Sarajevo.
The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson airs its final show on NBC. May 23 –
June 28 Estonia holds a referendum on its constitution, which will come into effect on July 3.
MR. OBAMA GOES TO WASHINGTON: Obama entered this university's law school in 1988 & graduated magna cum laude in '91
Harvard
Allison Harvard, American model  Michael Mancienne, English footballer  January 9  Marc Crosas, Spanish footballer  January 12 Claude Giroux, Canadian ice hockey player Andrew Lawrence, American actor  January 14  Kacey Barnfield, English actress  Hakeem Nicks, American football player  Tom Rosenthal, English actor and comedian  January 15  Jun. K, Korean vocalist (2PM)
3
The Democratic-controlled United States House of Representatives rejects President Ronald Reagan's request for $36.25 million to support the Nicaraguan Contras.
Blanca Suárez, Spanish actress  October 22 – Parineeti Chopra, Bollywood actress.
Mona Washbourne, British actress (b. 1903)  November 17 – Sheilah Graham, English-born gossip columnist (b. 1904)  November 19 – Christina Onassis, American shipping magnate (b. 1950)  November 21 – Carl Hubbell, American baseball player (New York Giants) and member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1903)  November 22 – Luis Barragán, Mexican architect (b. 1902)  November 27 – John Carradine, American actor (b. 1906)  December thumb|150px|Roy Orbison thumb|150px|Nikolaas Tinbergen  December 2 –
WORLD HISTORY: The Montreux Convention of 1936 recognized this country's right to fortify the Dardanelles
Turkey
Regarding the Regime of the Straits is signed in Montreux, allowing Turkey to fortify the Dardanelles and the Bosphorus but guaranteeing free passage to ships of all nations in peacetime.
3
May 12 –
November 26 –
Don Drysdale, American baseball player (d. 1993)  July 24  Ruth Buzzi, American actress and comedian   Mark Goddard, American actor and teacher  July 26 – Mary Millar, British actress (d. 1998)  July 28 – Russ Jackson, Canadian football player  July 29 – Elizabeth Dole, U.S. Senator from North Carolina  July 30  Buddy Guy, American blues guitarist and singer  Ted Rogers, English comedian and game show host (d. 2001)  August thumb|120px|Robert Redford thumb|120px|Wilt Chamberlain thumb|120px|John McCain  August 1  Bradford Bishop, American fugitive  Donald Neilson, British serial killer (d. 2011)  Yves Saint Laurent, Algerian-born French fashion designer (d. 2008)  August 6 – Robert Gnaizda, lawyer and social justice advocate  August 11 – Andre Dubus, American short-story writer (d. 1999)  August 12  André Kolingba, President of Central African Republic (d. 2010)  Tom McAvoy, American baseball player (d. 2011)  August 18 – Robert Redford, American actor  August 21 – Wilt Chamberlain, African-American basketball player (d. 1999)  August 24 – Kenny Guinn, American politician (d. 2010)  August 25 – Giridharilal Kedia, Former Working President of KVK (d. 2009)  August 26 - Benedict Anderson, American academic (d. 2015)  August 29 – John McCain, U.S. Senator from Arizona; 2008 Republican Presidential candidate  September thumb|right|120px|Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali               thumb|right|120px|Jim Henson thumb|right|120px|Silvio Berlusconi   thumb|right|120px|Brian Blessed thumb|right|120px|Václav Havel thumb|120px|Bill Wyman  September 2  Andrew Grove, Hungarian-American businessman, engineer and author  Károly Krajczár, Hungarian Slovene teacher, writer and collector   September 3 –
NEWSPAPERS & MAGAZINES: Originally a social satire magazine, it became a pictorial weekly when bought by Luce in 1936
Life
This is the cover date of the first issue of Life, a weekly news magazine in the United States under the management of Henry Luce.
3
In California, the San Francisco–Oakland Bay Bridge opens to traffic.
Ipswich Town Football Club turns professional.
Albert Fish, American serial killer (b. 1870)  January 18 – Rudyard Kipling, British writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1865)  January 20 –
HISTORIC NEWS PHOTOS: The 1936 photograph of Florence Owens Thompson seen here came to symbolize this national crisis
the Great Depression
thumb|Family during the Great Depression, Oklahoma, 1936  November   November 2  The BBC launches the world's first regular (then) high-definition television service.
3
January 16 – Serial killer Albert Fish is executed in Sing Sing Prison.
November 3 – U.S. presidential election, 1936: Franklin D. Roosevelt is reelected to a second term in a landslide victory over Kansas Governor Alf Landon.
Don Drysdale, American baseball player (d. 1993)  July 24  Ruth Buzzi, American actress and comedian   Mark Goddard, American actor and teacher  July 26 – Mary Millar, British actress (d. 1998)  July 28 – Russ Jackson, Canadian football player  July 29 – Elizabeth Dole, U.S. Senator from North Carolina  July 30  Buddy Guy, American blues guitarist and singer  Ted Rogers, English comedian and game show host (d. 2001)  August thumb|120px|Robert Redford thumb|120px|Wilt Chamberlain thumb|120px|John McCain  August 1  Bradford Bishop, American fugitive  Donald Neilson, British serial killer (d. 2011)  Yves Saint Laurent, Algerian-born French fashion designer (d. 2008)  August 6 – Robert Gnaizda, lawyer and social justice advocate  August 11 – Andre Dubus, American short-story writer (d. 1999)  August 12  André Kolingba, President of Central African Republic (d. 2010)  Tom McAvoy, American baseball player (d. 2011)  August 18 – Robert Redford, American actor  August 21 – Wilt Chamberlain, African-American basketball player (d. 1999)  August 24 – Kenny Guinn, American politician (d. 2010)  August 25 – Giridharilal Kedia, Former Working President of KVK (d. 2009)  August 26 - Benedict Anderson, American academic (d. 2015)  August 29 – John McCain, U.S. Senator from Arizona; 2008 Republican Presidential candidate  September thumb|right|120px|Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali               thumb|right|120px|Jim Henson thumb|right|120px|Silvio Berlusconi   thumb|right|120px|Brian Blessed thumb|right|120px|Václav Havel thumb|120px|Bill Wyman  September 2  Andrew Grove, Hungarian-American businessman, engineer and author  Károly Krajczár, Hungarian Slovene teacher, writer and collector   September 3 –
OF THE CRYSTAL: A 1936 fire in this city destroyed the prefabricated Crystal Palace
London
May 28 - Alan Turing submits his paper "On Computable Numbers" to the London Mathematical Society for publication, introducing the concept of the "Turing machine".
3
February 17 –
Peak of July 1936 heat wave: The U.S. states of Wisconsin, Michigan, and Indiana all set new state records for high temperature.
Generalissimo Chiang Kai-shek of the Republic of China is kidnapped by Marshal Zhang Xueliang.
SO, COME HERE OFTEN?: This "saintly" Swiss resort was the site of the Winter Olympic Games in 1928 & 1948
St. Moritz
The 1928 Winter Olympics are held in St. Moritz, Switzerland, the first as a separate event.
3
July 7 –
Eric Porter, English actor (d. 1995)  April 9 –
Herbert Henry Asquith, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (b. 1852)
50 WAYS TO LEAVE YOUR LOVER: Marry anthropologist Reo Fortune in 1928, lose Fortune in '35, marry anthropologist Gregory Bateson in '36
Margaret Mead
Margaret Mead's influential cultural anthropology text Coming of Age in Samoa is published in the U.S.  The Episcopal Church in the United States of America ratifies a new revision of the Book of Common Prayer.
3
xxv, xxvl).
Italy and Ethiopia sign the Italo-Ethiopian Treaty.
November 18 – Mickey Mouse appears in Steamboat Willie, the third Mickey Mouse cartoon released, but the first sound film and the first such film to be generally distributed.
THANKSGIVING: This department store's beloved Thanksgiving Day parade has been floating through New York City since 1924
Macy's
In New York City the first Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade is held.
3
January 23 –
February 7 - Capital punishment: The first state execution using gas in the United States takes place in Nevada.
Joanne Winter, American female professional baseball pitcher and LPGA player (d. 1996)  November 25 – Takaaki Yoshimoto, Japanese poet, critic, and philosopher (d. 2012)  November 28 – Dennis Brutus, South African poet and anti-Apartheid activist (d. 2009)  November 30   Allan Sherman, American comedy writer, television producer, and song parodist (d. 1973)  Shirley Chisholm, American politician (d. 2005)   December  thumb|120px|Ed Koch  December 2 –
WORLD WAR I: In the 1916 battle of this French fortress city, France had more than half a million casualties
Verdun
January 31 – WWI: An attack is planned on Verdun.
2
At least one shark attacks 5 swimmers along  of New Jersey coastline during the Jersey Shore shark attacks of 1916, resulting in 4 deaths and the survival of one youth who requires limb amputation.
December   December 12 –
"O"PERA: George finds out Lennie has a dead mouse in his pocket in this Carlisle Floyd opera based on a 1937 novel
Of Mice And Men
Of Mice and Men by John Steinbeck is published.
3
January 19 – Howard Hughes establishes a record by flying from Los Angeles to New York City in 7 hours, 28 minutes and 25 seconds.
May 30  Spanish Civil War:
Walter Burley Griffin, American architect and town planner (b. 1876) February 24 – Guy Standing, British actor (b. 1873) February 27 – Charles Donnelly, Irish poet (killed in battle) (b. 1915)  March March 8 – Howie Morenz, Canadian ice hockey player (b. 1902) March 9 –
COLLEGE FOOTBALL HALL OF FAMERS: Steve Spurrier (1966)
Florida
Herbert Marshall, English actor (b. 1890)  January 23   Jo van Ammers-Küller, Dutch writer (b. 1884)  Frank L. Anders, United States Army soldier, received Medal of Honor (b. 1875)  Berton Braley, American poet (b. 1882)  Pat Cannon, American politician,  United States Representative from Florida (b. 1904)  January 24 – Homi J. Bhabha, Indian nuclear physicist, known as "father of the Indian nuclear programme" (b. 1909)  January 25  Saul Adler FRS, Russian-born British-Israeli expert on parasitology (b. 1895)  Edmund Blaurock, German Army general during World War II (b. 1899)  Miguel Bover, Spanish bicycle racer (b. 1928)  January 27   Caterina Albert, Spanish writer (b. 1869)  Major Ronald Armstrong-Jones, British barrister and soldier; father-in-law of Princess Margaret (b. 1899)  Grover Cleveland Bergdoll, American pilot who went to Germany to avoid service in World War I (b. 1893)  Norman Blackburn, English World War I pilot and aviation industrialist (b. 1896)  January 28   Bruno Bianchi, Italian swimmer, competitor in the 1960 and 1964 Olympic Games (b. 1943)  Benjamin Burrows, English composer (b. 1891)   January 29 –
3
Some spectators demonstrate against the groom because he is German.
The Soviet Union declares that all Chinese students must leave the country before the end of October.
March 1 – Zack Snyder, American actor, film director, screenwriter, and producer  March 2 Sheren Tang, Hong Kong actress David Wickham, British concert pianist, musical director and conductor  March 3  Tone Lōc, African-American R&B musician  Nick Rhodes, British scientist  March 4  Daniela Amavia, American actress and international model  Ant Banks, African-American rapper  Steve Bastoni, Australian actor  Kevin Johnson, American basketball player  Dav Pilkey, American writer  Wash Westmoreland, British film director  March 5   Mark Z. Danielewski, American author  Michael Irvin, American football player  March 6 – Maurice Ashley, American chess grandmaster  March 7  Jeff Feagles, American football kicker  Atsushi Sakurai, Japanese singer (Buck-Tick)  March 9 –
A, B, C, D THEN F: Queen Victoria married this man in an elaborate ceremony in 1840
Prince Albert
February 10 – Queen Victoria of the United Kingdom marries her cousin Prince Albert of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha.
3
The Raleigh and Gaston Railroad is completed from Raleigh to near Weldon, North Carolina.
Ongoing  First Opium War (1839–1842)  First Anglo-Afghan War (1839–1842)  Egyptian–Ottoman War (1839–41)   Births    January–June  thumb|110px|Ernst Abbe thumb|110px|John Boyd Dunlop thumb|right|110px|left|Émile Zola thumb|110px|Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky  January 3 – Father Damien, Belgian missionary priest (d. 1889)  January 18 –
Carl Ludvig Engel, German-Finnish architect (b. 1778)  May 26 –
REDS: In 1940 Ramon Mercader gave this commie the axe... literally!
Trotsky
Leon Trotsky is attacked with an ice axe in his Mexico home by NKVD agent Ramón Mercader.
3
May 20  WWII: German forces (2nd Panzer division), under General Rudolf Veiel, reach Noyelles on the English Channel.
The Holocaust: Franz Rademacher proposes the Madagascar Plan.
As British authorities attempt to deport Jewish refugees (originating from German-occupied Europe) from Mandatory Palestine to Mauritius aboard the requisitioned emigrant liner  at Haifa, the Jewish paramilitary organization Haganah sinks the ship with a bomb, killing around 250 refugees and crew.
AMERICAN HISTORY: You're in the Army now--in 1940 FDR instituted the first peacetime one of these in U.S. history
the draft
The draft registration of approximately 16 million men begins in the United States.
3
Neville Chamberlain, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, in what proves to be a tragic misjudgment, declares in a major public speech that Hitler has "missed the bus".
WWII: Germany invades the neutral countries of Denmark and Norway in Operation Weserübung, opening the Norwegian Campaign.
December 23 –
"WHO"s THERE?: Albee play, 1962
Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?
October 13 – Broadway debut of Edward Albee's drama Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?.
3
September 27 –
November 7 – Richard M. Nixon loses the California governor's race.
That Was, hosted by David Frost is broadcast on BBC Television in the U.K.  November 26  Spiegel scandal: German police end their occupation of Der Spiegel'''s offices.
19TH CENTURY SCIENCE: Edison's 1876 carbon transmitter was invented to improve this device
Telephone
March 7 – Alexander Graham Bell is granted a United States patent for an invention he calls the telephone (patent #174,466).
3
The new commander General Fernando Primo de Rivera marches on the remaining Carlist stronghold at Estella, where he meets a force of about 1,600 men under General Carlos Calderón at nearby Montejurra.
The United States celebrates its centennial.
The British Colony of New Zealand dissolves its nine provinces and replaces them with 63 counties.
DO YOU LIKE KIPLING?: "Rikki-Tikki-Tavi" is one of the tales in this 1890s collection
The Jungle Book
Rudyard Kipling published The Jungle Book in 1894.
3
Santa Barbara, Calif.:
Three racially integrated unions—the Teamsters, the Scalesmen, and the Packers—made up what came to be called the "Triple Alliance."
That Glitters—Class, Conflict, and Community in Cripple Creek, Elizabeth Jameson, 1998, page 7. and for events which culminated in the Colorado Labor Wars.
NOTE-ABLE WOMEN: The violin virtuoso known by the single name Midori was born in this country in 1971
Japan
A tsunami 85 m high rises over the Ryukyu Islands in Japan.
3
July 14 –
Camden was, however, the site of a 1949 shooting rampage by Howard Unruh, considered by some to be the first mass murderer in the United States.
March 18 – Leland Hayward, American film and theatrical agent (b. 1902)  March 19 – Winifred Horrabin, British socialist activist and journalist (b. 1887)  March 23 –
NOTABLE NAMES: In 1967 his daughter Svetlana Alliluyeva made big news when she defected to the U.S.
Joseph Stalin
March 9 – Joseph Stalin's daughter, Svetlana Alliluyeva, defects to the United States via the U.S. Embassy in New Delhi.
3
Puppet on a String by Sandie Shaw (music and lyrics by Bill Martin and Phil Coulter) wins the Eurovision Song Contest 1967 for the United Kingdom.
Most fighting takes place in the states of Andhra Pradesh, Maharashtra, Odisha and Madhya Pradesh.
The Montreal, Quebec Expo 67 closes, having received over 50 million attendees.
NOTABLE NAMES: In 1967, Adrian Kantrowitz became the first in the United States & the second in the world to perform this operation
Heart transplant
December 3 – Christiaan Barnard carries out the world's first heart transplant at Groote Schuur Hospital in Cape Town.
3
April 27 – Montreal, Quebec, Expo 67, a World's Fair to coincide with the Canadian Confederation centennial, officially opens with Prime Minister Lester B. Pearson igniting the Expo Flame in the Place des Nations.
October 14 – Quebec Nationalism: René Lévesque leaves the Liberal Party.
Professor John Archibald Wheeler uses the term black hole for the first time.
THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF CHILDREN'S HOSPITALS: The single largest health insurer for children is this "aid" program set up by the U.S. government in 1965
Medicaid
U.S. President Lyndon B. Johnson signs the Social Security Act of 1965 into law, establishing Medicare and Medicaid.
3
In the Dominican Republic, officers and civilians loyal to deposed President Juan Bosch mutiny against the right-wing junta running the country, setting up a provisional government.
May 12  West Germany and Israel establish diplomatic relations.
One is shot down and the other 3 sustain damage.
GOLDBERGS: In 1965 Arthur Goldberg left this body to be U.N. Ambassador partly in hopes of stopping the Vietnam War
U.S. Supreme Court
Nat King Cole, American singer and musician (b. 1919)  February 19 – Forrest Taylor, American stage, film and television actor (b. 1883)  February 21 – Malcolm X, American activist (assassinated) (b. 1925)  February 22 – Felix Frankfurter, U.S. Supreme Court Justice (b. 1882)  February 23 –
3
Gemini 3: NASA launches the United States' first 2-person crew (Gus Grissom, John Young) into Earth orbit.
September    September 2 – Pakistani troops enter the Indian sector of Kashmir, while Indian troops try to invade Lahore.
The storm is the first hurricane to cause $1 billion in unadjusted damages, giving it the nickname "Billion Dollar Betsy".
GEOGRAPHY "B": Until 1973 these islands off the southeast coast of Florida belonged to Great Britain
the Bahamas
The Bahamas gains full independence within the Commonwealth of Nations.
3
February 28  The Republic of Ireland general election is held.
The Athens Polytechnic uprising occurs against the military regime in Athens, Greece.
Michael O'Shea, American actor (b. 1906)  December 5 – Sir Robert Watson-Watt, Scottish engineer, radar pioneer (b. 1892)  December 20  Luis Carrero Blanco, first minister of Spain (assassinated) (b. 1904)  Bobby Darin, American singer, songwriter, musician, actor, dancer, impressionist and TV presenter (b. 1936)  December 23 – Gerard Kuiper Netherlands-born American astronomer (b. 1905)  December 24 –
SCOTT JOPLIN: Interest in Joplin's music was revived by this 1973 film that featured many of his songs & starred Newman & Redford
The Sting
December 25 - Movie premier for The Sting starring Robert Redford and Paul Newman in Manhattan.http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0070735/releaseinfo  December 28 –
3
March 8  Northern Ireland sovereignty referendum (the "Border Poll"): 98.9% of those voting in the province want Northern Ireland to remain within the United Kingdom.
August 15 –
October  thumb|right|October 20: Sydney Opera House is opened by Elizabeth II  October 6   Yom Kippur War begins: The fourth and largest Arab–Israeli conflict begins, as Egyptian and Syrian forces attack Israeli forces in the Sinai Peninsula and Golan Heights on Yom Kippur.
NYC IN THE '70s: Saying he wouldn't be active in the day-to-day running of the Yankees, in 1973 he led the group that bought them
George Steinbrenner
CBS sells the New York Yankees for $10 million to a 12-person syndicate led by George Steinbrenner (3.2 million dollars less than CBS bought the Yankees for).
3
July 29 –
September 20 - Singer-songwriter Jim Croce dies following a gig at Northwestern State University in Natchitoches, Louisiana.
Roberto Martínez, Spanish football manager   July 14 –
WOULD-BE ASSASSINS: This magazine publisher was shot and wounded by serial would-be assassin Joseph Franklin in 1978
Larry Flynt
March 6 – American porn publisher Larry Flynt is shot and paralyzed in Lawrenceville, Georgia.
3
January 14 – January 15 –
February 19 – Egyptian raid on Larnaca International Airport  February 21 –
Police in the West Midlands of England launch a massive murder hunt, when 13-year-old newspaper boy Carl Bridgewater is shot dead after disturbing a burglary.
STOOGES: Hafizullah Amin's failure to appease traditional & ethnic leaders of this nation led to the Soviet invasion in 1979
Afghanistan
February 14  In Kabul, Muslim extremists kidnap the American ambassador to Afghanistan, Adolph Dubs, who is later killed during a gunfight between his kidnappers and police.
3
March 30 – Airey Neave, World War II veteran and Conservative Northern Ireland spokesman, is killed by an Irish National Liberation Army bomb in the British House of Commons car park.
October 19 – 13 U.S. Marines die in a fire at Camp Fuji, Japan as a result of Typhoon Tip.
Wayne Brenkert, American football player-coach (b. 1895)  August 2  Víctor Raúl Haya de la Torre, Peruvian politician, founder of the APRA Party (b. 1895)  Thurman Munson, American baseball player (b. 1947)  August 3 – Bertil Ohlin, Swedish economist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1899)  August 4  Reynold C. Fuson, American chemist (b. 1895)  Roger Lambrecht, Belgian road bicycle rider (b. 1916)  August 5 –
THE  NFL: (Hi, I'm Reggie White!)  In 1982 I was named Southeastern Conference player of the year while playing for this school's Volunteers
Tennessee
A crowd of over 100,000 attends the first day of the 1982 World's Fair in Knoxville, Tennessee, which is kicked off with an address by President Ronald Reagan.
3
The United States Environmental Protection Agency recommends the evacuation of Times Beach, Missouri due to dangerous levels of dioxin contamination.
George Stigler is awarded Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences.
Sam Kydd, Irish-born English actor (b. 1915)  March 27 –
ROCK: After he bit the head off a bat during a 1982 concert, a series of rabies shots followed
Ozzy Osbourne
Rab Butler, British statesman (b. 1902)  March 19 – Randy Rhoads, American guitarist for Ozzy Osbourne (b. 1956)  March 25 –
3
February 9 – Japan Airlines Flight 350 crashes in Tokyo Bay due to thrust reversal on approach to Tokyo International Airport, killing 24 among the 174 people on board.
March 26 –
The Mary Rose, flagship of Henry VIII of England that sank in 1545, is raised from the Solent.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1982 he became the first Pope in modern history to visit Sicily
Pope John Paul II
May 12  Spanish priest Juan María Fernández y Krohn tries to stab Pope John Paul II with a bayonet during the latter's pilgrimage to the shrine at Fátima.
3
The Mary Rose, flagship of Henry VIII of England that sank in 1545, is raised from the Solent.
November   November 2 –
Jimmy Wakely, American Country-Western singer and actor (b. 1914)  September 28 – Mabel Albertson, American actress (b. 1901)  September 30 –
IT'S STRICTLY BUSINESS: Dean Witter & Sears introduced this credit card in 1986 & consumers have been "finding" things to charge ever since
Discover
April 21 – Geraldo Rivera opens Al Capone's secret vault on The Mystery of Al Capone's Vaults, discovering only a bottle of moonshine.
3
October 11 – 12 – Cold War:
150px|thumbnail|Alexandra Daddario 150px|thumbnail|Lady Gaga 150px|thumbnail|Mika Newton  March 1 – Jonathan Spector, American soccer player  Ayumu Goromaru, Japanese rugby union player  March 2 – Ethan Peck, American actor  March 3 – Stacie Orrico, American singer  March 4 –
Jerry Smith, American football All Pro tight end, Washington Redskins, NFL (b. 1943)  October 16 –
SOVIET BLOC HEADS: Leader Volodymyr Shcherbytsky suppressed press coverage of a 1986 disaster in this Soviet republic
Ukraine
Radioactive fallout from the accident is concentrated near Belarus, Ukraine and Russia and at least 350,000 people are forcibly resettled away from these areas.
3
February 27 –
In London, Jeremy Bamber is found guilty of the murder of his adoptive bailii.org retrieved 13:58 28.10.2011 see also :Jeremy Bamber : introductary statement parents, sister and twin nephews, and sentenced to life imprisonment, with a recommendation by the trial judge that he should serve at least 25 years before being considered for parole.
John Bagot Glubb, British soldier (b. 1897)  March 18 –
FAMOUS QUESTIONS: Henry Stanley's famous interrogative in 1871 Africa
Dr. Livingstone, I presume?
Henry Morton Stanley, Welsh-born correspondent for the New York Herald, locates the missing Scottish explorer and missionary Dr. David Livingstone in Ujiji, near Lake Tanganyika, and greets him by saying "Dr. Livingstone, I presume?"
3
December 25 –
May 3 – Walter Robinson Parr, English-born Congregational pastor in the United States (d. 1922)  May 6  Victor Grignard, French chemist, Nobel Prize in Chemistry laureate (d. 1935) thumb|left|110px|Christian Morgenstern  Christian Morgenstern, German author (d. 1914)  May 15 – Kōzō Satō, Japanese admiral (d. 1948)  May 27 – Georges Rouault, French painter and graphic artist (d. 1958) right|thumb|110px|Ernst Stromer von Reichenbach  June 12 –
Tad Lincoln, Youngest son of American President Abraham Lincoln (b. 1853)  July 31 –
ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON: The place where Stevenson & his wife spent their honeymoon in 1880 is now a state park in this state's Napa Valley
California
The University of Southern California opens its doors to 53 students and 10 faculty.
3
October–December   October –
The "Blizzard of 1880" begins in North America.
Reginald Farrer, English botanist (d. 1920)  February 21 – Waldemar Bonsels, German writer (d. 1952)  February 22 – Frigyes Riesz, Hungarian mathematician (d. 1956)  February 27 –
BRITISH PHYSICISTS: In 1932 James Chadwick discovered this subatomic particle that appears in all atoms except hydrogen
the neutron
James Chadwick discovers the neutron.
3
March   March 1  Charles Lindbergh, Jr., the infant son of Anne Morrow Lindbergh and Charles Lindbergh, is kidnapped from the family home near Hopewell, New Jersey.
The Nazis remain the largest party, but their share of the seats drops from 37% to 32%.
March 4 – Fawcet Wray, British admiral (b. 1873)  March 6 – John Philip Sousa, American band leader, conductor, and composer (The Stars and Stripes Forever) (b. 1854)  March 7   Heinrich Clam-Martinic, Austrian statesman, former Prime Minister (b. 1863)  Aristide Briand, French statesman, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (b. 1862)  March 11 – Dora Carrington, British painter (b. 1893)  March 10 – Paolo Boselli, 22nd Prime Minister of Italy (b. 1838)  March 17 – Iliaz Vrioni, Albanian statesman, former Prime Minister (b. 1882)  March 14 – George Eastman, American inventor (Kodak) (b. 1854)  March 18 – Chauncey Olcott, American stage actor and singer-songwriter (b. 1858)  March 31 – Eben Byers, American steel tycoon and socialite (radiation poisoning) (b. 1880)  April thumb|110px|Wilhelm Ostwald  April 2 –
THE SERPENT: In this 1981 film Harrison Ford delivers the immortal line "I hate snakes"
Raiders of the Lost Ark
June 12 – Indiana Jones and the Raiders of the Lost Ark is released in theaters.
3
June 7 –
Shiri Maimon,  Israeli pop/R&B singer, TV show host and actress  May 18 –
– Kathryn Drysdale, English actress  December 2 – Britney Spears, American singer and entertainer  December 3  David Villa, Spanish footballer  Brian Bonsall, American actor  Tyjuan Hagler, American football player  December 4    Lila McCann, American singer  Courtney Cummz, American pornographic actress   December 8 –
19th CENTURY AMERICA: In 1869 Uriah Stephens founded the Knights of this as a secret society
Labor
In Egypt, the Suez Canal, linking the Mediterranean Sea with the Red Sea, is inaugurated in an elaborate ceremony.
3
January 5 – Scotland's oldest professional football team, Kilmarnock F.C., is founded.
May 6 – Purdue University is founded in West Lafayette, Indiana.
Austria-Hungary sends reinforcements to battle the uprising in Krivošije  October 11 – Red River Rebellion against British forces in Canada.
COMPOSERS: His "Maple Leaf Rag", the most famous instrumental rag, was composed in 1899
Scott Joplin
September 18 – Scott Joplin's Maple Leaf Rag is registered for copyright as ragtime music enjoys mainstream popularity in the United States.
3
It is the latest in a series of disasters to Florida's citrus industry.
At 17,272 gross tons and , she is the largest ship afloat, following scrapping of the  a decade earlier.
Emma Morano, Italian supercentenarian, oldest Italian person ever.
THE SATURDAY EVENING POST: Born in NYC in 1894, he painted 317 covers for the Post over 47 years
Norman Rockwell
Norman Rockwell, American artist and illustrator (d. 1978)  February 8 Billy Bishop, Canadian World War I fighter ace (d. 1956) Ludwig Marcuse, German philosopher (d. 1971)  February 10 –
3
May – Bubonic plague breaks out in the Tai Ping Shan area of Hong Kong (by the end of the year, the death toll is 2,552 people).
Walter Piston, American composer (d. 1976)  January 21 –
Arthur D. Struble, American admiral (d. 1983)   July–August   July 9 –
IT'S MILLER TIME: The works of this writer, born in 1891, have been banned numerous times for their sexual content
Henry Miller
Clarrie Grimmett, New Zealand-Australian cricketer (d. 1980)  December 26 – Henry Miller, American writer (d. 1980)   Date unknown   Godfrey Ince, British civil servant (d. 1960)  W. Alton Jones, American industrialist and philanthropist (d. 1962)  Anna Sprengel, German Countess (alleged death)   Deaths    January–June  thumb|110px|Nikolaus Otto thumb|110px|John A. Macdonald thumb|110px|Wilhelm Eduard Weber  January 5 –
3
January 29 – Liliuokalani is proclaimed Queen of Hawaii.
March 9–12 –
Erik Gustaf Boström becomes Prime Minister of Sweden.
THE FIRST MODERN OLYMPICS: The Olympics were reborn on April 6, 1896 with 14 national teams made up of 241 men & this many women
0
Tacitus, The Annals 1.20  Sextus Appuleius and Sextus Pompeius serve as Roman consuls.
2
At the time, it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Pompeius and Appuleius (or, less frequently, year 767 Ab urbe condita).
Events   By place    Roman Empire   August 19 – Augustus, the first Roman emperor, dies and is declared to be a god.
BORN & DIED: She was born at 280 Main Street in Amherst, Massachusetts in 1830 & died there in 1886
Emily Dickinson
Emily Dickinson, American poet (b. 1830)
3
January 18 – Modern field hockey is born with the formation of The Hockey Association in England.
March 29 – Wilhelm Steinitz becomes first recognized World Chess Champion.
November –
"BACK" WORDS: Eric Stoltz was originally cast as Marty McFly in this 1985 comedy
Back to the Future
Back to the Future opens in American theatres and ends up being the highest grossing film of 1985 in the United States and the first film in the successful franchise.
3
March 25 –
Carol Wayne, American actress (b. 1942)  January 14 –
(b. 1889)  May 16 –
REUNIONS: In 1989 the fall of a wall reunited this world capital after 28 years
Berlin
It was a historical turning point for the wave of revolutions that swept the Eastern Bloc, starting in Poland that summer with the beginning of a move towards private enterprise, coming to a head with opening of the Berlin Wall in November, embracing the overthrow of the communist dictatorship in Romania in December and ending in December 1991 with the dissolution of the Soviet Union.
3
U.S. President Bush meets Canadian prime minister Mulroney in Ottawa, laying the groundwork for the Acid Rain Treaty of 1991.
A military coup attempt begins in the Philippines against the government of Philippine President Corazon C. Aquino.
– Jess Glynne, British singer  October 24  Armin Bačinović, Slovenian football midfielder
WOMEN'S FIRSTS: In 1933 she became America's first woman cabinet member when FDR appointed her labor secretary
Frances Perkins
Frances Perkins becomes United States Secretary of Labor, and the first female member of the United States Cabinet.
3
The Twentieth Amendment to the United States Constitution is ratified, changing Inauguration Day from March 4 to January 20 starting in 1937.
Nazi leader Adolf Hitler is appointed Chancellor of Germany by President of Germany Paul von Hindenburg.
February 6–7 –
HAIL TO THE CHIEF: His presidential library has a sailfish he caught during his 1953 honeymoon in Acapulco
Kennedy
Senator John Fitzgerald Kennedy marries Jacqueline Lee Bouvier at St. Mary's Church in Newport, Rhode Island.
3
The Standards And Recommended Practices (SARPS) for Aeronautical Information Service (AIS) were adopted by the ICAO Council.
August 19 – Cold War:
Sylvia Chang, Taiwanese actress  July 23 –
NEWSPAPERS: In 1922 the South Bend Tribune established WSBT, this state's first radio station
Indiana
November 12 – Sigma Gamma Rho (ΣΓΡ) Sorority, Incorporated is founded by seven educators in Indianapolis, Indiana.
3
May 12 –
October 30 – Benito Mussolini becomes the youngest ever Prime Minister of Italy at age 39.
Lukas Foss, German-born composer (d. 2009)  August 17 – Agostinho Neto, Angolan politician (d. 1979)  August 21 – Mel Fisher, American treasure hunter and founder of the Mel Fisher Maritime Heritage Museum (d. 1998)  August 23 –
GOD SAVE THE BRITISH KING OR QUEEN: In 1603 he became the first British monarch of the House of Stuart
James I
thumb|King James I of England/VI of Scotland, the first monarch to rule the Kingdoms of England and Scotland at the same time.
3
Queen Elizabeth I of England (b. 1533)  March 25 – Ikoma Chikamasa, Japanese warlord (b. 1526)  April 25 –
Jan Dymitr Solikowski, Polish archbishop, writer, and diplomat (b. 1539)  July 4 – Philippe de Monte, Flemish composer (b. 1521)
Pierre Charron, French philosopher (b. 1541)  November 20 – Krzysztof Mikołaj "the Lightning" Radziwiłł, Polish nobleman (b. 1547)  December 9 –
THE 18TH CENTURY: In 1757 this man led the East India Company's forces to victory in the Battle of Plassey
Robert Clive
June 23 – Battle of Plassey: 3,000 troops serving with the British East India Company under Robert Clive defeat a 50,000 strong Indian army under Siraj ud-Daulah through conspiracy, at Plassey in India marking the first victory of the East India Company upon India .
3
May 6 – Seven Years' War – Battle of Prague (1757): Frederick the Great defeats an Austrian army and begins to besiege the city.
August 3 – August 9 – French and Indian War: A French army under Louis-Joseph de Montcalm forces the English to surrender Fort William Henry.
Henry Addington, 1st Viscount Sidmouth, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (d. 1844)  June 18 – Gervasio Antonio de Posadas, Argentine leader (d. 1833)  June 22 –
REIGN DROPS: His reign as King of France began in 1774; it would be cut short 18 years later
Louis XVI
May 10 – Louis XVI becomes King of France following the death of his grandfather, Louis XV.  May 19 –
3
The element oxygen is discovered for the third (and last) time – the second quantitatively following the somewhat earlier work of Carl Wilhelm Scheele (1771–1772) – by Joseph Priestley, who publishes the fact in 1775 and so names the element and usually gets all the credit due to the fact his work was published first.
Prince Adolphus, Duke of Cambridge (d. 1850)  March 9 – Mayhew Folger, whaler, captain of Topaz, rediscovered Pitcairn Islands in 1808 (d. 1828)  March 16 –
Elizabeth Ann Seton, co-founder of Mount St. Mary's University, founder of the Sisters of Charity (d. 1821) thumb|110px|Caspar David Friedrich  September 5 – Caspar David Friedrich, German artist (d. 1840)  September 26 – Johnny Appleseed (John Chapman), nurseryman/missionary planted apple-tree nurseries in Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois  (d. 1847)  date unknown  Sergei Nikolayevich Glinka –
WHEN THEY WERE KIDS: In 1808 at age 5, war hero Luis Alves de Lima e Silva joined an infantry unit in this large South American country
Brazil
The Bragança Portuguese Royal Family arrives in Brazil, fleeing from the French army.
3
March 11 – Russian troops occupy Tampere.
Andrew Johnson, 17th President of the United States (d. 1875)
John Claiborne, U.S. politician (b. 1777)
SPORTS HISTORY: In a famous incident, it's the school at which William Webb Ellis disregarded the rules in 1823
Rugby
According to tradition, William Webb Ellis invents the sport of rugby football at Rugby School in England.
3
March 19 – Agustín de Iturbide, Emperor of Mexico, abdicates thus ending the short-lived First Mexican Empire.
David Breakenridge Read, Canadian lawyer, Mayor of Toronto (d. 1904)
Goldwin Smith, English historian (d. 1910)  August 14 – Karel Miry, Belgian composer (d. 1889)  August 15
MOST POPULAR BABY NAMES BY YEAR: 1930, boys: Like Goddard or Benchley
Robert
Births January 120px|thumbnail|right|Robert Loggia 120px|thumbnail|right|Rod Taylor thumb|120px|Gene Hackman  January 1 – Gaafar Nimeiry, President of Sudan (d. 2009)  January 2 –
3
Elm Farm Ollie becomes the first cow to fly in a fixed-wing aircraft, and also the first cow to be milked in an aeroplane.
Lingle is later found to have had contacts with organized crime.
William Archibald Spooner, British scholar and Anglican priest (b. 1844)  September 1 – Peeter Põld, Estonian pedagogical scientist and politician (b. 1878)  September 10 –
TRAVEL U.S.A.: Octagon House in Washington, D.C. is the place where the Treaty of Ghent that ended this war was signed in 1815
War of 1812
War of 1812 – Battle of New Orleans: American forces under General Andrew Jackson defeat an invading British force in the last major battle of the war.
3
The Spanish reconquest of Latin America begins.
March 2–18 – Sri Vikrama Rajasinha of Kandy, the last king in Ceylon, is deposed under the terms of the Kandyan Convention, which results in Ceylon becoming a British colony.
By the end of the year Serbia is acknowledged as a semi-independent state; the ideals of the First Serbian Uprising have thus been temporarily achieved.
AMERICAN HISTORY: In 1814 & 1815 New England leaders took part in the Hartford Convention to discuss opposition to this war
War of 1812
War of 1812 – Battle of New Orleans: American forces under General Andrew Jackson defeat an invading British force in the last major battle of the war.
3
March 16 –
June 18 – Battle of Waterloo:
The Great September Gale of 1815 is the first hurricane to strike New England in 180 years.
HISTORY FROM HOLLYWOOD: 1927's "Wings" features great dogfight scenes set in this war
World War I
Ernest Starling, English physiologist (b. 1866)  May 3 – Ernest Ball, American singer and songwriter (b. 1878)  May 8 – Charles Nungesser, French aviator and World War I fighter ace (date of disappearance) (b. 1892)  May 11 – Juan Gris, Spanish sculptor and painter (b. 1887)   June   June 1  Lizzie Borden, American accused murderer; acquitted of killing her father and stepmother (b. 1860)  J. B. Bury, Irish historian (b. 1861)  June 4 – Robert McKim, American actor (b. 1886)  June 9 – Victoria Woodhull, American feminist and spiritualist (b. 1838)  June 11 –
3
The Menin Gate is dedicated as a war memorial at Ypres, Belgium.
David Diop, French West African poet (d. 1960)  July 10  David Dinkins, African-American Mayor of New York City from 1989 through 1993  William Smithers, American actor  July 15 –
Xenophon Stratigos, Greek general (b. 1869)  March 14 –
18th CENTURY QUOTATIONS: 2 yrs. before his 1794 execution, he said, "I am no courtier, nor moderator... nor defender of the people: I am myself the people"
Maximilien Robespierre
June 17 – Marguerite-Élie Guadet, French Revolutionary leader (executed) (b. 1753)  June 18  François Buzot, French Revolutionary leader (suicide) (b. 1760)  James Murray, British military officer and administrator  June 27  Wenzel Anton, Prince of Kaunitz-Rietberg, Austrian statesman (b. 1711)  Philippe de Noailles, French soldier (executed) (b. 1715)  Victor de Broglie, French soldier (executed) (b. 1756)  July 13 – James Lind, pioneer of naval hygiene in the Royal Navy (b. 1716)  July 17 – John Roebuck, English inventor (b. 1718)  July 23 – Alexandre de Beauharnais, French politician and general (executed) (b. 1760)  July 25 – André Chénier, French writer (executed) (b. 1762)  July 28  Maximilien Robespierre, French Revolutionary leader (executed) (b. 1758)  Augustin Robespierre, French Revolutionary leader (executed) (b. 1763)  Louis Antoine de Saint-Just, French Revolutionary leader (executed) (b. 1767)  Jean-Baptiste de Lavalette, French general (executed) (b. 1753)  François Hanriot, French Revolutionary leader (executed) (b. 1761)  August 6 –
3
British troops capture Port-au-Prince in Haiti.
Siege of Warsaw: The Polish people resist a siege by armies of the Russian Empire and Kingdom of Prussia.
William Whewell, English scientist, philosopher, and historian of science (d. 1866)  May 27 –
TEEN QUEENS: British monarch crowned in 1837, when she was barely 18
Victoria
Queen Victoria, Queen of the United Kingdom (1837–1901).
3
The First Carlist War.
December 17 – Fire in the Winter Palace, Saint Petersburg.
Carl Koldewey, German explorer famous for the German North Polar Expedition (d. 1908)  October 28 –
19th CENTURY LITERARY QUOTES: 1852 U.S. novel with the line "Eliza made her desperate retreat across the river just in the dusk of twilight"
Uncle Tom's Cabin
Uncle Tom's Cabin by Harriet Beecher Stowe was published in book form in Boston.
3
January 15 –
After learning that U.S. President Fillmore has sent Commodore Matthew C. Perry, to open trade with Japan, Nicholas I of Russia sent Rear Admiral Yevfimy Putyatin to lead the Pallada on a similar mission.
October 23 —
1958: This Russian made news on October 29th when he turned down a cash prize worth $41,420
Boris Pasternak
October 23 – Nobel Committee announces Boris Pasternak as the winner of the 1958 Prize for Literature  October 26 –
3
February   February 1 – Egypt and Syria unite to form the United Arab Republic.
April 14  The satellite Sputnik 2 disintegrates in space after several orbits.
An F-104 Starfighter sets a world speed record of .
FOOD GLORIOUS FOOD: In 1958 the first International House Of these opened in Toluca Lake, California
Pancakes
The first International House of Pancakes (IHOP) opens in Toluca Lake, Los Angeles.
3
The Peronist party becomes legal again in Argentina.
The U.S.S.R. performs a nuclear test at Novaya Zemlya.
Max Crivello, Italian artist  February 28   Natalya Estemirova, Russian activist (d. 2009)  Phil Hayes, British voice actor   March  thumb|120px|Miranda Richardson thumb|120px|Sharon Stone thumb|120px|Albert II, Prince of Monaco thumb|120px|Holly Hunter thumb|120px|Gary Oldman  March 1 – Nik Kershaw, English singer  March 3 – Miranda Richardson, English actress  March 4 - Patricia Heaton, American actress  March 5 –
OPERA HODGEPODGE: (AUDIO DAILY DOUBLE):This 1847 opera by an Italian composer features singing witches
Macbeth
March 14 – Verdi's opera Macbeth premieres at Teatro della Pergola in Florence, Italy.
3
__NOTOC__   Events    January–March   January 4 – Samuel Colt sells his first revolver pistol to the U.S government.
March 9 – Mexican–American War:
July 26 – Liberia gains independence.
NO PLACE TO GO: Listen!  Up in the attic!  It must be Mr. Rochester's first wife!--in this 1847 novel
Jane Eyre
October 19 – Charlotte Brontë publishes Jane Eyre under the pen name of Currer Bell.
3
February 22 –
United States forces led by General Winfield Scott take Veracruz after a siege.
Manuel José Arce, Central American politician (b. 1787)   References    Historic Letters of 1847
PRESIDENT TYLER: In 1844 a treaty signed by Tyler's envoy in Wanghia opened up trade with this Asian country
China
July–September  thumb|115px|right| July 3: great auk  July 3  The United States signs the Treaty of Wanghia with the Chinese Government, the first ever diplomatic agreement between China and the United States.
3
February 27 –
June 6 – George Williams founds the Young Men's Christian Association (YMCA) in London.
The Rochdale Pioneers commence business at their cooperative in Rochdale, England.
U.S.A.: In 1802 Eleuthere Irenee Du Pont built his new gunpowder factory in this state
Delaware
July–September   July – Éleuthère Irénée du Pont founds E. I. du Pont de Nemours and Company, the modern DuPont chemical company, as a gunpowder manufactory near Wilmington, Delaware.
3
A general amnesty signed by Napoleon allows all but about 1,000 of the most notorious émigrés of the French Revolution to return to France, as part of a conciliatory gesture to make peace with the various factions of the Ancien Régime that ultimately consolidates his own rule.
By the Law of 20 May 1802, Napoleon reinstates slavery in the French colonies, revoking its abolition in the French Revolution.
The Health and Morals of Apprentices Act in the United Kingdom comes into effect, regulating conditions for child labour in factories.
KILL BILL: VOL. 1: This former "Ziegfeld follies" humorist died in 1935 in an Alaskan plane crash
Will Rogers
August 15 – Humorist Will Rogers and aviator Wiley Post are killed when Post's plane crashes shortly after takeoff near Barrow, Alaska.
3
January 13 –
September    September 2 – 1935 Labor Day hurricane: The strongest hurricane ever to strike the United States landfalls in the Upper Florida Keys as a Category 5 storm with 185 mph winds, killing 423.
October 14 –
WORDS ABOUT WRITING: In his 1954 Nobel Prize acceptance speech, this American called "writing, at its best... a lonely life"
Ernest Hemingway
Linus Pauling  Medicine – John Franklin Enders, Thomas Huckle Weller, Frederick Chapman Robbins  Literature – Ernest Hemingway  Peace –
3
A dock workers' strike expands in England.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average rises 3.27 points, or 0.86 percent, closing at an all-time high of 382.74.
Mordechai Vanunu, a former Israeli nuclear technician who revealed secrets of its nuclear weapons program  October 15   Peter Bakowski, Australian poet  Michael Garner, English actor  October 18 - Yūji Mitsuya, Japanese voice actor  October 23 – Ang Lee, Taiwanese film director  October 24  Doug Davidson, American actor  Mike Rounds, South Dakota politician   October 30  Kathleen Cody, American actress  Mario Testino, Peruvian photographer  November thumb|120px|Condoleezza Rice thumb|120px|Aleksander Kwaśniewski  November 2 –
19th CENTURY BIGWIGS: He came from Scotland to the U.S. in 1842 & in 1850 became the first detective on the Chicago police force
Allan Pinkerton
Allan Pinkerton forms the North-Western Police Agency, later the Pinkerton National Detective Agency, in the United States.
3
December 16 –
The dry-goods store of Lehman Brothers Montgomery, Alabama, predecessor of the bank, is so renamed.
Edward Merritt Hughes, U.S. Navy officer (d. 1903)  January 29  Ebenezer Howard, British urban planner (d. 1928)  Lawrence Hargrave, Australian engineer (d. 1915)  February 8 –
THE GADSDEN PURCHASE: This U.S. president authorized the deal in 1853
Franklin Pierce
March 4 – Franklin Pierce succeeds Millard Fillmore as the 14th President of the United States and affirms the oath of office.
3
January 12 – Taiping Rebellion: The Taiping army occupies Wuchang.
Stanford White, American architect (d. 1906)  November 13 – John Drew, Jr., American stage actor, (d. 1927)  December 6 – Haraprasad Shastri, Indian academic, Sanskrit scholar, archivist and historian of Bengali literature (d. 1931)  December 17 – Émile Roux, French physician, bacteriologist and immunologist (d. 1933)  December 22 – Teresa Carreño,  Venezuelan pianist, singer, composer, and conductor (d. 1917)  December 23 –
Lionel Kieseritzky, Baltic German chess player (b. 1806)  June 2  Lucas Alamán, Mexican statesman and historian (b. 1792)  Henry Trevor, 21st Baron Dacre, British peer and soldier (b. 1777)  June 8 – Richard William Howard Vyse (b. 1784)
AMAZIN' FACTS: This "Dr. Faustus" playwright was a flamboyantly gay spy who was stabbed in the head in 1593
Christopher Marlowe
thumb|May 18: Christopher Marlowe.
3
June 22 – Battle of Sisak in Croatia: The Habsburgs defeat the Ottoman Empire.
Births   March 13 – Georges de La Tour, French painter (d. 1652)  March 25 – Jean de Brébeuf, French Jesuit missionary (d. 1649)  April – Mumtaz Mahal, Persian wife of Shah Jahan I (d. 1631)  April 3 –
July 11 – Giuseppe Arcimboldo, Italian painter (b. 1527)  September 25 – Henry Stanley, 4th Earl of Derby (b. 1531)  date unknown  Jeong Cheol, Korean administrator and poet (b. 1536)  William Harrison, English clergyman (b. 1534)  Krzysztof Kosiński, Polish noble  Li Shizhen, Chinese physician, pharmacologist, and mineralogist (b. 1518)   References
WORD SMITHS: His translation of "The Book of Mormon" was published in 1830
Joseph Smith
April–June   April 6 – Joseph Smith and five others organize the Church of Christ (later renamed the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints), the first formally organized church of the Latter Day Saint movement, in northwestern New York.
3
Craig vs. Missouri: The United States Supreme Court rules that state loan certificates are unconstitutional because they were bills of credit emitted by a state in violation of Article I, Section 10 of the Constitution.
August 9 – France: Louis Philippe becomes King of the French.
November 2 –
DIBS!: The Dutch had already sighted Australia, & Aborigines lived there, when he claimed it for England in 1770
Captain James Cook
March 26 – First voyage of James Cook: English explorer Captain James Cook and his crew aboard  complete the circumnavigation of New Zealand.
3
Joseph-Louis Lagrange proves Bachet's Conjecture.
– Ezekiel Hart, Canadian entrepreneur & politician (d. 1843)  May 29 – Charles Adams, second son of President John Adams (1735–1826) (d. 1800)  June 1 –
Ludwig van Beethoven, German composer] (d. 1827)  December 18 – Nicolas Joseph Maison, Marshal of France and Minister of War (d. 1840)   Deaths   January 7 –
IT'S A CONSPIRACY!: This Guy is the best known figure in the conspiracy known as the "Gunpowder Plot" to kill King James I in 1605
Guy Fawkes
November 5 – Gunpowder Plot: A plot to blow up the English Houses of Parliament is foiled when, following a tip-off, Sir Thomas Knyvet, a justice of the peace, finds Catholic plotter Guy Fawkes in a cellar below the Parliament building and orders a search of the area.
3
April 1 –
April 13 – Tsar Boris Godunov dies; Feodor II accedes to the Russian throne.
Pope Clement VIII (b. 1536)  April 5 –
ANIMALS ON THE MAP: In 1620 the Pilgrims first landed in the New World on this peninsula & that's no fish story
Cape Cod
The Mayflower departs from Plymouth, England, on its 3rd attempt without the Speedwell, arriving on November 11 (Old Style date) at Cape Cod (named from Concord voyage of 1602).
3
Under the terms of the Treaty of Ulm, the Protestant Union declares neutrality and ceases to support Frederick V of Bohemia.
A Short Account of the Destruction of the Indies by Bartolomé de las Casas and Origin and progress of the disturbances in the Netherlands by Johannes Gysius was re-published in the Netherlands.
Salvatore Castiglione, Italian painter (d. 1676)  April 24 – John Graunt (d. 1674)  May 3 –
THE VIKING SHIP MUSEUM: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reports from the Viking Ship Museum in Roskilde, Denmark.) The Sea Stallion is a reconstruction of a ship built of oak from near Glendalough on this island, which suffered its first recorded Viking raids in 795
Ireland
The earliest recorded Viking raid on Ireland, they attack the monasteries at Iona (Inner Hebrides), Inishbofin and Inishmurray (approximate date).
3
Britain   Quarrels between the kings Cynan Dindaethwy and Hywel leave the way open for Caradog ap Meirion (the House of Rhos) to usurp the throne of Gwynedd (modern Wales).
By topic    Religion   December 25 –
I, gastald (or count) of Capua (approximate date)  Lothair
MILITARY HISTORY: In 774 this Frank took the crown of Desiderius, the last king of the Lombards
Charlemagne
|right|The Frankish Kingdom under Charlemagne __NOTOC__ Year 774 (DCCLXXIV) was a common year starting on Saturday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
3
Saxon Wars:
The Conquest of Saxony AD 782–785, p. 14.
By topic   Astronomy   A 1.2% growth of carbon-14 concentration recorded in tree rings suggests that a very strong solar storm may have hit the earth in either 774 or 775.http://www.nature.com/news/mysterious-radiation-burst-recorded-in-tree-rings-1.10768/   Births   Kūkai, Japanese Buddhist monk (d. 835)   Deaths   Abd al-Rahman al-Awza'i, Muslim scholar (b. 707)  Abu Mikhnaf, Muslim historian (approximate date)  Amoghavajra, Chinese translator (b. 705)  Aurelius, king of Asturias (Spain)  Gummarus, Frankish noblemen (b. 717)  Kim Daeseong, Korean minister (b. 700)   References
FAMOUS TRIALS: After his 1633 sentencing, he said he must "abandon the false opinion that the sun is the center of the world"
Galileo
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June   February 13 – Galileo Galilei arrives in Rome for his trial before the Inquisition.
3
Samuel Whiting, Jr., American clergyman (d. 1713)  March 26 –
– Walter Chetwynd, antiquary, politician (d. 1693)  May 15 –
George Herbert, English poet and orator (b. 1593)
JONATHAN SWIFT: Swift sent Gulliver on this many voyages, 3 fewer than Sinbad
4
Births   Ban Biao, Chinese historian (d. 54)   Deaths    References      als:0er#Johr 3
2
__NOTOC__ Year 3 (III) was a common year starting on Monday or Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar (the sources differ, see leap year error for further information) and a common year starting on Monday of the Proleptic Julian calendar.
Wang Mang foils a plot by his son, Wang Yu, his brother-in-law, Lu Kuan, and the Wei clan to oust him from the regent's position.
BIOLOGY: Of the 4, blood group of the universal recipient
AB
At the time, it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Catus and Saturninus (or, less frequently, year 757 Ab urbe condita).
3
Tiberius also adopts Germanicus as his own heir.
A pact of non-aggression and friendship is signed between the Roman Empire, represented by Tiberius, and the German tribe the Cherusci, represented by their King Segimer.
China   Emperor Ping of Han marries Empress Wang (Ping), daughter of Wang Mang, cementing his influence.
THE HOUSE OF THE 7 GERBILS: If a pair of pet gerbils are from the same family, they'll be familiar with this, rodents' main means of recognition
odor
Births   Drusus Caesar, son of Germanicus and Agrippina the elder (d. 33)  Gnaeus Domitius Corbulo, Roman General (d. 67)   Deaths   Athenodoros Cananites, Stoic philosopher (b. 74 BC)   References      als:0er#Johr 7
2
Roman Emperor Caesar Augustus dismisses the Judean ethnarch Herod Archelaus.
Construction of the Temple of Concord begins.
BUSY AS A BEAVER: Of 1, 5 or 15, the rough maximum number of minutes a beaver can hold its breath underwater
15
|right|Bust of Germanicus (15 BC –
3
AD 19)
On his return journey, he recaptures the aquila of Legio XIX and visits the battlefield of the Teutoburg Forest.
Tacitus, The Annals 1.62     Varna (Odessus), on the Bulgarian Black Sea Coast, is annexed to the Roman province of Moesia.
WORMS: This man, already pronounced a heretic, was formally declared an outlaw by 1521's Edict of Worms
Martin Luther
Pope Leo X excommunicates Martin Luther in the papal bull Decet Romanum Pontificem.
3
June 30 – Battle of Esquiroz:
August 29 –
Date unknown  thumb|Neacşu's Letter, the oldest surviving document written in Romanian has the oldest appearance of the word "Rumanian"  Jacopo Berengario da Carpi publishes Commentaria cum amplissimus additionibus super anatomiam Mundini in Bologna, including observation of the vermiform appendix.
MATH PROBLEMS: If one bus can hold 50 tourists, then at least this many buses are needed for 210 tourists
5
thumb|The world in 50 __NOTOC__ Year 50 (L) was a common year starting on Thursday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
3
12, § 2.  In Britain, governor Publius Ostorius Scapula begins his campaign against the recalcitrant Silures of south Wales, who are led by the former Catuvellaunian prince Caratacus.
(approximate date)
The Apostles hold the Council of Jerusalem (approximate date).
AMERICAN HISTORY: On May 9, 1995 the Senate, by a vote of 98-0, confirmed John Deutch as director of this agency
CIA
Deaths   January 27 – Nerva, Roman emperor (b. 30 AD)  Apollonius of Tyana, Greek/Roman philosopher and mathematician (b. 2)   References
3
A brilliant soldier and administrator, he enters Rome without ceremony and wins over the public.
By topic   Arts and sciences   Tacitus finishes his Germania (approximate date).
Births   Nobody (was born of historical importance)
THE 19th CENTURY: Much of the fighting in this war, 1853 to 1856, took place on a peninsula in the Black Sea
the Crimean War
The Treaty of Paris is signed, ending the Crimean War.
3
April–June   April – Xhosa cattle-killing movement and famine begins in Cape Colony.
December 9 –
Henri Philippe Pétain, French soldier and statesman (d. 1951)  April 26 –
COUNTRY TIME: In 2002 this country shifted out of neutral & finally joined the U.N.
Switzerland
Switzerland joins the United Nations as the 191st member state after rejecting a place in 1986.
3
February 15 –
The Funeral of Queen Elizabeth
The Igandu train disaster in Dodoma Region, Tanzania, kills 281 people in the worst rail accident in African history.
FOREIGN LITERATURE: His "Eventyr, fortalte for Born", or "Fairy Tales, Told for Children" was published in 1835
Hans Christian Andersen
Hans Christian Andersen's Fairy Tales Told for Children.
3
First Collection.
Henryk Wieniawski, Polish composer (d. 1880)  July 27 –
April 1 – Józef Zeydlitz, Polish military leader (b. 1755)  April 8 – Wilhelm von Humboldt, German linguist and philosopher (b. 1767)  April 10 –
WORLD CITIES: This capital of Australia's Victoria state was founded in 1835 & named for England's prime minister
Melbourne
April–June   April 18 – Lord Melbourne succeeds Sir Robert Peel as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.
3
H. Fox Talbot exposes the world's first known photographic negatives at Lacock Abbey in England.
September 7 –
Ernest Giles, Australian explorer (d. 1897)  July 10 –
CHICAGO: In 2004, to benefit the city's cultural life, e-Bay sponsored a charity auction called the "Great Chicago" this sale
fire
Darfur conflict: The Humanitarian Ceasefire Agreement is signed by the Sudanese government and 2 rebel groups.
3
March 17 –
October 27 – Details of the discovery of a new, recent species of fossil hominid, Homo floresiensis, from the island of Flores, Indonesia, are published.
Nicholas Berg, American businessman (executed by decapitation) (b. 1978)  May 14 –
THE FRANKS: In 732, when he defeated an invading Muslim army at Tours, a king earned the nickname Martel, meaning this
the hammer
Charles extends his authority in the south of France which gives him the nickname Martellus ("The Hammer").
3
Abdul Rahman Al Ghafiqi pulls back to establish a position at the Vienne River.
Durant, Will, The Age of Faith.
ISBN 0813908116
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: (Jon of the Clue Crew reports from West Point.) These links were part of the great chain across the Hudson used in 1778 to block the naval forces of this British Commander
Henry Clinton
June 28 – American Revolutionary War – Battle of Monmouth: George Washington's Continental Army battles the British general Sir Henry Clinton's army to a draw near Monmouth County, New Jersey.
3
American Revolutionary War: the Wyoming Massacre takes place near Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania, ending in a terrible defeat of the local colonists.
In the Hawaiian Islands, Captain James Cook becomes the first European to land on Maui.
Benjamin Jacob, British musician (d. 1829)  April 3 –
NUMBERS IN LATIN: A 2008 card-counting movie: viginti unus
21
Cyprus and Malta set to join eurozone in 2008, EurActivAkrotiri and Dhekelia adopt the euro, EUbusiness (ISO 4217 code: VEF).
3
Thousands of Palestinians cross into Egypt, as the border wall with Gaza in Rafah is blown up by militants.
May 12 –
June 8 –
IT'S BAD FOR YA: James Lind's 1753 "Treatise On" this vitamin C deficiency suggests eating citrus fruits
scurvy
Date unknown   James Lind writes A Treatise of the Scurvy.
3
March 1 – Sweden adopts the Gregorian calendar by skipping the 11 days difference between it and the Julian calendar and letting February 17 be followed directly by March 1.
March 17 – First official Saint Patrick's Day.
Joachim Ludwig Schultheiss von Unfriedt, German architect (b. 1678)  August 6 – Georg Wilhelm Richmann, Russian physicist (struck by lightning) (b. 1711)  August 19 – Balthasar Neumann, German architect and military engineer (b. 1687)  December 15 – Richard Boyle, 3rd Earl of Burlington, English architect (b. 1694)  December 25 – Godolphin Arabian, thoroughbred stallion (b. c.1724)   References
HEIR CONDITIONING: In 1536, with only a female heir, she was first of Henry VIII's wives to go on the chopping block
Anne Boleyn
thumb|May 19: Execution of Anne Boleyn.
3
The legal and political union of Wales with England is reinforced by An Acte for Lawes & Justice to be ministred in Wales in like fourme as it is in this Realme.
May 26 – Francesco Berni, Italian poet (b. 1497)  June 18 – Henry FitzRoy, 1st Duke of Richmond and Somerset, illegitimate son of Henry VIII of England (b. 1519)  June 28 –
References
2007 BESTSELLERS: Walter Isaacson's biography of this scientist was based on the subject's personal letters
Albert Einstein
Eddie Robinson, American football coach (b. 1919)  April 4 – Bob Clark, American film director (b. 1939)  April 5  Thomas Stoltz Harvey Pathologist who conducted Albert Einstein's autopsy (b. 1912)  Leela Majumdar, Bengali children's author (b. 1908)  Darryl Stingley, American football player (b. 1951)  Poornachandra Tejaswi, Indian writer and novelist (b. 1938)  April 6 – Luigi Comencini, Italian film director (b. 1916)  April 7  Johnny Hart, American cartoonist (b. 1931)  Barry Nelson, American actor (b. 1917)  April 9 – AJ Carothers, American writer (b. 1931)  April 10 –
3
(Daily Times)
A week later it was founded that the aircraft has crashed onto the Makassar Strait, killing all 102 people on board.
ABC launches a new on-air identity.
ART & ARTISTS: Carel Fabritius, Rembrandt's finest student, died in a 1654 explosion in this Dutch pottery city
Delft
The Delft Explosion, in the arsenal, devastates the city in the Netherlands, killing more than 100, among whom is Carel Fabritius (32), the most promising student of Rembrandt.
3
April 5 –
October 31 – Ferdinand Maria, Elector of Bavaria, is crowned.
September 7 – Yom-Tov Lipmann Heller, Bohemian rabbi and liturgical poet (b. 1579)  October 12 – Carel Fabritius, Dutch artist (b. 1622)  October 30 – Emperor Go-Komyo of Japan (b. 1633)  November 30 – John Selden, English jurist (b. 1584)  December 5 – Jean François Sarrazin, French writer  date unknown –
B.C. TIMES: He was about 45 when he invaded Britain in 55 B.C. & 50 when he conquered Gaul
Julius Caesar
According to the testimony of Julius Caesar, Gaul was divided into three parts: Gallia Celtica, Belgica and Aquitania.
3
Before the rapid spread of the La Tène culture in the 5th to 4th centuries BC, the territory of eastern and southern France already participated in the Late Bronze Age Urnfield culture (c. 12th to 8th centuries BC.) out of which the early  iron-working  Hallstatt culture (7th to 6th centuries BC) would develop.
The religious practices of druids were syncretic and borrowed from earlier pagan traditions, with probably indo-European roots.
In addition, the Druids monitored the religion of ordinary Gauls and were in charge of educating the aristocracy.
TOUGH CAPITALS: Bucharest
Romania
Bucharest (; , ) is the capital and largest city of Romania, as well as its cultural, industrial, and financial centre.
3
The powers of the local government over a certain area are therefore shared both by the Bucharest Municipality and the local sectoral councils with little or no overlapping of authority.
in the city centre, and at precincts throughout the city.
Also the oldest hospital in Bucharest, Coltea Hospital was built by Mihai Cantacuzino between 1701 and 1703, composed of many buildings, each with 12 to 30 beds, a church, three chapels, a school, and doctors' and teachers' houses.
EXPLORATION: In 1493, during his second voyage to the New World, he built a trading post called Isabela on Hispaniola
Columbus
Christopher Columbus was delayed by a storm in Azores  March 15 – Christopher Columbus and Martín Alonso Pinzón return to Palos de la Frontera the original port in Spain from where they started the first voyage of discovery.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 1493 (MCDXCIII) was a common year starting on Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar).
Treaty of Barcelona:
September 9 – Battle of Krbava Field in southern Croatia: Forces of the Ottoman Empire defeat those of the Kingdom of Croatia.
BIRDS: The willow ptarmigan, which makes its home in Arctic areas, is this state's official bird
Alaska
The Arctic consists of the Arctic Ocean and parts of Alaska (United States), Canada, Finland, Greenland (Denmark), Iceland, Norway, Russia, and Sweden.
3
Coastal Arctic climates are moderated by oceanic influences, having generally warmer temperatures and heavier snowfalls than the colder and drier interior areas.
Two Arctic states (Finland and Sweden) do not border the Arctic Ocean.
Retro.met.no (28 January 2008).
WORLD HISTORY: At the Congress of Vienna, William I of the Netherlands traded Nassau for this Duchy
Luxembourg
William I (Willem Frederik, Prince of Orange-Nassau; 24 August 1772 – 12 December 1843) was a Prince of Orange and the first King of the Netherlands and Grand Duke of Luxembourg.
3
Youth and early military career As eldest son of the Prince of Orange (of whom there could only be one at a time)
High costs of the war came to burden the Dutch economy, fueling public resentment.
Wilhelmina Frederika Louise Charlotte Marianne (b. Berlin, 9 May 1810 – d. Schloss Reinhartshausen bei Erbach, 29 May 1883), married on 14 September 1830 with Prince Albert of Prussia.
THE 19th CENTURY: 29-year-old slave Harriet Tubman escaped in 1849, went north & became a "conductor" on this
Underground Railroad
Born into slavery, Tubman escaped and subsequently made some thirteen missions to rescue approximately seventy enslaved family and friends,Larson, p. xvii. using the network of antislavery activists and safe houses known as the Underground Railroad.
3
A devout Christian, Tubman ascribed the visions and vivid dreams to revelations from God.
Although she never advocated violence against whites, she agreed with his course of direct action and supported his goals.
Both historians agree that no concrete evidence exists for such a possibility, and the mystery of Tubman's relationship with young Margaret remains to this day.
BUY AMERICAN LIT!: This author of "The Martian Chronicles" co-wrote the 1956 screenplay for "Moby Dick"
Ray Bradbury
The Martian Chronicles is a 1950 science fiction short story collection by Ray Bradbury that chronicles the colonization of Mars by humans fleeing from a troubled and eventually atomically devastated Earth, and the conflict between aboriginal Martians and the new colonists.
3
In the previously mentioned version, this short story describes the first settlers coming to Mars, the "Lonely Ones", the ones that came to start over on the planet.
The Martian, exhausted from his constant shape-changing, spasms, and dies.
Synopsis at Fandango.comEntry at Amazon.comEntry at Zimbio.com  Comic books Several of the short stories in The Martian Chronicles were adapted into graphic novel-style stories in the EC Comics magazines, including "There Will Come Soft Rains" in Weird Fantasy #17, "The Million-Year Picnic" in Weird Fantasy #21, "The Silent Towns" in Weird Fantasy #22.
ENGLISH LIT.: The final veision of his "Paradise Lost" was published in 1674
Milton
Paradise Lost is an epic poem in blank verse by the 17th-century English poet John Milton (1608–1674).
3
Leonard, John. "Introduction".
He desires glory and praise from all his creations.
The Norton Anthology of English Literature.
STUPID ANSWERS: On the west, Central Park is bounded by this street
Central Park West
The names were chosen to represent the broad diversity of New York City's trades; for example, "Mariner's Gate" for the entrance at 85th Street and Central Park West.
3
Execution of the Greensward Plan was the responsibility of a number of individuals, including Jacob Wrey Mould (architect), Ignaz Anton Pilat (master gardener), George E. Waring, Jr. (engineer), and Andrew Haswell Green (politician), in addition to Olmsted and Vaux.
On December 31, 2009, the restaurant closed its doors in what was expected to be a permanent closure, but it reopened on April 24, 2014 after a major renovation.
The writer Evan H Rhodes published The Prince of Central Park, a 1975 novel that describes the life of an 11-year-old in the park.
WAR & PIZZA: Pizza Hut paid $1 million to deliver a pie to Yuri Usachov, who was here at the time
International Space Station
Pizza Hut developed a pizza for use as space food, which was delivered to the International Space Station in 2001.
3
The menu will be expanded to introduce various items such as crust flavors and eleven new specialty pies.
ISBN 1118834747, 9781118834749.
The Stuffed Crust pizza was introduced in March 26, 1995.
TACO BELL-UM: Taco Bell is 1 of 3 main parts of Tricon Global Restaurants, along with KFC & this chain
Pizza Hut
The chain has since co-branded with Pizza Hut and Long John Silver's as well.
3
Taco Bell Express locations operate primarily inside convenience stores, truck stops, shopping malls, and airports.
The advertisement states that the McMuffin belongs in 1984.
Following an aggressive campaign of expansion, Taco Bell's efforts soon withered, and the chain withdrew from Poland shortly thereafter.
ZOOM IN FOR A CLOSE-UP: First there was one big county, then Norfolk split off in 1793, leaving this county
Suffolk
It borders Lincolnshire to the west and north-west, Cambridgeshire to the west and southwest, and Suffolk to the south.
2
The site played host to BBC's 'Springwatch' from 2008 until 2010.
Thomas Shadwell, playwright, satirist and Poet Laureate  Allan Smethurst, 'The Singing Postman' who sang songs in his Norfolk dialect, was from Sheringham  Hannah Spearritt, actress and former S Club 7 singer, who is from Gorleston  Adam Thoroughgood, colonial leader in Virginia, namer of New Norfolk County, which later became Norfolk, Virginia.
GOOD TV: Julianna Margulies stars as Alicia Florrick, the title political spouse on this CBS drama
The Good Wife
The 2010s saw additional hits for the network including drama series The Good Wife; police procedurals Person of Interest, Blue Bloods, Elementary, Hawaii Five-0 and NCIS spin-off NCIS: Los Angeles; reality series Undercover Boss; and sitcoms 2 Broke Girls and Mike & Molly.
3
From 1960 to 1965, the CBS television network limited its color broadcasts to only a few special presentations such as The Wizard of Oz, and only then if the sponsor would pay for it.
On June 1, 1977, it was announced that Elvis Presley had signed a deal with CBS to appear in a new television special.
The "America's Most Watched Network" was re-introduced by CBS in 2011, used alongside the "Only CBS" slogan.
SCREEN TEENS: Angus T. Jones is the fractional character in the title of this CBS sitcom
Two and a Half Men
During the 2000s, CBS found additional successes with a slew of police procedurals (several of which were produced by Jerry Bruckheimer) including Cold Case, Without a Trace, Criminal Minds, NCIS and The Mentalist, along with CSI spinoffs CSI: Miami and CSI: NY as well as sitcoms Still Standing, Two and a Half Men, How I Met Your Mother, The New Adventures of Old Christine, Rules of Engagement and The Big Bang Theory.
3
CBS was also hit, though not as severely: Paley's brilliant 1928 affiliate contract which had given CBS first claim on local stations' air during sponsored time – the network option – came under attack as being restrictive to local programming.
Bergreen, p. 183
Beginning in 1963, at least one CBS show, The Lucy Show, began filming in color at the insistence of its star and producer Lucille Ball; she realized that color episodes would command more money when they were eventually sold into syndication, but even it was broadcast in black and white through the end of the 1964–65 season.
YE GODS!: In Egyptian myth this son of Isis is the god of the sky
Horus
R.E Witt, Isis in the Ancient World, p. 7, 1997, ISBN 978-0-8018-5642-6 Isis is often depicted as the mother of Horus, the falcon-headed deity associated with king and kingship (although in some traditions Horus's mother was Hathor).
2
Sometimes she is depicted as holding a lotus, or, as a sycamore tree.
Sometimes she also is represented as a cow, or with a cow's head.
COMPLETES THE OPERA TITLE: Rossini:"The ____ of Seville"
Barber
Many operas have been set in the city, including those by such composers as Beethoven (Fidelio), Mozart (The Marriage of Figaro and Don Giovanni),  Rossini (The Barber of Seville) and Bizet "(Carmen)".
3
It was the second largest building in Spain, after the royal residence El Escorial.
Before the existence of wetlands regulation in the Guadalquivir basin, Seville suffered regular heavy flooding; perhaps worst of all were the floods that occurred in November 1961 when the river Tamarguillo overflowed as a result of a prodigious downpour of rain, and Seville was consequently declared a disaster zone.
See also   Seville Public Library  Seville Statement on Violence  References  External links   Seville city guide at HitchHikers Handbook
R-RATED OPERA: In this composer's "Don Giovanni", the title character seduces women, kills a man & is dragged down to Hell
Mozart
Don Giovanni (; K. 527; complete title: , literally The Rake Punished, or Don Giovanni) is an opera in two acts with music by Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart and Italian libretto by Lorenzo Da Ponte.
2
Leporello tells Elvira that Don Giovanni is not worth her feelings for him.
"Till they are tipsy").
A CZAR IS BORN: Born 1530, died 1584, known for his extreme despotism
Ivan the Terrible
Archangelsk is founded as New Kholmogory in northern Russia by Ivan the Terrible.
3
May 17 –
June 1 –
July 12 – Steven Borough, English explorer (b. 1525)
THE 16th CENTURY: In 1570 this first Russian czar killed thousands in Novgorod; he thought they were conspiring against him
Ivan the Terrible
Ivan the Terrible starts the Massacre of Novgorod.
3
January 23 –
A magnitude 8.3 earthquake occurs in Concepción, Chile.
Nakagawa Hidenari, Japanese daimyo (d. 1612)  Hans Lippershey, Dutch lensmaker (d. 1619)  Asprilio Pacelli, Italian Baroque composer (d. 1623)  Girolamo Rainaldi, Italian architect (d. 1655)  Salamone Rossi, Italian violinist and composer (d. 1630)  John Smyth, English Baptist minister (d. 1612)  Chief Powhatan, Algonquin chief (d. 1620)   Deaths   January 8 – Philibert de l'Orme, French architect (b. 1510)  January 19 –
WORLD HISTORY: In 1669 this loose confederation of North German cities met for the last time
the Hanseatic League
The Hanseatic League, after 400 years of operation, holds its last official meeting in Lübeck.
3
Ottoman units burn the eastern part of Kolárovo.
Okaya & Co., Ltd., is founded in Nagoya, Japan.
Jan Swammerdam publishes his Algemeene Verhandeling van de bloedeloose dierkens, a groundbreaking work in microscopy as well as entomology   Births   January 20 –
EUROPEAN HISTORY: In 1709 Sweden was defeated by this Russian czar in the Battle of Poltava, losing its dominance in the Baltic area
Peter the Great
In the Ukraine, Peter the Great, Tsar of Russia, defeats Charles XII of Sweden, thus effectively ending Sweden's role as a major power in Europe.
3
August 28 – Pamheiba is crowned King of Manipur.
The second Eddystone Lighthouse, erected off the south west coast of England by John Rudyerd, is completed.
Publication of the first modern edition of William Shakespeare's plays in London, edited by Nicholas Rowe.
HISTORY CLASS: Founded in 1702, Mobile in this state became the "City of Six Flags" (but it doesn't have a Six Flags theme park)
Alabama
In North America, ships from Fort Maurepas arrive at Twenty-Seven Mile Bluff to build Fort Louis de la Mobile (future Mobile, Alabama) to become the capital of French Louisiana.
3
March 8 (O.S.) – William III of England dies of complications following a fall from his horse on February 20; his sister-in-law Princess Anne Stuart becomes Queen Anne of England, Scotland and Ireland.
Warsaw is conquered by Charles XII of Sweden.
The War of the Spanish Succession widens, as war is declared on France by the Grand Alliance (Kingdom of England, Dutch Republic and Holy Roman Empire).
THE NEW WORLD: In 1513 Martin Waldseemuller updated his 1507 map, taking this name off the new continent
America
thumb|Waldseemüller maps America.
2
Date unknown   The Timurid dynasty ends when Uzbeks under Muhammad Shaybani capture the capital, Herat, and the Emir Badi' al-Zaman Mirza flees.
William Waldegrave, English Member of Parliament (d. 1554)
DESPERATE HOUSEFLIES: Showdowns in this Sergio Leone epic include Fonda vs. Bronson & Jack Elam vs. a fly
Once Upon a Time in the West
More (1965) and The Good, the Bad and the Ugly (1966)), the Western Once Upon a Time in the West (1968), the epic buddy Zapata Western Duck, You Sucker! (1971) and the epic crime drama
3
In the mid-1960s, historical epics fell out of favor with audiences, but Leone had shifted his attention to a subgenre which came to be known as the "Spaghetti Western", owing its origin to the American Western.
According to Christopher Frayling's book Something to do with Death, Leone knew a great deal about the American Old West.
It was a meditation on another aspect of popular American mythology, the role of greed and violence and their uneasy coexistence with the meaning of ethnicity and friendship.
2-LETTER WORDS: A small hawk, or a moon of Jupiter
Io
Because of its rapid rotation, the planet's shape is that of an oblate spheroid (it has a slight but noticeable bulge around the equator).
3
It is convenient to treat hydrogen as gas in the upper layer extending downward from the cloud layer to a depth of about 1,000 km, and as liquid in deeper layers.
The discovery of this relatively small object, a testament to his keen eyesight, quickly made him famous.
On September 10, 2012, another fireball was detected.
JUPITER: On the surface this force is 2.64 times ours; a 100-pound object would weigh 264 lbs.
gravity
Jupiter was most recently visited by a probe in late February 2007, when New Horizons used Jupiter's gravity to increase its speed and bend its trajectory en route to Pluto.
2
This process causes Jupiter to shrink by about 2 cm each year.
It parachuted through  of the atmosphere at speed of about 2,575 km/h (1600 mph) and collected data for 57.6 minutes before it was crushed by the pressure of about 23 atmospheres at a temperature of 153 °C. It would have melted thereafter, and possibly vaporized.
CELEBRITY RELATIVES: He appeared in the 1951 London stage production of "South Pacific", which starred his mom, Mary Martin
Larry Hagman
She was also the mother of actor Larry Hagman.
3
So Red Rose”.
Martin left everything behind, including her young son, Larry, and went to Hollywood while her father handled the divorce for her.
Richard Watts, Jr. of the New York Post wrote: "nothing I have ever seen her do prepared me for the loveliness, humor, gift for joyous characterization, and sheer lovableness of her portrayal of Nellie Forbush....
MILLENNIUM MOMENTS: In 1397 the Union of Kalmar united Denmark, Sweden & this country
Norway
July 20 – Queen Margaret forms the Kalmar Union, uniting the three kingdoms of Denmark, Norway (with Iceland and Greenland) and Sweden (including Finland).
3
Establishment of the Università, a form of local government, in Malta.
Thomas Holland, 2nd Earl of Kent (b. 1350)
June 3 – William Montacute, 2nd Earl of Salisbury, English military leader (b. 1328)
SCIENTISTS: Casimir Funk named these substances, which are essential for normal metabolism
vitamins
Available from: http://jn.nutrition.org/content/102/9/1105.full.pdf), commonly anglicized as Casimir Funk, was a Polish biochemist,Casimir Funk denied his Jewish identity, according to his granddaughter generally credited with being among the first to formulate (in 1912) the concept of vitamins,Just
3
It was later to be known as vitamin B3 (niacin), though he thought that it would be thiamine (vitamin B1) and described it as "anti-beri-beri-factor".
In 1911 he published his first paper in English, on dihydroxyphenylalanine.
341–68.
AUTHORS ON FILM: 1995's "Carrington" also portrays the life & loves of this Bloomsbury Group member who wrote "Eminent Victorians"
Lytton Strachey
The Bloomsbury Group—or Bloomsbury Set—was an influential group of associated English writers, intellectuals, philosophers and artists,Fargis, p. 262 the best known members of which included Virginia Woolf, John Maynard Keynes, E. M. Forster and Lytton Strachey.
3
64, 96  Rejection of bourgeois habits Bloomsbury reacted against current social rituals, "the bourgeois habits ... the conventions of Victorian life"Lee, p. 54 with their emphasis on public achievement, in favour of a more informal and private focus on personal relationships and individual pleasure.
Virginia Woolf: Paper Darts: the Illustrated Letters (1991)  Tate.
Rindert Kromhout, "Soldaten huilen niet" (Dutch Young Adult novel about the youth of Quentin 2010)  Steve Moyers. "British Modernism’s Many Manners ." Humanities, March/April 2009, Volume 30, Number 2  Christopher Reed, Bloomsbury Rooms, 2004.
CLIFF NOTES: Before "Into the Wild", this author wrote "Into Thin Air", about a Mount Everest trip gone wrong
Jon Krakauer
Jon Krakauer's Into Thin Air (1997) expressed the author's personal criticisms of the use of bottled oxygen.
3
Nonetheless, in 1847, the British continued the Great Trigonometric survey and began detailed observations of the Himalayan peaks from observation stations up to  away.
Environment   Atmospheric pressure comparison Pressure ReferencekilopascalpsiOlympus Mons summit  –Mars average  –Hellas Planitia bottom  –Armstrong limit  – Mount Everest summit  Earth sea level  –Dead Sea level  Surface of Venus   In 2008, a new weather station at about 8000 m altitude (26,246 feet) went online.
Nepal turned Chinese reluctance into an incredible success for the country, with the executive donating tens of thousands of dollars to local hospitals and achieving a new hybrid aviation/mountaneering stylethey awarded her the Nepalese International Mountaineer of the Year.
OCEANIA: Annual events in this country include the Bula Festival in Nadi & the Hibiscus Festival in Suva
Fiji
Suva is the capital and the second most populated municipality of Fiji, after Nasinu.
3
The town initially comprised one square mile; these boundaries remained intact until 1952 when the Muanikau and Samabula wards were annexed, expanding its territory to 13 square kilometers.
The city hosted the 2003 South Pacific Games, being the third time in the event's 40-year history that they had been held in Suva.
After the foundation stone was laid in 1937, the building was completed in 1939; a new wing was completed in 1967.
MIND YOUR SHAKESPEARE "P"s & "Q"s: Fruity surname of Peter in "A Midsummer Night's Dream"
Quince
– Titania's husband and King of the Fairies Titania – Oberon's wife and Queen of the Fairies Robin Goodfellow/Puck – servant to Oberon Peaseblossom  – fairy servant to Titania Cobweb  – fairy servant to Titania Moth  – fairy servant to Titania Mustardseed  – fairy servant to Titania  The Mechanicals (an acting troupe) Peter Quince – carpenter, leads the troupe and plays Prologue Nick Bottom – weaver, plays Pyramus Francis Flute – bellows-mender, plays Thisbe Robin Starveling – tailor, plays Moonshine Tom Snout – tinker, plays Wall Snug – joiner, plays Lion  Plot thumb|upright|Hermia and Helena by Washington Allston, 1818 The play consists of four interconnecting plots, connected by a celebration of the wedding of Duke Theseus of Athens and the Amazon queen, Hippolyta, which is set simultaneously in the woodland and in the realm of Fairyland, under the light of the moon.
3
They are the most powerful figures featured, not Theseus as often thought.
As the primary sense of motivation, this desire is reflected even in the scenery depictions and the story's overall mood.
The opera was first performed on 1 June 1960 at Aldeburgh.
_____ OF _____: In 1950 Scottish nationalists stole this object from under the coronation chair at Westminster Abbey
the Stone of Scone
From 1301 to 1996 (except for a short time in 1950 when it was temporarily stolen by Scottish nationalists), the chair also housed the Stone of Scone upon which the kings of Scots are crowned.
3
The work continued between 1245 and 1517 and was largely finished by the architect Henry Yevele in the reign of Richard II. Henry III also commissioned unique Cosmati pavement in front of the High Altar (the pavement has recently undergone a major cleaning and conservation programme and was re-dedicated by the Dean at a service on 21 May 2010).
Coronations thumb|King Edward's Chair.
Henry III rebuilt the abbey in honour of a royal saint, Edward the Confessor, whose relics were placed in a shrine in the sanctuary.
BEST PICTURE OSCAR WINNERS: In this film, Clint Eastwood says, "Hell of a thing, killin' a man. Ya take away all he's got and all he's ever gonna have"
Unforgiven
For his work in the Western film Unforgiven (1992) and the sports drama Million Dollar Baby (2004), Eastwood won Academy Awards for Best Director and Producer of the Best Picture, as well as receiving nominations for Best Actor.
3
Before Irving Leonard died, he and Eastwood had discussed the idea of Malpaso producing Play Misty for Me, a film that was to give Eastwood the artistic control he desired, and his debut as a director.
The film was among the top 10 box office performers in that year, earning $102 million in the United States alone.
Supporting Actor (Freeman).Roberts and Skutt, p. 689
TOM HANKS MOVIE ROLES: Book store owner & Internet messaging fan Joe Fox
You've Got Mail
He is known for his roles in Splash (1984), Big (1988), Philadelphia (1993), Forrest Gump (1994), Apollo 13 (1995), Saving Private Ryan, You've Got Mail (both 1998), The Green Mile (1999), Cast Away (2000), The Da Vinci Code (2006), Captain Phillips, and Saving Mr. Banks (both 2013), as well as for his voice work in the animated films The Polar Express (2004) and the Toy Story series.
3
Actor Tom Hanks...
Then out of nowhere it got canceled.
He also made an appearance in the credits, expressing a desire to be left alone when he is out in public.
THE TALES OF DUSTIN HOFFMAN: Laurence Olivier sets dentistry back about 1,000 years as he works on Dustin in this film; that's not safe at all
Marathon Man
His later films included  Sleuth (1972),  Marathon Man (1976), and The Boys from Brazil (1978).
3
Billington adds that the engagement led to "a lifelong friendship with his fellow actor Ralph Richardson that was to have a decisive effect on the British theatre."
After a holiday with Coward in Jamaica, she seemed to have recovered, but Olivier later recorded, "I am sure that ... [the doctors] must have taken some pains to tell me what was wrong with my wife; that her disease was called manic depression and what that meant—a possibly permanent cyclical to-and-fro between the depths of depression and wild, uncontrollable mania.
Olivier's move from leading parts to supporting and cameo roles came about because his poor health meant he could not get the necessary long insurance for larger parts, with only short engagements in films available.
DIRECTORS: He said, "My wife has taught me the meaning of uxoriousness" when he won an Oscar for "The English Patient"
Anthony Minghella
Film adaptation The book was adapted into a 1996 film by Anthony Minghella, starring Ralph Fiennes, Kristin Scott Thomas, Willem Dafoe, and Juliette Binoche.
3
Geoffrey offers to return Almásy to Cairo on his plane since the expedition will break camp with the coming of war.
Almásy is portrayed in a sympathetic light, partly because he tells his own story, but also because he always adheres to his own moral code.
He is a long-time friend of Hana's father and becomes known as "the man with bandaged hands" when he arrives at the villa; the bandages cover his severed thumbs the result of an interrogation by the Italians in Florence.
EN-COMPASSING: Henry Hudson died looking for it
the Northwest Passage
Hudson discovered a strait and immense bay on his final expedition while searching for the Northwest Passage.
3
In 1611, after wintering on the shore of James Bay, Hudson wanted to press on to the west, but most of his crew mutinied.
Firstly, prior to the mutiny the alleged leaders of the uprising, Greene and Juet, had been friends and loyal seamen of Captain Hudson.
He also appears in the time-travel novel Torn by Margaret Peterson Haddix.
I'LL BE YOUR HOST: Rosie O'Donnell made news in 2006 when she returned to TV as a co-host of this morning chatfest
The View
In 2006 O'Donnell became a moderator on The View.
3
Early life O'Donnell, the third of five children, was born and raised in Commack, Long Island, New York.
O'Donnell countered that Kmart sells hunting rifles, not handguns or assault weapons and does so legally, which she supports.
Rosie's Family Cruise nominated  Kids' Choice Awards:  2000 Hall of Fame Award  Tony Award:  2014 Isabelle Stevenson Award "for her commitment to arts education for New York City's public school children."  Women in Film Crystal + Lucy Awards:  2002 Lucy Award in recognition of her excellence and innovation in her creative works that have enhanced the perception of women through the medium of television.
NAME IN COMMON: ...to a "Lethal" Mel Gibson movie character & a famous loser to Billie Jean King
Riggs
He is most well known as an action hero, for roles such as Martin Riggs in the Lethal Weapon buddy cop film series and Max Rockatansky in the first three films in the Mad Max post-apocalyptic action series.
3
He appeared in serial
In 1985, after working on four films in a row, Gibson took almost two years off at his Australian cattle station.
In September 2002, Gibson announced that he would direct a film called The Passion in Aramaic and Latin with no subtitles because he hoped to "transcend language barriers with filmic storytelling."
HAS ANYBODY SEEN MY "GAL"?: This country's capital, Dakar, was once the capital of French West Africa
Senegal
Dakar (;   )Dakar pronunciation: How to pronounce Dakar in French, Spanish, Polish is the capital and largest city of Senegal.
1
Ann Arbor, Michigan, United States  Baku, Azerbaijan  Douala, Cameroon  Isfahan, Iran  Milan, Italy  Oran, Algeria  Rangpur, Bangladesh  Rosario, Argentina  Bissau, Guinea-Bissau  Washington, D.C., United States  L. Bigon (2009)
THE SILENT SCREEN: Gary Cooper had a small role as a cadet in this first Best Picture winner about 2 flyers in love with the same girl
Wings
His drawings and watercolors were exhibited throughout the dormitory, and he was named art editor for the college yearbook.
3
Dickens 1970, pp.
Rested and rejuvenated by his year-long exile, a healthy Cooper returned to Hollywood in April 1932Meyers 1998, p. 82. and negotiated a new contract with Paramount for two films per year, a salary of $4,000 a week, and director and script approval.
The organization—whose membership included Walt Disney, Clark Gable, Ronald Reagan, Barbara Stanwyck, and John Wayne—pressured the United States Congress to investigate communist influence in the motion picture industry.
MOVIE TIMES: Gary Cooper was Marshal Will Kane in this classic
High Noon
In the post-war years, he portrayed more mature characters at odds with the world in films such as The Fountainhead (1949) and High Noon (1952).
3
In the early 1930s, he expanded his heroic image to include more cautious characters in adventure films and dramas such as A Farewell to Arms (1932) and The Lives of a Bengal Lancer (1935).
Back at Paramount, Cooper appeared in his first of seven films by director Henry Hathaway,Meyers 1998, p. 107.
According to biographer Jeffrey Meyers, Cooper, who struggled with moral conflicts in his personal life, "understood the anguish of a character striving to retain his integrity ... [and] brought authentic feeling to the role of a tempted and tormented, yet essentially decent man".Meyers 1998, p. 290.
TELEVISION: In a 1995 episode of this Fox animated series, Glenn Close played Homer's long-lost mother
The Simpsons
The Simpsons Mona Simpson 5 episodes 1997
3
Close has also won Tony Awards in 1984 for The Real Thing, and in 1992 for Death and the Maiden.
Her co-stars were John Lithgow as Tobias, Martha Plimpton as Julia and Lindsay Duncan as Claire.
In 1995 Close was engaged to carpenter Steve Beers, who had worked on Sunset Boulevard, but the two never married, and they separated in 1999.
19th CENTURY AFRICA: In the 1830s this group began its "Great Trek" north from Cape Colony to gain freedom from British rule
the Boers
History of the Boers in South Africa; Or, the Wanderings and Wars of the Emigrant Farmers from Their Leaving the Cape Colony to the Acknowledgment of Their Independence by Great Britain.
2
Illustrated History of South Africa.
(1859–1860)  Robert Henry Wynyard (2nd time) (acting) (1861–1862)  Sir Philip Edmond Wodehouse (1862–1870)  Charles Craufurd Hay (acting) (1870)  Sir Henry Barkly (1870–1877)  Henry Bartle Frere (1877–1880)  Henry Hugh Clifford (acting) (1880)  Sir George Cumine Strahan (acting) (1880–1881)
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: A 7-mile tunnel through Mont Blanc connects Chamonix, France to this country
Italy
The mountain lies in a range called the Graian Alps, between the regions of Aosta Valley, Italy, and Haute-Savoie, France.
3
Historical map
Starting from Chamonix, the Téléphérique de l'Aiguille du Midi is taken towards the Col du Midi.
Storm over Mont Blanc (Stürme über dem Mont Blanc, 1930) with Leni Riefenstahl and directed by Arnold Fanck  La Roue (The Wheel, 1923) is a 273-minute film by Abel Gance depicting rail operations, workers, and families in southeastern France, including the Mont Blanc area.
THE FRANZ LIST: Franz Schubert wrote over 600 musical pieces known by this German word for songs
Lieder
His output consists of over six hundred secular vocal works (mainly Lieder), seven complete symphonies, sacred music, operas, incidental music and a large body of chamber and piano music.
2
Newbould (1999), p. 66
and he confided to some friends that he feared that he was near death.
OPERA: Carl Maria von Weber's 1826 opera about this king of the fairies was subtitled "or, the Elf King's Oath"
Oberon
Weber's operas Der Freischütz, Euryanthe and Oberon greatly influenced the development of the Romantische Oper (Romantic opera) in Germany.
3
In 1800, the family moved to Freiberg in Saxony, where Weber, then 14 years old, wrote an opera called Das stumme Waldmädchen (The Silent Forest Maiden), which was produced at the Freiberg theatre.
Invitation to the Dance also served as the thematic basis for Benny Goodman's swing theme song for the radio program
44, J. 190 (1815)  Scene and Aria of Atalia Misera me! for soprano and orchestra, Op.
NEW YORK CITY: The name of this street that cuts diagonally through Manhattan is synonymous with big-time theater
Broadway
"Families have overtaken commerce as the catalyst for change in this TRIangle BElow CAnal Street (although the only triangle here is its heart: Hudson Street meeting West Broadway at Chambers Street, with Canal its north side) ... Artists began seeking refuge from fashionable SoHo (SOuth of HOuston) as early as the mid-70s."Cohen, Joyce.
3
See Legislative Resolutions Senate No. 5476 and Assembly No. 2708.
The building, an elegant Beaux-Arts tower, was one of the most painful losses of the early preservation movement when it was razed in 1967....
Fortune Magazine: New York State and City Home to Most Fortune 500 Companies, Empire State Development Corporation, press release dated April 8, 2005, accessed April 26, 2007. "New York City is also still home to more Fortune 500 headquarters than any other city in the country."  , the global advertising agencies of Omnicom Group and Interpublic Group, both based in Manhattan, had combined annual revenues of approximately US$21 billion, reflecting New York City's role as the top global center for the advertising industry, which is metonymously referred to as "Madison Avenue".
BRIDGES: It connects the 3 boroughs of Manhattan, Queens, & The Bronx
Triborough Bridge
The Grand Central Parkway, whose western terminus is the Triborough Bridge, extends east to the Queens/Nassau border, where its name changes to the Northern State Parkway.
3
The Flushing Remonstrance signed by colonists in 1657 is considered a precursor to the United States Constitution's provision on freedom of religion in the Bill of Rights.
Comprising almost 17% of the jobs in Queens is the information, financial activities, and business and professional services sectors.
Accessed May 17, 2007. "
WHERE THERE'S A VILLE: Kinshasa was formerly called this, after a Belgian king who exploited the Congo region
Leopoldville
Kinshasa (; formerly Leopoldville ( or Dutch )) is the capital and the largest city of the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
3
Thus, while the culture is dominated by the Francophonie, a complex multilingualism is present in Kinshasa.
Kinshasa?
L'enfer des chemins de fer urbains kinois, Le Potentiel, 25 July 2005.
THE 3rd CENTURY B.C.: Greek mathematician Eratosthenes famously calculates the circumference of this
the Earth
He is best known for being the first person to calculate the circumference of the Earth, which he did by applying a measuring system using stadia, which was a standard unit of measure during that time period.
3
His interest in Plato led him to write his very first work at a scholarly level, Platonikos, inquiring into the mathematical foundation of Plato's philosophies.
Eratosthenes knew that at local noon on the summer solstice in the Ancient Egyptian city of Swenet (known in ancient Greek as Syene, and now as Aswan) on the Tropic of Cancer, the Sun would appear at the zenith, directly overhead.
(lost, criticized by Strabo)  Arsinoe (a memoir of queen Arsinoe; lost; quoted by Athenaeus in the Deipnosophistae)
IN LAS VEGAS: The Las Vegas Strip received its name because it reminded someone of a "Strip" in this city's metro area
Los Angeles
Trader Antonio Armijo led a 60-man party along the Spanish Trail to Los Angeles, California in 1829.
3
Established in 1905, Las Vegas was incorporated as a city in 1911.
Las Vegas Strip  thumb|The Las Vegas Strip, primarily located in Paradise.
Notable people  See also  List of films set in Las Vegas List of films shot in Las Vegas List of Las Vegas casinos that never opened List of mayors of Las Vegas List of television shows set in Las Vegas Radio stations in Las Vegas Television stations in Las Vegas  References  Further reading  Chung, Su Kim (2012).
LAS VEGAS: Pastoral meaning of “Las Vegas” in English inappropriate to its desert locale
the meadows
The area was named Las Vegas, which is Spanish for "the meadows", as it featured abundant wild grasses, as well as desert spring waters for westward travelers.
3
The influx of construction workers and their families helped Las Vegas avoid economic calamity during the Great Depression.
According to the United States Census Bureau, the city has a total area of , of which  is land and  (0.03%) is water.
Most general aviation traffic uses the smaller North Las Vegas Airport and Henderson Executive Airport.
FEELIN' GOUTY: Gout didn't stop this reformer from nailing his 95 Theses to a Wittenberg church door
Martin Luther
The importance of Wittenberg historically was due to its seat of the Elector of Saxony, a dignity held by the dukes of Saxe-Wittenberg and also to its close connection with Martin Luther and the dawn of the Protestant Reformation; several of its buildings are associated with the events of this time.
2
It was seriously damaged by fire in 1760 during a bombardment by the French during the Seven Years' War, was practically rebuilt, and was later (1885–1892) restored.
In 1356, Emperor Charles IV bestowed upon the Duke of Saxony-Wittenberg the honour of Elector.
SCIENCE HISTORY: The unit of this in electricity is named for Georg Ohm; it's also what ohm ran into when he published his ideas
resistance
In this work, he stated his law for electromotive force acting between the extremities of any part of a circuit is the product of the strength of the current, and the resistance of that part of the circuit.
3
His mother died when he was ten.
Ohm's school was closed down in February 1816.
, The Galvanic Circuit Investigated Mathematically) (1827) in which he gave his complete theory of electricity.
HOPE YOU STAYED AWAKE IN MATH: This trigonometric function is the ratio of an angle's opposite side to its hypotenuse
sine
The list is long but to name a few acupuncture, bollywood and global cuisine are also integrated throughout the world giving rise to hope.
3
As a verb, its definitions include: "expect with confidence" and "to cherish a desire with anticipation".
In these instances, the therapist helps their client overcome barriers that have prevented them from achieving goals.
Additionally, having a greater amount of hope before and during cognitive therapy has led to decreased PTSD-related depression symptoms in war veterans.
I READ THE NEWS TODAY: (Hi, I'm Al Sparks.)  In 1987 I was named "Funniest Teenager in Chicago" by this newspaper for which Roger Ebert works
the Chicago Sun-Times
He was a film critic for the Chicago Sun-Times from 1967 until his death in 2013.
3
Retrieved April 9, 2013.
He also wrote the following books:  An Illini Century: One Hundred Years of Campus Life (1967) –
This Movie (2000) – a collection of reviews of films that received two stars or less, dating to the beginning of his Sun-Times career.
AFRICA: "Moor" can refer to the Muslims who conquered Spain or to people from this country whose capital is Nouakchott
Mauritania
Nouakchott (,  , originally derived from Berber Nawākšūṭ, "place of the winds") is the capital and by far the largest city of Mauritania.
2
Between 1988 and 1989, racial tensions between Arabs and blacks escalated.
There are many primary and secondary schools, among the most prominent are TLC International School the American International School of Nouakchott and the Lycée Français Théodore Monod.
TRANSPORTATION: In 1887 Canada's Transcontinental Railroad reached from Montreal to this west coast city
Vancouver
The City of Vancouver, incorporated in 1886, was designated the western terminus of the line.
3
It is the world's longest rail line at  long.
Railway Gazette International | month=October | year=2010 | page=63 (with map)  Asia  The Trans-Asian Railway is a project to link Singapore to Istanbul and is to a large degree complete with missing pieces primarily in Myanmar.
When its construction started in the 1880s it was in those times a Transcontinental Railroad.
AUDREY HEPBURN FILM ROLES: Sister Luke
The Nun's Story
Hepburn went on to star in a number of successful films, such as Sabrina (1954), The Nun's Story (1959), Breakfast at Tiffany's (1961), Charade (1963), My Fair Lady (1964) and Wait Until Dark (1967), for which she received Academy Award, Golden Globe and BAFTA nominations.
3
She was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom in recognition of her work as a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador in December 1992.
From audreyhepburnlibrary.com [expired domain].
I think perhaps with time, instead of there being a politicisation of humanitarian aid, there will be a humanisation of politics."
PRIME MINISTERS OF GREAT BRITAIN: Harold Wilson of this party was the last PM to serve 2 nonconsecutive terms, 1964-70 & 1974-76
Labor
Former MI5 officer Peter Wright claimed in his memoirs, Spycatcher, that 30 MI5 agents then collaborated in an attempt to undermine Wilson.
3
Marriage
Increases in the age exemption and dependant relative's income limits benefited the low-income elderly.
He thought that Mountbatten, as a member of the Royal Family and a former Chief of the Defence Staff, would command public support as leader of a non-democratic "emergency" government.
ENGLISH "T": She replaced James Callaghan May 4, 1979
Margaret Thatcher
He responded to the economic crises by adopting deflationary policies to reduce inflation, and cutting public expenditure – a precursor to the monetarist economic policies that the next government, a Conservative one led by Margaret Thatcher, would pursue to ease the crises.
3
His union position at the Inland Revenue Federation brought Callaghan into contact with Harold Laski, the Chairman of the Labour Party's National Executive Committee and an academic at the London School of Economics.
On 14 July, the bank rate was increased again to seven percent.
1978 was a year of economic recovery for Britain, with inflation falling to single digits, unemployment declining during the year, and general living standards going up by more than 8%.A Short History of the Labour Party by Henry Pelling Famously, he strung along the opposition and was expected to make his declaration of election in a broadcast on 7 September 1978.
U.S. PRESIDENTS: A revolving book stand he adapted may be seen at his home, Monticello
Thomas Jefferson
thumb|right|Monticello and its reflection thumb|Some of the gardens on the property Monticello was the primary plantation of Thomas Jefferson, the third President of the United States, who began designing and building Monticello at age 26 after inheriting land from his father.
3
Levy's heirs argued over his estate, but their lawsuits were settled in 1879, when Uriah Levy's nephew, Jefferson Monroe Levy, a prominent New York lawyer, real estate and stock speculator (and later member of Congress), bought out the other heirs for $10,050, and took control of Monticello.
Jefferson's bed opens to two sides: to his cabinet (study) and to his bedroom (dressing room).
On the slope below Mulberry Row, slaves maintained an extensive vegetable garden for Jefferson and the main house.
INTERNATIONAL STARS: Antonio Banderas
Spain
Career  Early work, 1982–90 Banderas began working in small shops during Spain's post-dictatorial cultural movement known as the 'Movida'.
3
José Antonio Domínguez Banderas (born 10 August 1960) is a Spanish actor, director, and producer.
Early life José Antonio Domínguez Banderas was born on 10 August 1960, in the Andalusian town of Benalmádena, the son of José Domínguez, a police officer in the Civil Guard, and Ana Banderas Gallego, a school teacher.http://www.elmundo.es/magazine/m53/textos/avances.html He has a younger brother, Javier.
In 2003, he starred in the last installment of the trilogy
MARKS: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew's got a sword.)  This sword is a replica of the one Antonio Banderas used to leave his mark as this title character in a 1998 film
Zorro
He began his acting career with a series of films by director Pedro Almodóvar and then appeared in high-profile Hollywood movies, especially in the 1990s, including Assassins, Evita, Interview with the Vampire, Philadelphia, Desperado, The Mask of Zorro and Spy Kids.
3
thumb|upright|Banderas with Melanie Griffith at the Shrek Forever
In 2002, the couple's dedication to philanthropy was recognized when they received the 'Stella Adler Angel Award' for their extensive charity work.
According to the petition filed in the Los Angeles Superior Court, the couple had "irreconcilable differences" that led to the divorce.http://www.reuters.com/article/2014/06/06/us-people-melaniegriffith-antoniobandera-idUSKBN0EH27T20140606  In 1996, Banderas appeared among other figures of Spanish culture in a video supporting the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party lists in the general election.
U.S.A.: With fewer people than Houston or Dallas, this TX city is still 1 of the 10 biggest in the U.S.
San Antonio
The city proper ranks ninth in the U.S. and third in Texas after Houston and San Antonio.
3
Dallas is also home to three Eastern Orthodox Christian churches.
Dallas is home of the two other major malls in North Texas, the Dallas Galleria and NorthPark Center, which is the 2nd largest mall in Texas.
Garland Independent School District.
NEW ORLEANS & KATRINA: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from New Orleans, LA.)  The Domino Sugar refinery built a 200-unit trailer park here on-site to house its employees when this "saintly" parish was hit hard by flooding
St. Bernard
The city and parish are bounded by the parishes of St. Tammany to the north, St. Bernard to the east, Plaquemines to the south, and Jefferson to the south and west.
3
Glassman, James K., "New Orleans: I have Seen the Future, and It's Houston", The Atlantic Monthly, July 1978 As the middle class and wealthier members of both races left the center city, its population's income level dropped, and it became proportionately more African American.
The city is located in the Mississippi River Delta on the east and west banks of the Mississippi River and south of Lake Pontchartrain.
Many shipbuilding, shipping, logistics, freight forwarding and commodity brokerage firms either are based in metropolitan New Orleans or maintain a large local presence.
HIGHWAYS & BYWAYS: This New Orleans street name is derived from a never-built waterway connecting Lake Pontchartrain with the Mississippi
Canal Street
thumb|Basin Street looking towards Canal Street - 1977 The New Orleans metropolitan area continued expanding in population, however, just not as rapidly as other major cities in the Sun Belt.
3
Prior to 2005's Hurricane Katrina, there were 265 hotels with 38,338 rooms in the Greater New Orleans Area.
An ordinance in 2006 established an Office of Inspector General for city government.
This longstanding pattern is changing, however, as the NOPS system is engaged in the most promising and far-reaching public school reforms in the nation, reforms aimed at decentralizing power away from the pre-Katrina school board central bureaucracy to individual school principals and independent public charter school boards, monitoring charter school performance by granting renewable, five-year operating contracts permitting the closure of those not succeeding, and vesting choice in parents of public schools students, allowing them to enroll their children in almost any school in the district."Vallas wants no return to old ways", The Times-Picayune, July 25, 2009.
HISTORICAL NOVELS: Adina de Zavala, who barricaded herself inside this San Antonio landmark to save it in 1908, inspired a 1999 novel
The Alamo
The Alamo |image_flag = Flag of San Antonio, Texas.svg |image_seal = Sanantonioseal.jpeg |image_shield             = File:San Antonio, Texas Coat of Arms.svg |image_map = Bexar SanAntonio.svg |mapsize = 250px |map_caption = Location in Bexar County in the state of Texas |pushpin_map = USA |pushpin_relief = yes |pushpin_label = San Antonio |pushpin_label_position = right |pushpin_map_alt = Map of Texas |pushpin_map_caption = Location in Texas |coordinates_region = US-TX |subdivision_type  =
3
; Austin: Presidial Press, 973), p.13  In a series of battles, the Texian Army succeeded in forcing Mexican soldiers out of the settlement areas east of San Antonio, which were dominated by Americans.
Extended an additional 13 miles between 2009-2013, the landscaped walking and bike path line the San Antonio River from the "Museum Reach" beginning at the Historic Pearl Brewery through downtown, "Downtown Reach", past the Blue Star's "Eagleland" to the "Mission Reach" ending at Loop 410 South past Mission San Juan Capistrano.
She is the first African American female to hold the office.
INDIAN GAMING: Long before Jim Thorpe, Roger Williams wrote that Indians "have great meetings of" this game, "town against town"
football
Considered one of the most versatile athletes of modern sports, he won Olympic gold medals in the 1912 pentathlon and decathlon, played American football (collegiate and professional), and also played professional baseball and basketball.
3
All his personal references were either Shawnee (the county seat of Pottawatomie County and about ten miles (16 km) southwest of his birthplace) or "Pott County".
Jim Thorpe, Thomson-Gale, Bookrags, June 2006, Retrieved April 23, 2007 His earliest recorded track and field results come from 1907.
Thorpe never played for an NFL championship team.
THE MOVIES: His 1997 film "Jackie Brown" was the first full feature film he's directed since "Pulp Fiction"
Quentin Tarantino
Pulp Fiction is a 1994 American black comedy crime film written and directed by Quentin Tarantino, from a story by Tarantino and Roger Avary.
3
(One reviewer took it as a "tacit comic statement about the ghettoization of blacks in movies").
Polan (2000), p. 69; Dawson (1995), p. 159.
ISBN 0-19-512350-6
NIGHTS: He was nominated for a Best Actor Oscar for "Saturday Night Fever"
John Travolta
Saturday Night Fever is a 1977 American dance film directed by John Badham and starring John Travolta as Tony Manero, a young man whose weekends are spent visiting a local Brooklyn discotheque; Karen Lynn Gorney as Stephanie Mangano, his dance partner and eventual friend; and Donna Pescow as Annette, Tony's former dance partner and would-be girlfriend.
3
The film is the first example of cross-media marketing, with the tie-in soundtrack's single being used to help promote the film before its release and the film popularizing the entire soundtrack after its release.
The PG-rated version was 112 minutes.
It was added to The New York Times "Guide to the Best 1,000 Movies Ever Made", which was published in 2004.
THEIR MAIN MUSICAL INSTRUMENT: Dizzy Gillespie
trumpet
John Birks "Dizzy" Gillespie (; October 21, 1917 – January 6, 1993) was an American jazz trumpeter, bandleader, composer and occasional singer.
1
This band recorded a live album at the 1957 Newport jazz festival that featured Mary Lou Williams as a guest artist on piano.
'70S TV: This ABC show made its debut on Monday, September 21, 1970 & is still on
Monday Night Football
Wet Monday  Whit Monday  See also   Monday Club  Monday demonstrations  Monday Night Football
3
In Thailand, the day is called Wan Jan, meaning "the day of the Moon god Chandra".
The Portuguese and the Greek (Eastern Orthodox Church) name for Monday reflects this, as do all the days' names except Saturday and Sunday: the Portuguese word for Monday is segunda-feira and the Greek word is Δευτέρα "devtéra" (second in order).
Many businesses owned by Latter-Day Saints close early on Mondays so they and their customers are able to spend more time with their families.
HEY "YA": Slang word for a convict, or a Charlie Parker nickname
yardbird
March 12, 1955), also known as "Yardbird" and "Bird", was an American jazz saxophonist and composer.
3
He was a keen student of classical music, and contemporaries reported he was most interested in the music and formal innovations of Igor Stravinsky and longed to engage in a project akin to what later became known as Third Stream, a new kind of music, incorporating both jazz and classical elements as opposed to merely incorporating a string section into performance of jazz standards.
DialOrnithology3:00Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Parker, C. – Harris, B.143/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNYNo Parker solo DialOrnithology3:15Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Parker, C. – Harris, B.343/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNY DialYOrnithology2:58Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Parker, C. - Harris, B.443/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNY DialA Night in Tunisia (with Famous Alto break)0:47Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Gillespie, D. – Paparelli, F.153/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNYincomplete [Famous Alto Break] DialA Night in Tunisia3:04Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Gillespie, D. – Paparelli, F.453/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNY DialYA Night in Tunisia3:01Charlie Parker SeptetMiles Davis (tpt); Eli "Lucky" Thompson (ts); Arvin Garrison (g); Michael "Dodo" Marmarosa (p); Vic McMillan (b); Roy Porter (d)Gillespie, D. – Paparelli, F.553/28/1946WOR StudioNew YorkNY DialYMax is Making Wax2:29Charlie Parker QuintetHoward McGhee (tpt); Jimmy Bunn (p); Bob Kesterson (b); Roy Porter (d)Pettiford, O.??7/29/1946C.P. MacGregor StudioHollywoodCA DialYLover Man3:18Charlie Parker QuintetHoward McGhee (tpt); Jimmy Bunn (p); Bob Kesterson (b); Roy Porter (d)Davis, J. – Ramirez, R. – Sherman, J.??7/29/1946C.P. MacGregor StudioHollywoodCA DialYThe Gypsy3:01Charlie Parker QuintetHoward McGhee (tpt); Jimmy Bunn (p); Bob Kesterson (b); Roy Porter (d)Reid, B.??7/29/1946C.P. MacGregor StudioHollywoodCA DialYBebop2:52Charlie Parker QuintetHoward McGhee (tpt); Jimmy Bunn (p); Bob Kesterson (b); Roy Porter (d)Gillespie, D.??7/29/1946C.P. MacGregor StudioHollywoodCAAt 0:39 someone (Porter?) yells "Blow!"
Boston, Northeastern University Press.
NUMBER PLEASE: An unlucky Friday or a baker's dozen
13
In modern times, Friday the 13th is considered to be especially unlucky, due to the conjunction of Friday with the unlucky number thirteen.
3
Etymology right|thumb|Frigg spinning the clouds, by John Charles Dollman The name Friday comes from the Old English Frīġedæġ, meaning the "day of  Frige", a result of an old convention associating the Old English goddess Frigg with the Roman goddess Venus, with whom the day is associated in many different cultures.
thumb|top|right|280px|Muslim Friday prayer at a mosque in Malaysia According to some Islamic traditions, the day is stated to be the original holy day ordained by Allah, but that now Jews and Christians recognize the days after.
However, episcopal conferences are now authorized to allow some other form of penance to replace abstinence from meat.
DAYS OF BIRTH: Garrison Keillor might say be gone to Wednesday's child, who's full of this
Woe
The Dutch name for the day, woensdag has the same etymology as English Wednesday, it comes from Middle Dutch wodenesdag, woedensdag ("Wodan's day").
3
It is a calque of Greek , a term first attested, together with the system of naming the seven weekdays after the seven classical planets, in the Anthologiarum by Vettius Valens (ca.
The Finnish name is Keskiviikko ("middle of the week"), as is the Icelandic name: Miðvikudagur, and the Faroese name: Mikudagur ("Mid-week day").
Additionally, Wednesday sometimes appears as a character's name in literary works.
COMPUTER TERMS: When you've got too much data for just 1 of these, try RAID, short for a "redundant array of inexpensive" ones
disks
RAID (originally redundant array of inexpensive disks, now commonly redundant array of independent disks) is a data storage virtualization technology that combines multiple physical disk drive components into a single logical unit for the purposes of data redundancy, performance improvement, or both.
3
Thus, any read request can be serviced by any drive in the set.
Write throughput is always slower because every drive must be updated, and the slowest drive limits the write performance.
For instance, consider a computer whose disk is configured as RAID 1 (mirrored drives); if the first drive in the array fails, then a first-stage boot loader might not be sophisticated enough to attempt loading the second-stage boot loader from the second drive as a fallback.
SAY UNCLE: This "electric" character in "The Addams Family" could light up a light bulb by sticking it in his mouth
Uncle Fester
thumb|From left to right, Pugsley, Wednesday, Gomez, Aristotle the octopus, Uncle Fester, Morticia The Addams Family is a group of fictional characters created by American cartoonist Charles Addams.
3
Veteran character actors Parley Baer and Vito Scotti, who both had recurring roles in the original series, also appeared in the movie.
Halloween is nigh, and Pancho tells the children the legend of the Great Pumpkin-like character of Cousin Shy, who distributes gifts and carves pumpkins for good children on Halloween night.
Category:Comics adapted into television series Category:Comics adapted into animated series Category:Comics adapted into plays Category:Comics adapted into films Category:Comics adapted into video games  ja:アダムス・ファミリー no:Familien Addams pt:A Família Addams sv:Familjen Addams
HAIFA LOAF: Haifa is the world center of this religion founded in Persia in the mid-19th century
Bahá'í Faith
(1886) Haifa, or Life in Modern Palestine Adamant Media Corporation pp 11-12  thumb|Shrine of the Báb and the Bahá'í gardens on Mount Carmel In 1909, Haifa became important to the Bahá'í Faith when the remains of the Báb, founder of the Bábí Faith and forerunner of Bahá'u'lláh in the Bahá'í Faith, were moved from Acre to Haifa and interred in the shrine built on Mount Carmel.
3
Haifa's main tourist attraction is the Bahá'í World Centre, with the golden-domed Shrine of the Báb and the surrounding gardens.
5% were in special education.
With a single track, six stations and two trains, it is listed in Guinness World Records as the world's shortest metro line.
HISTORIC NAMES: As a teenager this dictator tried to get into the Academy of Fine Arts in Vienna, but failed twice
Adolf Hitler
In 1913, Adolf Hitler, Leon Trotsky, Joseph Tito, Sigmund Freud and Joseph Stalin all lived within a few miles of each other in central Vienna, some of them being regulars at the same coffeehouses.
3
Here, the Soviet forces controlled districts 2, 4, 10, 20, 21 and 22 and all areas incorporated into Vienna in 1938.
In 2001 the SPÖ regained the overall majority with 52 seats and 46.91% of the vote; in October 2005 this majority was increased further to 55 seats (49.09%).
For readers seeking family histories these are good sources of information.
AFRICAN GEOGRAPHY: The town of Koudougou is west of Ouagadougou in this country
Burkina Faso
Ouagadougou (; Mossi: ) is the capital of Burkina Faso and the administrative, communications, cultural and economic centre of the nation.
2
Retrieved 19 March 2006 from http://www.mairie-Ouaga.bf  Transport thumb|Ouagadougou train station Many residents travel on motorcycles and mopeds.
The economy is dominated by the informal sector, which is characterized by petty commodity production, and workers not necessarily having salaries.
BULL: In about 1867 he was made principal chief of several Sioux tribes
Sitting Bull
Descendants of Sitting Bull and Crazy Horse break away from US, Agence France-Presse news The group considers Lakota to be a sovereign nation, although as yet the state is generally unrecognized.
3
By 1700 some had migrated to present-day South Dakota.
Oglala Lakota Chief  Tȟašúŋke Kȟokípȟapi (Young Man Afraid Of His Horses) —
Sisseton Wahpeton Oyate  Standing Rock Sioux Tribe of North & South Dakota  Yankton Sioux Tribe of South Dakota  Legacy A Manitoba Historical Plaque was erected at the Spruce Woods Provincial Park by the province to commemorate Assiniboin (Nakota) First Nation's role in Manitoba's heritage.
TOWNS & CITIES: This South Dakota capital was first known as Mahto, Sioux for "bear"
Pierre
Later visiting French traders and missionaries included Claude-Jean Allouez, Daniel Greysolon Duluth, and Pierre-Charles Le Sueur who wintered with Dakota bands in early 1700.
3
However, this Proto-Algonquian term most likely was ultimately derived from a form *-a·towe·, meaning simply "to speak a foreign language", which would make it similar to the etymology of the Greek "Barbarian".
It is within this context that the military service of the Pawnee Scouts must be viewed."Mark van de Logt (2012). "War Party in Blue: Pawnee Scouts in the U.S. Army".
Miniconjou Lakota chief    Kȟaŋǧí Yátapi (Crow King/Medicine Bag That Burns) — Hunkpapa Lakota war chief  Wicasa Tankala (Little Big Man/Charging Bear) —
MOVIE QUOTES: "Help me, Obi-Wan Kenobi.  You're my only hope"
Star Wars
Obi-Wan Kenobi (later known as Ben Kenobi) is a fictional character and former Templar of Corucant in Star Wars universe, played by Sir Alec Guinness and Ewan McGregor.
3
Obi-Wan is nearly killed alongside Qui-Gon in the ensuing duel, although he manages to turn the tables and defeat Maul, sending him plunging down a vast reactor shaft to his supposed death.
The Jedi Apprentice books follow his adventures as Qui-Gon's Padawan.
The street was named in 2005.
REALLY TOUGH WHEEL OF FORTUNE PUZZLES: ON THE MAP: This country whose capital is Astana became a republic of the USSR in 1936
Kazakhstan
Astana (, ;  ) is the capital of Kazakhstan.
3
By 2007, Astana's population has more than doubled since becoming the capital, to over 600,000, and it is estimated to top 1 million by 2030.
North of the railway line, which crosses Astana in an east-west direction, are industrial and poorer residential areas.
The oldest university in Astana is the S.Seifullin Kazakh Agro Technical University founded in 1957.
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: You'll find this African country's national museum in its capital, Kampala
Uganda
Kampala is the capital and largest city of Uganda.
3
The fifth is Lubaga Hill, where the Rubaga Catholic Cathedral is and where the headquarters of the White Fathers were.
Kampala is also known for its nightlife,A Night Out in Kampala, the City
The city's ethnic makeup has been defined by political and economic factors.
SHE MARRIED A ROCKER: This model spent most of the '90s married to Mick Jagger
Jerry Hall
Nicholas Fonseca, Limited Engagement, Entertainment Weekly  In late 1977 Jagger began seeing model Jerry Hall; they moved in together and had four children.
3
By autumn 1963 Jagger had left the London School of Economics in favour of his promising musical career with the Rolling Stones.
"People of the Day 2, Volume 2".
Hells Angels  In 2008 it was revealed that members of the Hells Angels had plotted to murder Jagger in 1975.
"MY" OH, MY!: This nation's capital city is Yangon
Myanmar
Yangon (, MLCTS rankun mrui, ; also known as Rangoon, literally: "End of Strife") is a former capital of Myanmar (Burma) and the capital of Yangon Region.
3
Colonial Rangoon thumb|300px|Yangon and Environ map, 1911  thumb|left|A view of the Cantonment Gardens (now Kandaw Minglar Garden) in 1868.
Two grounds were used to host these matches, the BAA Ground and the Gymkhana Ground.
Education  thumb|University of Medicine 1 Yangon has the best educational facilities and the highest number of qualified teachers in Burma where state spending on education is among the lowest in the world.
JOHNNY, TELL THEM WHAT THEY'VE WON: After winning the 3rd Punic War, you deserve a little sack for what you pillage from this city that was near current Tunis
Carthage
Beyond this district lie the suburbs of Carthage, La Marsa, and Sidi Bou Said.
3
p. 18
p. 608
In the early 14th century, Hafsid Darba Abû al-Muhammad al-Mustansir Lihyânî ordered the construction of a second chamber including the Medina and two suburbs outside.
THE INDY 5: After moving to Indianapolis in 1854 this future pres. became a deacon & elder at the First Presbyterian Church
Benjamin Harrison
Indiana World War Memorial Plaza Landmark for Peace Memorial Medal of Honor Memorial Project 9/11 Indianapolis Soldiers' and Sailors' Monument USS Indianapolis Memorial  Other heritage and history attractions Benjamin Harrison Home Cole-Noble District Crown Hill Cemetery Indianapolis City Market James Whitcomb Riley Museum Home Lockerbie Square Madame Walker Theatre Center Morris-Butler House Saints Peter and Paul Cathedral Scottish Rite Cathedral  Performing arts thumb|Indiana Repertory Theatre in 2012.
3
Of the total households, 59.3 percent were family households, with 28.2 percent of these including the family's own children under the age of 18; 36.5 percent were husband-wife families; 17.2 percent had a female householder (with no husband present) and 5.6 percent had a male householder (with no wife present).
Fortune 1000 companies based in the Indianapolis metropolitan area included Simon Property Group (529), CNO Financial Group (608), hhgregg (914), and Allison Transmission Holdings (974).
Italian IndyCar manufacturer Dallara opened in Speedway in 2012.
COUNTRIES' LARGEST ISLANDS: Sakhalin
Russia
Sakhalin (, ) is a large Russian island in the North Pacific Ocean, lying between 45°50' and 54°24' N.
1
Japan has granted mutual exchange visas for Japanese and Ainu families divided by the change in status.
MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS: Lawrence Welk was nicknamed "The Liberace of" this musical instrument
Accordion
May 17, 1992) was an American musician, accordionist, bandleader, and television impresario, who hosted The Lawrence Welk Show from 1951 to 1982.
3
Welk described his band's sound, saying "We still play music with the champagne style, which means light and rhythmic.
The same year, he began producing The Lawrence Welk Show on KTLA in Los Angeles, where it was broadcast from the Aragon Ballroom in Venice Beach.
One notable showcase was his album with the noted jazz saxophonist Johnny Hodges.
ARMY STRONG: Its army has about 30,000 permanent troops, with about 11,000 stationed in Queensland
Australia
Queensland (abbreviated as Qld) is the second-largest and third-most-populous state in Australia.
2
Climate thumb|left|Great Sandy Strait from orbit Because of its size, there is significant variation in climate across the state.
There are large coal export facilities at Hay Point / Dalrymple Bay, Gladstone and Abbot Point.
IT'S A DOG'S LIFE: An excellent watchdog, this breed is named for a town on northern Honshu island
Akita
Aomori Prefecture, Iwate Prefecture, Miyagi Prefecture, Akita Prefecture, Yamagata Prefecture, Fukushima Prefecture.
3
Its area has been expanding with land reclamation and coastal uplift in the north, but global sea level rise has diminished these effects.
In addition to Mt. Fuji, the Japanese Alps are a feature of Honshu.
Natural features    Minerals  Yields of zinc, copper, and oil have been found on Honshu.
IN JOE PATERNO'S FIRST YEAR: Secretary of State Rusk visited this capital to assure South Vietnam we wouldn't sell it out
Saigon
Its capital was Saigon.
3
In July 1954, France and the Viet Minh (later the Viet Cong) agreed at the Geneva Conference that the State of Vietnam would rule the territory south of the 17th parallel, pending unification on the basis of supervised elections in 1956.
thumb|left|200px|President Johnson conferring with South Vietnamese President Nguyễn Văn Thiệu in July 1968.
The country made no significant economic progress for the next twenty years.
ET AL: He parodied Nirvana's "Smells Like Teen Spirit" by singing "Smells Like Nirvana"
"Weird Al" Yankovic
The video has been parodied at least twice: in "Weird Al" Yankovic's music video for "Smells Like Nirvana" and in Bob Sinclar's 2006 music video for "Rock This Party (Everybody Dance Now)".
3
The guitar chords were double tracked because the band "wanted to make it sound more powerful," according to Vig.
However, campus radio and modern rock radio stations picked up on the track, and placed it on heavy rotation.
In the wake of Nirvana's success, Michael Azerrad wrote in a 1992 Rolling Stone article, Smells Like Teen Spirit' is an anthem for (or is it against?) the 'Why Ask Why?' generation.
MUSICAL GROUPS: Clarence Clemons & Max Weinberg were part of this longtime Bruce Springsteen backup band
The E Street Band
With the addition of pianist David Sancious, the core of what would later become the E Street Band was formed, with occasional temporary additions such as horn sections, "The Zoomettes" (a group of female backing vocalists for "Dr. Zoom") and Southside Johnny Lyon on harmonica.
3
Lyrical themes  Often described as cinematic in their scope, Springsteen's lyrics frequently explore highly personal themes such as individual commitment, dissatisfaction and dismay with life in a context of every day situations.
|- | "Wings for Wheels: The Making of Born to Run" | Best Long Form Music Video |- | style="text-align:center;"
Lawrence Kirsch Communications.
AROUND THE USA: This Calif. city's Transamerica Pyramid stands on the site of the Exchange Saloon where Mark Twain once imbibed
San Francisco
The Transamerica Pyramid is the tallest skyscraper in the San Francisco skyline.
1
The aluminum cap is indirectly illuminated from within to balance the appearance at night.
JUDGES: On Oct. 29, 1969 at a trial in this city, Judge Hoffman ordered Bobby Seale bound & gagged
Chicago
Bobby Seale was one of the original "Chicago Eight" defendants charged with conspiracy and inciting to riot, in the wake of the 1968 Democratic National Convention, in Chicago.
3
The New Haven trials were accompanied by a large demonstration in New Haven on May Day, 1970, which coincided with the beginning of the American college Student Strike of 1970.
The Shadow of the Panther:
Addison-Wesley, 1994.
HELLO, LARRY: Born Lawrence Zeiger, he made his CNN debut in 1985
Larry King
The program's former timeslot was later occupied by Larry King Live.
3
Time Warner:
A business program, hosted by Tom Cassidy, featuring news and interviews with industry leaders.
The Point with Greta Van Susteren  2001–2002
ISLANDS: Together with South Island, it makes up most of the area of New Zealand
North Island
The South Island or Te Waipounamu is the larger of the two major islands of New Zealand, the other being the smaller but more populous North Island.
3
The drawings are estimated to be between 500 and 800 years old, and portray animals, people and fantastic creatures, possibly stylised reptiles.
Secession movements have surfaced several times in the South Island.
It accommodates around 320 male prisoners of minimum to low-medium security classifications and includes Kia Marama a sixty-bed unit that provides an intensive 9-month treatment programme for male child sex offenders.
FILMS OF THE '80s: Susan Sarandon, Michelle Pfeiffer & Cher were this title group
The Witches of Eastwick
She finally scored a major box-office hit as Sukie Ridgemont in the 1987 adaptation of John Updike's novel The Witches of Eastwick, alongside Jack Nicholson, Cher and Susan Sarandon.
3
Her performance won her widespread acclaim; Hal Hinson of the Washington Post saw Pfeiffer's role as "the least obvious and the most difficult.
She appeared as her character in the music video for the soundtrack's lead single, 'Gangsta's Paradise' by Coolio (featuring L.V.), which was used by the producer Jerry Bruckheimer for television advertising.
Pfeiffer also did voice work in two animated films during this period, voicing Tzipporah in The Prince of Egypt (1998), in which she introduced the Academy Award–winning song, 'When You Believe', and Eris in Sinbad: Legend of the Seven Seas (2003).
OLD MOVIES: "Corny" 1945 film with Bette Davis as a devoted Welsh schoolteacher
The Corn is Green
The Corn Is Green (1945).
3
Success with Warner Bros. (1937–1941) Davis began work on Marked Woman (1937), as a prostitute in a contemporary gangster drama inspired by the case of Lucky Luciano.
247–48 The film marked her first comedy in several years and earned her some positive reviews; but it was not particularly popular with audiences and returned only a small profit.
She continued acting for television, appearing in Family Reunion (1981) opposite her grandson J. Ashley Hyman, A Piano for Mrs. Cimino (1982) and Right of Way (1983) with James Stewart.
NONFICTION: In 1980 lefty scholar Howard Zinn published this type of "History of the United States"
A People's History
A People's History of the United States.
3
Public Broadcasting Service (PBS).
615–68  However, the fervor also inspired anti-Japanese sentiment, which was handled by removing everyone of Japanese descent from the West Coast war zone.
Donald T. Critchlow, Phyllis Schlafly and Grassroots Conservatism: A Woman's Crusade (2005)Jane J. Mansbridge, Why We Lost the ERA (1986)  However, many federal laws (i.e., those equalizing pay, employment, education, employment opportunities, and credit; ending pregnancy discrimination; and requiring NASA, the Military Academies, and other organizations to admit women), state laws (i.e., those ending spousal abuse and marital rape), Supreme Court rulings (i.e. ruling that the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment applied to women), and state ERAs established women's equal status under the law, and social custom and consciousness began to change, accepting women's equality.
THE ANATOMY OF EVEL: In 1976 Evel Knievel had a farewell to these, breaking both in an attempt to jump a tank full of sharks
Arms
Although Knievel broke his arms, he was more distraught over, what he claimed was a permanent eye injury his accident caused, to cameraman Thomas Geren.
3
Upon hearing that Tonning had been fired, Knievel contacted Combined's Vice President Matt Walsh.
After the crash, despite breaking his pelvis, Knievel addressed the audience and announced his retirement by stating, "Ladies and gentlemen of this wonderful country, I've got to tell you that you are the last people in the world who will ever see me jump.
and Johnny Carson's Tonight Show.
"HO" POURRI: Errol Flynn was born in this Tasmanian capital in 1909
Hobart
Flynn was born in Hobart, Tasmania, where his father, Theodore Thomson Flynn, was a lecturer (1909) and later professor (1911) of biology at the University of Tasmania.
3
Higgins, B. Errol Flynn Stood Trial for Statutory Rape in 1934.
Be 'in like Flynn' to 10 days of events!
In 2009, the Port Antonio mega-yacht marina in the north-eastern coast of Jamaica underwent a name change to the Errol Flynn Marina.
1960s OSCAR NOMINEES: Paul Scofield was nominated for best actor (& won) for playing him in "A Man for All Seasons"
Thomas More
Outside his homeland, Scofield is best known for his Academy and BAFTA Award- winning performance as Sir Thomas More in the 1966 film A Man for All Seasons.
3
For a moment we wondered who this stranger was and why he was wandering onto our stage.
The horses shied and broke into a gallop.
Eight sides, SRS 232 (first published 1963).A Midsummer Night's Dream, directed by Howard Sackler, with Barbara Jefford, Joy Parker, John Stride, etc.
THE DALLAS COWBOYS: This "Dandy" guy still holds the team record for longest pass completion, a 95-yarder to Bob Hayes in 1966
Don Meredith
In the 1966 game, on the last meaningful play of the game, Hayes missed an assignment of blocking linebacker Dave Robinson, which resulted in Don Meredith nearly being sacked by Robinson and as a result throwing a desperation pass into the end zone that was intercepted by Tom Brown.
3
The next year he broke the record with a time of 9.1, a record that would not be broken for eleven years (until Ivory Crockett ran a 9.0 in 1974).
His time was recorded at 9.91 seconds.
Gettysburg Times.
HODGEPODGE: Yeoman, as in Yeoman of the Guard, is probably a contraction of forms of these two words
Young Man
It may be a contraction of Old English iunge man, meaning "young man" (compare knave, meaning "boy"), but there are alternative suggestions, such as derivation from an otherwise unattested *geaman (Old Frisian gaman, from gea- "province") meaning "villager; rustic".
3
The later sense of yeoman as "a commoner who cultivates his own land" is recorded from the 15th century; in military context, yeoman was the rank of the third order of fighting men, below knights and squires, but above knaves.
In Southern areas where land was poor, like East Tennessee,The difficulty yeoman farmers faced in this region was notorious enough that it inspired the lyrics "Corn don't grow at all on Rocky Top; dirt's too rocky by far" in Rocky Top, now one of Tennessee's state songs.
Whether they engaged in subsistence or commercial agriculture, they controlled far more modest landholdings than those of the planters, typically in the range of 50-200 acres.
ISLANDS: At 40,420 square miles, Luzon is this nation's largest island
the Philippines
Luzon  is the largest and most populous island in the Philippines and the 15th largest in the world.
2
These mountains extend to the sea in the north, forming the Lingayen Gulf, and to the south, forming the Bataan Peninsula.
ofprovinces(includingassociated islands*)Cities andmunicipalities      90pxIlocos Region(Region I)4,748,37213,055San Fernando(La Union)90pxCagayan Valley(Region II)3,229,16331,159Tuguegarao90pxCentral Luzon(Region III)10,137,73721,543San Fernando(Pampanga)90pxCALABARZON(Region IV-A)12,609,80316,368.12Calamba90pxMIMAROPA(Region IV-B)2,744,67129,621Calapan90pxBicol Region(Region V)5,420,41118,054.3Legazpi90pxCordilleraAdministrativeRegion(CAR)1,616,86719,294Baguio90pxNationalCapitalRegion(NCR)11,855,975638.55Manila'''N/A'''Region  2010Census  Area  Regionalcenter  Provinces  Cities andmunicipalitiesThe list includes the associated islands of Luzon.
ALSO AT THE 2000 GRAMMYS: Los Palominos won for Best Performance in this Mexican-American style made famous by Selena
Tejano
Called the Queen of Tejano music, her contributions to music and fashion made her one of the most celebrated Mexican-American entertainers of the late 20th century.
3
Selena became a sex icon; she was often criticized for wearing suggestive outfits in light of her comments about being a role model for young women.
Its popularity grew in Mexico, where a compilation album bearing the single's name was released there.
Quintanilla, Jr. took the claims seriously; he told Selena to "be careful" and said Saldívar may not be a good influence.
SIR ARTHUR CONAN DOYLE: This popular 1894 play written by Sir Arthur shares its name with a Belgian town where Napoleon met defeat
Waterloo
The Allies formed a Seventh Coalition, which ultimately defeated Napoleon at the Battle of Waterloo in June.
3
He maintained his strategic status through a series of alliances and family appointments.
Bourrienne, Memoirs of Napoleon, p.38.
By the Russian campaign in 1812, however, Napoleon seems to have lost his verve.
POETRY: "Portrait of the Artist as a Young Dog" is a collection of stories about this poet's youth in Wales
Dylan Thomas
At the same time the post war period saw the emergence of one of the most notable and popular Welsh writers of the 20th century; Dylan Thomas one of the most innovative poets of his time.
3
When in 1908 the Miners' Federation of Great Britain became affiliated to the Labour Party, the four Labour candidates sponsored by miners were all elected as MPs.
But he does not have a role in the governance of Wales, even though his title might suggest that he does."  Government and politics  thumb|The
From Ortelius:
MOVIE MANIA: Brendan Fraser, not co-star Alicia Silverstone, was "clueless" in this retro 1999 comedy
Blast from the Past
Also released in 1997 was Excess Baggage, the first movie by Silverstone's production, Silverstone starred in the Saturn Award-nominated romance/comedy film Blast from the Past which also stars Brendan Fraser, Christopher Walken and Sissy Spacek.
3
As a result, she signed a deal with Columbia-TriStar valued between $8 and $10 million.
It was not picked up for production.
Silverstone bought the house, shared with a "menagerie of rescued dogs", in 1996.
TEAM SPORTS: Hockey's Colorado Avalanche once played for this city, birthplace of their star Patrick Roy
Quebec City
Though first awarded to a group in San Francisco, the team quickly moved to Quebec City when the California deal soured because of financial and arena problems.
3
Among teams in the five major North American professional sports leagues, only the National Football League (NFL)'s Washington Redskins have also accomplished the feat.
The Avalanche advanced through the first two rounds of the playoffs winning 4–3 against the Los Angeles Kings and 4–3 against the San Jose Sharks.
Patrick Roy won the William M. Jennings Trophy, given to the goaltenders of the team with fewest goals scored against.
HAWAIIAN AGRICULTURE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew presents the clue from a jungle on Maui.)  Hawaii, the only U.S. state with a true tropical one of these environments, grows most of the USA's macadamias, which originated in the same type of environment when it covered much of Australia
rainforest
Maui is home to a large rainforest on the northeastern flanks of Haleakalā, which serves as the drainage basin for the rest of the island.
3
Maui is part of a much larger unit, Maui Nui, that includes the islands of Lānai, Kahoolawe, Molokai, and the now submerged Penguin Bank.
Humpbacks are an endangered species protected by U.S. federal and Hawaii state law.
King Kamehameha
SPORTS SUPERSTARS: (Hi, I'm Kareem Abdul-Jabbar.) 3 NBA players have officially blocked over 3,000 shots in their career: myself, Mark Eaton & this Houston Rockets star
Hakeem Olajuwon
In 1984, the Rockets drafted center Hakeem Olajuwon, who would be paired with 7'4" Ralph Sampson, forming one of the tallest front courts in the NBA. Nicknamed the "Twin Towers", they led the team to the 1986 NBA Finals—the second NBA Finals berth in franchise history—where Houston was again defeated by the Boston Celtics.
3
They played in the arena for four years, before occupying The Summit in 1975.
Steve Francis (7,281) 12.
Tracy McGrady (6,888)  13.
COMPANY NAME ORIGINS: Mitch Kapor named this computer software company after the yoga position also known as the padmasana
Lotus
is an entrepreneur best known for promoting the first spreadsheet Visicalc, and later founding Lotus, where he was instrumental in developing the Lotus 1-2-3 spreadsheet.
2
In 2003, Mitch became the founding Chair of the Mozilla Foundation, creator of the open source web browser Firefox.
Diversity in technology  In August 2015, Mitch and Freada announced they would invest $40 million over three years to accelerate their work to make the tech ecosystem more inclusive.
A PRINCELY CATEGORY: William Phipps voiced this character in Disney's "Cinderella"
Prince Charming
In the traditional pantomime version the opening scene takes place in a forest with a hunt in progress; here Cinderella first meets Prince Charming and his "right-hand man" Dandini, whose name and character come from Gioachino Rossini's opera (La Cenerentola).
3
Cinderelma then gets a job as a seamstress, later opens her own dress shop, and marries a young printer who owns the shop next door to hers.
The Cinderella motif may well have originated in classical antiquity.
After the king finds out he puts Patzzi to death and feeds her to the unknowing stepmother.
CRAFTS: Louis Comfort Tiffany made lampshades of this material using the copper foil technique
Stained Glass
Louis Comfort Tiffany (February 18, 1848 – January 17, 1933) was an American artist and designer who worked in the decorative arts and is best known for his work in stained glass.
3
He is the American artist most associated with the Art Nouveau Lander, David. "The Buyable Past: Quezal Glass" American Heritage (April/May 2006) and Aesthetic movements.
(The First Presbyterian Church building of 1905 in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania is unique in that it uses Tiffany windows that partially make use of painted glass.)
The Haworth Art Gallery in Accrington, England contains a collection of over 140 examples of the work of Louis Comfort Tiffany, including vases, tiles, lamps and mosaics.
ROMANCE NOVELIST HISTORY BOOK: Odysseus had been gone 20 years, even after she'd given him a son, Telemachus.  Yet she knew someday, Odie would return
Penelope
upright|thumb|Telemachus departing from Nestor, painting by Henry Howard (1769–1847) Telemachus ( ; , Tēlemakhos, literally "far-fighter") is a figure in Greek mythology, the son of Odysseus and Penelope, and a central character in Homer's Odyssey.
3
(Hom. Od.
p. 1796; Dict.
Telemachus was the subject of numerous operas throughout the eighteenth century, most based on Fénelon's version.
1997 ANNIVERSARIES: 1997 marks the 75th anniversary of Sir Frederick Banting & Charles Best's discovery of this pancreatic hormone
Insulin
Sir Frederick Grant Banting, KBE, MC, FRS, FRSC (November 14, 1891February 21, 1941) was a Canadian medical scientist, physician, painter and Nobel laureate noted as the first person that used insulin on humans.
2
After failing his first year, he petitioned to join the medical program in 1912 and was accepted.
The dispute centred around the future use of the 40 ha (100 acre) property and its buildings.
ONE KNOWS: One knows in January 2000 1 of the 3 Wilson volleyballs used in this film sold at auction for $18,400
Cast Away
James Wilson (House), from the TV show House  George Everett Wilson, from the comic strip Dennis the Menace  Wilson the Wonder Athlete, from the British story papers and comics published by D.C. Thomson & Co.  Wilson the Volleyball, from the film Cast Away  Wilson, king in the Gamehendge saga by the rock band Phish  Wilson, a red diesel engine from the TV series  Chuggington  Wilson, the main character from the video game Don't Starve   Other uses   The Wilson, new name of Cheltenham Art Gallery & Museum in England  Wilson's School, boys' grammar school in Wallington, London, UK  Wilson (1944 film), 1944 biographical film about President Woodrow Wilson  Wilson (2016 film), an upcoming film directed by Craig Johnson  "Wilson" (House episode), a 2009 episode of the Fox television series House  Wilson Ornithological Society  Wilson reading system  Wilson's theorem in mathematics  Wilson gearbox, or preselector gearbox  Wilson (crater), lunar crater near plain Clavius on the Moon's near side
1
Wilson may refer to:   Name  Wilson (surname)  List of people with surname Wilson  List of people with given name Wilson  Leaders  Woodrow Wilson, U.S. president, 1913 to 1921  Harold Wilson, British prime minister during the 1960s and 1970s   Places   Australia   Wilson, Western Australia  Wilson Inlet, Western Australia  Wilson Reef, Queensland   Canada   Wilson Avenue (Toronto), Ontario  Wilson (TTC) subway station  Wilson Subway Yard   Poland   Wilson Square (Plac Wilsona), in Warsaw   United Kingdom   Wilson, Leicestershire   United States of America   Wilson, Arkansas  Wilson, Indiana  The Wilson, listed on the NRHP in Indiana  Wilson, Kansas  Wilson, Louisiana  Wilson (town), New York  Wilson, New York (village within the town)  Wilson, North Carolina  Wilson, Ohio  Wilson, Oklahoma  Wilson, Pennsylvania  Wilson, South Carolina  Wilson, Texas  Wilson, Kaufman County, Texas, an unincorporated community  Wilson, Wisconsin (disambiguation), several places  Wilson, Wyoming  Wilson Avenue (BMT Canarsie Line) subway station in New York City  Mouth of Wilson, Virginia  Mount Wilson, California   Lists of places with Wilson in the name   Lake Wilson (disambiguation)  List of peaks named Mount Wilson  Wilson County (disambiguation)  Wilson Township (disambiguation)  Wilsonville (disambiguation)   Medicine   Wilson's disease, a hereditary disease characterized by the accumulation of copper in tissue  Wilson's temperature syndrome, a contested form of thyroid deficiency in alternative medicine circles   Botany and zoology   Wilson's bird-of-paradise  Wilson's magnolia (Magnolia wilsonii)  Wilson's phalarope  Wilson's plover  Wilson's snipe  Wilson's spiny mouse  Wilson's storm petrel  Wilson's warbler   Companies   Wilson (company), Norwegian shipping company  Wilson Sporting Goods, company that manufactures and markets sports equipment  Wilson's (Mint Cake), one of three companies that manufacture Kendal mint cake  H. J. Wilson Co., aka Wilson's, a defunct catalog showroom chain  O. G. Wilson, a defunct catalog showroom chain owned by Zale Corporation  Wilson's Leather   Fictional characters   Sergeant Arthur Wilson, from the TV show Dad's Army  Wilson (Home Improvement), from the TV show Home Improvement
COUNTRY: It's where you'll find Kerry's lovely lakes of Killarney
Ireland
County Kerry is a county in the southwest of Ireland.
1
South Kerry (UK Parliament constituency)
PLAY FASTER!: At a setting of 70, you're in this tempo; Samuel Barber wrote one "for Strings"
adagio
He is one of the most celebrated composers of the 20th century: music critic Donal Henahan stated that "Probably no other American composer has ever enjoyed such early, such persistent and such long-lasting acclaim."  His Adagio for Strings (1936) has earned a permanent place in the concert repertory of orchestras.
3
19, LP recording, 10-inch, London LPS 334 (New York and London: London Records, 1951); reissued as Samuel Barber: Symphony
He was elected a Fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1961.
Oxford and New York: Oxford University Press ISBN 0-19-869164-5
MOVING PICTURES: A veritable feast for Pixar in 2007
Ratatouille
Most of Pixar's films have been nominated for the Academy Award for Best Animated Feature, since its inauguration in 2001, with seven winning; this includes Finding Nemo and Toy Story 3, along with The Incredibles (2004), Ratatouille (2007), WALL-E (2008), Up (2009), and Brave (2012).
3
Only after learning from New York critics that Toy Story would probably be a hit—and confirming that Disney would distribute it for the 1995 Christmas season—did he decide to give Pixar another chance.
A large number of animators that make up the animation department at Pixar were hired around the time Pixar released A Bug's Life (1998) and Toy Story 2 (1999).
The exhibition moved to three Spanish cities later in 2014 and 2015: Madrid (held in CaixaForum from March 21 until June 22), Barcelona (held also in Caixaforum from February until May) and Zaragoza.
IT'S A GROUP THING: Sometimes these goddesses of destiny are identified as Clotho, Lachesis & Atropos
the Fates
The Fooling of the Fates   Clotho, along with the other two Fates, was tricked into becoming intoxicated by Alcestis.
3
Clotho brought him back to life, with the exemption of his eaten shoulder, which was replaced by a chunk of ivory.
The Calydonian Boar Hunt
The Facts on File Encyclopedia of World Mythology and Legend.
SHAKESPEAREAN TRIVIA: Operas based on this comedy include "Hermione", "Perdita" & "Ein Wintermaerchen"
The Winter's Tale
Hermione may refer to:  People  Hermione (given name), a female given name  Hermione (mythology), only daughter of Menelaus and Helen in Greek mythology and original bearer of the name  Hermione Gingold, actress  Arts and Literature  Cadmus et Hermione, an opera by Jean-Baptiste Lully  Hermione, a character in Shakespeare's The Winter's Tale  HERmione, a novel by American poet, Hilda "H.D." Doolittle  Hermione Granger, a main character in the Harry Potter novels and films  Letter to Hermione, a song from the album Space Oddity by David Bowie  Ships  French ship Hermione, twelve ships of the French Navy  French frigate Hermione (1779), a French frigate that carried La Fayette to join the American fight for independence in 1780  French frigate Hermione (2014), a replica of the 1779 original, built in France from 1996 to 2012, launched in 2014.
3
, four ships of the Royal Navy, the crew of the first of which mutinied, killing the captain and most of the officers before handing the ship over to the enemy.
Spanish frigate Hermione, captured by the British Navy with a notably valuable cargo in the action of 31 May 1762.
Hermione), a genus of moth in the family Geometridae  Ermioni, a resort town in Greece originally called Hermione  Hermione (Tallulah, Louisiana), a Greek Revival building built in 1855 in Tallulah, Louisiana  Hermiones, The Irminones, a group of early Germanic tribes  Hotspot Ecosystem Research and Man's Impact On European Seas (HERMIONE), an EU-funded deep-sea research project  Sony Ericsson P990, a mobile phone codenamed Hermione  USS Hawk (IX-14), formerly called Hermione  See also Hermine (disambiguation)  cs:Hermiona (jméno) pl:Hermiona (imię)
CANNES: Also known as the Cote D'Azur, it's the coastal strip where you'll find Cannes
French Riviera
Cannes (, , in Occitan Canas) is a city located on the French Riviera.
3
Climate Cannes has a Mediterranean climate (Köppen climate classification: either Csa or Csb ) and the city enjoys 12 hours of sunshine per day during summer (May to September), while in winter (December to February) the weather is mild.
Landmarks The Promenade de la Croisette is the waterfront avenue with palm trees.
Bus Coach services arrive at the Gare Routière de Cannes, in the centre of the city, near the Town Hall.
AUTHORS: His 1885 work "King Solomon's Mines" was suggested by the ruins at Zimbabwe
H. Rider Haggard
King Solomon's Mines (1885) is a popular novel by the Victorian adventure writer and fabulist Sir H. Rider Haggard.
3
Thomson was so outraged at Haggard's alleged plagiarism that he published a novel of his own, Ulu: an African Romance, which, however, failed to sell.
The Englishmen join Ignosi's army in a furious battle.
Around the same period an Australian animated TV film came out, King Solomon's Mines.
BIBLICAL ART: Claude Lorrain painted a landscape with the marriage of Rebecca & him
Isaac
The Disembarkation of Cleopatra at Tarsus (1642–43) - Oil on canvas, 119 x 170 cm, Musée du Louvre, Paris The Trojan Women Setting Fire to their Fleet - Metropolitan Museum of Art, NY  Brook and Two Bridges - Oil on canvas, 74 x 58 cm,  Voyage of Jacob The Angel's Visit View of the Church Santa Trinità Dei Monti - drawing, Hermitage Museum, St. Petersburg Seaport with Castle - Howard University Gallery of Art, Washington D.C.  View of Tivoli at Sunset (1644)  – San Francisco Museum of Art  Mercury Stealing Apollo's Oxen (1645) - Oil on canvas, 55 x 45 cm, Galleria Doria-Pamphilj, Rome Landscape with Cephalus and Procris reunited by Diana (1645) - Oil on canvas, 102 x 132 cm, National Gallery, London The Judgement of Paris (1645–46) - National Gallery of Art at Washington D.C.  Sunrise (1646–47) - Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York  Embarkation of the Queen of Sheba (1648) - National Gallery, London  Marriage of Isaac and Rebekah (1648) - National Gallery, London  Landscape with Paris and Oenone (1648) - Oil on canvas, 119 x 150 cm, Musée du Louvre, Paris Landscape with Dancing Figures (The Mill) (1648) - Oil on canvas, 150,6 x 197,8 cm, Galleria Doria-Pamphili, Rome View of La Crescenza (1648–50)  - Oil on canvas, 38.7 x 58.1 cm, Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York Landscape with Apollo and the Cumaean Sybil (ca. 1650) - Oil on canvas, 99,5 x 125 cm, Hermitage Museum, St. Petersburg The Rest on the Flight into Egypt (1651 or 1661) - Oil on canvas, 113 x 157 cm, Hermitage Museum, St. Petersburg  Landscape with Mercury and Battus (1654) - Oil on canvas, 74 x 98 cm, Swiss private collection  Landscape with Hagar and the Angel (1654) - Oil on canvas, 54.5 x 76 cm, Dunedin Public Art Gallery, Dunedin.
3
Sandrart's account of Claude's early years, however, is quite different.
Landscape with Goatherd (1636) - National Gallery, London  The Ford (1636) - Metropolitan Museum, New York  Port with Villa Medici (1637) - Galleria degli Uffizi, Florence  Finding of Moses (1638) -  Oil on canvas, 209 x 138 cm, Museo del Prado, Madrid Pastoral Landscape, (1638)  Minneapolis Institute of Arts Seaport (1639) - National Gallery, London  Seaport at Sunset (Odysseus) (1639) - Oil on canvas, 119 x 150 cm, Musée du Louvre, Paris Village Fête, (1639) - Oil on canvas, 103 x 135 cm, Musée du Louvre, Paris View of Campagna (c. 1639) - Oil on canvas, 101.6 x 135.9 cm, Royal Collections Embarkation of Saint Paula Romana at Ostia (1639)  - Oil on canvas, 211 x 145 cm, Museo del Prado, Madrid The Embarkation of St. Ursula (1641) - National Gallery, London  The Disembarkation of Cleopatra at Tarsus (1642) - oil on canvas, Musée du Louvre, Paris.
Ideal Landscape: Annibale Carracci, Nicolas Poussin and Claude Lorrain.
WHACK: Thomas a Becket was killed by 4 of this king's men after excommunicating some bishops & barons
Henry II
It is a depiction of the conflict between Thomas Becket and King Henry II of England leading to Becket's assassination in 1170.
3
It was not until he showed the finished play to a friend that he found out the old book he had based it on was historically incorrect in certain important aspects.
Stage productions
The play later transferred to the Globe Theatre.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Callao, the port of Lima, handles about 3/4 of this country's imports
Peru
Lima  is the capital and the largest city of Peru.
3
On May 24, 1940, an earthquake destroyed most of the city, which at that time was mostly built of adobe and quincha.
Their routes are not generally publicitized but are understood by frequent users.
The amount of users has increased from 2011 in 28.2% for weekdays, 29.1% for Saturdays, and 33.3% for Sundays.
THE GRAMMYS 2010: In sort of an odd pairing, Taylor Swift sang "Rhiannon" with her & she sang "You Belong With Me" with Taylor
Stevie Nicks
Stevie Nicks was inspired to create the song after reading Triad: A Novel of the Supernatural, a novel by Mary Bartlet Leader.
3
Rhiannon produces her "small bag" which is also a magical paradox for it cannot be filled by any ordinary means.
Rhiannon is also connected to three mystical birds.
Cardiff.
CELEBRITY QUOTES: The bass player on "The Partridge Family", I went on to be voted the most dangerous former child star
Danny Bonaduce
thumb|right|180px|The Partridge Family, season 1  Cast and characters  Shirley Jones as Shirley Partridge: vocals, keyboards, tambourine, percussion  David Cassidy as Keith Partridge: lead vocals, rhythm guitar, electric lead guitars, banjo  Susan Dey as Laurie Partridge: vocals, harmony, piano, Hammond organ, percussion  Danny Bonaduce as Danny Partridge: vocals, bass guitar   Jeremy Gelbwaks as Chris Partridge (season 1): vocals, drums  Brian Forster as Chris Partridge (seasons 2–4): vocals, drums  Suzanne Crough as Tracy Partridge: tambourine, percussion  Dave Madden as Reuben Kincaid: band manager  Ricky Segall as Ricky Stevens (season 4): singer  Notable guest stars During its four-season run, many actors made guest appearances on the show.
3
After more persuading, Shirley agrees that the family can go on tour.
Subsequent episodes usually feature the band performing in various venues or in their garage.
DVD nameEp.
MUSICAL THEATER: In this musical based on a Roger Corman film, no one heeds the musical warning, "Don't feed the plants!"
Little Shop of Horrors
His fastest film was perhaps The Little Shop of Horrors (1960), which was reputedly shot in two days and one night.
3
In his early period, he produced up to nine movies a year.
Also in 2006, his film Fall of the House of Usher was among the twenty-five movies selected for the National Film Registry, a compilation of significant films being preserved by the Library of Congress.
Actors who obtained their career breaks working for Corman include Jack Nicholson, Peter Fonda, Bruce Dern, Todd Field Michael McDonald, Dennis Hopper, Talia Shire, Sandra Bullock, Robert De Niro, and David Carradine, who received one of his first starring film roles in the Corman-produced Boxcar Bertha (1972) and went on to star in Death Race 2000.
OH MAYAN GODS!: Kinich Ahau had a day job as sun god, but at night he roamed the underworld as this jungle cat
Jaguar
Connections with other deities Several other deities evince a large eye, such as God D (Itzamna), Chaak, and various jaguar gods.
2
Particularly in Yaxchilan, the ancestral king is seated within a solar cartouche, his wife in a lunar crescent.
The solar aspect of a king often seems to imply apotheosis and life after death.
BRIT LIT: He wrote his semi-autobiographical novel "Sons and Lovers" in part as a tribute to his mother
D.H. Lawrence
Dialect Poems by D.H. Lawrence  Film, TV and theatrical adaptations  Sons and Lovers has been adapted for the screen several times, including the Academy Award winning 1960 film, a 1981 BBC TV serial and another on ITV1 in 2003.
3
Title Lawrence rewrote the work four times until he was happy with it.
Eventually, he leaves their Nottinghamshire home for a job in London, where he begins to rise up into the middle class.
But as her sons grow up she selects them as lovers — first the eldest, then the second.
TREES COMPANY: Populus tremuloides is the scientific name for this "quaking" species
an aspen
aspen, common aspen, Eurasian aspen, European aspen, quaking aspen (Europe, northern Asia) Populus adenopoda –
3
Leaf size is very variable even on a single tree, typically with small leaves on side shoots, and very large leaves on strong-growing lead shoots.
2009http://www.springerlink.com/content/553472252334p7kq/fulltext.pdf  India left|thumb|upright|Popular Populus variety G48 in Punjab, India; Jhalli Farms Village Niara/Hoshiarpur  In India, the poplar is grown commercially by farmers, mainly in the Punjab region.
The Odd Poplers Alley, in Iași, Romania, is one of the spots where Mihai Eminescu sought inspiration in his works (the poem "Down Where the Lonely Poplars Grow").
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: This 1906 Upton Sinclair novel centers on Jurgis Rudkus, a worker in the Chicago stockyards
The Jungle
In 1906, Sinclair acquired particular fame for his classic muckraking novel, The Jungle, which exposed conditions in the U.S. meat packing industry, causing a public uproar that contributed in part to the passage a few months later of the 1906 Pure Food and Drug Act and the Meat Inspection Act.
3
The child was born on December 1, 1901, and named David.
vii-viii
Marcus, p. 131Bloom, Harold.
ANCIENT WORLD: In the 1st Century the Trung sisters headed Vietnam's revolt against the Han overlords from this country
China
Han may refer to:  China Chinese history  Han (Western Zhou state) (韓) (11th century BC – 757 BC), a state during the Spring and Autumn period  Han (state) (韓) (403  BC – 230  BC), a state during the Warring States period  Han dynasty (漢) (206 BC – 220 AD), a dynasty split into 2 eras, Western Han and Eastern Han  Shu Han (221–263), one of the Three Kingdoms  Former Zhao (304–329), one of the Sixteen Kingdoms, known as Han (漢) before 319  Cheng Han (304–347), one of the Sixteen Kingdoms, known as Han (漢) after 338  Former Shu (907–925), a state during the Five Dynasties and Ten Kingdoms period, known as Han (漢) between 917 and 918  Southern Han (漢) (917–971), a state during the Five Dynasties and Ten Kingdoms period  Later Han (Five Dynasties) (漢) (947–951), a state during the Five Dynasties and Ten Kingdoms period  Northern Han (951–979), successor to Later Han, also during the Five Dynasties and Ten Kingdoms period  Han (漢) (1360–1363), an insurgent state founded by Chen Youliang in the Yuan Dynasty  Other uses  Han Chinese, the dominant ethnic group of China, named after the Han dynasty  Chinese language (Hanyu) or Chinese characters (Hanzi)  Han (surname), also Haan, Hahn or Hann, the Romanized spelling of many Chinese family names: 韓(韩), 邗, 罕, 寒, 憨, 漢, etc.
2
Khan (title), or Han in Chinese transliteration, originally Central Asian title for a sovereign or military ruler  Type 091 submarine, the first nuclear powered submarine class (SSN) deployed by the People's Liberation Army Navy   France  Han-sur-Meuse in Meuse Han-devant-Pierrepont in Meurthe-et-Moselle Han-sur-Nied in Moselle   Iran   Han, Iran, a village in Sistan and Baluchestan Province, Iran   Japan  Han system (藩), a term for feudal clan or fief in Japan  Han school, an educational establishment during the Edo period  Han, a wooden board hanging throughout a temple complex in a Zen monastery to alert monks of mealtime when out of range of the umpan   Korea   Han (cultural), a Korean cultural concept of lament  Han (Korean surname), a Korean surname (한, 韓 or 漢), also romanized as "Hahn"  Korea, an abbreviation for "Hanguk" (한국, 韓國), the Korean language name for Korea  Korean language (한국어 Hangug-eo) or Hangul (한글 Hangeul)  an archaic Korean root meaning "great" or "leader"; transliterated into hanja as 韓, 幹, or 刊; see Names of Korea  Samhan, three confederacies of chiefdoms on the southern Korean peninsula in the Proto-Three Han Kingdoms Period  Vietnam HAN, the International Air Transport Association code for Noi Bai International Airport serving Hanoi Hán, a term describing related to the history of writing in Vietnam  Other uses Han (name), people named "Han" Han Solo, a Star Wars character Hän, a indigenous people in Canada Hän language, an endangered indigenous language spoken by the Hän people  Han, Eskişehir in Turkey  Han-sur-Lesse, Rochefort, Belgium  Huns, most notably Attila the Hun  Han, the Turkish word for a caravanserai  Han (trilobite)  Han unification (Chinese character glyph unification) in Unicode   HAN University of Applied Sciences  Home network, a type of local area network  Hydroxylammonium nitrate, a rocket fuel oxidizer and monopropellant  Khan (title), alternative spelling, notably in Turkic languages  See also  Han River (disambiguation)  Hans (disambiguation)
Hahn (disambiguation)
6-LETTER WORDS: This flowery shade of reddish blue was one of the original Crayola colors
violet
thumb|Thirteen of 50 officially retired Crayola crayon colors|alt=Thirteen retired Crayola crayons no longer produced The colors in the box below come in the packs of 8, 16, and 24:  8 pack (as of 1903) +8 = 16 pack (as of 1930) +8 = 24 pack (as of 1999) 75px|link=Red 75px|link=Orange 75px|link=Carnation Pink 75px|link=Red Orange 75px|link=Violet Red 75px|link=Scarlet 75px|link=Yellow 75px|link=Green 75px|link=Yellow Orange 75px|link=Yellow Green 75px|link=Dandelion 75px|link=Green Yellow 75px|link=Blue 75px|link=Violet (Purple) 75px|link=Blue Green 75px|link=Blue Violet 75px|link=Cerulean 75px|link=Indigo 75px|link=Brown 75px|link=Black 75px|link=Red Violet White 75px|link=Apricot75px|link=Gray  Cultural impact A Yale University study on scent recognition found the scent of Crayola crayons is one of the most recognizable scents for adults, ranking at number 18, trailing coffee and peanut butter that were number one and two respectively, but beating out cheese and bleach, which placed at 19 and 20.
3
Binney's experimentation with industrial materials, including slate waste, cement, and talc, led to the invention of the first dustless white chalk, for which the company won a gold medal at the 1904 St. Louis World's Fair.
thumb|right|220px|Inside the Rubens Crayola No. 500 crayon box  In April 1904 at the St. Louis World's Fair, Binney & Smith won the Gold Medal for their An-Du-Septic dustless chalk.
thumb|left|A girl draws with Crayola-brand crayons in the Crayola Experience|alt=A young girl draws with Crayola crayons at the Crayola ExperienceA "discovery center" was built that showcases the manufacturing process of crayons.
OXYMORONS: Before Joan Rivers left for her own show, she held this oxymoronic post for Johnny Carson
guest host
Carson can be seen discussing his upcoming job for the first time on the February 11, 1962 episode of What's My Line?. Because Carson had six months left on his ABC contract, NBC used multiple guest hosts until he could take over, including Merv Griffin, Art Linkletter, Joey Bishop, Arlene Francis (the first woman to host The Tonight Show), Bob Cummings, Jerry Lewis, Groucho Marx, Donald O'Connor, and others.
3
Billy Wilder said of Carson:  McMahon followed Carson from Who Do You Trust?
In November 2004, Carson announced a $5.3 million gift to the University of Nebraska Foundation to support the Hixson–Lied College of Fine and Performing Arts Department of Theater Arts, which created the Johnny Carson School of Theater and Film.
Made TV Magic
FAMOUS JOES & JOSEPHS: In 1982 this British singer paired with Jennifer Warnes in the No. 1 hit "Up Where We Belong"
Joe Cocker
Warnes teamed up with Joe Cocker to record "Up Where We Belong" for the 1982 motion picture An Officer and a Gentleman.
3
It was released as a single and hit No. 1 (for three weeks running) on Billboard's Hot 100 chart.
In 1985, she recorded vocals for Leonard Cohen's record Various Positions, getting equal vocals credits with Cohen in the inside booklet.
These include two previously unreleased recordings from the original session: "La Luna Brilla", "A Fool for the Look (in Your Eyes)", and one extra bonus selection, "Show Me the Light" (a second duet with Bill Medley, which was originally featured on the 1998 movie soundtrack Rudolph the Red Nosed Reindeer-The Movie).
LET'S PLAY SOME GOLF: Adam Sandler faces off on the links against Shooter McGavin & Bob Barker in this golf comedy
Happy Gilmore
He is best known for his comedic roles, such as in the films Billy Madison (1995), the sports comedies Happy Gilmore (1996) and The Waterboy (1998), the romantic comedy The Wedding Singer (1998), Big Daddy (1999), and Mr. Deeds (2002), and voicing Dracula in Hotel Transylvania (2012) and Hotel Transylvania 2 (2015).
3
Filming began in October 2008 and finished in January 2009.
Other costars include Salma Hayek (as Sandler's wife), Maria Bello (as James' wife), and fellow SNL alumna Maya Rudolph (as Rock's wife), Colin Quinn, Tim Meadows, and Norm Macdonald.
1998 Best On-Screen Duo (with Drew Barrymore) The Wedding Singer  Best Comedic Performance  Best Kiss (with Drew Barrymore)
MOVIE TITLE TRANSLATIONS: Bulgaria changed this Adam Sandler film to "Psycho Therapy"
Anger Management
SNL contemporary Kevin Nealon has appeared in eleven Happy Madison productions or Sandler films, including Happy Gilmore, The Wedding Singer, Little Nicky, Joe Dirt, Eight Crazy Nights, Anger Management, Grandma's Boy, You Don't Mess with the Zohan, Just Go With It, Blended, and the Dana Carvey vehicle, The Master of Disguise.
3
thumb|left|Sandler in Berlin 2009 Sandler starred along with Keri Russell and English comedian Russell Brand in Adam Shankman's fantasy film Bedtime Stories (2008), as a stressed hotel maintenance worker whose bedtime stories he reads to his niece and nephew begin to come true.
Comedy Click  Choice Movie:
Male
"MAN"LY MOVIES: 1983:Starring Steve Martin
The Man with Two Brains
American Film Institute, Arthur M. Sackler Foundation  Martin was in three more Reiner-directed comedies after The Jerk: Dead Men Don't Wear Plaid in 1982, The Man with Two Brains in 1983 and All of Me in 1984, his most critically acclaimed performance up to that point."Steve Martin
3
Later, he met budding actress Stormie Sherk, and they developed comedy routines and became romantically involved.
In 2011, he appeared with Jack Black, Owen Wilson, and JoBeth Williams in the birdwatching comedy The Big Year.
Walker, Morris (1999)
MOVIE COMEDY: Mike Myers comes to bring nirvana to North America as Pitka, this title character
The Love Guru
His award was presented to him by Justin Timberlake, his co-star in The Love Guru.
3
At the age of ten, he made a commercial for British Columbia Hydro, with Gilda Radner playing his mother.
Myers also appeared as Wayne Campbell in the music video for Ward's Canadian hit "Boys and Girls".
Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Actor – ComedyNominated — MTV Movie Award for Best Comedic Performance 1998 54 Steve Rubell Nominated —
ACTOR-DIRECTORS: As a divorce attorney, director Danny DeVito narrated this 1989 comedy
The War of the Roses
Two years later, DeVito reunited with Douglas and Turner in The War of the Roses, which he directed and in which he co-starred.
3
Although generally a comic actor, DeVito expanded into dramatic roles with The Rainmaker (1997), Hoffa (1992), which he directed and in which he co-starred with Jack Nicholson, Jack the Bear (1993), L.A. Confidential, The Big Kahuna, and Heist (2001), as a gangster nemesis of Joe Moore (Gene Hackman).
DeVito has an interest in documentaries: In 2006, he began a partnership with Morgan Freeman's company ClickStar, on which he hosts a documentary channel called Jersey Docs.
In 2013, along with Rashida Jones, he voiced Herb for the third time on "The Changing of the Guardian" episode of The Simpsons (aired on January 27, 2013.
GEOLOGY: This crater is formed when a volcano explodes & the cone collapses; Oregon's Crater Lake is an example
the caldera
The caldera was created in a massive volcanic eruption between 6,000 and 8,000 years ago that led to the subsidence of Mount Mazama.
2
See further details in the prose and citations of #Dimensions and depth.
In the winter of 1949/1950 as much as  of snow fell, whilst the less complete snow cover records show cover as high as  occurred during another particularly unsettled winter in 1981/1982.National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration; Climate at a Glance: Oregon Climate Division 5 (High Plateau) October to June Precipitation
THE ANDY GRIFFITH SHOW: Goooooolly!  This show spun off from "The Andy Griffith Show" in 1964
Gomer Pyle, U.S.M.C.
The series spawned its own spin-off, Gomer Pyle, U.S.M.C. (1964), a sequel series, Mayberry R.F.D. (1968), and a reunion telemovie, Return to Mayberry (1986).
3
Future players in The Andy Griffith Show, Frances Bavier and Ron Howard, appeared in the episode as townspeople Henrietta Perkins and Opie Taylor (the sheriff's son).
Production The show's production team included producers Aaron Ruben (1960–1965) and Bob Ross (1965–1968).
Kurt Cobain wrote a song titled "Floyd the Barber" that was recorded on Nirvana's first album, Bleach.
ART HISTORY CLASS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew points to an image of a painting on a screen.)  You can see why John Constable said that in this type of work, the sky is the chief organ of sentiment
a landscape
To the sky studies he added notes, often on the back of the sketches, of the prevailing weather conditions, direction of light, and time of day, believing that the sky was "the key note, the standard of scale, and the chief organ of sentiment" in a landscape painting.
3
His work was embraced in France, where he sold more works than in his native England and inspired the Barbizon school.
Tate Britain  Weymouth Bay: Bowleaze Cove and Jordon Hill (1816–17)
The largest collection of original Constable paintings outside London is on display at Christchurch Mansion in Ipswich.
YOUR BUMMER TO BUMMER TRAFFIC REPORT: The Verrazano-Narrows bridge is a mess!  Getting from Staten Island to this neighboring borough?  Fuhgedaboudit!
Brooklyn
Motor traffic can reach the borough from Brooklyn via the Verrazano-Narrows Bridge and from New Jersey via the Outerbridge Crossing, Goethals Bridge, and Bayonne Bridge.
3
thumb|250px|The Conference House.
Culture  Local support for the arts thumb|250px|"Postcards 9/11 Memorial", St. George Esplanade, Staten Island.
The Staten Island Ferry had undergone ramp renovations which were completed in 2014.
RECORDS: Van Halen in 1984 & Kris Kross in 1992 each had a No. 1 hit with this 1-word title
"Jump"
The lead single, "Jump", became an international hit and their only single to reach number one on the Billboard Hot 100.
3
Shortly afterwards, Roth re-entered the studio with the band and producer Glen Ballard.
But Eddie showed up late and drunk, and when he finally appeared, he was incoherent.
"
WORLD HERITAGE SITES: Uluru-Kata Tjuta National Park in Australia includes this monolith, which aboriginals of the region call Uluru
Ayers Rock
Uluru (), also known as Ayers Rock  and officially gazetted as UluruAyers Rock, is a large sandstone rock formation in the southern part of the Northern Territory in central Australia.
3
For the purpose of mapping and describing the geological history of the area, geologists refer to the rock strata making up Uluru as the Mutitjulu Arkose, and it is one of many sedimentary formations filling the Amadeus Basin.
Moves are supported for the reintroduction of locally extinct animals such as malleefowl, common brushtail possum, rufous hare-wallaby or mala, bilby, burrowing bettong and the black-flanked rock-wallaby.
grasses  Trees such as the mulga and centralian bloodwood are used to make tools such as spearheads, boomerangs and bowls.
THE COMICS: Jerome Siegel & Joe Shuster created this superhero when they were teenagers
Superman
He was best known for co-creating the DC Comics character Superman, with writer Jerry Siegel, first published in Action Comics No. 1 (June 1938).
3
Titling it
Although the duo received an encouraging letter, Consolidated never again published comic books.
Shuster continued to draw comics after the failure of Funnyman, although exactly what he drew is uncertain.
STARTS WITH "S": This 3-word doctrine stems from the Supreme Court case Plessy v. Ferguson & was extended in Gong Lum v. Rice
"separate but equal"
Plessy v. Ferguson, , was a landmark United States Supreme Court decision upholding the constitutionality of state laws requiring racial segregation in public facilities under the doctrine of "separate but equal".
3
Retrieved 2012-12-22.
The railroad company, which had opposed the law on the grounds that it would require the purchase of more railcars, had been previously informed of Plessy's racial lineage, and the intent to challenge the law.
Maltz has argued that "modern commentators have often overstated Harlan's distaste for race-based classifications," pointing to other aspects of decisions in which Harlan was involved.
CELEBRITIES: His film "La Vita e Bella" or "Life is Beautiful" was inspired by his father who was imprisoned in Bergen-Belsen
Roberto Benigni
Life Is Beautiful ( ) is a 1997 Italian tragicomic comedy-drama film directed by and starring Roberto Benigni, who co-wrote the film with Vincenzo Cerami.
3
He puts off Giosuè's requests to end the game and return home by convincing him that they are in the lead for the tank, and need only wait a short while before they can return home with their tank.
As the camp is in chaos Guido goes off to find Dora, but while he is out he is caught by a German soldier.
At the 71st Academy Awards, the film won awards for Best Music, Original Dramatic Score,  and Best Foreign Language Film, with Benigni winning Best Actor for his role.
REMEMBER THESE OSCAR NOMINEES?: Actor Massimo Troisi died shortly after delivering this occupational 1994 movie
Il Postino
He is best known for his role as Mario Ruoppolo in the 1994 film Il Postino.
2
It was reported that he postponed surgery to complete the film.
He is one of only seven actors to be posthumously nominated for an acting Academy Award.
NO. 1 HITMAKERS OF THE '70s: 1975: "Lucy In The Sky With Diamonds" (& it's not the Fab 4)
Elton John
Elton John version  In 1974, Elton John released a cover version as a single.
2
The song modulates between musical keys, using the key of A major for verses, B♭ major for the pre-chorus, and G major for the chorus.
The Flaming Lips version  The cover version of The Flaming Lips was included in the album
MOVIE MONSTERS: Improbably, in 1958 Steve McQueen played a teenager being chased by this improbable giant amoeba-like mass
The Blob
McQueen was subsequently hired for the films Never Love a Stranger, The Blob (his first leading role), and The Great St. Louis Bank Robbery.
3
"Writers find fame with franchises".
Although the jump over the fence in The Great Escape was done by Bud Ekins for insurance purposes, McQueen did have considerable screen time riding his 650cc Triumph TR6 Trophy motorcycle.
McQueen learned the martial art Tang Soo Do from ninth-degree black belt Pat E. Johnson.
BROADWAY SECRETS: According to her daughter, Marlene Dietrich secretly romanced this man between matinees & evening shows of "The King & I"
Yul Brynner
Her last great passion, when Dietrich was in her 50s, appears to have been for the actor Yul Brynner, with whom she had an affair that lasted more than a decade; still, her love life continued well into her 70s.
3
but by 1922 she had her first job, playing violin in a pit orchestra that accompanied silent films at a cinema in Berlin.
In 1988, Dietrich recorded spoken introductions to songs for a nostalgia album by Udo Lindenberg.
Her funeral ceremony was conducted at La Madeleine in Paris, a Roman Catholic church (despite Dietrich having been an atheist) on 14 May 1992."I have given up belief in a God."
AVIATION: On October 1, 1986, Northwest Airlines took this word out of its name
Orient
(All pre-war airline service to the Orient had been via Hawaii and the Philippines.)
3
To pay off the debt incurred in their takeover, the new management sold many of the airline's aircraft to leasing companies, and sold property around the world, including land in central Tokyo.
In 2008, Northwest was one of several U.S. airlines to receive permission from the British government to fly into Heathrow Airport in London after previously having to use Gatwick Airport.
WorldPerks right|150px  Northwest Airlines' frequent-flyer program, WorldPerks, offered regular travelers the ability to obtain free tickets, First Class upgrades on flights, discounted membership for its airport lounges (WorldClubs), or other types of rewards.
THE '60s MUSIC SCENE: Grammy voters certainly loved Aretha Franklin "just a little bit"; she won 2 1967 awards for this song
"Respect"
Following her signing to Atlantic Records in 1967, Franklin achieved commercial acclaim and success with songs such as "Respect", "(You Make Me Feel Like) A Natural Woman" and "Think".
3
Franklin's rapport with producer Jerry Wexler helped in the creation of the majority of Franklin's peak recordings with Atlantic.
In 1985, inspired by her desire to have a "younger sound" in her music, her fifth Arista album, Who's Zoomin' Who?, became her first album to be certified platinum, after selling well over a million copies, thanks to the hits, "Freeway of Love", the title track and "Sisters Are Doing It for Themselves".Rolling Stone magazine, "Aretha Franklin's New Wave of Pop" by Eliza Graham, page 11.
As of 2014, Franklin is now signed under RCA Records, controller of the Arista catalog and a sister label to Columbia via Sony Music Entertainment, and is currently working again with Clive Davis.
SEE 'EM & WEEP: This actress copes with cancer & overbearing mom Shirley MacLaine in "Terms of Endearment"
Debra Winger
In 1983, she won an Oscar for Terms of Endearment, playing Debra Winger's mother.
3
This was the beginning of her interest in performing.
She attended Washington-Lee High School, where she was on the cheerleading squad and acted in school theatrical productions.
In 1988, MacLaine won a Golden Globe for Best Actress (Drama) for Madame Sousatzka.
WORLD HISTORY: After the king of Caria died in 353 B.C., his widow had this memorial built at Halicarnassus
the Mausoleum
According to Pliny the Elder the craftsmen continued to work on the tomb after the death of their patron, "considering that it was at once a memorial of his own fame and of the sculptor's art," finishing it in 350 BC. This tomb of Mausolus came to be known as the Mausoleum, one of the seven wonders of the ancient world.
3
1911encyclopedia.org
Of Pisindalis, her son and successor, little is known; but Lygdamis, who next attained  power, is notorious for having put to death the poet Panyasis and causing Herodotus, possibly the best known Halicarnassian, to leave his native city (c. 457 BC).
At the Suda On Line Project.
LET'S GET BIBLICAL: Samson, Gideon & Deborah all make appearances in this biblical book with an occupational name
Judges
thumb|right|Samson's Fight with the Lion by Lucas Cranach the Elder, 1525  Samson (; , meaning "man of the sun"), Shamshoun ( /), or Sampson (), is one of the last of the judges of the ancient Israelites mentioned in the Hebrew Bible (Book of Judges chapters 13 to 16).
3
The riddle ("Out of the eater, something to eat; out of the strong, something sweet") was a veiled account of his second encounter with the lion (at which only he was present).
The Philistines find out why Samson burned their crops and they burn Samson's wife and father-in-law to death.
Samson, refuses to reveal the secret, teases her, telling her that he will lose his strength should he be bound with fresh bowstrings.
OLD TESTAMENT WOMEN: She was offered 1,100 pieces of silver from each Philistine lord for help in defeating Samson
Delilah
thumb|left|Rembrandt's painting of Samson and Delilah  When he was a young adult, Samson left the hills of his people to see the cities of the Philistines.
3
An army of Philistines goes up and demands that 3000 men of Judah deliver them Samson.
She asks again, and he says he can be bound if his locks are woven together.
Both heroes, champion of their respective people, die by their own hand: Heracles ends his life on a pyre while Samson makes the Philistine temple collapse upon himself and his enemies.
MEET THE ROBINSONS: In 1951 he defeated Jake LaMotta to become middleweight boxing champ
Sugar Ray Robinson
LaMotta's six fight rivalry with Sugar Ray Robinson is one of the most notable in the sport, with LaMotta winning just one of the bouts, although each one was close and LaMotta dropped Robinson multiple times.
3
Reeves won a much less controversial decision.
LaMotta, who was already leading on the scorecards before knocking Robinson out of the ring, pummeled and outpointed him for the rest of the fight.
It will also feature Joe Mantegna, Tom Sizemore, Penelope Ann Miller, Natasha Henstridge and Ray Wise.
SPICY NAMES: While Donovan doesn't use a last name, the girl Jennifer, of whom he sang in '68 had this one
Juniper
The title track, originally entitled "Poor Love", was the B-side of his next single, "Jennifer Juniper". "Jennifer Juniper
3
The article was the first in a three-part series, Drugs & Pop Stars
In late 1967 Donovan contributed two songs to the Ken Loach film, Poor Cow.
In October 2007 Donovan announced plans for the "Invincible Donovan University" focusing on Transcendental Meditation.
FIGHTS HISTORICAL: In 2000 Shane Mosley didn't win an Oscar for defeating this Oscar but did win the welterweight title
Oscar De La Hoya
Mosley has fought and defeated some of the most recognizable names in the sport, including Oscar De La Hoya (twice), Fernando Vargas (twice), Ricardo Mayorga (twice), and Antonio Margarito.
3
They had a rematch six months later at Conseco Fieldhouse in Indiana and Mosley once again lost by a unanimous decision in a very closely contested bout that saw Mosley land far more power shots and Forrest land far more insignificant shots as well as an even level of aggression between the two competitors, however Forrest was utilizing far more effective ring general-ship which would ultimately prove to be the difference.
The Associated Press had "Sugar"
After the fight, Mosley was named The Rings #1 ranked welterweight.
NATIVE AMERICAN PLACE NAMES: The name of this river that flows past Mount Vernon may mean "place where people trade"
the Potomac
The estate is situated on the banks of the Potomac River in Fairfax County, Virginia, near Alexandria, across from Prince George's County, Maryland.
3
Though no architect is known to have designed Mount Vernon, some attribute the design to John Ariss (1725–1799), a prominent Virginia architect who designed Paynes Church in Fairfax County (now destroyed) and likely Mount Airy in Richmond County.
Richard Blackburn, who also designed Rippon Lodge in Prince William County and the first Falls Church.
The need for a new tomb was confirmed when an unsuccessful attempt was made to steal his body.
SYLVESTER STALLONE: In "Rocky III" Sly regains "The Eye of the Tiger" training for a rematch with Clubber Lang, played by this man
Mr. T
Rocky III also marks the film debuts of Mr. T as James "Clubber" Lang, and of professional wrestler Hulk Hogan as the supporting character "Thunderlips".
3
At the start of the fight, Rocky sprints from his corner, fighting with a level of skill and spirit that no one, including Lang, expected.
The film concludes with both of the fighters throwing their first punch simultaneously.
Roger Ebert and Gene Siskel attributed the film's success to the positive reaction from critics and audiences towards Rocky II and the production team's "quality control" of that film.
10-LETTER WORDS: Remember Chuck Mangione?  Remember this instrument that he plays?
the flugelhorn
After playing the national anthem on the flugelhorn, Mangione, a Yankees fan, joined Phil Rizzuto and Bill White in the broadcast booth.
3
Charles Frank "Chuck" Mangione (; born November 29, 1940) is an American flugelhorn player, trumpeter and composer.
So Good." Performances of material new and old included versions of "Main Squeeze," “Hill Where the Lord Hides" and "Chase the Clouds Away." Mangione opened and closed the show with "Feels
In it he portrays himself as a celebrity spokesman for Mega Lo Mart, although his animated form appears much younger than his current age, more closely resembling how he looked in the late 1970s, always wearing the white and red shirt from the cover of his "Feels So Good" album.
WHERE DO YOU GET "OFF"?: In this film, Lou Gossett Jr. drills Richard Gere & Debra Winger thrills Richard Gere
An Officer and a Gentleman
He went on to star in several hit films, including An Officer and a Gentleman, Pretty Woman, Primal Fear, Runaway Bride, Arbitrage and Chicago, for which he won a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor and a Screen Actors Guild Award for part of the Best Cast.
3
His father, Homer George Gere (born 1922), was an insurance agent for the Nationwide Mutual Insurance Company, and had originally intended to become a minister.
In September 2007, Gere called for the boycott of the 2008 Beijing Olympic Games to put pressure on China to make Tibet independent.
Not ThereBob Dylan as Billy
FAMOUS UNDERSTUDIES: Richard Gere was an understudy in this musical set at Rydell High before he starred in it in London
Grease
His first major acting role was in the original London stage version of Grease in 1973.
3
Early life and education Gere was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.
In 2002, he appeared in three major films, including The Mothman Prophecies, Unfaithful and the Academy Award-winning film version of Chicago, for which he won a Golden Globe as "Best Actor – Comedy or Musical".
Gere is also an advocate for human rights in Tibet.
PRESIDENTS ON THE MOVE: His travels included an 1875 trip to Salt Lake City; he later visited Mark Twain to do the book deal
Ulysses S. Grant
Twain also lost money through his publishing house, Charles L. Webster and Company, which enjoyed initial success selling the memoirs of Ulysses S. Grant, but went broke soon afterward, losing money on a biography of Pope Leo XIII.  Fewer than 200 copies were sold.
3
Arriving in September 1893, he took "a cheap room", at $1.50 per day, at The Players Club, which he had to keep until March 1894, and meanwhile became "The Belle of New York".
The rest is just cheating.
In the late 1860s and early 1870s, he spoke out strongly in favor of American interests in the Hawaiian Islands.
THAT FILM'S A DISASTER: Instead of curing cancer, a virus has been created, leaving Will Smith to fend for himself in NYC
I Am Legend
Later that month, Smith starred in the film I Am Legend, released December 14, 2007.
2
Willard Carroll "Will" Smith, Jr.
Smith and his family reside in Los Angeles, California.
WE "ONE" YOU: Halifax engineer Sandford Fleming came up with these divisions working on the Trans-Canada Railway
time zones
He proposed worldwide standard time zones,Sandford Fleming was not the first to propose universal time and worldwide standard time zones.
3
He also proposed a universal time to be used in astronomy and telegraphy.
Family thumb|right|Fleming with his grandchildren in 1893 As soon as he arrived in Peterborough in 1845, Fleming became friendly with the family of his future wife, the Halls, and was attracted to Ann Jane (Jeanie) Hall.
Although he hesitated because of the amount of work he had, in 1872 he set off with a small party to survey the route, particularly through the Rocky Mountains, finding a practicable route through the Yellowhead Pass.
WHO'S THE MRS.?: Mrs. Ben Affleck
Jennifer Garner
Following high-profile relationships with Gwyneth Paltrow and Jennifer Lopez, Affleck married Jennifer Garner in 2005.
3
After expressing an interest in a directorial career, Affleck shadowed John Frankenheimer throughout the pre-production process.
He later said the film was an "amazing experience," and that he learned from director Roger Michell.
thumb|Affleck speaking at a Feeding America rally in 2009 Affeck is a longtime supporter of Boston-based cancer charity The Jimmy Fund, making numerous appearances at their Radio-Telethon.
CATCHPHRASES: Maiden name of author Edith Wharton, whose social-climbing family may have inspired a catchphrase
Jones
Edith Wharton (; born Edith Newbold Jones; January 24, 1862 – August 11, 1937) was a Pulitzer Prize-winning American novelist, short story writer, and designer.
2
She handled all of the business arrangements, lined up contributors, and translated the French entries into English.
Scribner's ISBN 0-292-70274-4  Edith Wharton's French Riviera (2002)
AYE AYE, ADMIRAL: In less than a day, May 1, 1898, his fleet demolished the Spanish fleet in Manila Bay
George Dewey
The bay was the setting for the Battle of Manila Bay in 1898 in which American troops led by Commodore George Dewey, seized the area.
3
Interaction between Manila Bay and Laguna de Bay today occurs only through the Pasig River.
The actual uses of Manila's Baywalk.
These factors are directly degrading the overall environment of Manila Bay and these impacts are manifested in the continued deterioration of the water quality within the bay.
AMERICAN WOMEN: In 1915 this Hull House founder created the Women's Peace Party, which sought an end to World War I
Jane Addams
Hull House was a settlement house in the United States that was co-founded in 1889 by Jane Addams and Ellen Gates Starr.
3
On October 15, 1966, which is the day that the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 was enacted, it was listed on the National Register of Historic Places.
The exodus of most ethnic groups began shortly after the turn of the twentieth century.
Their businesses, e.g. Greektown and Maxwell Street, however, remained.
THE BROWNS: This current mayor of Oakland flirted with Linda Ronstadt & the presidency in the 1970s
Jerry Brown
It was fueled by a relationship with then–Governor of California Jerry Brown, a Democratic presidential candidate.
3
It included her as the featured artist with a full photo layout and an article by Ben Fong-Torres, discussing Ronstadt's many struggling years in rock n roll, as well as her home life and what it was like to be a woman on tour in a decidedly all-male environment.
Ronstadt's album sales have not been certified since 2001, and at the time, Ronstadt's U.S. album sales were certified by the Recording Industry Association of America at over 30 million albums sold, while Peter Asher, her former producer and manager, placed her total U.S. album sales at over 45 million.
(Music) (column)".
PLEASANT 4-LETTER WORDS: In "Silent Night", the holy infant is said to be "tender and" this
mild
Holy infant, so tender and mild, sleep in heavenly peace, sleep in heavenly peace.
3
However, a manuscript was discovered in 1995 in Mohr's handwriting and dated by researchers at .
First Silent Night, The, production details  Translations In 1859, the Episcopal priest John Freeman Young, then serving at Trinity Church, New York City, published the English translation that is most frequently sung today.
New York:
HENRY IV, PART 2: By the end of the play, Prince Henry, then known as Hal, has become this title character of another play
Henry V
I of France  Henry II of France Henry III of France Henry IV of France Henri, comte de Chambord, Henry V of France  Six Holy Roman Emperors: Henry II, Holy Roman Emperor Henry III, Holy Roman Emperor Henry IV, Holy Roman Emperor Henry V, Holy Roman Emperor Henry VI, Holy Roman Emperor Henry VII, Holy Roman Emperor  Kings of England: Henry I of England Henry II of England Henry the Young King, co-ruler with his father, Henry II, until his death.
2
Portuguese royalty  King-Cardinal Henry, King of Portugal  Henry, Count of Portugal, aka Henry of Burgundy, Count of Portugal (father of Portugal's first king)  Prince Henry the Navigator, Infante of Portugal  Infante Henrique, Duke of Coimbra (born 1949), the sixth in line to Portuguese throne   King of Germany Henry the Fowler (876–936), first king of Germany  King of Scots (in name, at least)  Henry Stuart, Lord Darnley (1545/6–1567), consort of Mary, queen of Scots  Henry Benedict Stuart, the 'Cardinal Duke of York', brother of Bonnie Prince Charlie, who was hailed by Jacobites as Henry IX  Four kings of Castile: Henry I of Castile Henry II of Castile Henry III of Castile Henry IV of Castile  Five kings of France, spelt Henri in Modern French since the Renaissance to italianize the name and to make the difference with the Norman and the English Henry.
Henry
VILIFICATION: In 1984 Barbara Bush said of this woman, "I can't say it, but it rhymes with rich"; she later apologized
Geraldine Ferraro
During the 1984 presidential campaign, Barbara made headlines when she told the press that she could not say on television what she thought of Vice-Presidential candidate Geraldine Ferraro, but "it rhymes with rich".Simpson’s Contemporary Quotations, compiled by James B. Simpson.
3
(2004), p. 72.
He [former President George H. W. Bush] sits and listens and I read books, because I know perfectly well that, don't take offense, that 90 percent of what I hear on television is supposition, when we're talking about the news.
thumb|George and Barbara Bush attend the christening ceremony for the , October 2006  While visiting a Houston relief center for people displaced by Hurricane Katrina, Bush told the radio program Marketplace, Almost everyone I've talked to says, 'We're gonna move to Houston.' What I'm hearing, which is sort of scary, is they all want to stay in Texas...
JIMMY JAM: He played Victor Sifuentes on "L.A. Law" before hitting the street as Det. Bobby Simone on "NYPD Blue"
Jimmy Smits
In 2009, TV Guide ranked "Hearts and Souls" (Season 6, Episode 5), Jimmy Smits' final episode written by Steven Bochco, David Milch, Bill Clark, and Nicholas Wootton and directed by Paris Barclay, #30 on TV Guides 100 Greatest Episodes of All Time.
3
His co-stars included (Season 2 and beyond)
A baby boy, Theo, is born towards the end of the season.
Rodriguez, Sorenson goes undercover, but then turns up missing after a stripper he was seeing turns up dead in his apartment (but not by his doing).
COLLEGE FOOTBALL QUOTES: A Buckeye at this school: "I'm really happy for... the guys who've been around here 6 or 7 years, especially our seniors"
Ohio State
Buckeye may refer to:  Buckeye (tree), several tree species of the genus Aesculus  Buckeye (nickname), a nickname for residents of the U.S. state of Ohio, the "buckeye state"  Ohio State Buckeyes, the intercollegiate athletic teams of Ohio State University  Brutus Buckeye, the mascot of The Ohio State University  Buckeye (chicken), a breed of chicken originating in Ohio  Buckeye, a named passenger train operated by the Pennsylvania Railroad between Cleveland, Ohio and Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania  Buckeyes, the athletic teams of Nelsonville-York High School, Nelsonville, Ohio  Buckeye Industries, an American aircraft manufacturer  Junonia coenia, also called Buckeye, a butterfly in the family Nymphalidae found in the United States and Canada  T-2 Buckeye, an aircraft  Buckeye candy (a.k.a.
1
Buckeyes), a peanut butter and chocolate candy made to resemble the nut of a buckeye tree  "Buckeye", a song by Lamb of God from the album Burn The Priest Buckeye coupler, a railway car coupler  Places in the United States  Buckeye, Arizona   Buckeye, California (disambiguation)   Buckeye, Colorado  Buckeye, Indiana  Buckeye, Iowa  Buckeye, Kansas  Buckeye, Kentucky  Buckeye, New Mexico  Buckeye Township (disambiguation)  Buckeye, West Virginia  Buckeye Lake, Ohio  Buckeye-Shaker, a neighborhood of Cleveland, Ohio  People  Garland Buckeye (1897-1975), a former professional football and baseball player  Fictional characters  Nathan "Buckeye" Heywood or Citizen Steel, a DC Comics character  See also  Buckeye Trail, a long-distance trail in Ohio  Buckeye Steel Castings, a former steelmaker in Columbus, Ohio  Buckeye Division or 37th Infantry Division, a division of the US Army  Buckeye Pipe Line  Buckeye CableSystem, a cable company  Buckeye coupler, a type of railway coupling used to connect locomotives and rolling-stock  Buckeye rot of tomato
DAYS IN...: Regardless of the title, this British gangster film starring Bob Hoskins only ran 114 minutes
The Long Good Friday
His work included lead roles in The Long Good Friday (1980), Mona Lisa (1986), Who Framed Roger Rabbit (1988), Mermaids (1990), and Super Mario Bros. (1993), and supporting performances in Brazil (1985), Hook (1991), Nixon (1995), Mrs. Henderson Presents (2005), A Christmas Carol (2009), Made in Dagenham (2010) and Snow White and the Huntsman (2012).
3
Whilst drinking at the bar, he was given a script and told, "You're next."
Nikita Khrushchev  Last Orders  Ray "Raysie" Johnson  National Board of Review Award for Best Acting by an EnsembleNominated –
BAFTA TV Award for Best Actor 1979  Of Mycenae and Men  Mr. Taramasalatopoulos  1980  Flickers  Arnie Cole  1981  Othello  Iago  1983  The Beggar's Opera  Beggar  1985  Mussolini and I  Benito Mussolini  1985  The Dunera Boys  Morrie Mendellsohn   Australian mini-series 1994  The Changeling  De Flores  World War II: When Lions Roared  Winston Churchill  1995–1999  The Forgotten Toys  Teddy  Voice only 1996  Tales from the Crypt   1998  Saturday Night Live  Himself  1999  David Copperfield  Wilkins Micawber  2000  Noriega: God's Favorite  Manuel Noriega  Nominated –
THE NAME GAME: Gilligan's Island" resident who is Barbie's little sister
Skipper
Barbie's siblings and cousins were also created including Skipper, Todd and Stacie (twin brother and sister), Kelly, Krissy, and Francie.
3
A standard Barbie doll is 11.5 inches tall, giving a height of 5 feet 9 inches at 1/6 scale.
In 1997, Mattel teamed up with Nabisco to launch a cross-promotion of Barbie with Oreo cookies.
In 1993, a group calling itself the "Barbie Liberation Organization" secretly modified a group of Barbie dolls by implanting voice boxes from G.I. Joe dolls, then returning the Barbies to the toy stores from where they were purchased.
SPORTS STARS: This American won her first Wimbledon singles title in 1999, beating Steffi Graf in the final
Lindsay Davenport
1 Lindsay Davenport en route to the Philadelphia title.
3
He claimed that he committed the attack to help Graf reclaim the World No.
Proceeds from her match against Sabatini went to Graf's foundation, "
She is the founder and chairperson of "Children for Tomorrow", a non-profit foundation for implementing and developing projects to support children who have been traumatized by war or other crises.
CUT TO THE "QUICK": This baking product from General Mills was introduced in 1931
Bisquick
Wheaties Dunk-a-Balls  Wheat Stax (introduced 1966; discontinued 1971) ("Now there's a cereal you can stack")  Baking goods The company's baking-goods brands include:   Betty Crocker  Bisquick (now a Betty Crocker brand)  Gold Medal Flour  Jus-Rol  Knack & Back  La Salteña  Pillsbury  V. Pearl  It also produces fruit snacks, including Fruit by the Foot, Fruit Gushers, Fruit Roll-Ups, and Fruit Shapes.
3
The site launched in August 2004 and ran through December 2010.
1930s: General Mills engineer, Thomas R. James, creates the puffing gun, which inflates or distorts cereal pieces into puffed up shapes.
The New York Times stated that the agreement could be interpreted to additionally construe purchasing General Mills products at a grocery store or liking the company's Facebook page as assent to the terms; General Mills disclaimed that interpretation, describing that interpretation as a "mischaracterization".
19th CENTURY AMERICA: This author's brother, Henry Ward Beecher, was involved in a sex scandal in 1874
Harriet Beecher Stowe
Several of his brothers and sisters became well-known educators and activists, most notably Harriet Beecher Stowe, who achieved worldwide fame with her abolitionist novel Uncle Tom's Cabin.
3
Over the course of his ministry, Beecher developed a theology emphasizing God's love above all else.
He received his first national publicity when he became involved in the break between "New School" and "Old School" Presbyterianism, which were split over questions of original sin and the slavery issue; Henry's father Lyman was a leading proponent of the New School.
The charges became public when Theodore told Elizabeth Cady Stanton of his wife's confession.
"STRAIGHT" & "NARROW": Nat King Cole hit heard here:
"Straighten Up and Fly Right"
Success  Cole's first mainstream vocal hit was his 1943 recording of one of his compositions, "Straighten Up and Fly Right", based on a black folk tale that his father had used as a theme for a sermon.
3
Gourse, Leslie, Unforgettable: The Life and Mystique of Nat King Cole.
This was the only song that hit No.
He did not condone the practice, but was not a politician and believed, "I can't change the situation in a day.
MOVIE REMAKES: Matt Damon took on Glen Campbell's Texas Ranger role in the remake of this western
True Grit
Damon's 2010 projects included Clint Eastwood's Hereafter and the Coen brothers' remake of the 1969 John Wayne-starring Western True Grit.
3
In 2014, he starred in George Clooney's The Monuments Men, and played the minor role of scientist Dr. Mann, in Christopher Nolan's Interstellar.
He, along with George Clooney, Brad Pitt, Don Cheadle, David Pressman, and Jerry Weintraub, is one of the founders of Not On Our Watch Project, an organization that focuses global attention and resources to stop and prevent mass atrocities such as in Darfur.
It culminated in a planned skit on September 12, 2006, when Damon stormed off after having his interview cut short.
ACTORS & THEIR FILMS: Matt Damon showed off his talent in this "talented" title role in 1999
Mr. Ripley
He received further praise for performances as the eponymous character in Saving Private Ryan (1998), the anti-hero in The Talented Mr. Ripley (1999), a fallen angel in Dogma, and received critical acclaim for performances in dramas such as Syriana (2005) and The Good Shepherd, as well as his role as a villain in the neo-noir crime drama The Departed (2006).
3
With his wife, Luciana Bozán Barroso, he has three daughters and a stepdaughter from Barroso's prior marriage.
As a student at Harvard University, he acted in small roles such as in the TNT original film Rising Son and the ensemble prep-school drama School Ties.
In 2014, he starred in George Clooney's The Monuments Men, and played the minor role of scientist Dr. Mann, in Christopher Nolan's Interstellar.
FAMOUS FOLKS: Pat Boone descends from this famed frontiersman
Daniel Boone
right|thumb|250px|Boone's handprints and shoe prints in front of The Great Movie Ride at Disney World's Disney's Hollywood Studios  In a 2007 interview on The 700 Club, Boone claimed that he is the great-great-great-great grandson of the American pioneer Daniel Boone.
3
His cover versions of rhythm and blues hits had a noticeable effect on the development of the broad popularity of rock and roll.
... the power of God.
Politics Boone campaigned for Ronald Reagan to become Governor of California in 1966 and 1970, and actively supported Reagan's bid for the Republican presidential nomination in 1976.
SHAKESPEAREAN ACTORS: In 1968, in Canada, Christopher Walken got romantic as this member of the Montague family
Romeo
He has also played the lead in the Shakespeare plays Hamlet, Macbeth, Romeo and Juliet, and Coriolanus.
3
His so-called Sicilian scene has been hailed by critics as the best scene in the film  and is the subject of four commentaries on the DVD. Walken has a supporting role in Tarantino's Pulp Fiction as a Vietnam veteran giving his dead comrade's son the family's prized possession—a gold watch—while explaining in graphic detail how he had hidden it from the Vietcong by smuggling it in his rectum, after the boy's father, in whose rectum the watch had previously been concealed, had died of dysentery.
A rare example of a role Walken turned down was that of Ray Ruby in the film Go Go Tales (2007).
For a Walken, adolescence is a difficult time.
"ARM"s: It's a former name for Veterans Day
Armistice Day
It coincides with other holidays, including Armistice Day and Remembrance Day, celebrated in other countries that mark the anniversary of the end of World War I; major hostilities of World War I were formally ended at the 11th hour of the 11th day of the 11th month of 1918, when the Armistice with Germany went into effect.
3
A Congressional Act (52 Stat. 351; 5 U.S. Code, Sec.
As Veterans Day and the birthday of the United States Marine Corps (November 10, 1775) are only one day apart, that branch of the Armed Forces customarily observes both occasions as a 96-hour liberty period.
National Independence Day (Polish holiday)  Remembrance Day  Volkstrauertag  Martinmas  National Civil War Museum
SHOW BUSINESS GROUPS: Harold Arlen & Doc Pomus are members of these people's Hall of Fame & Johnny Mercer was a co-founder
songwriters
Mercer’s exposure to black music was perhaps unique among the white songwriters of his generation.
3
Gene Lees, Portrait of Johnny: The Life of John Herndon Mercer, Pantheon Books, New York, 2004, ISBN 0-375-42060-6, p. 15.
They went on to compose "One for My Baby (and One More for the Road)" (1941), "That Old Black Magic" (1942), and Come Rain or Come Shine" (1946) among others.
The song has since become a jazz standard, with notable recordings by Rosemary Clooney, Nancy Wilson, and Megon McDonough, among other performers.
POP-ROCK: In 1996 the Fugees had a hit with a remake of this Roberta Flack song
"Killing Me Softly"
The group recorded two albums—one of which, The Score (1996), was a multi-Platinum and Grammy-winning success and contains their hit single "Killing Me Softly"—before disbanding in 1997.
3
It peaked at number 40 on the Billboard R&B Chart but was met with poor reviews, noting its radical departure from the Fugees' sound.
On February 6, 2006, the group reunited for a free show in Hollywood, with tickets given away to about 8,000 fans by local radio stations.
Meanwhile, in September 2007 an equally outspoken Jean told Blues & Soul: "I feel the first issue that needs to be addressed is that Lauryn needs help...
THAT '70s SHOW: Tom Selleck appeared as rival detective Lance White on this show that starred James Garner
The Rockford Files
He starred in several television series over more than five decades, including such popular roles as Bret Maverick in the 1950s western comedy series Maverick and Jim Rockford in the 1970s detective comedic drama series The Rockford Files, and played leading roles in more than 50 theatrical films, including The Great Escape (1963) with Steve McQueen, Paddy Chayefsky's The Americanization of Emily (1964), Grand Prix (1966), Blake Edwards' Victor Victoria (1982), Murphy's Romance (1985), for which he received an Academy Award nomination, Space Cowboys (2000)  with Clint Eastwood, and The Notebook (2004).
3
He changed his last name from Bumgarner to Garner after the studio had credited him as "James Garner" without permission.
The series itself, which only featured Garner for a few moments at the beginning of the first show, was canceled so rapidly, some of the episodes filmed were never broadcast.
Gorman, Steve. "James Garner undergoes surgery after stroke".
MOVIE BY CAST: Colin Firth, Hugh Grant, Renee Zellweger
Bridget Jones's Diary
This led to roles in films such as The English Patient, Bridget Jones's Diary (for which he was nominated for a BAFTA), Shakespeare in Love and Love Actually.
3
In 2009 he received widespread critical acclaim for his leading role in A Single Man, for which Firth gained his first Academy Award nomination, and won a BAFTA Award.
Career  1983–1994, "Brit Pack" boy Playing Hamlet in the Drama Centre end of year production, Firth was spotted by playwright Julian Mitchell, who cast him as the gay, ambitious public schoolboy Guy Bennett in the 1983 West End production of Another Country.
His performance earned Firth career best reviews and Academy Award, Golden Globe, Screen Actors' Guild, BAFTA, and BFCA nominations; he won the BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role in February 2010.
GEOGRAPHIC TERMS: It's sometimes defined as having a summit at less than 1,000 feet; Hugh Grant "Went Up" one "But Came Down A Mountain"
a hill
The same year, he played leading roles as Emma Thompson's suitor in Ang Lee’s Academy Award-winning adaptation of Jane Austen's Sense and Sensibility and as a cartographer in 1917 Wales in The Englishman Who Went Up a Hill
3
Education  Grant started his education at Hogarth Primary School in Chiswick but then moved to St Peter's Primary School in Hammersmith, Grant was then educated at an independent prep school Wetherby School.
But Came
Grant said that he was attending the Conservative and Labour conferences as well, but told Lib Dem activists that "You, more than any of the other parties, have a good bill of health.
TELEVISION: At the end of each "Mork & Mindy" episode, Mork reported to this Orkan superior
Orson
He has been assigned to observe human behavior by Orson, his mostly unseen and long-suffering superior (voiced by Ralph James).
3
When these ideas failed to improve ratings, many wilder ideas were tried to attempt to capitalize on Williams' comedic talents.
He eventually got married, in a "forest" (Mindy's attic).
The show has also aired on FOX Family Channel in the late 1990s.
CLASSIC ALBUMS: He left Mork behind to make the classic comedy album "A Night at the Met"
Robin Williams
Mork & Mindy is an American sitcom broadcast from 1978 to 1982 on ABC. It stars Robin Williams as Mork, an extraterrestrial who comes to Earth from the planet Ork in a small, one-man egg-shaped spaceship.
3
Winters had previously appeared in a season 3 episode as Dave McConnell (Mindy's uncle and Fred's brother).
Once Mork visited Exidor at a very nice apartment where he supposedly lived with his imaginary girlfriend and her twin sister.
Too small."
COLORIFIC: This color precedes "lady" & "Cadillac" & also the word "elephants" in a "Dumbo" song
pink
As a result, Dumbo and Timothy both become drunk and see hallucinations of pink elephants.
3
Dumbo and Snow White are the only two classic Disney features to use the technique, which was regularly employed for the various Disney cartoon shorts.
Dumbo II also sought to explain what happened to Dumbo's father, Mr. Jumbo.
Live-action remake
COLLEGE RADIO: Cal State Northridge's KCSN broadcasts an Americana music program called "Tangled" these plant parts
Roots
The term may be used to describe the theme of a museum or collection,Princeton Collections of Western AmericanaUniversity of Cincinnati German-Americana collection or of goods for sale.'Americana' styled modern hardware  The term can also be used to describe studies of American culture, especially studies based in other countries.'Americana', the E-Journal of American Studies in Hungary Americana music is contemporary music that incorporates elements of various American roots music styles, including country, roots-rock, folk, bluegrass and blues, resulting in a distinctive roots-oriented sound.
3
As Canby put it, Americans at this time "really believed all they heard on the Fourth of July or read in school readers.
It was all there at once, better than elsewhere, their own, and permanent.
"Coca-Cola Goes Back to Its 'Real' Past." New York Times.
5 PEOPLE WHO'VE NEVER BEEN IN MY KITCHEN: Known as the "White Mouse", New Zealand spy Nancy Wake was the Allies' most decorated woman in this war
World War II
Axis & Allies is a series of World War II strategy board games.
2
1942 1940 15 0 1 0 Airbases on islands allow all fighters and tactical bombers to scramble, which defends adjacent sea zones.
The first major revision to the rules was designed by Larry Harris and Mike Selinker (who would later develop the board game Attack! based on the experiences learned working with Harris), who tried to address many of the Milton Bradley version's shortcomings, including removing the Axis economic victory condition and the requirement of capturing enemy capitals in favor of victory cities, which has been used in every revision since.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: You'll find both campuses of Northwestern University on this Great Lake
Lake Michigan
Today, the main campus is a  parcel in Evanston, along the shores of Lake Michigan just 12 miles north of downtown Chicago.
3
Northwestern University (NU) is a private research university with campuses in Evanston and Chicago in Illinois, United States, as well as Doha, Qatar.
The Associated Student Government consists of the elected representatives of the undergraduate students and the Graduate Student Association represents graduate students.
Studio 22 is Northwestern's student-run production company which produces roughly ten films per year.
FROM A TO ALMOST Z: A symbolic narrative; Piers Plowman starred in a famous one
allegory
Summary The poem—part theological allegory, part social satire—concerns the narrator's intense quest for the true Christian life, from the perspective of medieval Catholicism.
3
The poem is divided into passus ('steps').
In the passus summaries in the second and third editions, Crowley emphasizes material in the poem warning of political instability and widespread corruption when the king is a child (as was then the case).
Kelen, S. A. Langland's Early Modern Identities (New York, Palgrave Macmillan, 2007).
YOU'RE HISTORY!: Godfrey of Bouillon was a leader of the First Crusade & was elected ruler of this city after its capture
Jerusalem
The most famous of the Lords of Bouillon was Godfrey of Bouillon, a leader of the First Crusade and the first ruler of the Kingdom of Jerusalem.
3
May 8, 1594 - Charlotte van der Marck dies without issue, and her claims to Bouillon pass to her husband, Henri de la Tour d'Auvergne.
June 25, 1791 -
1815 - The Congress of Vienna gives Bouillon to the Netherlands until the final settlement of the succession dispute between Philip Dauvergne (a British admiral by that time) and Charles-Alain-Gabriel de Rohan-Guemene (an Austrian general and the last duke's closest relative on his paternal side).
BATMAN TV VILLAINS: Julie Newmar, Eartha Kitt & Lee Meriwether as this purr-fect villain (not all at the same time)
Catwoman
In the 1960s, she starred for two seasons as Catwoman in the television series Batman (1966–67).
3
She appeared in the music video for George Michael's 1992 single "Too Funky", and had a cameo as herself in the 1995 film To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything!
She also appeared in the film, The Marriage-Go-Round (1961), which starred James Mason and Susan Hayward.
Entrepreneur In the 1970s, Newmar received two US patents for pantyhose and one for a brassiere.
THEY MEAN BUSINESS!: 19th century robber baron Jay Gould caused the Black Friday panic with his speculation on this commodity
gold
In August 1869, Gould and Fisk began to buy gold in an attempt to corner the market, hoping that the increase in the price of gold would increase the price of wheat such that western farmers would sell, causing a great amount of shipping of bread stuffs eastward, increasing freight business for the Erie railroad.
3
Jay Gould studied at local schools and the Hobart Academy in Hobart, Delaware County, New York.
The Erie entered receivership in 1859 and was reorganized as the Erie Railway.
Helen Gould (1868–1938), married Finlay Johnson Shepard (1867–1942)
PULITZER PRIZE PLAYS: This partner of Lynn Fontanne got to star in "Idiot's Delight" after suggesting the idea for it to Robert Sherwood
Alfred Lunt
She teamed with her husband, Alfred Lunt.
3
They spoke, in fact, as people do in ordinary life."Marshall, Arthur.
Fontanne was also a Kennedy Center honoree in 1980.
thumb|left|Lunt and Fontanne in 1950.
CAR & DRIVER: Burt Reynolds drives a Trans Am from Georgia to Texas & back in this 1977 romp
Smokey and the Bandit
He starred in many television series and feature films, such as Deliverance, The Longest Yard as well as its 2005 remake, Smokey and the Bandit and The Cannonball Run.
3
By Saul David" (review), Kirkus Review.
Fuller, Samuel Samuel Fuller: Interviews University Press of Mississippi, May 30, 2012.
He played Boss Hogg in a film remake of the television series The Dukes of Hazzard (2005)The Dukes of Hazzard (2005) - Full cast and crew and Nate Scarborough in a remake of The Longest Yard (2005), with Adam Sandler, who played the role of Paul "Wrecking" Crewe like Reynolds.
NONPOTENT POTABLES: This Northwest city was a coffee mecca pre-WWII, long before Starbucks began brewing there in 1971
Seattle
The chain was founded in Seattle, Washington in 1971; it operates 23,450 locations worldwide, including 12,937 (-79) in the United States, 2,118 (+56) in China, 1,430 (-3) in Canada, 1,158 (+8) in Japan and 869 (+6) in the United Kingdom (Differences reflect growth since December 17, 2015).
3
The three were inspired to sell high-quality coffee beans and equipment by coffee roasting entrepreneur Alfred Peet after he taught them his style of roasting beans.
Another is Roy Street Coffee and Tea at 700 Broadway E., also on Capitol Hill.
Others have used the Starbucks logo unaltered and without permission, such as a café in Pakistan that used the logo in 2003 in its advertisements and a cafe in Cambodia in 2009, the owner saying that "whatever we have done we have done within the law".
OZ: Buddy Ebsen was hired to play this character but had to quit after he developed an allergy to aluminum dust
the Tin Man
Cast as the Tin Man in 1939's The Wizard of Oz, Ebsen fell ill due to the aluminum dust in his makeup and was forced to drop out of the film.
3
Family financial problems caused by the collapse of the Florida land boom forced Ebsen to leave college at age 20.
One episode, "The Giant Jack Rabbit", was the highest-rated half-hour on television to that time and remains the most-watched half-hour sitcom episode.
Today when I look back, then look around me to see with whom I am standing, I fully realize the influence on my life that must be credited to DeMolay."
MOVIES ON THE MAP: Steve Buscemi is part of a botched kidnapping; you might say it had a chipper ending
Fargo
Miller's Crossing, Barton Fink, The Hudsucker Proxy, Fargo, and The Big Lebowski.
3
He graduated in 1975 from Valley Stream Central High School in Nassau County, New York, a school which he attended with actress Patricia Charbonneau.
During a flashback, he appears to be disguised as a teenager as he says that he was "part of a special task force of very young-looking cops who infiltrated high schools.
Thesmokinggun.com
RECENT HISTORY: After its own war with Iraq, this country opposed both Iraqi & U.S. policy during the Gulf War
Iran
Someone or Something of, from, or related to Persian Iraq, an old name for a region in Central Iran Fakhr-al-Din Iraqi (1213–1289)
2
For specific persons, see List of Iraqis.
See also Languages of Iraq.
MERYL STREEP MOVIE ROLES: Divorcee Jane, having an affair with her ex, Jake, played by Alec Baldwin
It's Complicated
Two years later, he co-starred in the hit romantic comedy It's Complicated with Meryl Streep and Steve Martin.
3
Film Baldwin made his film debut with a minor role in the 1987 film Forever, Lulu.
New York: WNYC Retrieved April 22, 2013.
He is an animal rights activist and a strong supporter of PETA, for which he has done work that includes narrating the video entitled Meet Your Meat.
DON'T QUIT YOUR DAY JOB: This supermodel starred with William Baldwin in the film "Fair Game", which was fair game for critics
Cindy Crawford
Baldwin starred alongside Cindy Crawford in the 1995 film Fair Game, then in 1996 starred in a low-budget film by Miramax Films titled Curdled, and was paid US$150,000 for his performance compared to the $1.7 million he received for his role in Sliver with Sharon Stone in 1993.
3
He is the brother of actors Alec, Daniel, and Stephen, sometimes collectively known as the Baldwin brothers, and of sisters Beth and Jane, all together known as the Baldwin family.
He also co-starred in ABC's Dirty Sexy Money as Donald Sutherland's oldest son, Patrick Darling IV, for the duration of the show until April 2009.
In 2015, he narrated for the documentary A Wing and a Prayer, a film about American fighter pilots who assisted in the 1948 Arab–Israeli War and the founding of the Israeli Air Force.
2 MILLION: Joseph Pulitzer game $2 million to this college in part to establish a school of journalism
Columbia
Today, he is best known for the Pulitzer Prizes, which were established in 1917 by money he bequeathed to Columbia University to recognize artistic and journalistic achievements.
3
On March 6, 1867, Pulitzer renounced his allegiance to the Austro-Hungarian Empire and became a naturalized American citizen.
He would work 16 hours a day—from 10 AM to 2 AM.
With his own paper, Pulitzer developed his role as a champion of the common man, featuring exposés and a hard-hitting populist approach.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: In 1976 Manila replaced Quezon City as the official capital of this country
Philippines
Manila () is the capital city of the Philippines.
3
Some of the country's oldest schools are founded in Intramuros, these are the University of Santo Tomas (1611), Colegio de San Juan de Letran (1620), and Ateneo de Manila University (1859).
Members of other religions comprises the remaining 1.4% of the city's population.
These systems are currently undergoing a multibillion-dollar expansion.
SOUTH PARK: Everglades National Park in this Southern state is the USA's largest subtropical wilderness
Florida
Everglades National Park is a U.S. National Park in Florida that protects the southern 20 percent of the original Everglades.
1
Due to their high tolerance of salt water, winds, extreme tides, high temperatures, and muddy soils, mangrove trees are uniquely adapted to extreme conditions.
THE STATE SHE GOVERNED: Christine Todd Whitman, 1994 to 2001
New Jersey
Christine "Christie" Todd Whitman (born September 26, 1946) is an American Republican politician and author who served as the 50th Governor of New Jersey from 1994 to 2001, and was the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency in the administration of President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2003.
2
Retrieved December 11, 2007. "
The federal court eventually overturned the rule on the ground that it violated the Clean Air Act.
TRUE LIVES: Isak Dinesen reflected on her years in Kenya in this book, later the title of a film about her
Out Of Africa
(One depiction of this period of change from one colonist's perspective is found in the memoir Out of Africa by Danish author Baroness Karen von Blixen-Finecke, published in 1937.)
3
After debates, it was passed by Parliament, the coalition would hold until the end of the current Parliament or if either of the parties withdraws from the deal before then.
Horticultural produce and tea are the main growth sectors and the two most valuable of all of Kenya's exports.
Base Titanium, a subsidiary of Base resources of Australia, shipped its first major consignment of minerals to China.
KNOW YOUR CONGRESS: Rep. Richard Baker &Sen. Mary Landrieu
Louisiana
Mary Loretta Landrieu ( ;AP News Pronunciation Guide born November 23, 1955) is an American politician and former U.S. Senator from the state of Louisiana.
2
In October 1987, she was succeeded in the 90th district by her brother Mitch.
The Senate Budget Committee recommended that Lew be confirmed on a 22–1 vote.
U.S. CITIES: 171-foot-wide Canal Street runs from Lake Pontchartrain to the Mississippi River in this city
New Orleans
The Industrial Canal connects the Mississippi River with the lake at New Orleans.
3
Namesake  Lake Pontchartrain is named for Louis Phélypeaux, comte de Pontchartrain.
In 1699, French explorer Pierre Le Moyne d'Iberville renamed it Pontchartrain after Louis Phélypeaux, comte de Pontchartrain.
Northshore  190px|thumb|left|At the southern terminus of LA 1077 in Madisonville, this lighthouse is on the west estuary of the Tchefuncte River at Lake Pontchartrain and was constructed in 1837.
WATERFALLS: At 3,110 feet, Tugela Falls in this country's Kwazulu-Natal province is the world's second highest
South Africa
KwaZulu-Natal (; also referred to as KZN or Natal and known as "the garden province"http://www.southafrica.info/about/geography/kwazulu-natal.htm#.U0ZMuuaSz58) is a province of South Africa that was created in 1994 when the Zulu bantustan of KwaZulu ("Place of the Zulu" in Zulu) and Natal Province were merged.
3
Tourists have come to see the iSimangaliso Wetland Park and the uKhahlamba Drakensberg Park, declared UNESCO World Heritage Sites.
Others come to hike in the mountains or explore the wetlands with guides.
Mr Price Pro, a premier international surfing event at Durban during winter (previously known as the "Gunston 500").
CELEBRITY SPOUSES: Joanne Woodward
Paul Newman
She continued to move between Hollywood and Broadway, eventually understudying in the New York production of Picnic, which featured her future husband  Paul Newman.
3
Retrieved 2010-07-06.
Homecomingepisode:
Mildred WatsonAll the Way HomeMary FolletTV movie1972BeatriceCannes Film Festival Best Actress AwardKansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best ActressNominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama1973Summer Wishes, Winter DreamsRita WaldenBAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading RoleKansas City Film Critics Circle Award for Best ActressNew York Film Critics Circle Award for Best ActressNominated – Academy Award for Best ActressNominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Drama1975Iris Devereaux1976SybilDr.
ON THE LABEL: It says right on the bottle: Absolut Vodka is from the country of this
Sweden
Absolut Vodka is a brand of vodka, produced near Åhus, in southern Sweden.
3
Currently, the global Absolut Vodka account is managed out of Sid Lee Amsterdam.
One of the most distinguished redesign aspects was the influence of paint.
To choice- To the Village Voice- To any passing fad.
SEMITIC LANGUAGES: Jim Caviezel learned to speak this Semitic language for his role in "The Passion of the Christ"
Aramaic
The film was shot in Italy, and the dialogue is entirely in reconstructed Aramaic, vernacular Hebrew and Latin with subtitles.
3
Many of the utterances from Jesus in the film cannot be directly sourced to the Gospel and are part of a wider Christian narrative.
At the suggestion of actress Maia Morgenstern, the Passover Seder is quoted early in the film.
The following day, Reuters and the Associated Press each independently confirmed the story, citing Vatican sources.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: The title character of this Bernard Malamud novel is Roy Hobbs of the New York Knights
The Natural
In 1836, Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803–1882), an ex-minister, published a startling nonfiction work called Nature, in which he claimed it was possible to dispense with organized religion and reach a lofty spiritual state by studying and responding to the natural world.
3
Philip Roth explores Jewish identity in American society.
His radical writings express a deep-rooted tendency toward individualism in the American character.
Upton Sinclair, most famous for his muck-raking novel The Jungle, advocated socialism.
WORLD CITIES: Mombasa, which lies on an island in the Indian Ocean, is the main port of this E. African country
Kenya
Mombasa (; ) is a city on the coast of Kenya.
3
It is located on Mombasa Island and sprawls to the surrounding mainlands.
Other local industries include an oil refinery with a capacity of 80,000 barrels a day,Mombasa Refinery - A Barrel Full.
Flying into South Coast, Mombasa   Sister cities   Mombasa is a sister city of:Twinning of Cities.
MOUNTAINS: The Apennine range runs the length of this Mediterranean country's boot-shaped peninsula
Italy
The lunar Montes Apenninus 10959 Appennino, an asteroid  Plants and animals Apennine sheep or Appenninica, a modern breed of domestic sheep Apennine shrew, an insectivore endemic to Italy Apennine yellow-bellied toad, an amphibian endemic to Italy Apennine deciduous montane forests, an ecoregion of Italy Apennine brown bear, the Marsican brown bear Apennine wolf, the Eurasian wolf Apennine hare, the Corsican hare South Apennine mixed montane forests, an ecoregion  Cultural objects Apennine Base Tunnel, a tunnel of Italy The archaeological Apennine culture Giro dell'Appennino, a bicycle tour
1
Apennine may refer to: The Apennine Mountains  Other places on Earth The Apennine or Italian peninsula Apennins, a department of the first French Empire  Astronomical names
CLASSICAL COMPOSITIONS: Term for Schubert's "Death and the Maiden", heard here, or the type of group playing it
String quartet
Death and the Maiden, a concept ultimately derived from the Medieval "Dance of Death",  may refer to:  In visual art:  Death and the Maiden (motif), born of Renaissance art  Death and the Maiden painting by Hans Baldung  Death and the Maiden painting by Egon Schiele  Death and the Maiden sketch by Edvard Munch  Death and the Maiden painting by Pierre Puvis de Chavannes  In music:  "Death and the Maiden" (song), composed by Franz Schubert in 1817  Death and the Maiden Quartet, string quartet by Franz Schubert, composed in 1824  Death and the Maiden Ballet by Nikos Skalkottas, composed in 1938  "Death and the Maiden" (The Verlaines song)  "Death and the Maiden Retold", by The Imagined Village from their self-titled debut album  In drama: Death and the Maiden (play), by Ariel Dorfman Death and the Maiden (film), adaptation by Roman Polanski Prinzessinnendramen: Der Tod und das Mädchen I-V (Princess Dramas:
1
Death and the Maiden I-V), five theatrical plays by Elfriede Jelinek  In literature:  Death and the Maidens (book), a biography of Fanny Imlay  Death and the Maiden novel by Gladys Mitchell  Death and the Maiden novel by P. N. Elrod  Batman: Death and the Maidens, a graphic novel by Greg Rucka In television: "Death and the Maiden" (The Vampire Diaries), an episode of the television series The Vampire Diaries  it:La morte e la fanciulla pt:Death and the Maiden ru:Смерть и девушка
A LITTLE "R" & "R": In China, it's called Yuan Jiang; in Vietnam, Song Hong
Red River
By about 1000 BC, the development of wet-rice cultivation and bronze casting in the Ma River and Red River floodplains led to the flourishing of the Đông Sơn culture, notable for its elaborate bronze drums.
3
The Vietnamese dynasties reached their zenith in the Lê dynasty of the 15th century, especially during the reign of Emperor Lê Thánh Tông (1460–1497).
Its current state constitution, 2013 Constitution, asserts the central role of the Communist Party of Vietnam in all organs of government, politics and society.
Nevertheless, only government-approved religious organisations are allowed; for example, the South Vietnam-founded Unified Buddhist Church of Vietnam is banned in favour of a communist-approved body."Vietnam: The Suppression of the Unified Buddhist Church".
BOOKS & AUTHORS: "Where Have I Been?" was the 1982 autobiography of this "Your Show of Shows" comedian
Sid Caesar
Your Show of Shows is a live 90-minute variety show that was broadcast weekly in the United States on NBC from February 25, 1950, through June 5, 1954, featuring Sid Caesar and Imogene Coca.
3
José Ferrer made several guest appearances on the series.
The Paley Center for Media in Manhattan and Beverly Hills, California holds an almost complete set of the series, and a set of master tapes of the 1976 syndicated series.
Then after a substantial contribution was offered, he asked for a higher bid to hear the disk ..."On the air: pioneers of American broadcasting Amy Henderson, National Portrait Gallery (Smithsonian Institution), Museum of Broadcasting (New York, N.Y.) - 1988 - Page 78 "Your Show of Shows" premiered on ...
BOOKS & AUTHORS: John Knowles' experiences at Phillips Exeter Academy inspired this 1960 novel set at a prep school during WWII
A Separate Peace
John Knowles, author of A Separate Peace and Peace Breaks Out, was a 1945 graduate; both novels are set at the fictional Devon School, which serves as an analog for his alma mater.
3
Notable faculty  Founder of the Religion department Frederick Buechner, minister and author  Instructor in History Michael Golay, historian and author  Instructor in English Todd Hearon, poet  Instructor in English Willie Perdomo, poet and children's book author  Instructor in Mathematics Zuming Feng, U.S. International Mathematical Olympiad Program team coach from 1997 to 2013  Instructor in Mathematics Gwynneth Coogan, former Olympic athlete  Instructor in Music Marilinda Garcia, member of the New Hampshire House of Representatives and harp player  Off-campus study Exeter's tenth Principal, Richard Ward Day, believed in the value of students studying outside Exeter, and broadening their experience and education in this way.
It also has a 3-D printer, which was added in 2013.
The George H. Love Gymnasium was built in 1969.
MUSICAL STYLINGS: A 1979 song by the Sugarhill Gang called this performer's "Delight" launched a musical genre
"Rapper's Delight"
Sugarhill Gang Live (2008)  Rhythm & Rhymes: The Definitive Collection (2010)   Singles  YearSinglePeak chart positionsAlbumU.S.U.S. R&BU.S. Club PlayNZUK1979"Rapper's Delight" 36 4 14 18 3Sugarhill Gang1980"Rapper's Reprise (Jam Jam)" — — — — —"8th Wonder" 82 15 38 — —8th Wonder1981"Apache" 53 13 51 — —"Showdown" (credited as The Furious Five meets The Sugarhill Gang) — 49 — —
3
a hip hop children's album.
Released: 1983 Label: Sugar Hill  1984Livin' in the Fast Lane Label: Sugar Hill — — —
In You" — 50 — — —Livin' in the Fast Lane1984"Livin' in the Fast Lane" — — — — —"Troy" / "Girls" — — — — —"The Down Beat" — — — — — —1985"Work, Work The Body" — — — — —1989"Rapper's Delight (Hip Hop Remix '89)" — — — 34 582009"Lala Song" (credited as Bob Sinclar featuring The Sugarhill Gang) — — — — —  References  External links  Sugarhill Gang playlist on WaveCat  "I Want My Name Back" documentary on the Sugar Hill Gang, Featuring Master Gee and Wonder Mike  Master Gee interview  Category:East Coast hip hop groups Category:Rappers from New Jersey Category:African-American musical groups Category:1973 establishments in New Jersey Category:Musical groups established in 1973 Category:Musical trios
BEAUTY: Like Kate Moss today, beautiful 1960s supermodel Twiggy was best known for this physical quality
Being thin
being thin was in my genes."
3
She's delicious looking."
Also in 2007, Sepia Records released a previously shelved album that Twiggy recorded in 1979, produced by Donna Summer and Juergen Koppers.
1983
EXPLORATION: (Kelly reads next to a map.)In 1845, Ludwig Leichhardt completed a 3,000-mile journey, finding a route to the North Coast and fertile pastures, exciting the people of this land
Australia
Friedrich Wilhelm Ludwig Leichhardt, known as Ludwig Leichhardt, (23 October 1813 – c.1848) was a Prussian explorer and naturalist, most famous for his exploration of northern and central Australia.
3
Naturally I'm very pleased to think that such discerning authorities consider me worthy of such honour; but whatever I have done has never been for honour.
He was last seen on 3 April 1848 at McPherson's Station, Coogoon, on the Darling Downs.
In 1864 Duncan McIntyre discovered two trees marked with "L" on the Flinders River near the Gulf of Carpentaria.
DISCOVERIES: These sacred scrolls found at Qumran in 1947 have yielded many insights into early Christianity & Rabbinic Judaism
the Dead Sea scrolls
It is best known as the settlement nearest to the Qumran Caves where the Dead Sea Scrolls were hidden, caves in the sheer desert cliffs and beneath, in the marl terrace.
2
E.M. Laperrousaz went as high as 1,428 inhabitants.
57), ed.
THE SOLAR SYSTEM: Examples of these celestial events include Perseids, Orionids & Leonids
Meteor showers
As with many meteor showers the visible rate is greatest in the pre-dawn hours, since more meteoroids are scooped up by the side of the Earth moving forward into the stream, corresponding to local times between midnight and noon, as can be seen in the accompanying diagram.http://meteorshowersonline.com/what_is.html While many meteors arrive between dawn and noon, they are usually not visible due to daylight.
2
Most of the particles have been part of the cloud for around a thousand years.
In the popular Japanese band Sandaime J Soul Brother's song R.Y.U.S.E.I (Meteor), they describe the Perseid meteor as falling like an evening rain shower - its shooting stars like raindrops pulling their tails behind them.
FORTUNE 500 COMPANIES: In 1999 the Class A stock of this company headed by Warren Buffett reached a 52-week high of $81,000 a share
Berkshire Hathaway
Buffett is the chairman, CEO and largest shareholder of Berkshire Hathaway, and is consistently ranked among the world's wealthiest people.
3
By 1960, Buffett operated seven partnerships.
In addition to suggestions of mistiming, the wisdom in keeping some of Berkshire's major holdings, including the Coca-Cola Company which in 1998 peaked at $86, raised questions.
He substantially reduced his stake in 2005 as changing interest rates increased the costs of holding currency contracts.
SINGERS: Katey Sagal of "Married... with Children" used to be one of the Harlettes, who sang back-up for this star
Bette Midler
She was a member of Bette Midler's backup group The Harlettes in 1978, and again from 1982–83.
3
Katey Sagal:
Katey Sagal on Wise Guys, Lost and More!. TV Guide.com.
In 2004, she married her current husband, Kurt Sutter.
NOBEL CATEGORIES BY WINNER: Paul Samuelson
Economics
The Swedish Royal Academies stated, when awarding the prize, that he "has done more than any other contemporary economist to raise the level of scientific analysis in economic theory". "In a career that spanned seven decades, he transformed his field, influenced millions of students and turned MIT into an economics powerhouse" Economic historian Randall E. Parker calls him the "Father of Modern Economics", and The New York Times considered him to be the "foremost academic economist of the 20th century".
2
It is paranoid to warn against inevitable slippery slopes…once individual commercial freedoms are in any way infringed upon".
Samuelson, Paul A. (2007), Inside the Economist's Mind: Conversations with Eminent Economists  with William A. Barnett, Blackwell Publishing, ISBN 1-4051-5917-0
CELEBRITY CARDS: This Rob Schneider character had a follow-up film subtitled "European Gigolo"
Deuce Bigalow
A stand-up comic and veteran of the NBC sketch comedy series Saturday Night Live, he went on to a successful career in feature films, including starring roles in the comedy films Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo, The Hot Chick, The Benchwarmers, and Grown Ups.
3
His older brother, John, is a producer.
After high school, he played Bay Area nightclubs such as the Holy City Zoo and The Other Cafe, and was a regular guest on local radio programs.
The Outback Johnny  Voice 2012 Wings Dodo Voice 2012 The Reef 2: High Tide Nerissa Voice 2012 Dino Time Dodger Voice 2013 The Little Penguin Pororo's Racing Adventure Toto   2013 InAPPropriate Comedy Psychologist / J. D.   2013 Frog Kingdom    2014 Jungle Shuffle Chuy Voice 2014 Shelby Shelby Voice 2014 Wings: Sky Force Heroes Fred Voice 2015 Back to the Jurassic Dodger  Voice 2015 OMG, I'm a Robot!
SCARY MOVIES: When Kate Hudson unlocks a hidden attic room that has a terrifying secret, she uses the title object of this 2005 film
The Skeleton Key
Her other films include How to Lose a Guy in 10 Days (2003), Raising Helen (2004), The Skeleton Key (2005), You, Me and Dupree (2006), Fool's Gold (2008), and Bride Wars (2009).
3
Career
She had previously appeared in the lesser-known films Gossip, a teenage drama, and 200 Cigarettes, a New Year's-set comedy with a large cast of actors.
thumb|Hudson signing autographs in July 2006 In 2002, Hudson starred in the remake of the historical romance The Four Feathers, which was panned by critics and audiences.
STUPID ANSWERS: It initially got its name from being the second Karakoram peak to be measured
K2
The Karakoram is home to the highest concentration of peaks over 8000m in height to be found anywhere on earth,BBC, Planet Earth, "Mountains", Part Three including K2, the second highest peak in the world at .
3
147-159, 5 figs.
Batura Muztagh  Rakaposhi-Haramosh Mountains  Spantik-Sosbun Mountains  Hispar Muztagh  South Ghujerab Mountains  Panmah Muztagh  Wesm Mountains  Masherbrum Mountains  Baltoro Muztagh  Saltoro Mountains  Siachen Muztagh  Rimo Muztagh  Saser Muztagh   Passes  thumb|Chinese and Pakistani border guards at Khunjerab
Reprint: Elibron Classics Series, Adamant Media Corporation. 2005.
"SEA" YA: This city's annual Seafair features various water sports & a hydroplane race on Lake Washington
Seattle
Lake Washington is a large freshwater lake adjacent to the city of Seattle.
2
Creeks and rivers The main inflowing rivers are the Sammamish and Cedar Rivers.
The water lost its clarity, the desirable fish populations declined, and masses of dead algae accumulated on the shores of the lake.
LET'S ROCK!: Keith, Brian, Mick, Bill & Charlie on drums
the Rolling Stones
It may also refer to:  MICK (DJ), American DJ, also known as Mick Boogie or Mick Batyske  Mickey Mantle or the Mick  Michael or Mick, a masculine give name  Mick (screenplay), a screenplay by Eoghan Harris  People with the name  Mick Aston, archaeologist on the Time Team series  Mick Fanning, Australian professional surfer  Mick Foley, professional wrestler, actor, and author  Mick Fleetwood, drummer and founding member of Fleetwood Mac  Mick Jagger, lead singer and songwriter for the Rolling Stones
1
Mick is a derogatory term for a person of Irish descent.
CHAMPS OF THE SQUARE CIRCLE: In real life it was the nickname of welterweight champ Benny Paret; in the movies, of the "Galahad" played by Elvis
"Kid"
Benny "Kid" Paret was buried at Saint Raymond's Cemetery in the borough of the Bronx in New York City.
3
In his first defense of the title, Emile Griffith knocked him out in the thirteenth round on April 1, 1961.
Griffith would come out as bisexual in his later years, but in 1962 allegations of homosexuality were considered fatal to an athlete's career and a particularly grievous insult in the culture both fighters came from.
In popular culture Paret's death was chronicled in a 1962 protest song by folksinger Gil Turner.
ABBREV.: MT is an abbreviation for megaton as well as this U.S. state
Montana
MT, Mt, mT, mt, or Mt. may refer to:  Automotive  Honda MT, a motorcycle  Hyundai Mega Truck, a medium-duty truck  Manual transmission, a part of a car  Motor Trend, an automotive magazine  Computing and the Internet  Machine translation, a subfield of computational linguistics  Mauritius Telecom, a telecommunications and Internet service provider  Media Temple, a website hosting company  Mersenne twister, a pseudorandom number generator  Monotype Corporation, a font company  Movable Type, a weblog publishing system  .mt, the top-level Internet domain for Malta  Empty, meaning "out of ammunition" in text speak  Magnetic tape data storage, digital recording on magnetic tape  Main Tank, the person who soaks up all the damage in an MMORPG; see Tank (gaming)  Megatransfer, referring to a number of data transfers or operations; see transfer (computing)  Multi-threading, a concept in computer programming; see thread (computer science)  MT, short for mistype, a declaration of a mistake or typo when typing in a live-text platform such as instant messenger  MT, short for Modified Tweet on Twitter  MT Framework, a proprietary game engine  Geography and languages  MT, the ISO 3166-1 alpha-2 code for Malta, a nation of Mediterranean islands  mt, the ISO 639 alpha-2 language code for the Maltese language  MT, the ISO 3166-2:BR subdivision code for Mato Grosso, a state in Brazil  MT, the state abbreviation for Montana, one of the United States of America  Mt or Mt., an abbreviation for the word mount, meaning mountain  MT, Mountain Time Zone, a time zone in North America  MT, abbreviation for car plates and used abbreviation of name of the town of Martin, Slovakia  MT - registration plate of Matera, Italy  Media and entertainment  M. T. Vasudevan Nair, a Malayalam writer  Magical Trevor, a cartoon by Jonti
2
Picking  Megatokyo, a webcomic  Megatron (Transformers), a fictional robot/character in the Transformers franchise  Meridian Tonight, a British regional news programme  Modern Talking, a band  Modern Tramway, the longtime former title of a British magazine  Moon Tycoon, a simulation computer game  Monopoly Tycoon, a video game  Muscle Tracer, an enemy in the Armored Core video game series  Musical theatre  Wangan Midnight Maximum Tune, an arcade racing game  Master tone, a form of musical ringtone  Marianas Trench (band), a Canadian pop rock band  Military  Maxim–Tokarev, a Russian light machine gun  Mobiles  Mobile-terminated, a call, text message or data received on a mobile telephone  Mobile Terminal, part of a Mobile Station in the GSM System architecture  Religion  Gospel of Matthew, part of the New Testament  Masoretic Text, the Hebrew text of the Jewish Bible (Tanakh)  Science   Biology   Medial temporal, part of the temporal lobe of the brain  Metallothionein, a protein  Methyltransferase, a type of enzyme  Microtubule, a component of the cytoskeleton  Mitochondrion, an organelle found in most eukaryotic cells  Visual area MT (see Visual cortex), also called V5  Health and medical  Magnetization transfer, a process contributing to image contrast in Magnetic resonance imaging  Massage therapy, adding directed pressure to the body  Massage therapist, the title of someone who performs massage therapy  Medical technologist, a healthcare professional who performs diagnostic tests  Medical transcriptionist, an allied-health professional who transcribes dictated medical reports  Middle temporal area, a region of the visual cortex where the motion of objects is analyzed  Motivational therapy, a treatment for substance abuse  Measurements  MT, the measure for one million Transfer (computing) operations per second  Mt, the symbol for megatonne, a unit of mass equal to one million tonnes (109 kg)  Mt, the symbol for megaton (of TNT equivalent), a unit of explosive power  MT, the symbol for megatesla, the SI unit of magnetic flux density  mt or MT, a U.S. abbreviation for the metric ton, an alternative term for tonne, a measurement of mass equal to one thousand kilograms  mT, the symbol for millitesla, the SI unit of magnetic flux density  Other  Magnetotellurics, a method of imaging underground structures  Materials Today, a scientific journal  Mt, the symbol for chemical element meitnerium  Transport  MT-Propeller, German aircraft propellor manufacturer  Mississauga Transit, a public transit operator in Mississauga, Ontario  Thomas Cook Airlines, "MT" in IATA airline designator code  Motor Tanker or Motor Transport in the name of a ship Name prefix for Merchant vessels Motor Tanker or Motor Tug Boat  Other uses  Master of Arts in Teaching, a graduate degree in teaching.
See also  The Maria Theresa thaler, generally abbreviated  but sometimes also seen as   Mountain  TM (disambiguation)  Category:Two-letter disambiguation pages
FAMOUS FIRSTS: In 1907 Anna Jarvis proposed wearing a carnation on the second Sunday in May to honor these people
mothers
Ann Reeves Jarvis was a social activist, founder of Mothers’ Day Work Clubs, and a unifying force within her community during the American Civil War.
3
As a woman who was also defined by her faith, she was very active within the Andrews Methodist Episcopal Church community.
Jarvis was singularly dedicated throughout this process, resigning her position at Fidelity Mutual and incorporating the Mother’s Day International Association (MDIA) in 1912 to encourage national and international recognition of the day.
Although the Anna M. Jarvis Committee supported her and helped to continue her movement during her declining health, it ultimately disbanded with the assurance that the Jarvis family gravesite remained under the care of the only heir to the estate, her oldest brother's granddaughter.
NUTRITION: Muscle spasms & leg cramps can be prevented with adequate amounts of this mineral, symbol Mg
Magnesium
Military MG, a prefix typically used for machine gun model designations (for example, "MG42" and "MG3") Major General, a military rank used by many countries; the specific "MG" abbreviation is used in the United States Medal for Gallantry (MG), an Australian military decoration, introduced in 1991  Nations .mg, the Internet country code top-level domain for Madagascar Madagascar, ISO 3166-1 country code (MG) Malagasy language (mg), the national language of Madagascar Minas Gerais (MG), a Brazilian state Mongolia, FIPS 10-4 country code (MG)  Science and technology Magnesium, symbol for the chemical element (Mg) Michaelis-Gutmann bodies (M-G bodies), concentrically layered basophilic inclusions in the urinary tract Monoglyceride, or monoacylglycerol Motor-generator (M-G), a device for converting electrical power to another form Myasthenia gravis (MG), an autoimmune disease mg (editor) (mg), an Emacs-compatible Unix text editor  Transportation The MG Car Company Limited (1924–2005), a now defunct British automobile manufacturer  MG Motor (2006-present), MG Cars now owned by SAIC  MG, IATA code for Champion Air (1995–), an American charter airline   MG, code for the Swiss mountain railway known as Monte Generoso railway  Units of measurement Multiples of the base unit of mass gram,  Milligram (mg), 10−3 gram  Megagram (Mg), 106 grams Multiples of a unit of magnetic field Gauss (unit), Milligauss (mG), equivalent to 1.0 × 10−7 tesla  Megagauss (MG), 100 teslas  Category:Two-letter disambiguation pages
2
MG, Mg, or mg and variants may refer to:  Education Main gauche (m.g.
, French), a term indicating "left hand" in piano music Matematička gimnazija, a Belgrade special school, elementary and high school, for those gifted in mathematics, physics and ICT  Entertainment and media  MG (The Perhapanauts), a character in The Perhapanauts comics  Memphis Group (M.G.), from the band Booker T. & the M.G.'s fronted by Booker T. Jones  MG Select, a house duo music production from Chicago named after Marc Mitchell and George Jackson  The MG's (album), an album recorded by Booker T.'s band  Match Game (MG) (1962–1969; 1973–1979; 1983–1984; 1990–1991), an American television game show  MG (Martin Gore album) an album recorded by Martin Gore, the primary songwriter for the band Depeche Mode  Middle Grade, that is, suitable for ages 8 - 12.
CROSSWORD CLUES "V": "Spike" sport(10)
Volleyball
Spike, spikes, or spiking may refer to:  Device to puncture or fasten   Cleat (shoe), protrusions on the sole of a shoe  Nail (fastener), especially one over ten inches (25 cm) long  Rail spike, or screw spike, used to construct railroad tracks  Spiking the guns, rendering a muzzle-loading gun temporarily inoperable by driving a nail into the vent  Spindle (stationery), an upright spike used to hold papers  Technology and science   Action potential, a concept in neuroscience  Spike (botany), a kind of inflorescence in which sessile flowers are arranged on an unbranched elongated axis  Spike (database), a biological database  Spike (missile) an Israeli fourth generation anti-tank guided missile (ATGM)  SPIKE algorithm, a mathematical parallel algorithm for solving banded systems of linear equations  Voltage spike, also called an electrical surge, an electronic glitch  Spike (software development), a small task done to reduce uncertainty about a larger task  As a name   Spike (given name), a list of people and fictional characters  Spike (nickname), a list of people  Spike (surname), a list of people  Spike Dudley, ring name of former professional wrestler Matt Hyson (born 1970)  Spike Jonze (born Adam Spiegel in 1969), filmmaker  Spikes (surname), a list of people  Sports   Spike (gridiron football), a play in American football  Spike (volleyball), a form of volleyball attack  Spikes (mascot), the mascot of the Minor League AAA Rochester Red Wings  State College Spikes, a minor league baseball team that currently plays in the New York –
1
Penn League  Track spikes, lightweight shoes with spikes screwed into their bottom, or spike plate, in order to maximize traction  Entertainment  Music   artists name of Frans van Zoest, guitar player of rock band Di-rect  A song from The Network album Money Money 2020  Spike (Agata album), 2004  Spike (Elvis Costello album), 1989  Spike (music), a part of certain stringed instruments  Spike (musician), singer of The Quireboys  Spike (Puffy AmiYumi album), 2001  Spike (Welsh guitarist), stage name of Mike Williams   Books and magazines  Spike (DC Thomson) a British comics anthology published by DC Thomson  Spike (IDW Publishing), a comic book series featuring the Buffy the Vampire Slayer character  Spike (Marvel Comics), a number of characters appearing in comic books from Marvel Comics  Spike (Peanuts), a cousin of Snoopy in the Peanuts comic strip  Spike Magazine, an internet cultural journal which began in 1996  The Spike (1980), a 1980 novel by Arnaud de Borchgrave  The Spike (1997), novel by Damien Broderick  Film and television   Spike (Buffy the Vampire Slayer), a character in the television series Buffy the Vampire Slayer  Spike (2008 film), directed by Robert Beaucage  Spike (stagecraft), a theatrical term  Spike (TV network), an American cable network  Spike (UK), a localized version of the American channel  Spike (Netherlands & Flanders), a localized version of the American channel  Spike, a Stegosaurus in The Land Before Time  Gaming   Spike (company), a video game company  Spike (video game), a 1983 platform game for the Vectrex video game system  Other uses   Mickey Finn (drugs) or drink spiking  Spike (journalism), to decide not to publish or make public  Spike (stagecraft), markings on a stage to show the correct positioning of objects and actors  Spike Island (disambiguation)  Colloquial name for a workhouse  See also       Golden spike (disambiguation)  Spiked (disambiguation)  Spyke, a character in the American animated television series X-Men: Evolution  The Spike (disambiguation)
HOLLYWOOD LEFTIES: This left-handed lady was positively "Bewitching" in a 2005 Nora Ephron film
Nicole Kidman
" There was a shocked reaction to her death (as she had kept her illness secret from most people), with Meryl Streep, Matthew Broderick, Billy Crystal, Meg Ryan, Nicole Kidman, Tom Hanks, Albert Brooks, and Ron Howard commenting on her brilliance, warmth, generosity, and wit.
3
Ephron graduated from Beverly Hills High School in 1958, and from Wellesley College in Wellesley, Massachusetts, in 1962.
Ephron's 2002 play Imaginary Friends explores the rivalry between writers Lillian Hellman and Mary McCarthy.
Or failing that, an architect who would rape me.
IT HAPPENED IN '08: 1908:She founds the Christian Science Monitor
Mary Baker Eddy
It was started in 1908 by Mary Baker Eddy, the founder of the Church of Christ, Scientist.
3
The paper's overall circulation has ranged widely, from a peak of over 223,000 in 1970, to just under 56,000 shortly before the suspension of the daily print edition in 2009.
Weekdays were news-led, but weekend schedules were exclusively dedicated to religious programming.
In 1986, the Monitor started producing a current affairs television series, The Christian Science Monitor Reports, which was distributed via syndication to television stations across the United States.
NATIONAL ANTHEMS: "Towards the East, an eye looks to Zion"
Israel
Mentioned in the Bible in the Book of Samuel (2 Samuel 5:7) as the name of the Jebusite fortress conquered by King David, its origin likely predates the Israelites.
3
A cryptic verse in the book of Zechariah, , seems to refer to Mount Moriah, but may be ambiguous, depending on the punctuation.
To Zion Goes I",  Sublime, Lauryn Hill, Boney M. ("Rivers of Babylon"), Black Uhuru "Leaving to Zion", Fluid Minds "Zion", Dreadzone with the reggae-tinged track "Zion Youth.", P.O.D. with song "Set Your Eyes to Zion" (but P.O.D. with a Christian viewpoint: Zion referring to the spiritual kingdom of God), Trevor Hall with song "To Zion", and Australian roots reggae outfit Vindan and The Zion Band, also Alcyon Massive (a reggae/psychedelic band in Southern Oregon) wrote a song titled "Zion".
The Jewish longing for Zion, starting with the deportation and enslavement of Jews during the Babylonian captivity, was adopted as a metaphor by Christian Black slaves in the United States, and after the Civil War by blacks who were still oppressed.
FILMS OF THE '70s: Sally Field won a victory for the union & an Oscar for herself, in this 1979 film
Norma Rae
After numerous other television roles, Field ventured into film, starring in Smokey and the Bandit (1977) and later Norma Rae (1979), for which she received universal acclaim, receiving the Academy Award for Best Actress for her performance.
3
In the 2000s, Field returned to television with a recurring role as Maggie Wyczenski on the NBC medical drama ER, for which she won the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actress in a Drama Series in 2001.
Field's gushing acceptance speech is well remembered and has since been both admired as earnest and parodied as excessive.
Field is an advocate for women's rights.
THE LITERARY WORLD: Both "The Magus" & "The French Lieutenant's Woman" by this author have been made into films
John Fowles
The French Lieutenant's Woman is a 1969 postmodern historical fiction novel by John Fowles.
3
Critic Michelle Phillips Buchberger describes this first ending as "a semblance of verisimilitude in the traditional 'happy ending'" found in actual Victorian novels.
Not all of the reviews were positive; for example, Roger Sale in The Hudson Review largely criticized the novel, saying, "At times it seems that the commentary is not so bad and the novel awful, but at others Fowles makes the novel almost work and the comments are embarrassingly vulgar."
London World Books (1971) Panther (1971) Triad Granada (1977)  Franklin Library (Privately Printed, 1979)  NAL/Dutton (Oct. 1981) New York American Library (1981) Penguin (Oct. 1981) Pan Books in association with Jonathan Cape (1987) New American Library (1989) Soho Press, Inc. (1990) William A. Thomas Braille Bookstore (1990) Hodder & Stoughton Educational (1991) Picador (1992) Buccaneer Books, Inc. (1994) Vintage (1996) Back Bay Books (1998)  Legacy The general popularity of The French Lieutenant's Woman has inspired several responses to the novel, most notably other authors' work and adaptation into film and theatre.
HISTORIC BATTLES: "Colonel William Prescott, June 17, 1775", reads the inscription memorializing this Boston battle
the Battle of Bunker Hill
Prescott stands right of center wearing all brown, just behind Captain Morgan in white  William Prescott (February 20, 1726 – October 13, 1795) was an American colonel in the Revolutionary War who commanded the rebel forces in the Battle of Bunker Hill.
3
Later life Prescott served in the Massachusetts General Court in later years.
See footnote for location map.^ http://map.harvard.edu/mapserver/campusmap.htm  However, Prescott Street, two blocks from Harvard Yard in Cambridge is not named after General William Prescott, but after his grandson, William Hickling Prescott (May 4, 1796 – January 28, 1859).http://hul.harvard.edu/lib/archives/refshelf/cba/p.html#prescottst  This grandson became a noted historian and author, who (in a remarkable moment of historical reconciliation) married the granddaughter of Captain John Linzee, captain of the HMS Falcon, one of the British ships that fired on Bunker Hill Patriots.
The city of Prescott, Arizona, is also named in honor of his scholarly grandson.
30 YEARS' WAR CALL-IN: (Alex: Well, on the line right now is General Albrecht von Wallenstein)  Hey, King Christian IV of this Scandinavian country give me your best shot, pal.  You got nothing!
Denmark
He then joined Tilly in the struggle with Christian IV of Denmark,Spielvogel, Jackson J. (2005) Western Civilization, Thomson Wadsworth, p. 414.
3
thumb|left|Self image Wallenstein depicted as Mars, the God of war, riding the sky in a chariot pulled by four horses.
ISBN 0-486-24913-1.
In the campaigning of 1633, Wallenstein's apparent unwillingness to attack the enemy caused much concern in Vienna and in Spain.
OPPOSITES IN SONG: While The Silhouettes were urged to "Get A Job", Johnny Paycheck told his employer this
"Take This Job And Shove It"
was an American country music singer, multi-instrumentalist and Grand Ole Opry member most famous for recording the David Allan Coe song "Take This Job and Shove It".
2
All I Got" which reached No. 2 on the U.S. country singles charts in 1971 and made it onto the Billboard Hot 100.
Little Darlin' Records With his producer, Aubrey Mayhew, Paycheck co-owned his record company, Little Darlin' Records.
LEGENDARY LIONS: Lioness that was "Born Free" in a Joy Adamson book
Elsa
Her book, Born Free, describes her experiences raising a lion cub named Elsa.
2
In 1977, she was awarded the Austrian Cross of Honour for Science and Art.
Every year, they got together for Christmas, and they remained on good terms.
GENERALS: In the early days of WWI, General Erich Ludendorff captured the fortress city of Liege in this country
Belgium
He was given his assignment largely due to his previous work investigating the dozen forts surrounding Liège, Belgium.
3
Together they formed the so-called Third Supreme Command.
Armies of occupation page 128	 Roy Arnold Prete, A. Hamish Ion –
Wilfrid Laurier University Press 1984 Ludendorff planned German settlement in conquered areas combined with expulsions of the native population and envisioned an eastern German empire whose resources would be used in future war with Great Britain and the United States.
ASCENT OF EVEREST: Reinhold Messner amazed people when he reached the summit without a bottle of this, a need for most
oxygen
He made the first ascent of Mount Everest without supplemental oxygen, along with Peter Habeler, and was the first climber to ascend all fourteen peaks over  above sea level.
3
Because of avalanche danger on the original route and time lost on the approach, they decided on climbing via the Abruzzi Spur.
Even during Messner and Kammerlander's ascent the weather was not good
Messner tried four times to climb Makalu.
ACTORS & THEIR ROLES: Larry Gigli & George Reeves
Ben Affleck
thumb|Ben Affleck as George Reeves in Hollywoodland Hollywoodland dramatizes the investigation of Reeves' death.
3
Later, Reeves' mother moved to California to stay with her sister.
During the second season, Reeves appeared in a short film for the Treasury Department entitled Stamp Day for Superman, in which he caught the villains and told children why they should invest in government savings stamps.
Character actor Ben Welden had acted with Reeves in the Warner Bros. days and frequently guest-starred on Superman.
IN THE NAVY: On July 18, 1792 this "Father of the American Navy" bought his "Stairway to Heaven"
John Paul Jones
Led Zeppelin bassist John Paul Jones recalled this presentation of the song to him following its genesis at Bron-Yr-Aur:  Page and Plant would come back from the Welsh mountains with the guitar intro and verse.
3
In November 1970, Page dropped a hint of the new song's existence to a music journalist in London:  It's an idea for a really long track....
Even "Hey Jude" was shorter, was a 45, and enjoyed the benefits of comprehensible words and a sing-along chorus.
Even our dislike and mockery is ritualistic.
BEASTLY GEOGRAPHY: Cities in this nation include Iskenderun, Islahiye & Istanbul
Turkey
İskenderun or Scanderoon ( "Little Alexandria"), historically known as Alexandretta, is a city and the largest district in the province of Hatay on the Mediterranean coast of Turkey.
3
The settlement was founded by Alexander the Great in 333 BC to supersede Myriandrus as the key to the Syrian Gates, about 37 km (23 miles) south of the scene of his victory at the Battle of Issus.
The city was well described in 1675 by the English naval chaplain Henry Teonge in his diary.
He proposed a new railway from Alexandretta which would greatly reduce the time for reaching India from the UK.
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: Rita Hayworth, Marilyn Monroe & Raquel Welch (in poster form) help Tim Robbins escape prison in this 1994 film
The Shawshank Redemption
He is well known for his portrayal of Andy Dufresne in the prison drama film The Shawshank Redemption (1994).
3
He spent two years at SUNY Plattsburgh and then returned to California to study at the UCLA Film School, graduating in 1982.
His breakthrough role was as pitcher Ebby Calvin "Nuke" LaLoosh in the 1988 baseball film Bull Durham which he co-starred with Susan Sarandon and  Kevin Costner.
As of 2006, he was the tallest Academy Award-winning actor at .
MOVIE DIRECTORS: (Hi, I'm Joel Schumacher.)  Directing movies based on this author's "The Client" & "A Time to Kill" was like getting paid to go to law school
John Grisham
John Grisham Schumacher has directed two adaptations of John Grisham novels: The Client (1994) and A Time to Kill (1996).
3
His mother was a Swedish Jew, and his father was a Baptist from Knoxville, Tennessee, who died when Joel was four years old.
The film was originally slated to be released in November 2001, but after the September 11 attacks it was pushed back to the summer of 2002 because of its theme about terrorist attacks in New York City.
The film was panned by most critics and was a box office failure.
TV CARTOONS: Before moving on to "King of the Hill", Mike Judge created & gave voice to this adolescent pair
Beavis and Butt-head
He created and starred in the animated television series Beavis and Butt-Head (1993–1997, 2011), King of the Hill (1997–2010) and The Goode Family (2009), and co-created the television sitcom Silicon Valley (2014–present).
3
In 1997, Judge created King of the Hill for the Fox Network.
Judge's film Idiocracy (2006), a dystopian comedy starring Luke Wilson and Maya Rudolph, was given a limited release theatrically by 20th Century Fox in September 2006, two years after production.
Since then, it has gained a cult following.
GUINNESS RECORDS: In 1970 the Pringles plant in Tennessee produced one of these measuring 23" X 14 1/2" -- Yum! Yum!
Potato chip
Originally marketed as "Pringles Newfangled Potato Chips", Pringles are sold in more than 140 countries, and it was the fourth most popular snack brand after Lay's, Doritos and Cheetos in 2012, with 2.2% market share globally, compared to Lay's share of 6.7%.
2
The crisps were made of corn and resembled a corn chip in flavor and texture.
Pringles, as a product brand, is especially known for its packaging, a tubular paperboard can with a foil-lined interior and a resealable plastic lid, which was invented by Fredric J. Baur.
CALENDAR GIRLS: Donna Douglas played this "Beverly Hillbillies" gal on TV & Erika Eleniak played her in the 1993 movie
Elly May
She had a starring role as Elly May Clampett in the screen adaptation of The Beverly Hillbillies in 1993.
3
She also starred in the films E.T.: The Extra-Terrestrial, The Blob, Under Siege and The Beverly Hillbillies.
In the film, she is described as "Jordan Tate, Miss July 1989"—which is the month that Eleniak was Playmate of the Month in real life.
She purchased a home in Calgary, where Daigle lived.
MOVIE DIRECTORS: John Ford said he played one of the Ku Klux Klan members in this D.W. Griffith film
Birth of a Nation
In addition to credited roles, he appeared uncredited as a Klansman in D. W. Griffith's 1915 The Birth of a Nation, as the man who lifts up one side of his hood so he can see clearly.
3
His 1923 feature Cameo Kirby, starring screen idol John Gilbert—another of the few surviving Ford silents—marked his first directing credit under the name "John Ford", rather than "Jack Ford", as he had previously been credited.
It was made at the insistence of Republic Pictures, who demanded a profitable Western as the condition of backing Ford's next project, The Quiet Man.
External links     La furia umana/3, winter 2010, special about John Ford, texts (in French, Italian, English, Portuguese) by Julio Bressane, Paul Vecchiali, Raymond Bellour, Art Redding, Toni D'Angela, Juan Gorostidi Munguia, Tag Gallagher, Joseph McBride, Jacques Aumont, John Zorn, Barry Gifford, Giulio Giorello, Alberto Abruzzese, Eva Truffaut and others; on www.lafuriaumana.it  Ford biography at Yahoo! Movies  "Ford Till '47" by Tag Gallagher, at SensesofCinema.com  "John Ford" by Richard Franklin, at SensesofCinema.com  Ford biography (with film poster illustration) at ReelClassics.com  Biography of Rear Admiral John Ford; U.S. Naval Reserve at Naval Historical Center  "Oral History – Battle of Midway: Recollections of Commander John Ford" at Naval Historical Center  John Ford Bibliography at Film.
POTPOURRI: On October 10, 1995 he retained his world chess title by defeating India's Viswanathan Anand
Garry Kasparov
In the World Chess Championship 2013 he lost to challenger Magnus Carlsen and he lost again to Carlsen in the World Chess Championship 2014.http://www.chessvibes.com/candidates’-r13-anand-draws-clinches-rematch-with-carlsen  In April 2006 Anand became the fourth player in history to pass the 2800 Elo mark on the FIDE rating list, after Garry Kasparov, Vladimir Kramnik and Veselin Topalov.
2
The 2002 FIDE world championship was ultimately won by Ruslan Ponomariov.
ChessVibes.
EXPLORERS: La Salle, exploring Lake Ontario around 1670, heard the roar of this feature but didn't bother to go look
Niagara Falls
La Salle Explorers, the athletic program of La Salle University in Philadelphia LaSalle Hotel, a historic landmark in Bryan, Texas LaSalle Expressway, an expressway in Niagara Falls, New York, United States LaSalle Records, a division of Atlantic Records Jones Lang LaSalle, a financial and professional services company specializing in real estate LaSalle's invariance principle, a concept in theory of differential equations, with applications in control theory USS La Salle (AGF-3) USS La Salle (AP-102) LaSalle, US band, signed by Thick Records  See also  De La Salle (disambiguation)  De La Salle College (disambiguation)  De La Salle High School (disambiguation)  La Salle High School (disambiguation)  La Salle University (disambiguation)  Salle (disambiguation)
2
La Salle, LaSalle or Lasalle may refer to:  Places Canada La Salle, Manitoba LaSalle, Ontario LaSalle, Quebec, borough of Montreal LaSalle (AMT), a commuter rail station serving the borough LaSalle—Émard, federal electoral district in Quebec  Lasalle (electoral district), former electoral district in Quebec  France  Lasalle, Gard  La Salle, Saône-et-Loire  La Salle, Vosges  La Salle-de-Vihiers, in the Maine-et-Loire department  La Salle-en-Beaumont, in the Isère department  La Salle-et-Chapelle-Aubry, in the Maine-et-Loire department  La Salle-les-Alpes, in the Hautes-Alpes department  La Salle-Prunet, in the Lozère department  Haiti La Salle Corail Haiti, a rural village in the Pestel municipality  Italy La Salle, Aosta Valley  United States La Salle, Colorado LaSalle, Illinois La Salle, Minnesota La Salle, Texas (disambiguation), multiple locations LaSalle County, Illinois La Salle County, Texas La Salle Parish, Louisiana LaSalle Park, a neighborhood of St. Louis, Missouri LaSalle Street, Chicago, Illinois LaSalle (CTA Blue Line station), on the Chicago Transit Authority's Blue Line LaSalle/Van Buren (CTA station), on the CTA's Brown, Purple, Pink, and Orange Lines in the Loop La Salle Township, Michigan LaSalle (Metro Rail), a Buffalo Metro Rail underground station   Education  La Salle is the name of several educational institutions affiliated with the Institute of the Brothers of the Christian Schools, also known as the Lasallian Brothers, a Roman Catholic religious teaching order founded by French priest Saint Jean-Baptiste de la Salle.
Many institutions are listed in La Sallian educational institutions, De La Salle Supervised Schools, and De La Salle Philippines  Universidad La Salle, in Mexico City, Mexico  De La Salle Araneta University, in Malabon City, Philippines  De La Salle University in Manila, Philippines
OPERA, LIKE IT OR NOT: Julie Taymor directed the 2006 opera "Grendel", which retold this classic tale from the monster's point of view
Beowulf
A darkly comic retelling of the Beowulf tale based on the novel by John Gardner, the opera was co-commissioned by the Los Angeles Opera and the Lincoln Center Festival.
3
author (alongside Salma Hayek).
Published by Abrams Books  Film Taymor has also worked in film, directing Titus (1999) and Frida (2002).
Her production of The Green Bird did not receive the same blockbuster reception as The Lion King.
PRO FOOTBALL: In 1972 this NFL team moved its home games to Arrowhead Stadium, upping its seating capacity by over 30,000
Kansas City Chiefs
Arrowhead Stadium is a multi-purpose stadium in Kansas City, Missouri, United States, that primarily serves as the home venue of the Kansas City Chiefs of the National Football League (NFL).
3
On July 25, 2010, Kansas City Wizards played Manchester United as Manchester United's third preseason friendly in America during 2011 at Arrowhead Stadium in Kansas City.
May 25, 2006.
DiPardo has written songs about the team such as "The Chiefs are on the Warpath" and "The Hank Stram Polka".
GOING TO THE DOGE: 14th century doge Marino Faliero was the subject of a tragedy by this "Don Juan" poet
Lord Byron
The story of Faliero's uprising was made into dramas by Lord Byron (1820)Lefevre, Carl. "
3
According to tradition, this came about because the dogaressa, Faliero's second wife, Aluica Gradenigo, had been insulted by Michele Steno, a member of an aristocratic family,Grignola, p. 49 but in a study of doges of Venice Antonella Grignola suggests that Faliero's move was consistent with a prevailing trend in Italian cities to move away from oligarchic government to absolute, dynastic rule.
Faliero pleaded guilty to all charges and was beheaded and his body mutilated.
49, No. 3 (July 1952), pp.
THE NUMBER OF...: ...white stripes on the U.S. flag
6
http://news.google.com/news?hl=en&ned=us&ie=UTF-8&q=US&btnG=Search+News vs   http://news.google.com/news?hl=en&ned=us&ie=UTF-8&q=American&btnG=Search+News  The first one nearly triples the ammount of headlines with US including major newspapers, the second is used by mostly local/regional newspapersDamianFinol 14:01, 24 January 2006 (UTC)  US is used in headlines chiefly because it's shorter than American.
3
Classifying Canadians as Anglo-Saxon just seems to me another example of leaping to conclusions about Canada.
Those born in Brazil are also brazilians, and those born in the USA are also "US citizens" or whatever equivalent you want it to be; as long as it is not ambiguous with the term american.
"The Americas" is a new English term meaning both continents of North America and South America.
STATE FLOWERS: This official U.S. national flower doubles as New York's state flower
Rose
Where the style of the prose flows better to say "America", I am using piped links.
3
I got into an argument with people on a messageboard because someone wanted to call us USAmericans.
I mentioned it to bring to light the fact that the reasoning about the "separation" of America in two parts, South and North, in the 18th century, was due to a political, unilateral position by the US.  As for English usage being offensive to people who speak other languages, that is a problem created entirely by people who speak other languages.
Isnt the language one country speaks part of its culture?
THE NATIONAL ARCHIVES: (Alex reports from the National Archives.)  American history might have been very different if this future country had agreed to the offer of statehood contained in Article 11 of the Articles of Confederation
Canada
I know most "US"ers would disagree, but I've always felt that it was presumptuous of us to call ourseleves Americans as if people from Canada and Mexico, etc. were not.
3
If you take the word "american" to mean a native of the continent of America, then theres no reason at all for canadians to be offended.
Rossami 02:24, 21 Sep 2004 (UTC) Note that I'm speaking of the connotations of said terms, and how they differ, here, not the denotations, which are identical with the way they are being literally used.
--Delirium 08:30, Jun 16, 2004 (UTC)  ---  I think there's a lot of confusion here due to cultural differences...
THE 19-AUGHTS: Radio pioneer Lee De Forest is seen here with his Audion, this type of tube which he patented in 1907
Vacuum tube
The Audion was an electronic amplifying vacuum tube invented by American electrical engineer Lee De Forest in 1906.De Forest patented a number of variations of his detector tubes starting in 1906.
3
The patent that most clearly covers the Audion is , Space Telegraphy, filed January 29, 1907, issued February 18, 1908<ref name="De Forest"> The link is to a reprint of the paper in the Scientific American Supplement, No. 1665, November 30, 1907, p.348-350, copied on Thomas H. White's United States Early Radio History website</ref
It had been known since the middle of the 19th century that gas flames were electrically conductive, and early wireless experimenters had noticed that this conductivity was affected by the presence of radio waves.
261–293, Sept. 1915.
ONE FACT AMONG THE FALSE GOSSIP: She's dating the Jonas Brothers! She rejoined her friend Courteney Cox as Tina on "Dirt"! She's dating Wilford Brimley!
Jennifer Aniston
At first the most famous cast member of the new show, Cox joined fellow castmates Jennifer Aniston (Rachel Green), Lisa Kudrow (Phoebe Buffay), Matt LeBlanc (Joey Tribbiani), Matthew Perry (Chandler Bing) and David Schwimmer (Ross Geller) for what would become her most famous role, lasting for 10 seasons until 2004.
3
Her early film roles include Masters of the Universe (1987), Cocoon: The Return (1988) and I'll Be Home for Christmas (1988).
In June 2012, Arquette filed for divorce after nearly two years of separation from Cox.
The divorce became final in May 2013.
HOME RUN SLUGGERS: As of opening day 2006, Carlos Delgado is the last to hit this record-tying number of homers in a game
4
With 473 home runs and 1,512 RBI, he holds the all-time home run and RBI records among Puerto Rican players.
3
In May, his batting average increased to .235 with five home runs.
Personal life
Delgado lives in his hometown of Aguadilla, Puerto Rico.
NONCREDIT WHERE CREDIT IS DUE: He got no credit as the brother of Zoolander or in "Anchorman", where he played rival newsman Wes Mantooth
Vince Vaughn
After his three roommates and colleagues are killed in a "freak gasoline-fight accident", Derek announces his retirement from modeling and attempts to reconnect with his father Larry (Jon Voight) and brothers Luke (Vince Vaughn) and Scrappy (Judah Friedlander) by helping in the coal mines.
2
It was subsequently made available in Singapore in 2006, with an R rating.
Zoolander
BLACK AMERICANS: This author of "I Know Why The Caged Bird Sings" won the NAACP's Spingarn Medal in 1994
Maya Angelou
Well-known recipients of the award include: W. E. B. Du Bois, Colonel Charles Young, George Washington Carver, Marian Anderson, Paul Robeson, Thurgood Marshall, Jackie Robinson, Martin Luther King, Jr., Langston Hughes, Sammy Davis, Jr., Alex Haley, Andrew Young, Rosa Parks, Coleman Young, Lena Horne, Bill Cosby, Jr., Jesse Jackson, Colin Powell, Earl Graves, Alvin Ailey and Maya Angelou.
2
1916 Charles Young (U.S. Army)  1917 Harry T. Burleigh (composer, pianist, singer)  1918 William Stanley Braithwaite (poet, editor, literary critic).
2013 Jessye Norman (opera singer)  2014 Quincy Jones   2015 Sidney Poitier http://www.naacp.org/press/entry/sidney-poitier-awarded-100th-naacp-spingarn-medal  References  External links NAACP Spingarn Medal site  Category:Awards established in 1915 Category:American awards Category:Awards honoring African Americans
RELATIVE SUCCESS: American Revolutionary statesman Jonathan Trumbull
Brother
He became a merchant with his father in 1731, participating more fully in the business after the death of his brother at sea in 1732.
3
When Gage sent Trumbull a request for assistance after the Battles of Lexington and Concord, Trumbull refused and made clear his choice to side with the Patriots.
He replied that Gage's troops would "disgrace even barbarians," and he accused Gage of "a most unprovoked attack upon the lives and the property of his Majesty's subjects."Eddlem, Thomas R. 25-AUG-03 The New American http://www.accessmylibrary.com/coms2/summary_0286-24329109_ITM  On July 6, 1775, along with other officers, the governor of Connecticut commissioned Nathan Hale as a first lieutenant in the newly raised Seventh Regiment.
Washington declared him "the first of the patriots."Phelps, Page 59.
ED TV: Played by Martin Short, he's the nerdy character seen here:
Ed Grimley
He has starred in comedy films, such as Three Amigos (1986), Innerspace (1987), Three Fugitives (1989), Father of the Bride (1991), Pure Luck (1991), Father of the Bride Part II (1995), Mars Attacks! (1996) and Jungle 2 Jungle (1997), and created the characters Jiminy Glick and Ed Grimley.
3
His mother died of cancer in 1968, his father two years later of complications from a stroke.
The special, I, Martin Short, Goes Home follows Martin's return to his native Hamilton, Ontario and has a cast that includes Eugene Levy, Andrea Martin, Joe Flaherty and Fred Willard.
However, Short appeared as a waiter, as he had only hosted twice."Cast, March 9, 2013 Saturday Night Live" imdb, accessed August 26, 2013Johnson, Zach. "Justin Timberlake" US Magazine, March 10, 2013  From 2014 to 2015, he starred in the Fox sitcom, Mulaney, as Lou Cannon, the boss and the game show host of the title character John Mulaney.
MUSIC: His No. 1 country song "A Boy Named Sue" was recorded live at San Quentin Prison
Johnny Cash
"A Boy Named Sue" is a poem written by Shel Silverstein that was made popular by Johnny Cash.
3
Cash was surprised at how well the song went over with the audience.
According to Cash biographer Robert Hilburn, neither the British TV crew filming the concert nor his band knew he planned to perform the song; he used a lyric sheet on stage while Perkins and the band improvised the backing on the spot.
Kristine M. McCusker, Diane Pecknold (2004)
COMPOSERS: This "Bolero" composer orchestrated Mussorgsky's piano work "Pictures at an Exhibition"
Ravel
Puerto Rico and Mexico The Cuban bolero has traveled to Puerto Rico and the rest of Latin America after its conception, where it became part of their repertoires.
3
In the 19th century there grew up in Santiago de Cuba a group of itinerant musicians who moved around earning their living by singing and playing the guitar.
The music has a gentle Cuban rhythm related to a slow son, which is the reason it may be best described as a bolero-son.
In some art music boleros, the root lies not in the bolero but in the habanera, a Cuban precursor of the tango, which was a favourite dance rhythm in the mid-19th century, and occurs often in French opera and Spanish zarzuela of the 19th and 20th centuries.
LITERARY MOMMAS: After Beowulf kills this monster, the monster's mother ravages Heorot before she is also killed by Beowulf
Grendel
The Geatish (Swedish) hero Beowulf defends the royal hall and its residents from the demonic Grendel.
3
" It served as a palace for King Hroðgar, a legendary Danish king of the sixth century.
Chi Heorot, a fraternity at Dartmouth College in Hanover, New Hampshire, is named after the hall.
Heorot is the name of a short story set in the Dresden Files universe, a series of novels written by Jim Butcher.
A WOMAN'S PLACE IS IN THE HOUSE: Former Rep. Debbie Stabenow took a stab & is now a U.S. senator from this state
Michigan
Deborah Ann "Debbie" Greer Stabenow (born April 29, 1950) is the senior United States Senator from Michigan and a member of the Democratic Party.
3
Stabenow served as Chairwoman of the Senate Agriculture Committee 2011-2015.
She defeated him 49.5%-48%, a difference of 67,259 votes.http://www.ourcampaigns.com/RaceDetail.html?RaceID=100  2006  Stabenow was challenged by Republican Michael Bouchard, Oakland County sheriff and former State Senate Majority Leader.
A controversial item during Stabenow's tenure, has been the renewal and reform of the 2012 U.S. Farm Bill.
ALSO A PRO SPORTS TEAM: Job title of Susan Collins, Carl Levin & Barack Obama
senators
After members of the U.S. House of Representatives and then-Senator Bob Smith (R-NH) threatened to redirect funds from the Cooperative Threat Reduction Program, Levin joined a bipartisan group of senators in opposition to the 20% reduction in funding.
3
He is the longest-serving senator in the state's history, and was ultimately fourth longest-serving incumbent in the U.S. Senate.
In 1999, Levin obtained $56 million for the Detroit Riverfront Project.
Health care Senator Levin supported a Patients' Bill of Rights to reduce the ability of Managed care organizations to affect medical decisions.
CHICKS RULE!: In the 1990s this Down Under island country has back-to-back female P.M.'s, Jenny Shipley & Helen Clark
New Zealand
Dame Jennifer Mary "Jenny" Shipley  (née Robson, born 4 February 1952) was the 36th Prime Minister of New Zealand from December 1997 to December 1999, the first woman to hold this office and to date the only female leader of the New Zealand National Party.
2
In her role as Minister of Social Welfare, Shipley presided over sharp cutbacks to state benefits.
She later started a charity to help a school she came across on that trip called the Namibian Educational Trust.
BIBLICAL FAMILIES: His mother Jochebed was hired to be his nurse by Pharaoh's daughter
Moses
For people named Yocheved, see Yocheved (disambiguation) thumb|right|250px|Moses and Jochebed by Pedro Américo, 1884.
3
She was the wife of Amram, as well as his aunt.
It was found by the Pharaoh's daughter, Bithia, who had come to bathe in the river.
Exodus 6:16–20, LXX
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: The neighbors of this country include Saudi Arabia & oh-oh, Iraq
Kuwait
Saudi Arabia is bordered by Jordan and Iraq to the north, Kuwait to the northeast, Qatar, Bahrain, and the United Arab Emirates to the east, Oman to the southeast, and Yemen to the south.
3
Saudi Arabia has a long list of outstanding orders for arms, including 27 more combat aircraft from the UK, 154 combat aircraft from the USA and a large number of armoured vehicles from Canada.
Most Saudis live in Hejaz (35%), Najd (28%), and the Eastern Province (15%).
With the advent of oil-wealth in the 20th century came exposure to outside influences, such as Western housing styles, furnishings, and clothes.
TV TITLE PAIRS: Eric McCormack & Debra Messing
Will & Grace
She is known for her many television roles, most notably her eight-year run playing Grace Adler on the NBC sitcom Will & Grace.
2
Messing was cast by director Woody Allen in a small role in his 2002 film Hollywood Ending.
Gracing Broadway —
LETTER & LETTER: Charles Keating owned the Lincoln one that failed in the 1980s
S&L
References  Bibliography          External links  Charles Keating's federal campaign contributions 1979–1990 FDIC bibliography about Keating's involvement in the S&L scandal 1989–1993  Category:1923 births Category:2014 deaths Category:20th-century American businesspeople Category:21st-century American businesspeople Category:American bankers Category:American businesspeople convicted of crimes Category:American construction businesspeople Category:American consulting businesspeople Category:American chief executives of financial services companies Category:American financiers Category:American fraudsters Category:American investors Category:American law firm executives Category:American military personnel of World War II Category:American newspaper publishers (people) Category:American people convicted of fraud Category:American real estate businesspeople Category:American Roman Catholics Category:American social activists Category:American swimmers Category:American white-collar criminals Category:Anti-pornography activists Category:Businesspeople from Phoenix, Arizona Category:Businesspeople from Ohio Category:Lawyers from Phoenix, Arizona Category:Cincinnati
3
In 1999, he pleaded guilty to a more limited set of wire fraud and bankruptcy fraud counts, and was sentenced to the time he had already served.
By the early 1980s, American Continental's profits were in the millions and it had become the biggest single-family home builder in Phoenix and Denver.
in the Paradise Valley neighborhood of Phoenix.
THE OLD-FASHIONED WAY: Who needs Ryan Seacrest or even Dick Clark?  For years we enjoyed this man & his Royal Canadians on New Year's Eve
Guy Lombardo
Clark aimed to challenge the dominance of Guy Lombardo's New Year's specials on CBS, as he believed its big band music skewed too old.
3
Radio programs Clark's first love was radio, and in 1963 he began hosting a radio program called The Dick Clark Radio Show.
Despite a feud between Clark and Soul Train creator and host Don Cornelius, the two would later collaborate on several specials featuring black artists.
Clark had a stake in a chain of music-themed restaurants licensed under the names "Dick Clark's American Bandstand Grill", "Dick Clark's AB Grill", "Dick Clark's Bandstand — Food, Spirits & Fun" and "Dick Clark's AB Diner".
WHEN YOU WERE A TEENAGER, ALEX: I used to bop around in my living room watching this '50s dance show hosted in Philly by Dick Clark
American Bandstand
Richard Augustus Wagstaff "Dick" Clark Jr. (November 30, 1929 – April 18, 2012) was an American radio and television personality, as well as a cultural icon who remains best known for hosting American Bandstand from 1957 to 1987.
3
The show gave many new music artists their first exposure to national audiences, including Ike and Tina Turner, Smokey Robinson and the Miracles, Stevie Wonder, Talking Heads and Simon & Garfunkel.
thumb|upright|Dick Clark as host of The $10,000 Pyramid Clark became the first host of The $10,000 Pyramid, which premiered on CBS March 26, 1973.
Each week, Clark would profile a different artist from the rock and roll era and count down the top four songs that week from a certain year in the 1950s, 1960s or early 1970s.
HIGH PLACES: Nanga Parbat in Jammu & Kashmir is considered the most dangerous peak for climbers in this range
Himalayas
It is the western anchor of the Himalayas around which the Indus river skirts into the plains of Pakistan.
3
An immense, dramatic peak rising far above its surrounding terrain, Nanga Parbat is also a notoriously difficult climb.
Italian Simone Moro, Germany David Göttler and Italy Emilio Previtali - Schell route on the Rupal Face.
(Mistress of Mistresses, 1935, p.2-3)  Jonathan Neale wrote a book about the 1934 climbing season on Nanga Parbat called Tigers of the Snow.
THE LONE REPRESENTATIVE: Bernie Sanders from this state with 14 counties, including Rutland & Bennington
Vermont
Bernard "Bernie" Sanders (born September 8, 1941) is an American politician and the junior United States Senator from Vermont.
3
Sanders stated that he would not pursue funding through a "Super PAC", instead focusing on small individual donations.
In December 2015, the Democratic National Committee suspended the campaign's access to its voter data after a campaign staffer viewed data from Hillary Clinton's campaign during a firewall failure.
Rep. Bernie Sanders Opposes Iraq War Official Senate SiteKrieg, Gregory (May 7, 2015).
QUE SARAH, SARAH: Sarah Josepha Hale wrote "Mary Had a Little Lamb" & advocated making this November day a national holiday
Thanksgiving
Hale famously campaigned for the creation of the American holiday known as Thanksgiving, and for the completion of the Bunker Hill Monument.
3
In its day, Godey's, with no significant competitors, had an influence unimaginable for any single publication in the 21st century.
ISBN 0-8263-0780-9 Hale did not support women's suffrage and instead believed in the "secret, silent influence of women" to sway male voters.
Sarah Josepha Hale Award, Richards Free Library  Hale was further honored as the fourth in a series of historical bobblehead dolls created by the New Hampshire Historical Society and sold in their museum store in Concord, New Hampshire.
IT'S A GROUP THING: Robby Krieger, Ray Manzarek, John Densmore & Jim Morrison
The Doors
Robert Alan "Robby" Krieger (born January 8, 1946) is an American rock guitarist and singer-songwriter best known as the guitarist in the Doors, and as such has been inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
3
At an early Doors rehearsal Morrison heard Krieger playing bottleneck guitar and initially wanted the technique featured on every song on the first album.
He enjoyed some success as a jazz-fusion guitarist, recording a handful of albums in the 1970s and 1980s, including Versions (1982), Robby Krieger (1985), and No Habla (1989).
The shows' setlists featured a range of material, including Doors standards, classic soul and rock 'n' roll covers from the '60s and '70s and material from Robinson's new Through a Crooked Sun album.
WATERFALLS: Reichenbach Falls in the Swiss canton of Bern was the setting of this literary hero's reported demise
Sherlock Holmes
In popular literature, Sir Arthur Conan Doyle gave the falls as the location of the final confrontation of his hero Sherlock Holmes with his greatest foe, the criminal Professor Moriarty in "The Final Problem".
2
Location
Numerous historical characters associated with the city, including Conan Doyle and his mentor Dr Joseph Bell, are mentioned in the story.
WORLD HISTORY: On August 1, 1798 Admiral Nelson delivered a fatal blow to the French fleet near the Rosetta mouth of this river
the Nile
Rosetta (;   ;   ) is a port city of the Nile Delta, located  east of Alexandria, in Egypt's Beheira governorate.
3
Rosetta or Rosette was the name used by the French at the time of  Napoleon Bonaparte's campaign in Egypt and thus became eponymous of the Rosetta Stone (), which was found by French soldiers at the nearby Fort Julien in 1799.
In Christian Egypt, the town was again known by the vernacular (Coptic) name, now in the form (t-)Rashit / Rakhit / Rexi  In the 850s, the Abbassid caliph ordered a fort to be built on the site of the Ptolemaic city, and the medieval city grew around this fort.
Climate Köppen-Geiger climate classification system classifies its climate as hot desert (BWh), but blowing winds from the Mediterranean Sea greatly moderate the temperatures, typical to the Egypt's north coast, making its summers moderately hot and humid while its winters mild and moderately wet when sleet and hail are also common.
BATMEN & ROBINS: This most recent Dick Grayson wore an earring
Chris O'Donnell
Dick Grayson has appeared as Robin in several other media adaptations: the 1943 serial played by Douglas Croft, the 1949 serial played by Johnny Duncan, the 1966–1968 live action Batman television series and its motion picture portrayed by Burt Ward, played by Chris O'Donnell in the 1995 film Batman Forever and its 1997 sequel Batman & Robin.
3
Nightwing (vol.
Titans A television pilot was being planned called Titans in which Dick Grayson was to be a central character.
Batman Unlimited: Animal Instincts Will Friedle plays Nightwing/Dick Grayson in Batman Unlimited: Animal Instincts.
FROM THE LAND DOWN UNDER: This character seen here is played by Barry Humphries
Dame Edna Everage
Humphries is best known for writing and playing his on-stage and television alter egos Dame Edna Everage and Sir Les Patterson.
3
At the appropriate juncture Humphries would force his way past the "blind" man, yelling "Get out of my way, you disgusting blind person", kicking him viciously in the shins and then jumping off the tram and making his escape in a waiting car.
In his award-winning autobiography, More Please (1992), Humphries relates that he had created a character similar to Edna in the back of a bus while touring country Victoria in Twelfth Night with the MTC at the age of twenty.
Dame Edna's new-found success in America led to many media opportunities, including a semi-regular role in the hit TV series Ally McBeal.
IT'S A TOUGH WORLD: Nawaz Sharif was the prime minister of this nation until deposed by its current military leader
Pakistan
Mian Muhammad Nawaz Sharif  (, ; born 25 December 1949) the 18th and current Prime Minister of Pakistan in office since June 2013.
3
Retrieved 5 August 2012.
This led to a collapse of the coalition government in late 2008 due to Zardari's erstwhile refusal to reinstate the sacked judge.
During the visit Sharif and Ghani also watch a cricket match between the two countries.
THE MIDDLE AGES: About 1000 A.D., they discovered North America & called parts of it Helluland, Markland, and Vinland
the Vikings
The particular part of the Labrador coast is difficult to pinpoint, as Helluland has been placed everywhere from Baffin Island to the northern Labrador coast beyond Groswater BayWhere in North America did the Vikings Settle?
3
However, the climate and hence the vegetation in this particular region may have changed significantly since the sagas were conceived - see Medieval Warm Period and Little Ice Age.
to the southern Labrador Coast.
See also   Norsemen  Vikings  Norse colonization of the Americas  References  External links  Markland and Helluland Archaeology  Category:Saga locations Category:Viking exploration of North America Category:Labrador
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: Of New York City's 5 boroughs, the one that is New York County
Manhattan
After years of struggle with alcohol dependency, Lowman Pauling ended up working as a night watchman at a Manhattan church and died of an apparent seizure on December 26, 1973.
3
The "5" Royales were inducted into the North Carolina Music Hall of Fame in 2009.
Cropper released an album in 2011 titled Dedicated: A Salute to the 5 Royales.
It's Hard
THE PONY EXPRESS: Of 5, 10 or 20 miles an hour, riders gererally averaged this
10
Veteran rock critic Dave Marsh chose the 1958 "5" Royales hit "The Slummer the Slum" as one of the top 1001 singles of all time in his book The Heart of Rock and Soul, crediting Pauling with capturing the first intentional use of guitar feedback on record, years before better-known squawks from the Beatles, Yardbirds, and Velvet Underground.
3
In the 1960s, R&B gradually gave way to more polished soul music and the Royales' career waned rapidly.
He was buried in Evergreen Cemetery in Winston-Salem, NC as was his brother Clarence who lies next to him, and fellow bandmates Otto Jeffries who died August 8, 1975 and Obadiah Carter who died June 30, 1994.
In May 2015, another compilation of their work won a Blues Music Award in the 'Historical' category.
HISTORY: Soldier & statesman Louis Botha helped negotiate the terms that ended this war in 1902
The Boer War
Role after the Boer War  thumb|right|Louis Botha Botha was a representative of his countrymen in the peace negotiations of 1902, and was signatory to the Treaty of Vereeniging.
3
thumb|upright=0.75|left|Caricature of Louis Botha by D. C. Boonzaier (in his Owlographs, 1901).
Widely viewed as too conciliatory with Britain, Botha faced revolts from within his own party and opposition from James Barry Munnik Hertzog's National Party.
F.V. Engelenburg, ‘
BRIT ROCK: This "dark" heavy metal band of the 1970s consisted of Bill Ward, Tony Iommi, Geezer Butler & Ozzy Osbourne
Black Sabbath
Best known as lead guitarist and founding member of the pioneering heavy metal band Black Sabbath, he has been the band's sole continual member and primary composer.
3
After releasing Fused, he joined Heaven & Hell, which disbanded after Ronnie James Dio's death in 2010.
But he kept insisting and he ended up playing the record for me.
Guitar Player Presents Guitar Heroes of the 70s (Milwaukee, WI: Backbeat Books, 2011), 131.
A STUDY IN SCARLET: As an epitaph, poet Hilaire Belloc wrote, "His sins were scarlet, but his books were" this
Red
thumb|left|Hilaire Belloc portrait, c. 1903 After being educated at John Henry Newman'sBrickel, Alfred G. "Hilaire Belloc and Cardinal Newman," The American Catholic Quarterly Review, Vol.
3
A.N. Wilson's Introduction to Belloc's Complete Verse, Pimlico, 1991.
380–383.
83, No. 973, Sep. 1954.  Gardner, A. G. "Mr. Hilaire Belloc."
BEFORE HE WAS PRESIDENT: He was captain of the debating team at Whittier College in California
Richard Nixon
The Orthogonian Society was co-founded by Richard Nixon in 1930.
3
Overview  Whittier College is one of the more diverse liberal arts colleges in the country, serving students not only of different ethnic and geographic backgrounds, but also of a wide range of socioeconomic backgrounds.
Assn.
Most Valuable Player playing for Taft, Bologna  Coaches George Allen, head football coach for the Poets from 1951–56.
MY DEAR WATSON: Diane Watson represents this state's 33rd district in the U.S. House of Representatives
California
A native of Los Angeles, Watson is a graduate of the University of California, Los Angeles, and also holds degrees from California State University, Los Angeles and Claremont Graduate University.
2
She was re-elected four times, but retired after the end of the 111th Congress.
The longtime chair of the Health and Human Services Committee, she gained a reputation as an advocate for health care for the poor and children.
POTENT POTABLES: This strong, dark type of beer takes its name from Einbeck, Germany, where it was first made
bock beer
Einbeck is the birthplace of bock beer, a beer with a high alcohol content.
3
Climate  Economy Einbeck had various industries over time that came and went.
The export of beer was a very important business so that in the harbor city of Hamburg Einbeck had it´s own distribution center (and pub), called the Eimbeck'sches Haus.
The New Town Hall was built in 1868 as Prussian Barracks.
NEW FACES IN THE 110th CONGRESS: Peter Roskam won the seat held for 32 years by this state's Henry Hyde
Illinois
Henry John Hyde (April 18, 1924 – November 29, 2007), an American politician, was a Republican member of the United States House of Representatives from 1975 to 2007, representing the 6th District of Illinois, an area of Chicago's northwestern suburbs which included O'Hare International Airport.
1
He remained in the Naval Reserve from 1946 to 1968, as an officer in charge of the U.S. Naval Intelligence Reserve Unit in Chicago.
ELMORE LEONARD: From a novelette in Dime Western Magazine, the "3:10 To" this place was a train
Yuma
Leonard's writings include short stories that became the films 3:10 to Yuma and The Tall T, as well as the FX television series Justified.
3
He went on to write seventeen novels and stories in the mystery, crime, and more topical genres which were made into movies between 1969 and 2013.
It was because of Leonard's affection for Hemingway, as well as George V. Higgins, that he chose the University of South Carolina, where many of Hemingway's and Higgins' papers are archived, as the home for his personal papers.
The Complete Western Stories of Elmore Leonard Leonard also wrote a short story included in the anthology Murderers' Row: Original Baseball Mysteries edited by Otto Penzler (2001).
FOOTBALL: (I'm Kurt Warner of the NFL.)  From 1995 to 1997 I played for the Iowa Barnstormers in this league that plays its games indoors
the Arena Football League
With no NFL teams willing to give him a chance, Warner turned to the Arena Football League (AFL) in 1995, and signed with the Iowa Barnstormers.
3
Warner became one of the very few quarterbacks in NFL history to throw more touchdowns (5) than incompletions (4) in a playoff game.
In December 2009, Warner topped a Sports Illustrated poll of NFL players to name the best role model on and off the field in the NFL.  Award In February 2010, Warner received the annual Bart Starr Award, given for outstanding character and leadership in the home, on the field and in the community.
Louis Rams players Category:Super Bowl MVPs Category:Undrafted National Football League players Category:American Christians Category:Arena Football Hall of Fame inductees Category:Super Bowl champions
THE CONGRESS: Former "Love Boat" star Fred Grandy represents this state's 6th District in the House
Iowa
Fredrick Lawrence "Fred" Grandy (born June 29, 1948) is an American actor best known for his role as "Gopher" on the sitcom The Love Boat and who later became a member of the United States House of Representatives from the state of Iowa.
2
Grandy was most recently the host of The Grandy Group, a morning drive time radio talk show on 630 WMAL in Washington, D.C.
He also wrote several vignettes for the show.
KITCHEN DUTY: In this author's book "Le Morte d'Arthur", Sir Gareth of Orkney is called the "Kitchen Knight"
Sir Thomas Malory
, Le Morte Darthur, by Sir Thomas Malory (New York: W. W. Norton, 2004), 1n.) is a reworking of traditional tales by Sir Thomas Malory about the legendary King Arthur, Guinevere, Lancelot, and the Knights of the Round Table.
3
In another, when Tristan defeats Sir Blamore, another knight of the Round Table, Blamore asks Tristan to kill him because he would rather die than have his reputation tarnished by the defeat.
New York.
Vinaver, Eugène (1971).
AUTO TUNES: Aretha Franklin sang about "ridin' on the freeway of love" in this car; it was later the title of a hit by Natalie Cole
"Pink Cadillac"
After a period of failing sales and performances due to a heavy drug addiction, Cole re-emerged as a pop artist with the 1987 album Everlasting and her cover of Bruce Springsteen's "Pink Cadillac".
3
She enrolled in the University of Massachusetts Amherst.
Cole released her first platinum record with her third release, Unpredictable, mainly thanks to the number-one R&B hit, "I've Got Love on My Mind".
The Magic of Christmas on October, which recorded with London Symphony Orchestra.
ANNUAL EVENTS: Every February, the town of Menton in France hosts La Fete du Citron--citron being this fruit
lemon
In 1848, Menton, along with its neighbour Roquebrune, seceded from Monaco, due at least in part to a tax imposed on lemon exports.
3
Its position on the border between the Angevin-ruled Provence and the Republic of Genoa, which at the time claimed Monaco as its western limit, made it a coveted location.
Later, sound scientific findings revealed that the seaweed was adept at absorbing pollutants and excess nutrients, actually aiding the recovery of native Posidonia sea grassJaubert, J. M., J. R. M. Chisholm, G. Passeron-Seitre, D. Ducrot, H. T. Ripley, and L. Roy.
Cocteau also decorated the wedding room in Menton's town hall, and the small stone bastion in Menton's harbour wall.
AN OPERATIC CATEGORY: (Hi, I'm Isaac Mizrahi.)  Mack the Knife wore those fancy gloves when I designed the costumes for a Broadway revival of this Brecht play
Threepenny Opera
Mizrahi has also worked as the costume designer for three Broadway revivals, including two plays (The Women in 2001 and Barefoot in the Park in 2006), and one operetta (Threepenny Opera in 2006).
3
Chanel eventually tired of the mounting losses and pulled financing in October 1998, forcing the closure of the company after the Fall 1998 collection.
On his Oxygen show, he sang jazz in a nightclub.
With Kelly" during the 84th Annual Academy Awards.
AUTHORS & THEIR SLEUTHS: Sam Spade
Dashiell Hammett
Sam Spade is a fictional private detective and the protagonist of Dashiell Hammett's 1930 novel, The Maltese Falcon.
3
Raymond Chandler's Philip Marlowe, for instance, was strongly influenced by Spade.
For your private detective does not — or did not ten years ago when he was my colleague — want to be an erudite solver of riddles in the Sherlock Holmes manner; he wants to be a hard and shifty fellow, able to take care of himself in any situation, able to get the best of anybody he comes in contact with, whether criminal, innocent by-stander or client.
ISBN 978-0-9703310-7-6  Short stories   "A Man Called Spade" (July, 1932, The American Magazine; also collected in A Man Called Spade and Other Stories)  "Too Many Have Lived" (October, 1932, The American Magazine; also collected in A Man Called Spade and Other Stories)  "They Can
"GEO" PARTY!: Type of math comparing lines & angles that the writer of this clue nearly failed in high school
Geometry
Geo- is thus a prefix for many words dealing in some way with the earth, including:   Geography, the study of the spatial characteristics of human and natural features on Earth as well as human-environment relationships  Geology, the study of the Earth's structure  Geotechnics, the application of scientific methods and engineering principles to the acquisition, interpretation, and use of knowledge of soil for engineering  Geopolitics, the analysis of history, geography and social science with respect to international politics  Geodesy, also known as geodetics, the study of the measurement and representation of the earth   Geometer moth, the larvae of which appear to "measure the earth" as they move in a looping fashion  Geometry, the mathematics of Earth measurement  Geocentric, a model of the universe that places the earth at its centre  Geostationary orbit, a circular orbit directly above the Earth's equator  Geosynchronous orbit, an orbit that has the same period as the Earth's sidereal rotation   Geothermal (geology), heat sources from within the Earth  Geo-exchange, a heating and cooling system   Geocaching, an outdoor activity that involves using navigational techniques to find geocaches    Geocoding or GeoTagging, encoding coordinates into features, images, web pages and other data records  Geolocation, the science of determining the real-world location of a website or website visitor
2
GEO or Geo may refer to any of the following:  In computational & scientific use:  GEO (magazine), a popular scientific magazine  GEO 600, a detector for gravitational radiation  Global Environment Outlook, an environmental assessment produced by the United Nations  Geo (microformat), a microformat for marking up geographical coordinates in (X)HTML  Geo URI, an IETF proposed standard for making URIs for physical locations  Gene Expression Omnibus, a National Center for Biotechnology Information database for gene expression  Geostationary Earth orbit, another name for geostationary orbit, a geosynchronous orbit directly above the Earth's equator.
In commercial use:  Geomarketing, a discipline within marketing analysis  Geo TV, a leading television channel in Pakistan  Geo (automobile), a defunct brand of entry-level cars produced by General Motors  GEO Group, a prison corporation  People:   Geo. is sometimes an abbreviation of the name George  Geo Bogza, Romanian poet and essayist  Geo Dumitrescu, Romanian poet  Geo Stelar is the protagonist in Mega Man Star Force  Christian Geo Heltboe, Danish comedian known by his middle name Geo  Geo, a fictional character on the Nick Jr. television show, Team Umizoomi  As a group:  Grupo Especial de Operaciones, a division of the Spanish police  General Education Officer, the basic rank of teachers of the Ministry of Education in Singapore  Group on Earth Observations, an intergovernmental organization  As a place:  GEO, the IATA code for Cheddi Jagan International Airport  Estadio Casas GEO, stadium in Mexicali, Mexico  Geo (landscape), a creek (inlet) or gulley in the Orkney and Shetland Islands  The IOC country code and three letter country code for , a Eurasian country  Geo City, a fictional city in the videogame Raw Danger  Prefix As a prefix: geo- is taken from the Greek word γη or γαια meaning "earth", usually in the sense of "ground or land".
MUSIC ON THE MAP: Herb Alpert spent time in one of its taxis while the Kingston Trio did time in its jail
Tijuana
Herbert "Herb" Alpert (born March 31, 1935) is an American musician most associated with the group variously known as Herb Alpert & the Tijuana Brass, Herb Alpert's Tijuana Brass, or TJB. Alpert is also a recording industry executive, the "A" of A&M Records, a recording label he and business partner Jerry Moss founded and eventually sold to PolyGram.
3
Save the Sunlight"
The Song Begins (1974) SP-3620Coney Island (1975) SP-4521Just You and Me (1976)
Sounds artists Category:American performers of Latin music Category:United States National Medal of Arts recipients
COMPLETES THE '60s HIT: Herman's Hermits' "Mrs. Brown, You've Got A Lovely..."
Daughter
After marrying the daughter of textile pioneer Edwin M. Holt, James Williamson became a principal in the Holt family textile interests and among the leading North Carolina businessmen of his time.
2
The FTC rejected the Lorillard deal on April 10, 1996, and B.A.T. and Brown & Williamson agreed July 25, 1996, to sell the six discount brands to Commonwealth Tobacco, LLC, a subsidiary of Commonwealth Brands, described as "a small cigarette maker based in Bowling Green, Ky., specializing in low-priced, unadvertised brands."
60 Minutes Despite Jeffrey Wigand's commitment to honor the confidentiality agreement and his initial refusal to talk to Lowell Bergman, a producer for 60 Minutes, Wigand claimed that he and his family were anonymously stalked, intimidated and threatened with death should he talk.
LAKES & RIVERS: The name of this state's Lake Okeechobee is a seminole Indian word meaning "plenty big water"
Florida
Lake Okeechobee (), locally referred to as "The Lake", "Florida's Inland Sea", or "The Big O", is the largest freshwater lake in the state of Florida.
3
History Lake Okeechobee sits in a shallow geological trough that also underlies the Kissimmee River Valley and the Everglades.
The Red Cross reported 1,836 deaths which the National Weather Service initially accepted, but in 2003, the number was revised to "at least 2,500".
ISBN 1-56670-614-9  External links
"CAP" & "GOWN": The nip before you're tucked in
Nightcap
Forage cap  Gandhi cap  Garrison cap  Glengarry  Greek fisherman's cap (also known as a Breton cap or a fiddler's cap)  International cap  Juliet cap  Karakul  Kepi  Kippah (also known as yarmulke)  Knit cap (also known as a Tuque, stocking cap, wool cap, watch cap, ski cap, bobble hat)  Kufi (also known as a kofia; an African cap worn with a dashiki)  M43 field cap  Mao cap  Monmouth cap  Newsboy cap  Nightcap  Nurse cap  Ochipok  Papakhi  Patrol cap  Peaked cap  Phrygian cap  Rastacap  Sailor cap  Shako  Shower cap  Sindhi cap  Square academic cap  Stormy Kromer cap  Swim cap  Tam o' Shanter  Taqiyah, worn by Muslim males  Trucker hat  Tubeteika  Ushanka  Utility cover  Welder's cap  Zucchetto   See also   Bonnet, until about 1700, the usual word for brimless male headgear  Cap (sport), metaphorical term  List of headgear    Category:Headgear
2
They are typically designed for warmth and, when including a visor, blocking sunlight from the eyes.
Types of caps  thumb|Baseball cap thumb|German M43-style field cap of the "Bundesgrenzschutz" (BGS), the German Federal Police thumb|A propeller hat, also known as a propeller beanie.
LANGUAGES: (Jon of the Clue Crew stands next to a monitor.) Kufic, named for the city of Kufa and often used for religious texts, is an ancient style of writing this most widely spoken Semitic language
Arabic
Kufa is also where the kufic script was developed, the earliest script of the Arabic language.
3
In order to manage the Military frontiers more efficiently, Ali shifted the capital from Medina to Kufa.
The historian Abu Mikhnaf al-Azdi (d. 774) compiled their accounts into a rival history, which became popular under Abbasid rule.
999), was the first to use the word 'kufic' to characterize this script, which reached a state of decorative perfection in the 8th century, when surahs were used to decorate ceramics, for representations of nature were strictly forbidden under the Islamic regime.
LITERARY MOVEMENTS: It's not ridiculous--Ionesco's "The Bald Soprano" is an example of the Theater of this
the Absurd
Meaning Like many plays in the theatre of the absurd genre, the underlying theme of The Bald Soprano is not immediately apparent.
3
ISBN 0-472-10310-5.
In this way the end becomes a new beginning but, since there are two couples in the play, it begins the first time with the Smiths and the second time with the Martins, to suggest the interchangeable nature of the characters: the Smiths are the Martins and the Martins are the Smiths".Bonnefoy, Claude.
Trans.
BASEBALL HALL OF FAMERS' TEAMS: Third baseman Brooks Robinson
the Orioles
Career Robinson was signed by the Orioles as an amateur free agent in 1955.Brooks Robinson: Trades and Transactions.
3
He played his entire 23-year major league career for the Baltimore Orioles (1955–1977).
- Baseball Almanac.
(Unitas threw a football.)
FAMILIAL QUOTATIONS: Robin Morgan made "Bartlett's" with her 1970 book title this "is Powerful"
Sisterhood
Her 1970 anthology Sisterhood is Powerful has been widely credited with helping to start the contemporary feminist movement in the US, and was cited by the New York Public Library as "One of the 100 Most Influential Books of the 20th Century" She has written more than 20 books of poetry, fiction, and nonfiction, and is also known as the editor of Ms. Magazine.
3
She never again met him or her two half-brothers.
In 2005, Morgan co-founded the non-profit progressive women's media organization, The Women’s Media Center, with friends actor/activist Jane Fonda, and activist Gloria Steinem.
Schlesinger Library, Radcliffe Institute, Harvard University.
HIGH SCHOOL TV: In 1952 Wally Cox was this title science teacher
Mister Peepers
Producer Fred Coe approached Cox about a starring role in a proposed live television sitcom, Mister Peepers, which he accepted.
3
These would lead to regular performances at nightclubs, such as the Village Vanguard, beginning in December 1948.
He became the roommate of Marlon Brando, who encouraged him to study acting with Stella Adler.
Personal life
A SALUTE TO SALLY FIELD: These days Sally plays Nora, matriarch of the Walker family on this ABC drama
Brothers & Sisters
People Arlind Nora (born 1980), Albanian footballer Pierre Nora (born 1931), French historian Princess Nora of Liechtenstein (born 1950) Nora Ephron (born 1941), Journalist  Norah Jones (born 1979), Singer-Songwriter Places Australia Norah Head, New South Wales, headland on the Central Coast Canada Mount Nora, a mountain on Vancouver Island, British Columbia Croatia Pula, known in Roman times as Nora Eritrea Nora (island), island in the Dahlak Archipelago of Eritrea Italy Nora, Italy, archaeological site in Sardinia Sweden Nora, Sweden Nora Municipality Nora and Hjulsjö Mountain District, district of Västmanland United States Nora, Idaho, an unincorporated community Nora, Illinois, village in Jo Daviess County Nora, Indianapolis, Indiana, a neighborhood Nora, Nebraska, village in Nuckolls County Nora, Virginia, unincorporated town in Dickenson County Nora, Wisconsin, unincorporated community in Dane County Nora Township, Clearwater County, Minnesota Nora Township, Jo Daviess County, Illinois Nora Township, Pope County, Minnesota Nora School, a high school in Silver Spring, Maryland Zimbabwe Glen Norah, Harare, high-density suburb  Fiction Nora (1923 film) Nora (1944 film), a German drama film Nora (2000 film) Nora (2008 film) Nora (EWTC show), a 2009 play based on Ibsen's A Doll's House Nora: The Last Chronicle of Devildom, a manga series by Kazunari Kakei Fictional characters Nora Baker, from the 2003 film Cheaper by the Dozen and Cheaper by the Dozen 2 Nora Batty, from the TV show Last of the Summer Wine Nora Charles, from The Thin Man series, wife of Nick Charles Nora Helmer, from Henrik Ibsen's play A Doll's House Nora Walker, from the TV show Brothers & Sisters  Music NORA (band), hardcore band "Nora", a song by The Long Winters from the 2003 album When I Pretend to Fall "Nora (song)", an alternative name for the folk song "When You and I Were Young, Maggie"
2
Nora is commonly a refined name for someone beautiful.
The name started to become popular for baby girls again in 2014.
THE MAGIC DRAGON: Peter MacNicol eventually gets this title job in a 1981 movie
Dragonslayer
In 1981 he landed the starring role in his first film, Dragonslayer, opposite Sir Ralph Richardson.
2
This adaptation was developed with the consultation of the author himself.
Among his other stage credits is the Broadway production of Black Comedy/White Lies.
FIRST NOVELS: "Valley of the Dolls"
Jacqueline Susann
Valley of the Dolls is a novel by American writer Jacqueline Susann, published in 1966.
3
Jennifer returns to the United States after years in Europe, where she's gained moderate success as an actress.
To cope with Lyon’s infidelity, Anne begins to take pills to sleep.
Her handlers demand that she lose weight.
M*A*S*H: Harry Morgan earned 8 Emmy nominations as this Colonel, scoring a win in 1980
Colonel Potter
1970s: M*A*S*H left|thumb|200px|As Colonel Potter in M*A*S*H with Alan Alda and Mike Farrell Morgan's first appearance on M*A*S*H was in the show's third season (1974–1975), when he played eccentric Major General Bartford Hamilton Steele in "The General Flipped at Dawn", which first aired on September 10, 1974.
3
In the same year, Morgan appeared in the movie Orchestra Wives as a young man pushing his way to the front of a ballroom crowd with his date to hear Glenn Miller's band play.
The following season, Morgan joined the cast of M*A*S*H as Colonel Sherman T. Potter.
His son, Charles, said he recently had been treated for pneumonia.
SPORTS HOLDS: Roger Staubach
Football
Roger Thomas Staubach (born February 5, 1942), nicknamed Captain America, is a former American football quarterback in the National Football League (NFL).
3
The Cowboys won the first NFC title in 1970 with Craig Morton starting at quarterback, but fell to the Baltimore Colts in Super Bowl V, losing by three points on a last-second field goal.
However, in a game against the Chicago Bears in the seventh week of that season, coach Tom Landry alternated Staubach and Morton on each play, sending in the quarterbacks with the play call from the sideline.
First of all, they didn’t pay quarterbacks what they do today.
PRO FOOTBALL: Quarterback Roger Staubach spent his entire 11-seaons pro career with this team
the Dallas Cowboys
Staubach joined the Dallas Cowboys in 1969 and played with the club during all 11 seasons of his career.
3
He is currently executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle.
Dallas gained almost 500 yards of offense but committed seven turnovers that led to a 23–19 loss to a mediocre Bears squad that dropped the Cowboys to 4–3 for the season, two games behind the Washington Redskins in the NFC East race.
He also gained 2,264 rushing yards and scored 21 touchdowns on 410 carries.
REDUCED SHAKESPEARE COMPANY: "Boo-oo!""Bl-bl-bl-bl!  Mad!  Ow!""Poison!""Mother!  Treachery!""Agh-hh-hh-hh!""Ugh!"
Hamlet
The Reduced Shakespeare Company is heard frequently on both NPR and the BBC.  Overview The Company was founded in 1981 by Daniel Singer, who wrote a 25-minute, 4-actor version of William Shakespeare's Hamlet, to be performed at the original Renaissance Pleasure Faire in Novato, California.
2
The ideal show length being about an hour, they decided they needed about twenty more minutes of material, and proposed doing Shakespeare's other 35 plays to round out an abridgement of everything the bard wrote in less than one hour.
Martin and Tichenor's second book, Reduced Shakespeare: The Attention Impaired Reader's Guide to the World's Best Playwright (abridged) was published by Hyperion in 2006.
NAME THAT BIOPIC: With Ray Liotta as mobster turned FBI informant Henry Hill
Goodfellas
He is best known for his portrayals of Henry Hill in the crime-drama Goodfellas (1990) and Shoeless Joe Jackson in Field of Dreams (1989).
3
Crossing Over Cole Frankel 2009 Observe and Report Det.
Chasing 3000 Adult Mickey 2010 Charlie St. Cloud Florio Ferrente 2011
G-Phoria Award for Best Male Voice PerformanceSpike Video Game Awards for Best Performance by a Human  2013 Call of Duty: Black Ops II Billy Handsome (voice)
THE COURAGE TO "B": This Asian capital city's Grand Palace houses the Emerald Buddha, which sits on a gilded wood throne
Bangkok
thumb|400px|The Grand Palace from across the Chao Phraya River thumb|right|400px|Chakri Maha Prasat in the Grand Palace, completed in 1882  The Grand Palace (,  ) is a complex of buildings at the heart of Bangkok, Thailand.
3
By 1925, the king, the Royal Family and the government were no longer permanently settled at the palace, and had moved to other residences.
The different tiers represents the king's power and prestige which extends in eight directions: the four cardinal directions and the four sub cardinal directions.
The throne hall was built on a symmetrical cruciform plan, the roof is topped with a tall gilded spire.
WHAT'S AT THE $2 CINEMA?: As the title character in this gory 1985 flick, Jeffrey Combs makes a serum that brings the dead to life
Re-Animator
Jeffrey Alan Combs (born September 9, 1954) is an American actor known for his horror film roles such as Re-Animator and appearances playing a number of characters in the Star Trek and the DC Animated Universe television franchises.
3
Other film credits include FeardotCom (2002), House on Haunted Hill (1999), I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998) and The Frighteners (1996).
On Star Trek: Enterprise, Combs had a recurring role as Shran, an Andorian military officer.
The Black Queen Ben 10: Omniverse Kuphulu Rad Monster Party; The Vampire Strikes Back 2015 Gotham Office Manager Red Hood, Everyone Has A Cobblepot Hulk and the Agents of S.M.A.S.H. Mainframe Wheels of Fury  Video game work  Year Title Role 2001 Star Trek: Deep Space Nine: Dominion Wars Weyoun 2003 Star Trek: Elite Force II Commander Suldok Batman: Rise of Sin Tzu
POLITICS: Earliest date in the year on which a US Presidential election can fall
November 2
November 2013.
3
Financial terms were not disclosed.
To improve the customer experience, the company plans to manage inventory better, make stores less cluttered and easier to shop, and develop a clear pricing strategy with simpler promotional offers.
December 2013.
17th CENTURY QUOTES: In his 1659 "Proverbs", James Howell wrote, "All work and no play makes Jack" this
a dull boy
Howell's Proverbs (1659), contains probably his most famous quote; All work and no play makes Jack a dull boy.http://www.famousquotesandauthors.com/authors/james_howell_quotes.html   Principal literary works Howell, James.
3
An Historical Discourse or Perlustration of the City of London.
Parley of Beasts Preheminence and Pedigree of Parliament 1677 Translation: Beginning, Continuance and Decay of Estates.(from French) Discourse of Dunkirk 1664 Sober Inspections.
A Restoration Publicist:James Howell and the Earl of Clarendon, 1661-6  W H Vann's Catalogue of Howell works (c1920)
BUT I'M TALKIN' ABOUT SHAQ: On March 6, 2000 Shaq dropped a career-high 61 points on this team that calls Staples Center home
the Clippers
During the late summer of 2010, modifications were made to the arena, including refurbished locker rooms for the Clippers, Kings, and Lakers and the installation of a new high-definition center-hung video scoreboard, replacing the original one that had been in place since the building opened in 1999.
3
Star Plaza
Initial fan reaction was positive, and has been a fixture on home games since.
Beyoncé performed at the Center during The Beyoncé Experience Tour on September 2, 2007, which was filmed and released as, The Beyoncé Experience Live.
IT'S ALL A BUNCH OF LIES: Although written by Parson Weems, the line "I can't tell a lie.  I did cut it with my hatchet" is often attributed to him
George Washington
He was the source of some of the apocryphal stories about George Washington.
3
Weems would later inflate this Washington connection and promote himself as the former "rector of Mount-Vernon parish".
He is buried at Bel Air.
It went on to be reprinted in the popular McGuffey Reader used by schoolchildren, making it part of the culture, causing Washington's  February 22 birthday to be celebrated with cherry dishes, with the cherry often claimed to be a favorite of his.
"SONG"S: The title of this 1976 No. 1 hit by Barry Manilow completes the line "I am music and..."
"I Write The Songs"
His #1 hit "I Write the Songs" was composed by Bruce Johnston of The Beach Boys.
3
The album was another eclectic mix of styles, almost entirely composed and produced by Manilow himself.
Guest Search 6/22/89 Manilow replied that he was just friends with Byrd, an innocent picture had been taken, and that there was no truth to the supposed engagement.
In July 1997, to settle the suit it was reported that Manilow donated $5,000 to American Tinnitus Association, an ear-disorder association.
PREHISTORIC CRITTERS: As the "avis" suggests, Argentavis' distinction was being able to do this, even at over 250 pounds
fly
Argentavis magnificens ("magnificent Argentine bird", or more literally "magnificent silver bird") is one of the largest flying birds ever known, possibly surpassed in wingspan only by the recently discovered Pelagornis sandersi.
2
Retrieved 2008-JAN-14  Description The humerus (upper arm bone) of Argentavis is somewhat damaged.
Mass estimates for these azhdarchids are on the order of .
ROCK MUSIC: This group's 1972 hit "Take It Easy" was written by group member Glenn Frey & Jackson Browne
The Eagles
Glenn Lewis Frey (; November 6, 1948 – January 18, 2016) was an American singer, songwriter, producer and actor, best known as a founding member of rock band the Eagles.
3
"You Belong to the City"                        2   1   2   6  2  94  20  46 Miami Vice (soundtrack) 1988 "True Love"         13  15   2   2  –
||  – || –
||  – || — |- | 1995 | "This Way to Happiness"||—|| –
WE ARE THE CHAMPIONS: Led by Isiah Thomas, this team's "Bad Boys" won the NBA title in 1989 & 1990
Detroit Pistons
Isiah Lord Thomas III (; born April 30, 1961) is an American retired basketball player who played professionally for the Detroit Pistons in the National Basketball Association (NBA).
3
At the 1979 Pan American Games in Puerto Rico Knight got so mad at Thomas he threatened to put him on a plane home.
Thomas purchased the CBA for $10 million, and in 2001 the league was forced into bankruptcy and folded, shortly after NBA Commissioner David Stern decided to create his own development league, the NBDL, to replace the CBA.CBA Museum, Isiah Thomas Years  Indiana Pacers From 2000 to 2003, Thomas coached the Indiana Pacers, succeeding Larry Bird, who previously coached the Pacers to the Eastern Conference title.
Thomas announced that he would donate his first year's salary back to the school.
ART: As a teenager, Andrew Wyeth was inspired by this American seascape artist
Winslow Homer
He studied art history on his own, admiring many masters of Renaissance and American painting, especially Winslow Homer.
3
Nathaniel Wyeth, the third child, was a successful inventor.
p. 373An
Retrieved April 21, 2011 Tom Duffield, the production designer for the American remake of The Ring (2002), was inspired by Wyeth's paintings for the look of the film.
TV SIDEKICKS: Kato
the Green Hornet
real name of Hibari Misora, Japanese singer and actress, National Treasure of Japan Kazuya Kato, a Japanese mathematician, working in number theory and algebraic geometry Koyuki Kato, a model and actress Masao Kato, a Go player Masashi Kato, a freestyle swimmer Masato Kato, a game developer and scenario writer Miliyah Kato, a singer Natsuki Katō, an actress , murderer at Akihabara massacre Ryohei Kato, Olympic gymnast Rosa Kato, an actress/ commercial model of Japanese and Italian origin Ryozo Kato (born 13 September 1941), former Japanese diplomat Sawao Kato, an Olympic gymnast and eight-time gold medal winner Katō Takaaki (1860–1926), Prime Minister of Japan from 11 June 1924 to 28 January 1926 Tōichi Katō, a painter Katō Tomosaburō (1861–1923), Prime Minister of Japan from 12 June 1922 to 24 August 1923 Shigeaki Kato (born 11 July 1987), a singer Tosio Kato (1917–1999), Japanese mathematician Yoichi Kato, a volleyball player Yuki Kato (disambiguation), people with this name  Fictional characters  Kato, from The Green Hornet Ayano Katou, from Someday's Dreamers Otome Kato from School Days Go Kato, from Someday's Dreamers Griffin Kato (Griff), from Rave Master Jeri Katou (Juri Katou in Japan), from Digimon Tamers Kachiro Kato, from Prince of Tennis Kyōji Katō, from School Rumble Kazumi Kato and Daigo, characters in The Order of the Stick webcomic.
3
Monkey Punch, a manga artist Kazuko Kato, an actress Katō Kiyomasa, a daimyō during the Sengoku and Edo periods of Japanese history Kazue Katō –
KATO-FM (93.1 FM) licensed to New Ulm, Minnesota, serving Mankato, Minnesota.
See also Kaito (disambiguation)  Category:Japanese-language surnames
SHORT FICTION: "The Sisters" & "Araby" are 2 of the 15 stories in his "Dubliners"
James Joyce
Dubliners is a collection of fifteen short stories by James Joyce, first published in 1914.
2
"Grace" –
The first paragraph of A Painful Case is an example of this style, as well as Joyce's use of global to local description of the character's possessions.
THE FABULOUS LIFE OF...: It was the sweet smell of success for François Coty, whose wealth in manufacturing this let him buy up newspapers
perfume
François Coty (born Joseph Marie François Spoturno; 3 May 1874, Ajaccio, France – 25 July 1934, Louveciennes) was a French perfumer and businessman.
1
He also bought the Château Saint-Hélène in Nice, the Villa Namouna in Beaulieu-sur-Mer, and Le Scudo in Ajaccio, Corsica.
IT'S LIKE, SHAKESPEARE, YOU KNOW?: OMG!  This king is so kidding with his rejection of Cordelia, who--hello--totally loves him
King Lear
It was borne by the tragic heroine of Shakespeare's King Lear (1606), a character based on the legendary queen Cordeilla.
1
Cordelia is a feminine given name.
BIRD WORDS & PHRASES: Australian slang for a lookout who warns criminals about police, or the kind of bird Baretta had
Cockatoo
Overview Detective Anthony Vincenzo "Tony" Baretta is an unorthodox plainclothes cop (badge #609) with the 53rd precinct, who lives with Fred, his Triton sulphur-crested cockatoo, in apartment 2C at the run-down King Edward Hotel in an unnamed Eastern city (presumably Newark, New Jersey).
3
Baretta drove a rusted-out Mist Blue 1966 Chevrolet Impala four-door sport sedan nicknamed "The Blue Ghost" (license plate 532 BEN).
Detective Nopke
DVD NameEp #Release Date Season 112 October 29, 2002  References  External links  TV Character Bio: Tony Baretta at TV Acres Roy Huggins discusses the creation of Baretta in an Archive of American Television Interview  Category:1975 American television series debuts Category:1978 American television series endings Category:1970s American television series Category:American Broadcasting Company network shows Category:American crime television series Category:American drama television series Category:Detective television series Category:English-language television programming Category:Fictional American people of Italian descent Category:Television series by Stephen J. Cannell Productions Category:Television series by Universal Studios Category:Television series by Universal Television Category:Television shows set in New Jersey
'60s ROLES: When Patty Duke won her Oscar for this 1962 role, she was the youngest person to win a regular Oscar
Helen Keller
Duke's first major starring role was playing Helen Keller (with Anne Bancroft as Annie Sullivan) in the Broadway play The Miracle Worker, which ran for nearly two years (October 1959-July 1961).
3
In fact, Duke was in the throes of a manic phase as part of her then-undiagnosed bipolar disorder, which would remain undiagnosed until 1982.
On-set, Duke became good friends with Army drill sergeant Michael Pearce, who was a technical advisor for the production; the couple married on March 15, 1986.
But Me –
CASTING SPELLS: William Peter Blatty based this 1971 novel partly on a reported case of a child's demonic possession
"The Exorcist"
Awards Awards include: The Commonwealth Club Silver Medal for Literature ("The Exorcist") The Gabriel Award and American Film Festival Blue Ribbon for "Insight"TV series episode "Watts Made Out of Thread?" Knight of Mark Twain (For Novel "John Goldfarb, Please Come Home!) Saturn Awards for  "The Exorcist" and for "The Ninth Configuration"  The People's Choice Award for the Oscars" –
3
His father left home when William was three years old.
With forty years to think about it, a few little changes were inevitable –
1965 Twinkle, Twinkle, "Killer" Kane  (1966)
WHAT'S IN A NAME?: 50 years after this Shawnee helped the British subdue Michigan, a man partly named for him helped subdue Georgia
Tecumseh
Tecumseh's War and the War of 1812 250px|thumb|Tecumseh, by Benson Lossing in 1848 based on 1808 drawing.
2
After Hull's surrender of Detroit during the War of 1812, General William Henry Harrison was given command of the U.S. Army of the Northwest.
The Shawnee Prophet.
SHOPPING SPREE: Hello Kitty is the star character & corporate symbol of this gift store
Sanrio
Kitty or Kittie may also refer to:  Music  Kittie, an all-female Canadian metal band  Kitty (drummer), a member of the band Mindless Self Indulgence  Kitty (rapper), Florida hip-hop artist Kathryn Beckwith (born 1993)  "Kitty" (song), by the Presidents of The United States of America  "Mickey" (song) or "Kitty", by Racey  "Kitty", a traditional song on Red Roses for Me  Film  Kitty Films, an anime production company in Japan  Kitty (1929 film), based on the Deeping novel; the first British talking picture  Kitty (1945 film), starring Paulette Goddard  Kitty (2002 film), a Kannada film starring Darshan   Games   Kitty, in poker terminology, a pool of money built by collecting small amounts from certain pots, often used to buy refreshments, cards, and so on  Kitty, in card game terminology, additional cards dealt face down in some card games  People or fictional characters  Kitty (given name), a list of people with the name Kitty or Kittie  Kitty Carlisle (1910–2007), American singer and actress born Catherine Conn  Kitty (actor), Tamil actor Raja Krishnamurthy's stage name  Kali Troy or Kittie (born 1971), American voice-over actress  Other uses  Kitty, Texas, United States, a ghost town - see List of ghost towns in Texas  Kitty, a 1927 novel by Warwick Deeping  See also  Kitty party, a party organised by women  Kitty Kitty Corporation, a now-defunct English record label  Kittie, a Canadian alternative metal band  Hello Kitty, a Sanrio character  Kitt (disambiguation)  Kit (disambiguation)  Miss Kitty (disambiguation)
1
Kitty is another word for a cat, a small, domesticated carnivorous mammal of the subspecies Felis silvestris catus, or more particularly a kitten, a young cat.
BACK TO '80s TV: Once a regular on "A Different World" he had a 2010 comedy special subtitled "Where U Been?"
Sinbad
Darryl M. Bell and Sinbad were promoted to the principal cast, and Glynn Turman and Lou Myers were added as supporting cast members.
3
A Different World is an American television sitcom which aired for six seasons on NBC from September 24, 1987 –
Ali's book is mentioned specifically in the 1990 episode "Time Keeps on Slippin'" where Ron suggests putting it in the time capsule to represent a female point of view, but is shouted down by the women in the group.
When Lena suspects that Dion has been beating up on Gina (who is sporting a black eye), she confronts her about it, but Gina makes excuses for Dion's rages and tells Lena to back off.
HEY, SPORT!: In Nov. 2000 Phil Mickelson caught this tiger by the tail, winning the Tour Championship PGA Tournament
Tiger Woods
His 2000 Buick Invitational win ended Tiger Woods' streak of six consecutive tournament victories.
3
Critical to Mickelson's win was a dramatic run in the third round on Saturday in which Mickelson, trailing leader Westwood by five strokes as he prepared his approach shot to the 13th green, proceeded to make eagle, then to hole-out for eagle from 141 yards at the next hole, the par 4 14th, then on the next, the par 5 15th, to miss eagle from 81 yards by mere inches.
Mickelson needed to hole out on the 18th hole for eagle from 74 yards to force a playoff with Bubba Watson.
Won with birdie on first extra hole72004Bob Hope Chrysler Classic Skip KendallWon with birdie on first extra hole82005BellSouth Classic Arjun Atwal,  Rich Beem, Brandt Jobe,  José María OlazábalWon with birdie on fourth extra holeOlazábal eliminated with par on third holeAtwal and Jobe eliminated with par on first hole92007Nissan Open Charles Howell IIILost to par on third extra hole102008FBR Open J. B. HolmesLost to birdie on first extra hole112012Northern Trust Open Keegan Bradley,  Bill HaasHaas won with birdie on second extra hole  European Tour wins (9) LegendMajor championships (5)World Golf Championships (2)Other European Tour (2)  No.
INVENTORS & INVENTIONS: Bette Nesmith Graham called her correction fluid "Mistake Out" before selling it under this brand name
Liquid Paper
The name was later changed to Liquid Paper when she began her own company.
3
She was also the mother of musician and producer Michael Nesmith of The Monkees.
She eventually began marketing her typewriter correction fluid as "Mistake Out" in 1956.
They divorced in 1975.
'50s FILM FACTS: Dean Stockwell was a teenager when he played the title lad in the 1950 film of this Kipling classic
Kim
In 1950, he appeared in a lead role alongside Errol Flynn in Kim.
3
In 1964, Stockwell guest-starred in an episode of NBC's medical drama The Eleventh Hour.
Stockwell and Marchenko divorced in 2004.
Did  Tramp  Movie 1999  The Drew Carey Show  Hal  Episode: "Y2K, You're Okay" 2002–04  JAG  Senator Edward Sheffield  11 episodes 2002  First Monday  Senator Edward Sheffield  3 episodes 2002  Star Trek: Enterprise  Colonel Grat  Episode: "Detained" 2002  Stargate SG-1  Doctor Kieran  Episode: "Shadow Play" 2006–09  Battlestar Galactica
"C" THE WORLD: This Australian capital's tallest landmark, Telecom Tower, towers 600' atop Black Mountain
Canberra
Black Mountain may refer to:  Places  Australia Black Mountain (Australian Capital Territory), a mountain in Canberra Black Mountain, New South Wales, a village in Guyra Shire, New South Wales Black Mountain, Queensland, a small town in Queensland Black Mountain (Kalkajaka) National Park, a protected area in Queensland  Canada  Dark Mountain, formerly known as Black Mountain, in the Cassiar Country of northern British Columbia  Black Mountain, one of two named summits forming the Cypress Mountain Ski Area in West Vancouver, British Columbia  Black Mountain, a mountain near Horsefly Lake in the Cariboo region of the Central Interior of British Columbia  Black Mountain, a summit west of the south end of Shuswap Lake in the Southern Interior of British Columbia  Black Mountain, a mountain on the west side of Atlin Lake to the north of Atlin, British Columbia in the region of the same name  Pakistan  Tor Ghar also known as Kala Dhaka, historically known as Black Mountain of Hazara  Slovakia  Black Mountain, Slovakia, a mountain range in the Slovak Ore Mountains  United Kingdom Black Mountain (Belfast), a mountain beside Belfast, Northern Ireland Black Mountain (hill), a peak in the Black Mountains range, the only peak on the English-Welsh border Black Mountain (range), a range of mountains in South Wales, different from the nearby Black_Mountains,_Wales Black Mountain transmitting station the transmitter on top of the mountain beside Belfast, Northern Ireland Black Mountain, County Antrim, a townland in County Antrim, Northern Ireland  United States
2
Black Mountain (Maricopa County, Arizona), a mountain  Black Mountain (Pima County, Arizona), a mountain  Black Mountain (Fresno County, California), a ridge  Black Mountain (Riverside County, California), a mountain  Black Mountain (San Benito County, California), a summit  Black Mountain (San Diego County, California), a summit  Black Mountain (near Los Altos, California), a summit on Monte Bello Ridge in the Santa Cruz Mountains of west Santa Clara County, California, south of Los Altos and west of Cupertino Black Mountain Ranch, San Diego, California, a community in San Diego city's northeast  Black Mountain Open Space Park, the community's city park  Black Mountain (near Los Altos, California), in western Santa Clara County at   Black Mountain (Milpitas, California), in eastern Santa Clara County at   Black Mountain (near Craig, Colorado), a mountain in Moffatt County  Black Mountain (Park County, Colorado), a mountain in Park County Black Mountain (Georgia), a mountain in Dawson County Black Mountain (Kentucky), highest point in the Commonwealth of Kentucky Black Mountain of Maine, a ski area in Rumford, Maine Black Mountain (Michigan), a large hill in Presque Isle County, Michigan Black Mountain (Nevada), a mountain in southern Nevada Black Mountain Ski Area (New Hampshire), a ski area in Jackson, New Hampshire Black Mountain (Conservation Area), a protected mountain in Dummerston, Vermont abutting the West River Black Mountain (Catron County, New Mexico), a mountain Black Mountain (Washington County, New York), a mountain Black Mountain, North Carolina, a town near Asheville, North Carolina Black Mountain College (1933–1957), a school founded in 1933 in Black Mountain, North Carolina, Black Mountain poets, sometimes called projectivist poets, a group of mid-20th-century poets centered on Black Mountain College  Entertainment  Music Black Mountain (band), a Canadian psychedelic-rock band Black Mountain (album), a 2005 debut rock album by the band "Black Mountain Side", Jimmy Page guitar solo Songs from Black Mountain, a 2006 album by the band Live  Literature Black Mountain poets, a group of mid-20th-century American postmodern poets The Black Mountain, a 1954 Nero Wolfe mystery novel by Rex Stout  Other Black Mountain Monpa ('Olekha), an endangered Tibeto-Burman language of western Bhutan  See also  Black Mountains (disambiguation)  Black Peak (disambiguation)  Black Volcano, an inactive volcano near Albuquerque, New Mexico  Black Hill (disambiguation)  Black Hills (disambiguation)  Black Rock (disambiguation)  Crna Gora (disambiguation), which has the same meaning in Serbo-Croatian  Kala Dhaka
(Black Mountain of Hazara)  Kara Dag (disambiguation), same in Turkic languages  Montenegro (disambiguation), which has the same meaning in many Romance languages  Mount Black, in Antarctica  Mount Black (Tasmania)  Qaradağlı (disambiguation), alternate Turkic form  黑山 (disambiguation), alternate East Asian form  zh:黑山
TRACK: On August 16, 1995 this country's Haile Gebrselassie set the world record in the 5,000-meter run at 12:44:39
Ethiopia
Haile Gebrselassie (, haylē gebre silassē; born 18 April 1973) is a retired Ethiopian long-distance track and road running athlete.
3
Also at the 1993 World Championships he ran in the 5,000-metre race to finish a close second behind Ismael Kirui of Kenya.
In 2001, Haile won the IAAF World half marathon and the bronze medal in the 10,000 metres at the 2001 World Championships in Athletics.
IAAF. Retrieved on 2011-11-21.
AWARDS & HONORS: In 1985 people from IBM, Apple & Boeing won the first National Medals of this
Technology
First or 1st may also refer to:  First (Grindelwald), minor summit below the Schwarzhorn in the Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (Kandersteg), mountain in Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (magazine), a Singaporean movie magazine   First grade, in primary education  For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and Technology (FIRST), a world-wide youth robotics competition  First, a British undergraduate degree classification  FirstGroup, a large British transportation company operating buses, trains, coaches and trams  FIRST, Far Infrared and Sub-millimetre Telescope, a previous name for Herschel Space Observatory  First Racing, a former racing team  First (communications), principles of communications  FIRST (computer security), Forum of Incident Response and Security Teams   Music   1st, album by Streets  1st, EP by The Rasmus, frequently identified as a single  First, album by Baroness  First, album by David Gates  First, album by O'Bryan  First, album by Raymond Lam  "First", song, by Lindsay Lohan  First, album by Denise Ho  "First", a song by Cold War Kids  "First", a song by Lauren Daigle  See also  FST (disambiguation)      Book:FIRST  :Category:Lists of firsts  1 (disambiguation)  One (disambiguation)  The First (disambiguation)
1
First or 1st is the ordinal form of the number one (#1).
GEOGRAPHY: It's bordered by the Bristol Channel, Cardigan Bay, the Irish Sea, & England
Wales
thumb|Map showing Cardigan Bay thumb|Cardigan Bay thumb|Sunset over Cardigan Bay from Gwbert Cardigan Bay () is a large inlet of the Irish Sea, indenting the west coast of Wales between Bardsey Island, Gwynedd in the north, and Strumble Head, Pembrokeshire at its southern end.
3
Much of the coast surrounding the bay is fertile farmland, dotted with towns and seaside resorts such as Fishguard, New Quay, Aberaeron, Llanon, Aberystwyth, Borth, Aberdyfi, Tywyn, Barmouth, Porthmadog, Criccieth and Pwllheli on the Cambrian Coast.
Today the Ministry of Defence (MOD) range within Cardigan Bay provides a large secure safety area for the testing of air launched weapons and unmanned aerial systems.
The purpose of the agreement is to deliver defence test, evaluation and training support services to ensure air launched weapon systems, associated sub-systems and UAS are safe and fit for purpose.
BESTSELLERS: In 2010 Jack Ryan Jr. & Sr. were back in this author's "Dead or Alive"
Tom Clancy
It may also refer to:   Film and television  Dead or Alive (film), a 1999 Japanese yakuza action film, followed by two sequels Rupan Sansei: Dead or Alive, a 1996 film DOA: Dead or Alive, a 2006 film based on the video game series Dead or Alive (see below) Dead or Alive, a 1944 American film starring Tex Ritter "Dead or Alive", a 1984 episode of the American TV series Hunter   Books  Dead or Alive (novel), a 2010 book by Tom Clancy, with an audio version which included narration by actor Lou Diamond Phillips   Video games   Temco video gaming: Dead or Alive (video game) (1996) Dead or Alive (series), series begun with the 1996 game   Music   British New Wave band Dead or Alive (band)  Songs: "Dead or Alive", by Deep Purple from The House of Blue Light  "Dead or Alive", by John Cale from Honi Soit "Dead or Alive", by Johnny Thunders  "Dead or Alive", by Journey from Escape "Dead or Alive", by Oingo Boingo from Good for Your Soul "Wanted Dead or Alive" (Bon Jovi song)  "(Wanted) Dead or Alive", by The Manhattan Transfer from Mecca for Moderns  "D.O.A." (Dead or Alive), by Van Halen from Van Halen II  See also Wanted Dead or Alive (disambiguation) DOA (disambiguation) Dead on arrival Dead and Alive (disambiguation)
1
Dead or alive was historically, and is in popular culture, a common qualification on a wanted poster.
DIARIES: This creator of Peter Rabbit devised a private code for the journals she kept in her youth
Beatrix Potter
Peter Rabbit is a fictional anthropomorphic character in various children's stories by Beatrix Potter.
3
He first appeared in The Tale of Peter Rabbit in 1902 and subsequently in five more books between 1904 and 1912.
Books thumb|Grown up Peter in his nursery garden, from The Tale of The Flopsy Bunnies  Peter Rabbit made his first appearance in 1902 in The Tale of Peter Rabbit.
To mark the 110th anniversary of the publication of The Tale of Peter Rabbit, Frederick Warne & Co. commissioned British actress Emma Thompson to write The Further Tale of Peter Rabbit, in which Peter ends up in Scotland after accidentally hitching a ride on Mr. and Mrs. McGregor's wagon.
1980s TV: We salute you if you know the Dukes of Hazzard raced about in a souped-up Dodge Charger called this
the General Lee
Other models  Dodge Charger Daytona – the name given to three different modified Dodge Chargers built on the B-body and LX platforms  Super Bee  Shelby Charger  Dodge Charger R/T (1999 concept)  See also  1971–1976 Chrysler Valiant Charger – short wheelbase Valiant coupe produced by Chrysler Australia  The General Lee – Dodge Charger used in the television series The Dukes of Hazzard  References  External links   Dodge Charger  A history of the pre-2000s Dodge Charger  A history of Dodge Chargers by Edmunds.com  A review of 1981 Dodge Charger by CarandDriver.com  Charger Category:Cars introduced in 1965
3
The base engine was a  V8 with a three-speed floor shifter.
Based on the Chrysler B platform, the model years received various cosmetic changes to the exterior and interior including: an undivided grill, rounded tail lights, and hidden headlights.
The 1973 and 1974 Chargers were very similar to the 1971 with minor differences in the grill and headlamps.
CLOTH & FABRICS: To get actual Harris tweed from where it's made, go to this group of islands west of the Scottish mainland
Hebrides
Harris–Stowe State University, Missouri  Other uses Harris affine region detector, an algorithm Harris's hawk, Parabuteo unicinctus, a bird of prey Harris operator, a corner detection algorithm Harris (train), a type of train on the Melbourne metropolitan railway Harris Tweed, a luxury cloth handwoven by islanders in the Outer Hebrides of Scotland, using local wool Mrs. Harris, a 2005 television film  See also
2
Consisting of the following schools Harris Academy Bermondsey Harris City Academy Crystal Palace, the flagship academy of the Federation Harris Girls' Academy East Dulwich Harris Boys' Academy East Dulwich Harris Academy Falconwood Harris Academy
Merton Harris Academy at Peckham Harris Academy South Norwood Harris Academy Purley Harris Academy Chafford Hundred
THE 1998 PULITZER PRIZES: A gold medal went to this state's Grand Forks Herald for coverage of a flood & other disasters
North Dakota
The Grand Forks Herald is a daily broadsheet newspaper, established in 1879, published in Grand Forks, North Dakota, United States.
3
Its distinctive features are a tall clock tower and the symbolism built into the structure, as well as parts of the old building that survived the fire.
Today, the Herald is one of many regional newspapers published by Forum Communications.
John Stennes (Photo chief)
ENGLISH LITERATURE: The "Elizabethan" literature of Elizabeth I's reign was followed by the "Jacobean", named for this king
James I
Jacobean indicates the period of English history that coincides with the reign of James I of England (1603–1625):   Jacobean era  Jacobean architecture  Jacobean literature  Jacobean English (the language used in the King James Version of the Bible)  Jacobean theatre  It is also used to refer to other things relating to the name James, notably the biblical Epistle of James.
2
Jacobean derives from the New Latin Jacobaeus, cognate with James and Jacob.
th:จาโคไบท์
NEW YORK CITY: (Alright, here comes Sofia):I'm standing outside the Waldorf-Astoria, on this New York City street mentioned in the theme of "Green Acres"
Park Avenue
[[Park Avenue (Manhattan)|Park Avenue]] was sold on July 2, 2007 for US$510 million, about $1,589 per square foot ($17,104/m²), breaking the barely month-old record for an American office building of $1,476 per square foot ($15,887/m²) set in the June 2007 sale of 660 Madison Avenue.<ref>Quirk, James.
3
He claimed the area for France and named it "Nouvelle Angoulême" (New Angoulême).
FDNY Headquarters]".
|newspaper=[[The New York Times]] |date=February 14, 1993 |accessdate=July 19, 2014}}</ref
THE HISTORY OF THE WORLD PART 2: Established in 1624 by the Dutch, it's the old name for New York City
New Amsterdam
New York City traces its roots to its 1624 founding as a trading post by colonists of the Dutch Republic and was named New Amsterdam in 1626.
3
Later on, the ice sheet would help split apart what are now Long Island and Staten Island.
Queens is the site of Citi Field, the home of the New York Mets, and hosts the annual U.S. Open tennis tournament.
Retrieved June 12, 2007.
NEW YORK CITY: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):Travel writer Stephen Birnbaum calls the building "The Princess of the Skyline"
The Chrysler Building
The Chrysler Building is below and behind him.|alt=A man working on a steel girder high about a city skyline.
3
The difficult years of the Great Depression saw the election of reformer Fiorello La Guardia as mayor and the fall of Tammany Hall after eighty years of political dominance.
}} {{Main|Sports in New York City}}  New York City is home to the [[headquarters]] of the [[National Football League]],<ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.hoovers.com/company-information/cs/company-profile.National_Football_League.f36bd60db3fbcb01.html |title=National Football League Company Information |publisher=Hoover's, Inc |accessdate=May 18, 2013}}</ref
<small>and</small> Long.]]
THE BIG PARADE: Held the fourth Thursday in November in New York City, this parade is a gas
Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade
Major tourist destinations include [[Times Square]]; [[Broadway theatre|Broadway theater]] productions; the [[Empire State Building]]; the [[Statue of Liberty]]; [[Ellis Island]]; the [[United Nations Headquarters]]; museums such as the [[Metropolitan Museum of Art]]; greenspaces such as [[Central Park]] and [[Washington Square Park]]; [[Rockefeller Center]]; the [[Manhattan Chinatown]]; luxury shopping along [[Fifth Avenue|Fifth]] and [[Madison Avenue]]s; and events such as the [[New York's Village Halloween Parade|Halloween Parade]] in [[Greenwich Village]]; the [[Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade]]; the lighting of the [[Rockefeller Center Christmas Tree]]; the [[St.
3
thumb|left|Broadway follows the Native American Wickquasgeck Trail through Manhattan.|alt=A painting of a snowy city street with horse-drawn sleds and a 19th-century fire truck under blue sky Under New York State's gradual abolition act of 1799, children of slave mothers were born to be eventually liberated but were held in indentured servitude until their mid-to-late twenties."An Act for the Gradual Aboliton of Negro Slavery in New York" (L. 1799, Ch. 62) Together with slaves freed by their masters after the Revolutionary War and escaped slaves, a significant free-black population gradually developed in Manhattan.
New York City's remaining four boroughs are collectively referred to as the "outer boroughs".
|first=Jennifer |last=Bleyer |work=The New York Times |date=May 14, 2006 |url=http://www.nytimes.com/2006/05/14/nyregion/thecity/14vend.html |accessdate=January 17, 2014}}</ref> popular examples of modern New York [[street food]].
"A" & "E": In a famous title, Irving Stone paired it with "Agony"
Ecstasy
To be distinguished from Irving I. Stone, philanthropist  Irving Stone (born Tennenbaumhttp://www.columbia.edu/cu/lweb/archival/collections/ldpd_6915380/, July 14, 1903, San Francisco, California – August 26, 1989, Los Angeles) was an American writer, chiefly known for his biographical novels of noted artists, politicians and intellectuals; among the best known are Lust for Life (1934), about the life of Vincent van Gogh, and The Agony and the Ecstasy (1961), about Michelangelo.
3
They funded a foundation to support charitable causes they believed in.
Legacy and honors 1960, he received an honorary Doctorate of Letters from Berkeley, his alma mater."Meet
– biography of Earl Warren Men to Match My Mountains (1956) –
ITALIAN ART & ARTISTS: In his "Purgatorio", this poet mentions that painter Giotto di Bondone "is all the rage today"
Dante
Purgatorio (; Italian for "Purgatory") is the second part of Dante's Divine Comedy, following the Inferno, and preceding the Paradiso.
3
As night approaches, the souls sing the Compline hymns Salve Regina and Te lucis ante terminum.
The first of these souls is Omberto Aldobrandeschi, whose pride lies in his descent ("I was Italian, son of a great Tuscan: / my father was Guiglielmo Aldobrandesco"Purgatorio, Canto XI, line 58–59, Mandelbaum translation.), although he is learning to be more humbleDorothy L. Sayers, Purgatory, notes on Canto XI. ("I / do not know if you have heard his name"Purgatorio, Canto XI, line 59–60, Mandelbaum translation.).
On the sixth terrace the gluttonous are purged, and more generally, those who over-emphasised food, drink, and bodily comforts.
SHAKESPEARE: "Twelfth Night" opens with, "If music be the food of love," do this
play on
there have been a number of re-workings for the stage, particularly in musical theatre, among them Your Own Thing (1968), Music Is (1977), All Shook Up (2005), and Play On! (1997), the last two jukebox musicals featuring the music of Elvis Presley and Duke Ellington, respectively.
3
The plot against Malvolio revolves around these ideas, and Fabian remarks in Act III, Scene iv: "If this were play'd upon a stage now, I could condemn it as an improbable fiction".Righter, p. 136.
In a nod to the shipwrecked opening of Shakespeare's Twelfth Night, the movie includes a scene where the character Viola, separated from her love by an arranged marriage and bound for the American colonies, survives a shipwreck and comes ashore to Virginia.
Clive Barker's short story "Sex, Death and Starshine" revolves around a doomed production of Twelfth Night.
THE EUROVISION SONG CONTEST: They must have been "walking on sunshine" when they won in 1997 for the U.K. with "Love Shine A Light"
Katrina & The Waves
Don Airey, who played as a session musician on the single recording of the song, arranged and conducted the live version for Katrina & The Waves.
3
Leskanich would later state she'd supplied her own outfit for her performance on the Eurovision 1997 finale: "the boys [ie. the Waves] were getting beautiful suits made by William Hunt and my outfit was an afterthought.
This song was also performed as part of a medley in the introduction of the 50th anniversary show for the ESC in Copenhagen as well as the semi-final of the Eurovision Song Contest 2006, in Athens.
" The single peaked at number 1 in Irish Country Charts and also charted at number 68 in the Irish Pop Charts.
NUDIST, BUDDHIST, OR CUBIST: Phil Jackson
Buddhist
He applied his Zen Buddhist philosophies to coaching, taking a non-traditional approach and getting players that may have been selfish in the past to play to the maximum level as a team.
3
ESPN. Retrieved July 31, 2015."Top 10 Coaches in NBA History".
Some believed that Krause felt under-recognized for building a championship team and believed that Jackson was indebted to him for giving him his first NBA coaching job.
style="background:#FDE910;" | style="text-align:left;"|Chicago | style="text-align:left;"| |82||72||10||.878|| style="text-align:center;"|1st in Central||18||15||3||.833 | style="text-align:center;"|Won NBA Championship |- ! style="background:#FDE910;" | style="text-align:left;"|Chicago | style="text-align:left;"| |82||69||13||.841|| style="text-align:center;"|1st in Central||19||15||4||.789 | style="text-align:center;"|Won NBA Championship |- !
MUSICAL THEATRE: In 1996 Lou Diamond Phillips filled Yul Brynner's royal shoes for a revival of this musical
The King And I
He earned a Golden Globe nomination for Best Supporting Actor for his role in Stand and Deliver (1988), and a Tony Award nomination for his role in The King and I (1996).
3
My name is Lou Diamond Phillips, an American citizen of Filipino descent  After his father died, he took his stepfather's surname "Phillips" as his own.
He plays Angel Guzman, a cholo gangster who is inspired by his math teacher, Jaime Escalante, to excel at calculus.
Never Forget Frank Hill
BALLET: The 1938 premiere of this ballet featured Lew Christensen in the role of Pat Garrett
Billy the Kid
Patrick Floyd Jarvis "Pat" Garrett (June 5, 1850February 29, 1908) was an American Old West lawman, bartender and customs agent who became renowned for killing Billy the Kid.
3
Neither of the Fountains was ever seen again.
A stray shot nicked Garrett.
Brazel appeared on horseback along the way.
POP & ROCK MUSIC: He left New Edition, going solo with hits like "Don't Be Cruel" & "Every Little Step"
Bobby Brown
During the group's first bout of fame in 1983, its members were  Ricky Bell, Michael Bivins, Bobby Brown, Ronnie DeVoe, and Ralph Tresvant.
2
Brown responded by dropping his microphone and a fist fight between the two ensued.
On June 28, 2009, the group performed a medley of Jackson 5 hits in tribute to Michael Jackson on the BET Awards.
THE TV CHARACTER IN COMMON: Cathy Lee Crosby (the TV movie) & Lynda Carter (the series)
Wonder Woman
Lynda Carter (born Linda Jean Córdova Carter; July 24, 1951) is an American actress, singer, songwriter and beauty pageant titleholder who was crowned Miss World America 1972 and also the star of the TV series Wonder Woman from 1975 to 1979.
3
After being voted "Most Talented", she dropped out to pursue a career in music.
Lens Express Chat: November 8, 1999; PlanetRx Chat: February 3, 2000 Around that time, Carter created her own production company, Potomac Productions.
An EP of the songs from the game's soundtrack was released on iTunes on November 6, 2015.https://itun.es/us/ucP7-  Personal life thumb|upright|Carter as the Grand Marshal at Gay Pride in Washington, DC in 2013 Carter has been married twice.
SUPERHERO CINEMA: Jason Bateman plays P.R. exec Ray Embrey, whose life is saved by the title sardonic superhero in this 2008 film
Hancock
He has since established himself in Hollywood by appearing in several films, including Juno (2007), Hancock (2008), Up in the Air (2009), Horrible Bosses (2011), Paul (2011), The Change-Up (2011), Identity Thief (2013),  Bad Words (2014), Horrible Bosses 2 (2014), and The Gift (2015).
3
(May 19, 2008.) USA Today.
New episodes of Arrested Development have been released on Netflix with the original cast, including Bateman.
He made a dramatic turn in 2012 with the thriller film Disconnect, and starred in the 2013 comedy film Identity Thief and the 2014 comedies
PLAY SETTINGS: Athol Fugard spent much of his life in Port Elizabeth in this country & set many of his plays there
South Africa
Harold Athol Lanigan Fugard (born 11 June 1932) is a South African playwright, novelist, actor, and director who writes in English.
3
The Fugards moved to Johannesburg in 1958, where he worked as a clerk in a Native Commissioners' Court, which "made him keenly aware of the injustices of apartheid." His best friend, father of four, Dennis Scarr, lived in Port Elizabeth and was actively involved in the anti-apartheid struggle along with his  wife, Mary Scarr, in the 1960s, until they were silenced after the state threatened their children.
Evening Standard Award  1983 – Best Play – "Master Harold"...and the Boys (winner)  Drama Desk Awards  1982 – "Master Harold"...and the Boys (winner)  Lucille Lortel Awards  1992 –
Special issue of Twentieth Century Literature 39.4 (Winter 1993).
SNL ALUMNI: He was "Berry Berry Good" as ballplayer Chico Escuela & more recently as Uncle Junior on "The Jamie Foxx Show"
Garrett Morris
The series stars Jamie Foxx, Garcelle Beauvais, Christopher B. Duncan, Ellia English, and Garrett Morris.
3
Jamie's romantic overtures toward Fancy were mostly unrequited until the final two seasons, when the two began to tentatively date and eventually became engaged.
inseason Title Original air date  Season 3 (1998–1999)  No.
Reruns of the series also aired on BET from 2005 to 2008 and started airing once again September 2009 to present, and as part of The CW Television Network's The CW Daytime (along with reruns of The Wayans Bros.) block from September 2008 to September 2009.
THE INSECURITY COUNCIL: In his book "Gasping for Airtime", comedian Jay Mohr deals with these attacks of intense fear
panic attacks
His 2004 memoir, Gasping for Airtime: Two Years in the Trenches of Saturday Night Live,ISBN 1-4013-0006-5 details this tumultuous period of his life, including his battle with chronic panic attacks.
3
Mohr stated on the Late Late Show that he has Scottish ancestry; Late Late Show.
Mohr starred as newly divorced dad Gary Brooks for two seasons on the CBS sitcom Gary Unmarried.
Their son, Meredith Daniel Mohr, was born on May 5, 2011.
MAGAZINES: The documentary "The September Issue" showed Anna Wintour prepping for this magazine's 2007 Fall Fashion issue
Vogue
Anna Wintour, OBE (; born 3 November 1949) is the English editor-in-chief of American Vogue, a position she has held since 1988.
3
The September Issue, 0:19. "Growing up in London in the '60s, you'd have to have had Irving Penn's sack over your head not to know something extraordinary was happening in fashion," she recalled.
Again, she made radical changes to staff and look, canceling $2 million worth of photo spreads and articles in her first week.
In $140,000 Worker's Comp Default; The Smoking Gun.
FASHION: Chanel is credited with making these a fashion item; Lana Turner made them a trademark
Sweaters
By that time, Chanel had opened a large dress shop at 31 rue Cambon, near the Hôtel Ritz, in Paris; among the clothes for sale were flannel blazers, straight-line skirts of linen, sailor blouses, long sweaters made of jersey fabric, and skirt-and-jacket suits.
3
Because the Balsan flat also was a salon for the French hunting and sporting élite, Chanel had opportunity to meet their demi-mondaine mistresses, who, as such, were women of fashion, upon whom the rich men displayed their wealth — as ornate clothes, jewelry, and hats.
Maillard, Pierre.
Kasia Struss  Natasha Poly  Bianca Balti  Magdalena Frackowiak  Chiharu Okunugi  Soo Joo Park  Toni Garrn  Joan Smalls  Julia Nobis  Lily Donaldson  Kati Nescher   See also  Belle Époque  Pink Chanel suit of Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy  References  External links       Category:Companies of France Category:Clothing companies of France Category:High fashion brands Category:Companies established in the 1910s Category:Luxury brands Category:Haute couture Category:Privately held companies of France Category:Watch manufacturing companies of France Category:Companies based in Paris Category:20th-century fashion Category:21st-century fashion Category:Companies established in 1909 Category:French brands Category:Comité Colbert members
COLLEGE ATHLETICS: In 1957 Wilt Chamberlain was MVP of the Final Four though his team, this Jayhawk school, didn't win the title
University of Kansas
For the origin of the term, see Jayhawker  Jayhawk may also refer to:  Geography Jayhawk, California, in El Dorado County  Vehicles HH-60 Jayhawk, US Coast Guard medium range recovery helicopter (a navalized version of the UH-60 Black Hawk) T-1A Jayhawk, twin-engine jet trainer used by the US Air Force AQM-37 Jayhawk, supersonic target drone produced by Raytheon for the US Navy  Sports Kansas Jayhawks teams and the official mascot of the University of Kansas Muskegon Community College athletics nickname the mascot for Jamestown Community College the school mascot for Head-Royce School in Oakland, California the school mascot for the now closed Jamestown High School in Jamestown, Kansas the school mascot for Jayhawk-Linn Junior-Senior High School near Mound City, Kansas the school mascot for Jericho High School in Jericho, New York the school mascot for Jeannette City School District in Jeannette, Pennsylvania the school mascot of Jefferson Central School, Jefferson, New York the school mascot of Saint Joseph's Catholic School, Ogden, Utah the school mascot of Urbandale High School, Urbandale, Iowa the school mascot of Vandercook Lake High School, Jackson, Michigan the school mascot of Joliet High School, Joliet, Montana  Music
1
The Jayhawks, band from Minnesota  Other  Jayhawk Area Council, an eastern Kansas council of the Boy Scouts of America
JULIUS: Sears president Julius Rosenwald donated millions to found this city's Museum of Science & Industry
Chicago
He was the principal founder and backer for the Museum of Science and Industry in Chicago, to which he gave more than $5 million and served as President from 1927 to 1932.
3
They were ruined by a recession in 1885.
It contributed more than $4 million in matching funds to the construction of more than 5,000 schools, shops, and teachers' homes in the South.
A 2015 film Rosenwald directed by Aviva Kempner documents  his life and philanthropy.
IT AIN'T ME, BABE: I played the simply named Jo March, but I was born with the last name Horowitz
Winona Ryder
Israel Horowitz, American chess master Jerome Horowitz, American scientist Michael Horowitz, American author, husband of writer Cynthia Palmer and father of actress Winona Ryder.
3
,  http://www.shlomo.horwitzfam.org/Origin_of_Horowitz_Name.htm List of people with the surname Horowitz  Rabbis Isaiah Horowitz, Czech-born German and Israeli rabbi, cabbalist, and author Pinchas David Horowitz, First Bostoner Rebbe, 1876-1941 Levi Yitzchak Horowitz, Bostoner Rebbe, 1921–2009
| Aaron Strashelah Chabad Rabbi Chaim " Tashkenter" Hurwitz - famously known for his self sacrifice, saving Jews in Tashkent during WWII  Others Adam Horowitz (screenwriter), American TV show writer Alexandre Horowitz, Dutch technical engineer and inventor Anthony Horowitz, British author and television scriptwriter Ariel Horowitz, an Israeli singer-songwriter Barry Horowitz, American professional wrestler Ben Horowitz, technology entrepreneur and investor Daniel Horowitz, legal analyst and attorney David Horowitz, formerly New Left but now conservative writer and social activist see also David Horowitz (disambiguation) Donald Horowitz (New Jersey lawyer), an American lawyer Donald L. Horowitz, a professor of Law and Political Science at Duke University Isaac Horowitz, scientist automatic control theory, developed Quantitative Feedback Theory.
See also  Horovitz Horvitz
BIBLICAL MILITARY MEN: Benaiah was commander of this wise king's army
Solomon
In David’s old age, Benaiah and the Cherethites and Pelethites supported the coronation of Solomon (1 Kin.
3
The second part of Benaiah is יה (Yah) = יהו (Yahu) = יו (Yu), a derivative of the Tetragrammaton.
Benaiah came to prominence by striking down two of Moab’s powerful heroes, by fearlessly descending into a water pit and killing a lion, and by overcoming exceptional odds to slay an Egyptian giant with the victim’s own spear (1 Chr. 11:22-24).
11:24, 25) having command over the Cherethites and Pelethites.
BOOKS & AUTHORS: This state was the setting for Edna Ferber's novel "Ice Palace"
Alaska
In other uses:  The Ice Palace (novel), (Is-slottet), a 1963 Norwegian novel by Tarjei Vesaas  The Ice Palace (film), a 1987 film based on the novel  Ice Palace, a 1958 novel by Edna Ferber   Ice Palace (film), a 1960 film based on the novel, starring Richard Burton The Ice Palace (1987 film), a 1987 Norwegian film  The Northward Building in Fairbanks, Alaska, Ferber's inspiration for the title of the novel and occasionally nicknamed "The Ice Palace" as a result  "The Ice Palace," a 1920 short story by F. Scott Fitzgerald
3
An ice palace is a castle-like structure made of ice.
The earliest known may be Anna Ivanovna's palace (1739–1740) in St. Petersburg, Russia.
Ice Palace may also refer to:  In Russia:  Ice Palace Saint Petersburg, an arena in St. Petersburg  Ice Palace (Cherepovets), an arena in Cherepovets  Ice Palace Salavat Yulaev, an arena in Ufa  Neftekhimik Ice Palace, in Nizhnekamsk  Romazan Ice Sports Palace, in Magnitogorsk  Vityaz Ice Palace, in Podolsk  In other countries:  Eispalast, a facility in the Jungfraujoch station of the Jungfraubahn in Switzerland  Amalie Arena, originally named "Ice Palace," a structure in Tampa, Florida  The Ice Palace at the Quebec Winter Carnival in Quebec City, Canada.
GOAT-POURRI: In "The Hunchback of Notre Dame", Pierre Gringoire rescues this gypsy girl's goat from a mob
Esmeralda
Later, when he sees Esmeralda dancing near the fire, he forgot about his failed play and fell in love with her.
3
One of his later works, Blazon des hérétiques (1524) attacks heretics and leaders of the Protestant Reformation, up to and including Martin Luther.
In the first film, his character is combined with the character of Captain Phoebus.
When the crowd leaves the play and celebrate the crowning of Quasimodo as the Pope of Fools, Gringoire felt disappointed.
NOVELIST-PLAYWRIGHTS: In 1908 this "Of Human Bondage" author had 4 of his plays running in London at the same time
Somerset Maugham
Of Human Bondage (1915) is a novel by W. Somerset Maugham.
3
The production won 7 Dora Awards, including Best New Play.
Also in S.I. Kishor's Appointment with Love, the protagonist corresponds from the war with a woman whose copy of the book he has found and read; he was touched by her notes in the margin and is about to meet her at Grand Central Station.
Television  Of Human Bondage was mentioned in the Buffy the Vampire Slayer episode "The Freshman".
TEAMS OF SUPER BOWL MVPs: XI: Fred Biletnikoff
the Raiders
Biletnikoff signed with the Raiders, where he played for fourteen seasons.
3
Early years Born and raised in Erie, Pennsylvania, Biletnikoff was the son of Russian emigrants who arrived in the U.S. during the Russian Civil War.
Personal life
Fred's younger brother Bob was a starting quarterback for the University of Miami in the mid-1960s.
MOVIE MUSIC: She sings "Cry" & "Only Hope" on the soundtrack of her movie "A Walk to Remember"
Mandy Moore
Based on the 1999 novel of the same name by Nicholas Sparks, the film stars Shane West, Mandy Moore, Peter Coyote, and Daryl Hannah, and was produced by Denise Di Novi and Hunt Lowery for Warner Bros.  Plot Popular and rebellious teenager Landon Carter (Shane West) is threatened with expulsion from school after he and his friends leave evidence of underage drinking on the school grounds and seriously injure another student as the result of a prank gone wrong.
3
The head of the school gives Landon the choice of being expelled or atoning for his actions by tutoring fellow students and participating in the school play.
The Reverend disagrees saying that in fact she did and that her miracle was Landon.
Track listing  Complete listing of music in the filmEnd credits, A Walk to Remember, 2002 "Cannonball" —
EAT YOUR WAY ACROSS THE U.S.A.: Veal meatloaf & peach bread pudding are specialties of Buckhead Diner, in this city's upscale Buckhead district
Atlanta
Buckhead is an affluent uptown district of Atlanta, Fulton County, Georgia, comprising approximately the northern fifth of the city.
2
Colleges and universities Georgia State University's J. Mack Robinson College of Business' Buckhead Center is located in the heart of Buckhead.
This name change is significant in that it defines a border between Buckhead and Midtown.
DICKENS BOOKS BY CHARACTERS: Jacob Marley &Tiny Tim
A Christmas Carol
In arts and entertainment  Fictional characters Tinny Tim, a child robot, from the television series Futurama Tim (Robots), a fictional robot from the movie Robots Tim the Enchanter from Monty Python and the Holy Grail Tiny Tim (A Christmas Carol), a character from A Christmas Carol Tim the Bear, a character from The Cleveland Show The Life and Times of Tim, an animated show with adult themes on HBO Tim Rimmer, a character in the movie Cars Tim Okazaki, a character in the Australian mockumentary series Angry Boys Tim Speedle, character on CSI: Miami Tim the Beaver, the mascot of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology TIM (Tomorrow People), a biological computer in The Tomorrow People Tim Taylor (character), Tim Allen's character on Home Improvement Tim the dog, a character from The Famous Five series of novels by Enid Blyton  Other uses in arts and entertainment Tim (album), an album by The Replacements Tim (film), an Australian film Tim (novel), a 1974 novel by Colleen McCullough TIM (Owarai), a Japanese comedy unit The Incredible Machine (game), a game series for PC Treasure Island Media (TIM), a gay pornographic studio  In science and technology  In biology and chemistry Hepatitis A virus cellular receptor 2 (HAVCR2), also known as T-cell immunoglobulin and mucin-domain containing-3 (TIM-3) Triosephosphate isomerase TIM (psychedelics) (thioisomescaline), a series of psychedelic drugs Translocase of the inner membrane, a complex of proteins found in the inner mitochondrial membrane of the mitochondria Timeless (gene), a gene involved in the fly circadian clock  Other uses in science and technology TIM (brand), a subsidiary of Telecom Italia Televisión Independiente de México, a television network in Mexico that operated between 1965 and 1972 Thermal Interface Material, also called thermal grease TNO intestinal model, model systems mimicking the digestive tract Transient intermodulation, a form of intermodulation distortion occurring in electronic circuits IBM Tivoli Identity Manager  Other uses Tim (inhabited locality), name of several inhabited localities in Russia Tiako I Madagasikara, a Malagasy political party "Tim", a colloquial name for the speaking clock telephone service in the United Kingdom, originally obtained by dialing TIM (846) TIM (firm), an economic firm in Varna, Bulgaria The Tims, a term for supporters of Celtic F.C.  See also Timothy (disambiguation) Tim (given name)
1
Tim or TIM may refer to:  Human names Timothy (name) Tim (given name)
CINCINNATI: Dr. Albert Sabin developed this vaccine at the University of Cincinnati medical school
polio
Albert Bruce Sabin (August 26, 1906 Białystok – March 3, 1993) was a Polish American medical researcher, best known for developing the oral polio vaccine which has played a key role in nearly eradicating the disease.
2
In 1934, he conducted research at The Lister Institute for Preventive Medicine in England, then joined the Rockefeller Institute for Medical Research (now Rockefeller University).
Against considerable opposition from the March of Dimes Foundation, which supported the relatively effective killed vaccine, Sabin prevailed on the Public Health Service to license his three strains of vaccine.
ROYALTY: All of this country's Capetian kings descended from Robert the Strong, Count of Anjou & Blois
France
RoBerTo Checked, Time Magazine, October 19, 1942  Notable people  Duke of Normandy Robert I, Duke of Normandy, also known as Robert the Magnificent; father of William the Conqueror  Franconian Babenbergers/Robertian Capetians Robert II (Robert of Hesbaye) of Worms, Germany (aka Rutpert II, Hruodbertus II) Robert III of Worms, Germany (aka Rutpert III, Hruodbertus III) Robert the Strong (aka Rutpert IV, Hruodbertus IV)  Kings of France Robert I of France Robert II of France  King of Naples Robert of Naples  Kings of Scotland Robert I of Scotland ("Robert the Bruce") Robert II of Scotland  Robert III of Scotland  Legendary Robert the Devil, supposed medieval knight fathered by the devil  Medieval Robert of Avesbury, English historian Robert, 1st Earl of Gloucester, English noble Robert of Melun, scholastic theologian Robert of Winchelsea, theologian and opponent of both Edward I and Edward II of England Brother Robert, 13th century translator of French works into Old Norse Robert the Englishman  Saints  Saint Robert of Molesme, founder of the Cistercian Order (d. 1111) Saint Robert of Newminster, established the Abbey of Newminster near the castle of Ralph de Merlay, at Morpeth, Northumberland (d. 1159) Saint Robert de Turlande, founding abbot of the Abbey of Casa Dei, also called Chaise-Dieu (d. 1067) Saint Robert Bellarmine, Jesuit Doctor of the Church (d. 1621)  Fictional characters  Robert Baratheon, a character in A Song of Ice and Fire novels by George R. R. Martin & the 2011 TV series Game of Thrones  Robert Barone, a character from the 1996 sitcom Everybody Loves Raymond Robert Langdon, symbologist and cryptologist in Dan Brown's novels Angels & Demons, The Da Vinci Code, The Lost Symbol &  Inferno, the 2006 film  The Da Vinci Code & the 2009 film  Angels & Demons Robert Paulson, a character in Chuck Palahniuk's novel  Fight Club and the 1999  film of the same name  Roberto, a handsome and suave Spix's macaw in Rio 2  In different languages  Arabic:روبرت Armenian: Ռոբերտ (Robert) Breton: Roparzh  Bulgarian: Робърт/Роберт (Robert) Catalan: Robert Chinese Simplified: 罗伯特 (Robert)  Chinese Traditional：羅伯特 (Robert)
3
Oxford Dictionary of English Christian names OUP   After becoming widely used in Continental Europe it entered England in its Old French form Robert, where an Old English cognate form (Hrēodbēorht, Hrodberht, Hrēodbēorð, Hrœdbœrð, Hrœdberð) had existed before the Norman Conquest.
Similar to the name, Richard, "Robert" is also a common name in many Germanic languages, including English, German, Dutch, Norwegian, Swedish, Danish, and Icelandic.
Roeper Ropars (Breton) Roper (Breton/French) Roope (Finnish) Roupen (Armenian) Rupert Ruprecht (Old High German) Ruppert Rvpertvs (Latin: "Rupertus") Rubert Rochbert Robrecht (German) Rodebert Rodebrecht (Old German) Rudbert Ruby (Old Dutch) Rudebet Roteberht (Germanic) Rotebert (Germanic) Trebor (reversal)  Feminine forms:  Roberta Robbi RobertineRobertina Robina Ruprette/a (archaic French)  Trivia
SHAKESPEARE DARK: Horatio speaks of this play's "Carnal, bloody, and unnatural acts", & he should know
Hamlet
Horatio Clare (born 1973), British author Horatio Davies (1842–1912), London businessman, politician and magistrate  Horatio Dresser (1866–1945), New Thought religious leader and author Horatio Earle (1855–1935), American road advocate Horatio Gates (c. 1727–1806), American general Horatio Greenough (1805–1852), American sculptor Horatio Hale (1817–1896), American-Canadian ethnologist, philologist and businessman Horatio Hocken (1857–1937), Canadian politician, social reformer and a founder of what became the Toronto Star newspaper Horatio Nelson Jackson (1872–1955), American automobile pioneer and physician Horatio King (1811–1897), American politician, Postmaster General of the United States Horatio Herbert Kitchener, 1st Earl Kitchener (1850–1916), British field marshal Horatio Luro (1901–1991), thoroughbred horse racing trainer Horatio Mann (1744–1814), English politician Horatio McCulloch (1806–1867), Scottish landscape painter Horatio Nelson, 1st Viscount Nelson (1758–1805), British admiral Horatio Parker (1863–1919), American composer Horatio Frederick Phillips (1845–1924), early aviation pioneer from the United Kingdom  Horatio Potter (1802–1887), Episcopal bishop in the Diocese of New York Horatio Ross (1801–1886), Scottish sportsman and pioneering amateur photographer Horatio Sanz (born 1974), Chilean-born American comedian Horatio Seymour (1810–1886), American politician, 18th governor of New York Horatio Seymour (Vermont) 1778-1857), United States senator from Vermont Horatio Sharpe (1718–1790), 22nd Proprietary Governor of Maryland Horatio Spafford (1828–1888), lawyer, hymn writer Horatio Torromé, Argentinian figure skater Horatio Townshend, 1st Viscount Townshend (1630–1687), English politician Horatio Walker (1858–1938), Canadian painter Horatio Walpole, 1st Baron Walpole (1678–1757), English diplomat Horace Walpole (1717–1797), also known as Horatio Walpole, 4th Earl of Orford, English author, art historian, antiquarian and politician Horatio Walpole, 1st Earl of Orford (1723–1809), British politician, son of the 1st baron Walpole Horatio Walpole, 2nd Earl of Orford (1752–1822), English politician, son of the 1st earl Horatio Walpole, 3rd Earl of Orford (1783–1858), British politician, son of the 2nd earl Horatio Walpole, 4th Earl of Orford (second creation) (1813–1894), British politician, son of the 3rd earl Horatio Wills (1811–1861), Australian pastoralist and politician Horatio Wright (1820–1899), American engineer and American Civil War Union Army General  Fiction Horatio (character), character in the play Hamlet by William Shakespeare Horatio Caine, police lieutenant in the television series CSI: Miami Horatio Hellpop, character in the comic book series Nexus Horatio Hornblower, naval hero in the novels of C. S. Forester Cap'n Horatio Crunch, the mascot of Cap'n Crunch cereal Cap'n Turbot, a main character in the TV show PAW Patrol, whose first name is "Horatio"  Places Horatio, Arkansas, a city Horatio, Ohio, an unincorporated community Horatio, Pennsylvania, an unincorporated community Horatio, South Carolina, an unincorporated community  Other uses Horace (65 BC–8 BC), Roman poet Horatio, a faction in the strategy game, Endless Space Horatius Cocles, legendary Roman defender of the Pons Sublicius bridge  See also See also the similar spelled name Horacio
2
Horatio is a male given name, derived from the Latin name (nomen) Horatius, from the Roman gens (clan) Horatia.
Horatio may refer to:   People Horatio Alger, Jr. (1832–1899), American author Horatio Allen (1802–1889), American civil engineer and inventor Horatio Thomas Austin (1801–1865), British Royal Navy officer and arctic explorer Horatio Barber (1875–1964), early British aviation pioneer Horatio Bottomley (1860–1932), English swindler, publisher and politician Horatio Bridge (1806–1893), American naval commodore Horatio Brown (1854–1926), Scottish historian Horatio Caro (1862–1920), English chess player Horatio Chriesman (1797–1878) was an American surveyor, mayor in Mexican Texas and participant in the Texas Revolution.
AMERICAN NO MORE: Ruth Graves Wakefield, creator of toll house cookies, sold her treats to this Swiss company
Nestlé
As the popularity of the Toll House Chocolate Crunch Cookie increased, the sales of Nestlé's semi-sweet chocolate bars also spiked.
2
It is often incorrectly reported that the cookie was an accident, and that Wakefield expected the chocolate chunks to melt making chocolate cookies.
In reality, Wakefield stated that she deliberately invented the cookie.
SALLY: This "All in the Family" actress was a longtime spokesperson for the Christian Children's Fund
Sally Struthers
Sally may refer to:  Military Sally (military), an attack by the defenders of a town or fortress under siege against a besieging force Sally, the Allied reporting name during World War II for the Imperial Japanese Armys Mitsubishi Ki-21 bomber  Names Sally, a nickname for Salome Sally, a nickname for Sarah Sally, a nickname for Sandra Sally, a nickname for Salamander Sally, a derivation of a traditional Irish Gaelic name, Sadhbh,  Sally, a derivation of a Sorcha, an Irish and Scottish Gaelic name,  A male nickname, rare outside Italy and the Italian diaspora, for someone named Salvatore   People with the given name Sally  Sally Ann Triplett (born 1962), British actress and singer Sally Anne Bowman (1987–2005), British murder victim Sally Deweese (born 1824), American young girl who became mother at 10 years Sally Field (born 1946), American actress Sally Gunnell (born 1966), British hurdler Sally Hawkins (born 1976), British actress Sally Kellerman (born 1937), American actress and singer Sally Chepyego Kaptich (born 1985), Kenyan distance runner Sally Kirkland (born 1941), American actress Sally Jessy Raphael (born 1935), talk show host (see Film and television below) Sally Pearson (born 1986), Australian track and field athlete  Sally Priesand (born 1946), America's first female rabbi ordained by a rabbinical seminary, and the second formally ordained female rabbi in Jewish history, after Regina Jonas Sally Rand (1904-1979), American burlesque performer  Sally Ride (1951–2012), American physicist and astronaut Sally Salminen (1906–1976), Finnish writer Sally Struthers (born 1948), American actress and spokeswoman Sally Ward Lawrence Hunt Armstrong Downs, also known as Sallie Ward, (1827-1896), American socialite.
2
Sally Whittaker (born 1963), British actress Sally Wister (1761–1804), American diarist Sally Viola Bauer (1908–2001), Swedish swimmer  Slang "Sally Ann" as The Salvation Army, a Protestant Christian church An effeminate boy or man Codename used for a modified 6502 used by Atari for a game console and home computers The South Atlantic League, a minor league baseball league in the United States A wild stallion Salvia divinorum  Fiction Sally, a detective novel by E.V. Cunningham (aka Howard Fast) "Sally" (short story), a short story by Isaac Asimov Sally (The Nightmare Before Christmas), a character in The Nightmare Before Christmas Princess Sally Acorn, a character from the American Sonic the Hedgehog comic book Sally Brown, Charlie Brown's little sister Sally Carrera, a Porsche 911 Carrera in Cars by Pixar Sally Forth, title character of an eponymous 1982+ syndicated comic strip focusing on the life of a working mother Sally Forth (Wally Wood), 1968–1974, a comic strip created by cartoonist Wally Wood for the male readership of military newspapers Sally Jackson (Percy Jackson), Percy's mother  Sally Simpson, a character from the musical Tommy "Sally", a poem by Patti Smith from her book Seventh Heaven Sally Lockhart, from books by Philip Pullman Sally Bowles, a Cabaret singer in Christopher Isherwood's Goodbye to Berlin and the musical Cabaret.
Businesses Sally Corporation, a manufacturer of dark rides and audio-animatronics Sally Line, an Ålandian passenger shipping company and cruise line  See also   Mustang Sally (disambiguation) Sally's Apizza  Category:Feminine given names Category:Feminine nicknames Category:Masculine nicknames
THE HUMAN BODY: Phlebitis, an inflammation of veins, usually affects these extremities
the legs
Phlebitis or venitis is the inflammation of a vein, usually in the legs.
3
In Henry Morton Robinson's best selling 1949 novel The Cardinal (later made into a motion picture by Otto Preminger), a severe case of phlebitis is a prominent plot device as sustained by the protagonist Stephen Fermoyle.
In King Of The Hill, when Mr. Strickland took Bible study classes in the pool with Luanne, Hank noted that it was "good for his phlebitis".
You're 42."
HOME: A heriz is a Persian one
Carpet
Persian may refer to:  Persian architecture, architecture of contemporary Iran and the Iranian Cultural Continent  Persian carpet, an essential part of Persian art and culture  Persian cuisine, traditional and modern styles of cooking related to Iran  Persian Empire, a series of empires based in Western Asia in Iran  Persian language, an Iranian language of the Indo-European family  Persian alphabet, a writing system which is quite similar to Arabic Alphabet.
2
Persian people, an ethnic group  Other uses  Persian cat, a long-haired breed of cat characterized by its round face and shortened muzzle  Persian (Pokémon), a fictional Pokémon species  Persian (roll), a pastry native to Thunder Bay, Ontario
The Persian, a character from Gaston Leroux's The Phantom of the Opera  See also  Alpha Gruis, star also known as "The Persian"  Parrotia persica, the Persian ironwood tree  Persian melon, an orange-fleshed melon, Cucumis melo  Persia (disambiguation)  List of Persia-related topics  List of Persian poets and authors  Iranian (disambiguation)   ar:فارس ca:Pèrsia de:Persien ko:페르시아 nl:Perzië th:เปอร์เซีย
CELEBRITY CRITTERS: Silver was the Lone Ranger's horse & this was the name of Tonto's horse
Scout
He refers to him by the title "ke-mo sah-bee," explaining that the phrase means "faithful friend" (radio series) or "trusty scout" (television series) in the language of his tribe.
3
The most recent portrayal was by Johnny Depp in the 2013 Disney film The Lone Ranger.
Tonto buries the dead rangers, and the Lone Ranger instructs him to make a sixth empty grave to leave the impression that he, too, is dead.
Tonto's horse Tonto first rode a horse named "White Feller" (White Fella/Fellah).
OPRYLAND USA: A historic building, this former home of the Grand Ole Opry was renovated & reopened in 1994
The Ryman Auditorium
The Ryman Auditorium, its home since 1943, was beginning to suffer from disrepair as the downtown neighborhood around it was falling victim to increasing urban decay.
3
This also allowed the general public to attend shows at the Acuff without having to pay for park admission, like the Opry itself.
In 1994, Gaylord Entertainment invested heavily in the renaissance of the entertainment district in downtown Nashville.
Stan Tucker 1983  Sing Tennessee   Dir:Chor: Jean WhittakerArr: Lloyd Wells<br/ >M.Dir: ?
PLAY"BOY": When Deniece Williams hit No. 1 with this song in 1984, she was "Footloose" & fancy free
"Let's Hear It for the Boy"
Take a Miracle" (1982), "Let's Hear It for the Boy" (1984), and for her duets with singer Johnny Mathis.
3
The album also featured "Cause You Love Me Baby" (which charted separately on the R&B chart as the flip side of "Free") and "That's What Friends Are For".
Williams returned to her hometown of Gary, Indiana for a performance to mark the re-opening of the historic Glen Theater on October 13, 2007.
Williams has received four awards out of twelve nominations.
FORGOTTEN MUSICALS: "First Impressions", based on this "Austen"tatious novel, starred Farley Granger as Mr. Darcy
Pride And Prejudice
In 1959, Granger returned to Broadway as Fitzwilliam Darcy opposite Polly Bergen as Elizabeth Bennet in First Impressions, a musical adaptation of Pride and Prejudice with a book and direction by Abe Burrows.
3
Clark, Shannon E. "Page 105." The Alameda: The Beautiful Way.
Goldwyn signed him to a seven-year contract for $100 per week.
Because The Hays Office was keeping close tabs on the project, however, the final script was so discreet that Laurents remained uncertain of whether Stewart ever realized that his own character was homosexual.
VACATION FUN: Disney offers fun cruises to many places including Castaway Cay, a private island in this West Indies island chain
the Bahamas
Castaway Cay is a private island in the Bahamas which serves as an exclusive port for the Disney Cruise Line ships Disney Wonder, Disney Magic, Disney Dream, and Disney Fantasy.
3
The Castaway Cay Airport and helipad on the island are no longer in regular use, but are kept maintained for emergencies.
To create the mooring site for the ships, workers dredged sand and used explosives to blast coral, and form a  channel about  deep and ranging from 200 to  wide.
There are three beaches for guests: one for families, one for Cabana guests, and another exclusively for adults, called Serenity Bay.
RELIGION: In Santeria, which combines Catholicism & African ritual, this apostle once named Simon is called Oggun
Peter
Reuters, 21 October 2014  Personalities  Editors Jack Goodman Justin Kaplan Michael Korda Robert Gottlieb Peter Schwed William Cole  Authors  North America   Allie Brosh Andrew Smith  Andrew Solomon  Anna Todd  Annie Proulx  Audrey Niffenegger  Becca Fitzpatrick  Bob Dylan  Bob Woodward  Brad Thor  Cassandra Clare  Cornelius Ryan
3
At the time, Simon was a piano salesman and Schuster was editor of an automotive trade magazine and together they pooled $8,000 to start the company.
As part of CBS, Simon & Schuster is the primary publisher for books related to various media franchises owned by and/or aired on CBS, such as How I Met Your Mother, Star Trek, and CSI.  In April 2012, the United States Department of Justice filed United States v. Apple Inc., naming Apple, Simon & Schuster, and four other major publishers as defendants.
Imprints  Adult publishing  Atria  37 Ink  Atria Español  Atria Unbound  Beyond Words Publishing (specializes in publishing new age, self-help, and inspiration stories with a spiritual focus.)  Cash Money Content  Emily Bestler Books  Howard Books  Keywords Press, "a new imprint to publish books by Internet entertainers"   Marble Arch Press  Strebor Books International   Washington Square Press  Gallery Books  Karen Hunter Publishing   Mercury Ink  MTV Books  Pocket Books  Pocket Star  Scout Press  Threshold Editions (specializes in publishing politically right-of-center books, including Jerome R. Corsi's controversial The Obama Nation)  Scribner   Touchstone  Simon & Schuster (the flagship imprint)  Folger Shakespeare Library   Free Press  Simon451  Saga Press  Children's publishing  Aladdin – initially the children's mass-market paperback imprint of Atheneum Books"Birthday Bios: Jean E. Karl".
BOOK TITLES: Sportswriter Rick Reilly wrote about lugging golf bags for Donald Trump & Jack Nicklaus in "Who's Your" this
Caddy
Who's Your Caddy – (Doubleday) –
2
Long known for being the "back page" columnist for Sports Illustrated, Reilly moved to ESPN on June 1, 2008, where he was a featured columnist for ESPN.com and wrote the back page column for ESPN the Magazine.
Film Reilly co-wrote the screenplay for Leatherheads, a film directed by George Clooney, starring Clooney, Renée Zellweger and John Krasinski and released in April 2008.
COLOR MOVIES: Amanda Seyfried donned the title cloak in this 2011 film
Red Riding Hood
She also stars in the dark fantasy historical romance Red Riding Hood (2011), the dystopian sci-fi thriller In Time (2011), the thriller Gone (2012), the musical drama film Les Misérables (2012), as the title porn actress in the biographical drama Lovelace (2013), and in the comedies A Million Ways to Die in the West (2014) and Ted 2 (2015).
3
The Letterman Show.
In March 2008 Seyfried was cast in the comedy horror film Jennifer's Body.
In the film, Seyfried's character is an escort/prostitute who is hired to test a husband, because his wife feels that she cannot trust his fidelity.
THE SONGS OF BACHARACH & DAVID: How could you forget that Naked Eyes remade this Burt & Hal hit in 1983
"Always Something There to Remind Me"
Fuel for the Fire (2013)  Singles  Year Single Chart Positions Album US USDance USAC CA AU NZ UK 1982 "Always Something There to Remind Me"8373187259Burning Bridges/Naked Eyes 1983 "Voices In My Head"–---–-- 1983 "Promises, Promises"1132196–1595 1983 "When the Lights Go Out"37---–-- 1984 "(What)
3
The band had subsequent hits with their own compositions, "Promises, Promises" (not to be confused with the Bacharach/David musical number), "When the Lights Go Out," and "(What)
The group never toured because in the early 1980s technology was not advanced enough to reproduce their multi-layered, multi-synthesizer sound in concert.
In the summer of 2008, Naked Eyes completed a U.S. tour along with Belinda Carlisle, ABC and The Human League.
"OLD" ENGLAND: A cottage in Yealmpton purports to be the residence of this nursery rhyme housekeeper
Old Mother Hubbard
Yealmpton is home to a 400-year-old stone cottage, where it is said, a version of the famous rhyme Old Mother Hubbard was written.
3
There is an electoral ward of the same name.
John Pollexfen Bastard (1756–1816) a British Tory politician, landowner and colonel of the East Devonshire Militia, lived at Kitley House, Yealmpton.
The senior branch of the Copleston family died out in the male line in 1632,Vivian, p.225, on the death of John V Copleston (1609-1632) but the Coplestons of Bowden survived a further century until the death without progeny of Thomas Copleston (1688-1748), MP, whose heirs in 1753 sold Bowden to William Pollexfen Bastard of Kitley.
PHYSICS: The Michelson interferometer was invented to show light moves thru this medium & found it didn't exist
ether
Michelson may refer to:   Michelson (surname), people with the given name or surname  27758 Michelson discovered in 1991  Michelson (Bahamas), city at Exuma, Bahamas  Michelson (crater) on the moon  Michelson-Gale-Pearson experiment, science  Michelson interferometer, most common configuration for optical interferometry   Michelson–Morley experiment, a scientific experiment regarding the luminiferous ether.
1
Michelson Museum of Art, Texas, USA  Mount Michelson (Brooks Range), Alaska, USA  USNS Michelson T-AGS-23, United States Naval ship  See also  Mickelson (disambiguation)  Michaelson (disambiguation)
POP MUSIC: Their 1979 album "Breakfast in America" featured a feast of hits like "Take The Long Way Home"
Supertramp
Breakfast in America is the sixth album by the English progressive rock band Supertramp, released on 29 March 1979 by A&M Records.
2
Recording The album went through two rounds of demos.
: Essential Playlist of the 115 Records it’s OK to Love.
IT'S IN THE BIBLE: Jesus' last quoted words, known as the "Great Commission", are in the book called these "of the Apostles"
the Acts
The acts of Jesus: the search for the authentic deeds of Jesus.
3
In John, Jesus' first two apostles were disciples of John the Baptist.
The soldiers place a Crown of Thorns on Jesus' head and ridicule him as the King of the Jews.
" Encyclopedia of World Biography. 2004.
BIBLICAL WHO'S WHO: Choosing this fisherman as a disciple, Jesus told him, "Henceforth thou shalt catch men"
Peter
These include the Gospel of Thomas, the Gospel of Peter, and the Apocryphon of James, among many other apocryphal writings.
3
The Synoptics and John agree on the main outline of Jesus' life."John, Gospel of."
Gentile lands surrounded the Jewish territories of Judea and Galilee, but Roman law and practice allowed Jews to remain separate legally and culturally.
The Quran mentions Jesus by name 25 times—more often than Muhammad—and emphasizes that Jesus was a mortal human who, like all other prophets, had been divinely chosen to spread God's message.
SINGERS NAME'S THE SAME: Singer-songwriter Nyro & pop singer Branigan
Laura
Branigan is the debut album by American singer Laura Branigan, recorded in 1981 and released in March 1982 on Atlantic Records.
3
Although the first "All Night With Me",  failed to enter the Top 40, the second single, an English version of the Italian hit by Umberto Tozzi "Gloria", made the singer a star.
The album included ballads "If You Loved Me" and "I Wish We Could Be Alone", the latter written by Branigan.
The album was certified gold.
CAN YOU DIGIT?: Number of stories on each of the 1,483-foot-high Petronas towers, or of keys on a standard piano keyboard
88
In 1980, petroleum products accounted for 88% of the country's commercial consumption of energy, the rest being provided from hydroelectric plants in Sarawak, too far away from the main population centres to become a major alternative.
3
In 1991, PETRONAS sold the bank back to another state company, Minister of Finance Inc., and announced its intention to concentrate on oil, gas, and associated activities in future.
PETRONAS had already raised Malaysia's oil production rate from 605,000 to  in late 1990 as the crisis unfolded.
Battling oil depletion: the late 1980s Fortunately for Malaysia, exploration was by no means at an end and could yet produce more reserves.
EARLY AMERICAN HISTORY: Margaret Brent, America's first woman barrister, was executor of the will of this colony's governor Leonard Calvert
Maryland
Leonard Calvert (1606 – June 9, 1647) was the First Proprietary Governor of Maryland.
1
Before he died, he wrote a will naming Margaret Brent, (the sister of Giles, and a future-historically famous planter, lawyer, and female advocate for women's rights) as the executor of his estate.
SOMEBODY WROTE THAT: "The Shining", "The Girl Who Loved Tom Gordon"
Stephen King
His popularity in Boston at this point led New England-based writer and Red Sox fan Stephen King to reference him as the object of infatuation for the young protagonist of the 1999 novel The Girl Who Loved Tom Gordon.
3
In his first season in Boston, Gordon had a 12-9 record and a 5.59 ERA – the highest ERA of his career to that point.
Prior to being placed on the disabled list, Gordon recorded a 13.45 earned run average giving up six runs in four total innings since June 11.
Early look at top five prospects for next year's MLB draft  Career highlights and achievements Rolaids Relief Man of the Year Award (1998) Led AL in saves (1998) Led AL in games finished (69, 1998) Set an MLB record with 54 consecutive saves (1998–99) Led AL in Holds (36) 2004 Three-time All-Star (1998, 2004, 2006) Only pitcher in MLB history with 100 wins, saves, and holds.
U.S. CITIES: It’s easy to recognize this city’s skyline--see the Sears Tower?
Chicago
-Vsmith 00:52, 8 Nov 2004 (UTC)  POLL CLOSED  Proposal 2 (A)   Replace the policy:  8.3 Commas  As stated by Kate Turabian's A Manual for Writers of Term Papers, Theses, and Dissertations, the Chicago Manual of Style, Strunk and White, and other authoritative sources, when a conjunction joins the last two elements in a series of three or more elements, a comma is used before the conjunction: "The wires were brown, blue, and green.
3
"U.S." is clearer and more useful for searching.
Is there a hidden complication in the current policy that I'm not seeing?
The Wikipedia Style Manual does not pretend to be a full style guide or grammar.
'TIL DEATH: In "The Enterprise Incident" episode of "Star Trek", he pretended to kill Kirk using the Vulcan Death Grip
Mr. Spock
Kirk orders the ship to the nearest starbase and gallantly invites the Romulan commander to accept Mr. Spock as her escort to her new quarters.
3
Chief Medical Officer Dr. McCoy is then summoned from the Enterprise to attend to him.
Alone with Spock in the turbolift, the Romulan acknowledges defeat and expresses her bitter disappointment at Spock's betrayal.
The latest explanation is given in the novel Vulcan's Heart, by Josepha Sherman and Susan Shwartz, in which her name is given as Liviana Charvanek.
POTPOURRI: 22 Jermyn Street, The Savoy & The Covent Garden are all hotels in this city
London
Jermyn Street is a one-way street in the St James's area of the City of Westminster in London, to the south of, parallel, and adjacent to Piccadilly.
3
It is widely known as a place where the shops are almost exclusively aimed at the gentlemen's clothing market and it is famous for its resident shirtmakers such as Turnbull & Asser, Hawes & Curtis, Thomas Pink, Harvie & Hudson, Charles Tyrwhitt and T. M. Lewin.
88, from 1696-1700; he then moved next door to No.
Though he did not live there, a statue of Beau Brummell stands on Jermyn Street at its junction with Piccadilly Arcade, as embodying its elegant clothing values.
FOR RICHARD: This businessman wrote "Losing My Virginity: How I've Survived, Had Fun, and Made A Fortune Doing Business My Way"
Richard Branson
Richard Branson (born 1950), British businessman and founder of the Virgin Group of companies Richard DeVos (born 1926), American businessman and co-founder of Amway Richard Jacobs (1925–2009), real estate businessman and owner of the Cleveland Indians baseball team Richard Rawlings (born 1969), star of American television show Fast N' Loud, owner of Gas Monkey garage, Gas Monkey Bar N' Grill and Gas Monkey Live Richard Velazquez (born 1973), PepsiCo Executive and first automotive designer at Porsche AG (Germany) of Puerto Rican descent Richard Warren Sears (1863–1914), co-founder of Sears, Roebuck and Company, and considered a promotional genius  Religious figures Saint Richard (disambiguation) Richard Baxter (1615 – 1691) English Puritan church leader, poet, hymn-writer.
3
Richard "Dick" Cheney (born 1941), Vice President of the United States under George W. Bush Richard Clarence "Dick" Clark (born September 14, 1928), former Senator from Iowa Richard Court (born 1947), Australian politician, former Premier of Western Australia Richard Cromwell (1626–1712), son of Oliver Cromwell, and his successor as Lord Protector of England Richard J. Daley (1902–1976), mayor of Chicago Richard M. Daley (born 1942), American former state senator and mayor of Chicago, son of Richard J. Daley Richard Hatfield (1931–1991), Canadian politician, Premier of New Brunswick Richard Johnson (judge) (born 1937), President of the Irish High Court Richard Mentor Johnson (1780–1850), Ninth Vice President of the United States, serving in the administration of Martin Van Buren.
Richard of Dover (died 1184), Benedictine monk and Archbishop of Canterbury Richard Foxe (c. 1448 – 1528), Bishop of Exeter, Bath and Wells, Durham, and Winchester, Lord Privy Seal, and founder of Corpus Christi College, Oxford  In music  Composers Richard D. James (born 1971), British composer and electronic musician, records music as Aphex Twin, among other monikers.
Rikardo Greek: Ριχάρδος (Richárdos) Latvian: Ričards, Rihards Lithuanian:
TIME FOR A SPOT OF "T": In 1990 millions of viewers tuned in to find out who killed Laura Palmer on this quirky ABC drama
Twin Peaks
Laura Palmer is a fictional character from the American television series Twin Peaks on ABC.
2
Laura's diary is uncovered in the first episode, but her secret diary is not recovered until later.
The Amanda Palmer album "Who Killed Amanda Palmer" is an allusion to the series and the character.
ANIMALS: The number of toes on the foot of a hippopotamus; especially the ones in Disney's "Fantasia"
four
Fantasia may refer to:   People   Fantasia Barrino (born 1984), American R&B singer  Rick Fantasia, American sociologist   Music    Fantasia (music), a free musical composition structured according to the composer's fancy  Fantasia contrappuntistica, a solo piano piece composed by Ferruccio Busoni  Fantasia on a Theme by Thomas Tallis, composed in 1910 by  British composer Ralph Vaughan Williams  Fantasía para un gentilhombre, a 1954 work by the Spanish composer Joaquín Rodrigo  Fantasia No. 3 (Mozart), a piece of music for solo piano composed by Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart in 1782  Fantasia in F minor (Schubert), a piano piece for four hands, composed by Franz Schubert in 1828.
1
Fantasia on British Sea Songs by Sir Henry Wood Albums  Fantasia (Fantasia Barrino album), 2006  Fantasia (Yolandita Monge album), 1980  Fantasia (Franco De Vita album), a 1986 album by Franco De Vita  Fantasia, an album by pianist Yuja Wang, 2012  Songs "Fantasia", a song by Mario Merola, 1967   Film    Fantasia (1940 film), a 1940 animated musical film produced by Walt Disney  Fantasia 2000, sequel to the 1940 film, premiered in december of 1999  Fantasia (video game), a 1991 game for the Sega Mega Drive based on the film  Fantasia (2014 film), a 2014 Chinese film  Fantasia International Film Festival, a genre film festival held each summer in Montreal  Fantasia, a fictional world in the NeverEnding Story films   Television    "Fantasia" (Eureka Seven episode), the 36th episode of the Eureka Seven anime series  Fantasia for Real, a reality television show starring Fantasia Barrino   Games    Fantasia, an adult arcade game similar to Taito's Qix  Fantasia, a fictional realm in the video game Chocobo Racing and a level in that game  Fantasia: Music Evolved, a 2014 music rhythm game for the Xbox One and Xbox 360 Kinect based on the Fantasia films   Ships    Fantasia-class cruise ship, a class of three cruise ships operated by MSC Cruises  , lead ship of the Fantasia-class cruise ships operated by MSC Cruises  MS Fantasia, a cross-channel ferry operated by SNCF, now known as the   MS Fantasia and , a cross-channel ferry operated by Sealink and Stena Line, now known as the Wawel  SS Fantasia, a cruise ship operated by Chandris Line   Other uses    Fantasia (comics), a fictional character in the Marvel Universe  Fantasia (performance), a traditional equestrian performance practiced in North Africa  Show tango, also called Fantasia, a more theatrical and exaggerated form of Argentine tango  1224 Fantasia, an asteroid  Fantasia, brightly coloured Nat Sherman cigarettes with gold filter-tips  Fantasia Holdings, a property developer in China  Fantasia (franchise)   See also    Fantasiaa, the Finnish entry in the Eurovision Song Contest 1983, performed in Finnish by Ami Aspelund  Fantasio (disambiguation)  Fantasy (disambiguation)  Phantasia (disambiguation)
CAT PEOPLE: He later went back to Mellencamp, but under this name his album "American Fool" was No. 1 in 1982
John Cougar
American Fool is the fifth album released by John Mellencamp, released under the stage name John Cougar in 1982.
2
"I just made them up.
3:35  "Thundering Hearts" (Mellencamp, Green) –
THE CW: Kristen Bell solves mysteries on this show now set in college
Veronica Mars
She gained critical acclaim playing the title character in the television series Veronica Mars from September 2004 to May 2007.
3
Since 2012, Bell has starred as Jeannie van der Hooven in the Showtime series House of Lies.
What I like about nerdiness, geekiness, is it doesn't really matter what you're into—it just means you're not a follower."
SpherelandHex (voice)2012Hit and RunAnnieAlso co-producer2012Stuck in LoveTricia2013Movie 43SupergirlSegment: "Super Hero Speed Dating"2013Some
REVOLUTIONARY WORDS: In "The American Crisis", he wrote, "We fight not to enslave, but to set a country free"
Thomas Paine
The American Crisis is a pamphlet series by 18th century Enlightenment philosopher and author Thomas Paine, originally published from 1776 to 1783 during the American Revolution.
3
The pamphlets were contemporaneous with early parts of the American Revolution, during a time when colonists needed inspiring works.
Paine says that this is very "unfatherly" and he should want the war to happen in his time so it does not happen in his child's time.
Paine then goes on to try to bargain with King George lll, "Why, God bless me!
OLD WEST DOGS: Developed by Plains Indians, this device consisted of a frame on 2 poles dragged by a dog
Travois
New York: A.S. Barnes & Company, 1904, 65, 112 Coronado described many common features of Plains Indians culture: skin tepees, travois pulled by dogs, Plains Indian Sign Language, and staple foods such as jerky and pemmican.
3
Sides, Hampton.
Soon afterwards pressure from Europeans on all sides and European diseases caused its decline.
Success was often counted by the number of horses or property obtained in the raid.
READ YOUR BIBLE: According to 1 Kings, after her death, Queen  Jezebel's body would be eaten in the street by these animals
dogs
For these transgressions against the God and people of Israel, Jezebel met a gruesome death - thrown out of a window by members of her own court retinue, and the flesh of her corpse eaten by stray dogs.
3
Obadiah, the faithful overseer of Ahab's house, rescued one hundred of these, hid them, and secretly fed them in a cave.
As such she would have a more active role in temple and palace relations than was customary in the Hebrew monarchy.
There are themes about witchcraft or sorcery and voodoo and cheating.
SOUNDS LIKE AN IRISH COUNTY: Route Julius Caesar took to France; too hard?  Okay, flutist James
Galway
A member of one of The Tribes of Galway, Blake was the second son of Walter Blake (died 1575) and Juliana Browne.
2
James "Spanish" Blake, Anglo-Irish merchant, soldier, and  spy, born after 1560, died 20 February 1630.
He has been named as the assassin of Red Hugh O'Donnell in Spain in 1602.http://www.ricorso.net/rx/az-data/authors/o/ODonnell_H/life.htm He was in the company of O'Donnell at the time of his death, and offered his services to Sir George Carew  for the plot.
JONES-ING: Lady Jones was the married name of Enid Bagnold, who wrote this 1935 novel about a 14-year-old girl & her horse
National Velvet
thumb|Enid Bagnold Enid Algerine Bagnold, Lady Jones, CBE (27 October 1889 – 31 March 1981) was a British author and playwright, known for the 1935 story National Velvet.
3
The Happy ForeignerProfile: "A Celebration of Women Writers", upenn.edu; accessed 28 September 2014.
Call Me Jacky; 1967 play)  Autobiography (1969) Four Plays (1970) Poems (1978) Letters to Frank Harris & Other Friends (1980) Early Poems (1987)  References  Further reading        Anne Sebba (1986), Enid Bagnold, The Authorised Biography Lenemaja Friedman (1986), Enid Bagnold  External links  A Diary Without Dates (1917)
Profile, spartacus-educational.com; accessed 28 September 2014.
THE '96 FALL TELEVISION SEASON: Aliens invade Earth in this NBC series starring Eric Close & Megan Ward
Dark Skies
Close later had leading roles on short-lived primetime shows such as McKenna (1994–1995), Dark Skies (1996–1997), The Magnificent Seven (1998–1999), Now and Again (1999–2000), and the Steven Spielberg miniseries production, Taken (2002).
3
Personal life
Close married his wife Keri in 1995.
Matt Spicer Episode: "Our Darkest Hour" 2011 Chaos Michael Dorset 13 episodes 2011–15 Suits Travis Tanner 7Suits Season 5 episode 5 episodes 2011 American Horror Story: Murder House Hugo Langdon 2 episodes 2012 Law & Order: Special Victims Unit Colin Barnes Episode: "Father Dearest" 2012–15
THE CARIBBEAN: In this group, Tortola is connected to Beef Island by the Queen Elizabeth Bridge
British Virgin Islands
Tortola  is the largest and most populated of the British Virgin Islands, a group of islands that form part of the archipelago of the Virgin Islands.
2
When the British took over, the name evolved to Tortola.
Many ferry companies provide travelers with the opportunity to arrive by sea.
EUROPE: Ettelbruck, Luxembourg has a monument to this U.S. general known as "Old Blood and Guts"; he liberated it
Patton
US General George S. Patton on Christmas Day, December 25, 1944 led US troops in the final liberation of Ettelbruck from Nazi occupation.
3
The A7 Motorway, known as the Motorway of the North, runs through Ettelbruck.
The museum was opened on July 7, 1995, and represents a main tourist attraction in the town.
Both the Alzette and Sauer rivers are named in the song, and since Ettelbruck is located at the point where they both meet, the location was appropriate for its public introduction.
DINOSAURS: Edmontosaurus, discovered in this Canadian province in 1917, was almost defenseless & was preyed upon by the T-rex
Alberta
The first fossils named Edmontosaurus were discovered in southern Alberta (named after Edmonton, the capital city), in the Horseshoe Canyon Formation (formerly called the lower Edmonton Formation).
3
Skin thumb|AMNH 5060: a well preserved specimen of E. annectens Multiple specimens of Edmontosaurus annectens have been found with preserved skin impressions.
YPM 2182 was put on display in 1901, and USNM 2414 in 1904.
The specimen became the first dinosaur skeleton to be mounted for exhibition in a Canadian museum.
THE AMERICAN THEATRE: Harry Connick, Jr. wrote the songs for the musical "Thou Shalt Not", set in this southern city, his hometown
New Orleans
, New Orleans district attorney and part-time singer Harry Connick, Jr., his son, New Orleans musician, singer, and actor
1
Harry Connick is the name of:  Harry Connick, Sr.
ONCE UPON A DECEMBER: A DAR chapter in Massachusetts has one of the chests from this December 16, 1773 event
Boston Tea Party
Protests against British attempts to tax the colonies after the French and Indian War ended in 1763 led to the Boston Massacre in 1770, and the 1773 Boston Tea Party escalated tensions.
3
As late as 1795, the population of Massachusetts was nearly 95% of English ancestry.
Sectors vital to the Massachusetts economy include higher education, biotechnology, information technology, finance, health care, tourism, and defense.
There are a number of major AM and FM stations which serve Massachusetts, along with many more regional and community-based stations.
U.S. HISTORY: THE EARLY 1800s: In the Missouri Compromise, Massachusetts gave up its northern territory to form this state
Maine
In 1691, the colonies of Massachusetts Bay and Plymouth were united (along with present-day Maine, which had previously been divided between Massachusetts and New York) into the Province of Massachusetts Bay.
3
The Puritans, who believed the Church of England needed to be purified and experienced harassment from English authority because of their beliefs, came to Massachusetts with the goal of establishing an ideal religious society.
According to the U.S. Census projections, the population was 6,745,408 in 2014,of that 79% of the state population spoke English, 7% spoke Spanish, 3.5% spoke Portuguese, and 1% spoke either French or Chinese.
Massachusetts has a total of  of freight trackage in operation.
GO FISH: This state fish of Massachusetts is valued as a food & for its liver oil
cod
The large coastal plain of the Atlantic Ocean in the eastern section of the state contains Greater Boston, along with most of the state's population, as well as the distinctive Cape Cod peninsula.
3
The Historical Linguistics of Native America.
0.37% Wampanoag  0.001%   As of 2010, 78.93% (4,823,127) of Massachusetts residents age 5 and older spoke English at home as a primary language, while 7.50% (458,256) spoke Spanish, 2.97% (181,437) Portuguese, 1.59% (96,690) Chinese (which includes Cantonese and Mandarin), 1.11% (67,788) French, 0.89% (54,456) French Creole, 0.72% (43,798) Italian, 0.62% (37,865) Russian, and Vietnamese was spoken as a main language by 0.58% (35,283) of the population over the age of five.
The public University of Massachusetts (nicknamed UMass) features five campuses in the state, with its flagship campus in Amherst that enrolls over 25,000 students.
EDUCATION: 19th century Massachusetts educator who's known as the "Father of American Public Education"
Horace Mann
Horace Mann made the state's school system a national model.
3
William C. Sturtevant, pp.
Other major interstates include I-91, which travels generally north and south along the Connecticut River, I-93, which travels north and south through central Boston, then passes Methuen before entering New Hampshire.
The voters of these now defunct counties elect only Sheriffs and Registers of Deeds, who are part of the state government.
COLLEGE FOUNDERS: Universalist Charles, who wanted to put "a light on the hill" in Medford, Massachusetts
Tufts
In addition to Harvard and MIT, several other Massachusetts universities currently rank in the top 50 at the national level in the widely cited rankings of U.S. News and World Report: Tufts University (#27), Boston College (#30), Brandeis University (#34), Boston University (#41) and Northeastern University (#47).
3
included John F. Kennedy, who was a senator and US president before his assassination in 1963, Robert F. Kennedy, who was a senator, US attorney general and presidential candidate before his assassination in 1968, Ted Kennedy, a senator from 1962 until his death in 2009, and Eunice Kennedy Shriver, a co-founder of the Special Olympics.
During the early and mid 19th century, immigrant groups began arriving to Massachusetts in large numbers; first from Ireland in the 1840s; today the Irish and part-Irish are the largest ancestry group in the state at nearly 25% of the total population.
Massachusetts has a total of  of freight trackage in operation.
RELIGION: Officially, any practicing Roman Catholic male can be elected to this high office
Pope
The diocese was canonically erected on 8 November 1984 by Pope John Paul II. Its territories were taken from the archdiocese based in Guam.
2
The Diocese of Chalan Kanoa is led by a prelate bishop who pastors the motherchurch, the Our Lady of Mount Carmel Cathedral on Saipan.
Ordinaries Tomas Aguon Camacho (1984 - 2010)  See also   Catholic Church by country  Catholic Church in the United States  Ecclesiastical Province of Agaña  Global organisation of the Catholic Church  List of Roman Catholic archdioceses (by country and continent)  List of Roman Catholic dioceses (alphabetical) (including archdioceses)  List of Roman Catholic dioceses (structured view) (including archdioceses)  List of the Catholic dioceses of the United States  References  External links  Official Site  Catholic Hierarchy Profile of the Diocese of Chalan Kanoa  Chalan Kanoa Chalan Kanoa Chalan Kanoa Category:Roman Catholic Church in the Northern Mariana Islands Category:Religious organizations established in 1984 Chalan Kanoa Category:1984 establishments in the Northern Mariana Islands
I WRITE THE SONGS: He wrote "Blinded By The Light" & "Fire", which were hits for Manfred Mann & the Pointer Sisters, respectively
Bruce Springsteen
"Blinded by the Light" is a song written and originally recorded by Bruce Springsteen, although it is mostly known by its 1977 #1 hit version recorded by Manfred Mann's Earth Band.
3
According to Springsteen, the song came about from going through a rhyming dictionary in search of appropriate words.
In 2002, Danish act Funkstar Deluxe released its disco version of this song.
piano  Manfred Mann's Earth Band cover Manfred Mann – organ, piano, keyboards, backing vocals Colin Pattenden –
MYSTERY!: Edward Petherbridge had trouble keeping his monocle in place as this Dorothy Sayers lord
Lord Peter Wimsey
Among his many roles, he portrayed Lord Peter Wimsey in the 1987 BBC television adaptations of Dorothy L. Sayers's novels, and Guildenstern in Tom Stoppard's Rosencrantz and Guildenstern Are Dead.
3
Petherbridge was born in West Bowling, Bradford, the younger son of William and Hannah Petherbridge.
Petherbridge maintains a weekly blog, which often features his poetry, artwork and short films.
In 2011, Petherbridge published an autobiographical anthology of essays, poems and artwork under the title Slim Chances and Unscheduled Appearances, which includes a foreword by Sir Ian McKellen.
OSCAR-WINNING MOVIE SYNOPSES: Brock is looking for diamonds but instead finds a picture of Rose, who is 102 years old; then--a flashback
Titanic
Fallsview also known as the Brock Hotel, a hotel in Niagara Falls, Ontario  Entertainment  Brock (TV series), an Australian mini-series based on the life of motor racing driver Peter Brock  Fictional characters  Brock (Pokémon), a character in the fictional world of Pokémon who usually travels with Ash  The Brocks, a family on the American television show Picket Fences  Eddie Brock, the longtime host of the Marvel alien symbiote Venom  John Brock, a fictional British undercover agent created by Desmond Skirrow  Matthew Brock, a news reporter on the American sitcom NewsRadio  Brock Lovett, a character in the 1997 film Titanic  Tommy Brock the badger from The Tale of Mr. Tod by Beatrix Potter  Brock Cantillo, on Breaking Bad the son of character Andrea Cantillo  Brock Samson, a character in the animated television series The Venture Bros.  People Brock (surname), for various people with this surname (last name or family name) As a first name (given name)  Brock Adams (1927–2004), an American Democratic politician and member of Congress  Brock Chisholm (1896–1971), a Canadian World War I veteran and the first Director-General of the World Health Organization  Brock Dave (b. 1941), singer-songwriter, founder member of British space-rock group Hawkwind  Brock Gillespie (b. 1983), a professional basketball player  Brock James (b. 1981), Australian rugby union player  Brock Lesnar (b. 1977), American professional wrestler and former MMA fighter  Brock Nelson (b. 1991), a professional ice hockey player  Brock Olivo (b. 1976), a former National Football League running back for the Detroit Lions  Brock Osweiler (b. 1990), a professional National League Football player, quarterback for the Denver Broncos  Brock Peters (1927–2005), an American actor  Brock Pemberton (1885–1950), a theatrical producer, director and founder of the Tony Awards  Brock Tredway (b. 1959), an ice hockey player who played one game in the National Hockey League  Brock Yates (b. 1933), executive editor of American automotive magazine Car and Driver  As a middle name:  Ferdinand Brock Tupper (1795–1874), a British author Other  Barthold Heinrich Brockes (1680–1747), a German poet  Kelly Le Brock (b. 1960), an American actress  Places In Canada  Brock, Ontario, a township in Ontario  Brock, Saskatchewan, a village in west central Saskatchewan, Canada  Brock No. 64, Saskatchewan. a rural municipality in Saskatchewan, Canada  Brock Island, a Canadian arctic island located in the Northwest Territories  Brockville in Ontario In England  Brock, a small village in Lancashire, England where the A6 road crosses the River Brock  River Brock, a river in Lancashire, England In the United States:  Brock, Nebraska, a village located in Nemaha County, Nebraska  Brock, Ohio, an unincorporated community  Brock, Texas  Schools  Brock High School, a high school in Brock, Ontario  Brock University, a comprehensive university located in St. Catharines, Ontario  Brock Faculty of Business, Brock University's business school  Brock University Students' Union, a union representing the undergraduate students at Brock University  Brockenhurst College, a sixth form college in Hampshire, UK  Ships  HMS Sir Isaac Brock, a British naval vessel destroyed at the Battle of York prior to being completed  USS Brock (APD-93), a United States Navy high-speed transport in commission from 1945 to 1947  Sports  Team Brock (disambiguation), a series of Australian motor racing teams  "To brock", a pro wrestling slang term named after Brock Lesnar; see Brock Lesnar#Coining of "to Brock",
1
Brock may refer to:  Animals  Brock, a traditional name for a badger; derived from the Irish Gaelic word, broc, meaning badger  Buildings  Broch, an Iron Age round tower fortification unique to Scotland  Businesses  Brock Motors, a short-lived automotive company founded in 1921 in Amherstberg, Ontario  Crowne Plaza Niagara Falls –
REEL LIFE QUOTES: 1977:"I suggest a new strategy, R2: let the Wookie win"
Star Wars
R2, R02, R.II, R.2 or R-2 may refer to:  Entertainment  R2: Reign of Revolution, an online game  R2 (Rock'n'Reel), a British music magazine  R2-D2, a character from Star Wars films and books  R2 unit, a line of droids in the fictional Star Wars universe  Code Geass: Lelouch of the Rebellion R2, a 2008 anime series  Resistance 2, a video game  Relapse 2, a 2009 album by rapper Eminem  Patricio Rey y sus Redonditos de Ricota or R2, an Argentine rock band  Timepass by Rashmi Ranjan or R2  Region 2, the DVD region code for Europe (except Russia, Ukraine, and Belarus), Middle East, Egypt, Japan, South Africa, Swaziland, Lesotho, Greenland  A button on the Sony PlayStation 2 and PlayStation 3 controllers  Science  R2, a symbol for the coefficient of determination of a linear regression  R2, the two-dimensional vector space of real numbers in mathematics  R2: Risk of explosion by shock, friction, fire or other sources of ignition, a risk phrase in chemistry  R2 RNA element, a cis-acting element identified in R2 retrotransposons which is involved in priming the reverse transcription process   ATC code R02 Throat preparations, a section of the Anatomical Therapeutic Chemical Classification System  Haplogroup R2 (Y-DNA), a human Y-chromosome haplogroup  receptor 2, the second in line of a series of cellular receptors, generally at the end of an acronym  Gangrene ICD-10 code  Robonaut 2, a humanoid robotic development project conducted by NASA's Dextrous Robotics Laboratory, deployed on the International Space Station  Computing  .r02, a RAR file extension  Microsoft Windows Server 2003 R2  Microsoft Windows Server 2008 R2  Microsoft SQL Server 2008 R2  ADC, Analog to Digital Converter, usual in MCUs, is often built with 2R resistance ladder  Radare2, an open source reverse engineering framework also known as r2  Transportation  R2 (Rodalies de Catalunya), a commuter rail line in Barcelona, Catalonia, Spain  R2 (SEPTA)  Wilmington/Newark Line (R2 Wilmington/Newark line)  Warminster Line (R2 Warminster line)  Autopista Radial R-2, a Spanish radial motorway connecting Madrid to Guadalajara and passing through Alcobendas and connecting to N-320  R2 expressway (Slovakia)  Orenburg Airlines by IATA code  Vehicles  DFW R.II, a 1918 German bomber aircraft  Fiat R.2, a 1919 Italian reconnaissance aircraft   HMS Zest (R02), a World War II British Royal Navy Z-class destroyer  Jaguar R2, Jaguar Racing's car for the 2001 Formula One season  Linke-Hofmann R.II, a World War I German bomber aircraft  Panzer 35(t), a Czech tank whose Romanian model was known as the R-2.
1
Polikarpov R-2, a Soviet Union copy of the 1931 British Airco DH.9A light bomber aircraft  Ross R-2 Ibis glider  Subaru R2, a 2003 Japanese car  USS R-2 (SS-79), a 1918 R-class coastal and harbor defense submarine of the United States Navy  Other  R-2 (missile), an improved version of German V-2 rocket manufactured by the Soviet Union  R2 signalling, a family of telephony protocols for line and register signalling  BBC Radio 2, a British radio station  R2 Clan a competitive Call of Duty clan  R2 Ratna Raj Singh
"BLACK" MOVIES: In this film Theresa Russell played a young woman who seduced, married & then murdered wealthy men
Black Widow
She has also been widely praised for her roles in The Razor's Edge (1984), Black Widow (1987), Impulse (1990), and The Believer (2001), as well as the HBO mini-series Empire Falls in 2005 with Ed Harris.
3
Williams2008JoleneAunt Kay2009He's Just Not That Into YouMrs.
Out of 7Lexi's Mom2011Rid of MeMrs.
Nancy BurnhamTV film2003Chasing AliceTV film2003Love
BOND, ATOMIC BOND: Nitrogen molecules are linked by 2 bonds called this, the ratio of a circle's circumference to its diameter
pi
Three tracks, "Life at a Risk", "Ghetto Zone", and "Ask You Somethin'" do not appear on this album, despite appearing on the original Forgotten Freshness.
3
Music and lyrics Forgotten Freshness Volumes 1 & 2 features several scrapped songs intended for some of the group's previous albums.
With a change in beat and lyrics, the song "Hey, Vato" became "Wagon Wagon" found on the Ringmaster album.
Some lyrics from the song are also found on the song "Who Asked You," also on Ringmaster.
CUBE IT!: 2
8
Released in 1998, it features unreleased and lost tracks that are harder to find elsewhere.
3
Forgotten Freshness Volumes 1 & 2 is a rarities album by American hip hop group Insane Clown Posse.
Forgotten Freshness Volumes 1 & 2.
"Piggy Pie (Old School)" is the original version of the song "Piggie Pie," found on The Great Milenko.
THE FORTUNE 500: AMR & UAL are the top 2 companies in this industry
airline
In the beginning of the song, a news brief is played about the actual looting of Northwest Airlines Flight 255 which crashed on I-94 in Detroit in 1987.
3
Psychopathic Records/Island Records/PolyGram Records. "Fat Sweaty Betty" was eventually given away as a single at the group's two "Mental Warp" shows.
"Piggy Pie (Old School)" is the original version of the song "Piggie Pie," found on The Great Milenko.
The song "Southwest Strangla" was planned to be released on Shaggy 2 Dope's second solo album Shaggs The Clown, but the entire project was scrapped.
NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC KIDS: The photo seen here ran to coincide with an exhibit on the terra-cotta warriors of this country
China
There are currently 17 international editions of National Geographic Kids magazine published in these countries and regions: Australia/New Zealand, Azerbaijan, Bulgaria, China, Egypt, Germany, Indonesia, Israel, Italy, Latin America, Lithuania, Netherlands, Slovenia, South Africa (English & Afrikaans editions), Spain, Turkey and United Kingdom.
3
National Geographic Kids Magazine thumb|187x187px|Cover of 1978 edition of National Geographic World (known as National Geographic Kids since 2002) featured a sculpture by Jim Gary from its lead article.
Wanna Be a What?!
National Geographic believes in the power of science, exploration, and storytelling to change the world.
OPERA: Donizetti's operas include "Anna Bolena" & "Lucrezia" this
Borgia
The etymological origin of the name is debatable, but is thought to come from the Latin lucrum, meaning "profit, wealth".http://www.behindthename.com/name/lucretia Other sources believe it may be of Etruscan origin, though its original meaning has been lost.http://wiki.name.com/en/Lucretia  People Lucrezia (singer), Italian singer Lucrecia (singer), Cuban singer Lucrezia Aguiari, Italian coloratura soprano Lucrezia Borgia (1480–1519), the daughter of Rodrigo Borgia, who became Pope Alexander VI Lucrezia Bori, Spanish opera singer Lucrecia Crescent, minor character in the video game Final Fantasy VII Lucrezia d'Alagno (1430–1479), close acquaintance of Alfonso V of Aragon Several women named Lucrezia de' Medici Lucrécia Jardim (born 1971), Portuguese athlete Lucrecia Kasilag (1917–2008), Filipino composer Lucrecia Martel (born 1966), Argentinian film director Lucrezia Noin, character from the anime Mobile Suit Gundam Wing Lucrezia Smith, character in Virginia Woolf's 1925 novel Mrs Dalloway Lucrezia Tornabuoni, Italian poet  Other Lucrezia Borgia (opera), opera by Gaetano Donizetti.
2
Lucrezia or Lucrecia  may refer to:  Lucrezia (given name): an Italian name, feminine of the Roman name Lucretius.http://www.etymonline.com/index.php?term=Lucretia&allowed_in_frame=0
See also Lucretia, legendary figure in the history of the Roman Republic Lucretia (disambiguation) for other uses  References  Category:Italian feminine given names
